Job Title,Job Detail
Algorithm Engineer - AML Engine Dedup,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team:
Focus on CV technologies video representation and large-scale retrieval, build the duplicated/similarity relationship between billions of videos, support TikTok and its affiliates global products with services as deduplication, originality recognition, copyright detection and content moderation

- Build the Dedup and Copyright system, supports billions of users all over the world;
- Based on the product requirements, develop models and systems to detect duplicated and similar materials among billions of videos;
- Introduce new AI technologies to our online system and improve the performance;
- Improve the reliability of the system, manage the challenges of scale and complexity;

Qualifications

- Bachelor or higher degrees in computer science or related discipline;
- Min 3 year of experience in Machine Learning, familiar with at least one DeepLearning framework, e.g. PyTorch, Tensorflow.
- Experienced in Multimedia or Computer Vision, e.g. Image/Video/Audio retrieval, Representation Learning, Re-Identification, Unsupervised/Self-supervised learning.

Preferred Qualifications
- Authors of published papers in top academia conferences;
- Winners of algorithm and machine learning competitions such as ACM and Kaggle;

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
IT Security Officer,"Want to be a part of our team?

Develops and executes security controls, defences and countermeasures to intercept and prevent internal or external attacks or attempts to infiltrate company email, data, e-commerce and web-based systems. Maintains hardware, software and network firewalls and encryption protocols. Administers cybersecurity policies to control physical and virtual access to systems. Performs network security audits and testing and evaluates system security configurations to ensure efficacy and compliance with policies and procedures. Conducts penetration testing and vulnerability assessments of applications, operating systems and/or networks. Responds to cybersecurity breaches, identifies intrusions and isolates, blocks and removes unauthorized access. Researches and evaluates cybersecurity threats and performs root cause analysis. Assists in the creation and implementation of security solutions. Provides information to management regarding impact on the business caused by theft, destruction, alteration or denial of access to information and systems.

Working at NTT

Develops and executes security controls, defences and countermeasures to intercept and prevent internal or external attacks or attempts to infiltrate company email, data, e-commerce and web-based systems. Maintains hardware, software and network firewalls and encryption protocols. Administers cybersecurity policies to control physical and virtual access to systems. Performs network security audits and testing and evaluates system security configurations to ensure efficacy and compliance with policies and procedures. Conducts penetration testing and vulnerability assessments of applications, operating systems and/or networks. Responds to cybersecurity breaches, identifies intrusions and isolates, blocks and removes unauthorized access. Researches and evaluates cybersecurity threats and performs root cause analysis. Assists in the creation and implementation of security solutions. Provides information to management regarding impact on the business caused by theft, destruction, alteration or denial of access to information and systems. #ownyourfuture

What will make you a good fit for the role?

Standard career level descriptor for job level:
Seasoned and experienced professional
Has full understanding of specialisation area
Resolves wide range of issues in creative ways
Fully qualified, career level, career journey-orientated
Uses good judgement in selecting tools and methods to solve problems
Networks with senior internal and external people in own area of expertise
Receives little instruction on day-to-day work, receives general instructions on new assignments
Typically requires demonstrable related experience with a Bachelor’s or equivalent degree; or moderate level experience and a Master’s or equivalent degree; or a PhD or equivalent degree without experience; or equivalent work experience"
Senior Firmware Engineer,"Job description:

Design and implement software of embedded devices and systems from requirements to production and commercial deployment
Identify technical challenges and risks and accordingly develop resolutions
Develop technical specifications based on product requirements
Design, develop, code, test and debug system software
Review code and design
Follow coding practices and recommend process improvements to build efficient systems
Interface with hardware design and development
Support software QA
Provide post development support
Work closely with other team members to deliver and optimize system performance.


Key Requirements:

Degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science and Electronics Engineering or its equivalent
Strong C/C++ programming skills
Possess good understanding of software development life cycles.
Good knowledge of microprocessor and microcontroller architecture.
Possess knowledge of basic electronics hardware and its interfacing to software systems.
Familiar with software configuration tools and concepts.
Experience in firmware systems design, embedded development in Linux and Real-time operating systems is an added advantage"
Sharepoint Developer," Hands-on delivery is required
 Understand client’s requirements, current IT infrastructure, application framework. Work with Business Analysts, Solution architect and Development Project Managers during project implementation.
 Understand client requirements and deliver appropriate solutions. Expected to maintain industry knowledge of Microsoft software and hardware products / services and trends in order to select the best solutions to meet business requirements.
 Understand agile implementation process, and support ITSM process
 Implement all standards and guidelines in the integration, application, data, infrastructure, solutions, security and technology domains.
 Perform delivery hands-on works with team to complete deliverables. Ensure execution is performed and timelines are met.
 Minimum 4-5 years’ experience in development, maintenance & administration of SharePoint farms, intranet portals, ADFS integration, Azure and SharePoint online sites in competitive environments.
 Aware of industry standards and complete life cycle of software development using Agile/Scrum methodology.
 4+ years of experience in Microsoft technologies
 Have hands-on experience with SharePoint 2013 / 2016/ 2019 / SP online
 Hands-on experience with .Net C# , MVC JavaScript MS SQL Development
 Understand SharePoint Online Azure Dynamics 365 (Basics) , Power Platform CSS PowerShell ADFS
 Experience in doing fitment analysis of customer requirements
 .NET Framework Version 4.5 or above including strong WCF experience
 Any degree in Bachelor or Computer Science
 Technically accomplished IT Professional for a position to work in the emerging technologies
Good to have
 SQL Server 2008 or above with custom report experience through SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS)
 Microsoft Azure or AWS knowledge
 Have hands-on experience of delivering Singapore Public sector Dynamic Projects and understand GCC
Employee Status : Full Time Employee

Shift : Day Job

Travel : No

Job Posting : Jan 03 2023

Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 185 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @Cognizant."
Software Engineer (System Integrator),"Job description:

Key Responsibilities:

Software Engineer (system Integrator) working on technical cross-system integration requirements for military simulators and simulators systems:

Analyse project requirements to develop functional specifications for cross-system integration
Design and implement application gateway module to link up different software systems
Collaborate with other software developers to implement and integrate complex software system
Conduct test and debugging of the implemented modules and overall system Documentation design and writing


Key Requirements:

Degree in Computer Science or Game Design (and/or equivalent)
Proficient in C++ programming language
Good computer science fundamentals: Software design pattern, data structure, algorithms
Good knowledge in Object Oriented Programming, methodologies, and best practices in software coding
Familiar with SDLC development process such as waterfall and Agile methodology
Knowledge of Interoperation protocols such as HLA and DDS will be advantageous
Experience in developing simulation software will be advantageous"
RDS IT Software Engineer,"Job Reference #

264915BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Are you an experienced mainframe engineer with all-round skills? Would you enjoy helping us to modernize a legacy application landscape? Can you imagine yourself working as part of a multi-location team? If so, we’re looking for someone like you.

As a part of an agile team of software engineers delivering software with latest technology standards:


design and implement Reference Data Services based on event driven architecture
conduct code reviews and test software as needed, along with participating in application architecture and design and other phases of Agile delivery
focus on engineering clean solutions reducing complexity, address technical debt and support
enhance DevOps landscape through highly automated quality assurance, build, and deployment-related tool chains
conduct requirements-gathering activities, like evaluating services, using a variety of internal and external data and conducting end user interviews
assist in quality control

Your team

You’ll be working in the Reference Data System delivery team in Singapore, partnering with a similar team located in Zurich. Our role is to provide business applications (customers) with a global infrastructure for the management, maintenance and use of reference static data. Our clients are the business application owners and the data owners of reference data tables. We provide customers with tools and public services for maintaining, managing and using shared reference data, backed up by our own dedicated support organization. We offer standardization, central storage and global synchronization for master and control data, ensuring high data quality and enabling programming to be parameterized and structured more flexibly.

Your expertise


5+ years of experience as a Software Engineer in agile software development
long-standing experience designing and building complex applications with relational databases
solid experience in COBOL programming, JCL, Relational Databases, Network databases, CICS online transactions, Web Services and Restful Services.
experience in tools like Workload Scheduler, Dynarep, IA tool, TOAD for DB2, SDLC Modelling Platform suite of tools.
good knowledge of SQL, JCL and IBM Debugger and IDz
very good understanding of CI/CD including containerization and usage of tools such as GitLab, Ansible, Nexus, Maven, Splunk, and many more (hands-on experience preferred)
experience of working in the Scrum Master role is an advantage.

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Data Engineer (E-Commerce) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About the team
The mission of the Data Platform Singapore Business Partnering (DPSG BP) team is to empower the TikTok business with data. Our goal is to build a Data Warehouse that can cater to batch and streaming data, Data Products that provide useful information to build efficient data metrics & dashboards which will be used to make smarter business decisions to support business growth. If you're looking for a challenging ground to push your limits, this is the team for you!

Responsibilities
- Translate business requirements & end-to-end designs into technical implementations and responsible for building batch and real-time data warehouse;
- Manage data modeling design, writing and optimizing ETL jobs - collaborate with business teams to build data metrics based on data warehouse;
- Responsible for building and maintaining data products;
- Involvement in rollouts, upgrades, implementation and release of data system changes as required for streamlining of internal practices.

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline;
- Solid computer basic knowledge (e.g. data structure & algorithms, SQL and networks);
- Strong coding capabilities and mastering at least one programming language (e.g. C/C++/Java/Python/Golang);
- Passionate about data warehouse, ETL development, data analysis and eCommerce;
- Good communication skills and a fast learner of new business and technology knowledge.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
"Software Engineer (App Engine / PaaS), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.

Relying on the cloud native environment, PaaS team creates a simple and easy-to-use service hosting platform for developers, improving research and development efficiency whilst reducing service maintenance costs. PaaS comes from a service perspective, connecting developers with the cloud native environment, shielding developers from the learning costs of kubernetes, and providing functions such as service hosting, code release, capacity adjustment, as well as operation and maintenance governance.

PaaS has been integrated into our development ecosystem, helping to build service discovery, quota management, access control, monitoring, alarm, and log transmission. At present, our PaaS platform has hosted most of the company's online services and is in a leading position in the industry in terms of the number of services and cluster size. We look forward to those who are interested in challenging tasks and are willing to embrace cloud native computing.


Responsibilities
- Design and develop application engines serving billions of requests;
- Design TikTok and its affiliates' business-oriented architecture, and construct an efficient online/offline service hosting platform;
- Provide solutions for internal product lines, and integrate with business-oriented frameworks;
- Design and develop key components of PaaS.

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree or above in computer science or a related field;
- Good programming habits and proficiency in Go/Python;
- Practical experience with large-scale distributed system development and maintenance;
- Excellent modeling and problem solving skills;
- Familiarity with microservice architecture and microservice governance;
- Familiarity with the best practices of R&D process.

Preferred Qualifications
- Experience with cloud computing development;
- Familiarity with Docker, Kubernetes, GAE, SAE, etc.;
- Experience with full stack development and private cloud platform components."
Frontend Software Engineer - TikTok,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Singapore, Beijing, Shanghai, Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.

About the Team:
The TikTok Fundamental team will focus on frontend development. We will also focus on understanding our users, identifying opportunity areas, prioritizing the problems we must solve, and rapidly creating innovative user experience solutions. We are looking for experienced frontend engineers to develop web/hybrid applications.

Responsibilities:
1. Responsible for the frontend development of the TikTok fundamentals business, including but not limited product for users, middle platform and operating platform, etc.
2. Responsible for development of various client scenarios in TikTok, including but not limited to WebApp, Hybrid dynamic scenarios, etc.
3. Realize with high-quality design and code to create the ultimate user experience for TikTok.
4. Take the lead on the exploration of new and efficient front-end development models to ensure R&D efficiency and delivery quality.

Qualifications

1. B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
2. 3+ years experience in developing frontend web applications, with proven experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp.
3. Experience in solving browser compatibility issues and optimizing front-end performance.
4. Good understanding of business, technical abstraction and system module design.
5. Great to have hybrid development experience.
6. Great to have large-scale website architecture experience.

Preferred Qualification
Minimum 3 years relevant work experience from a large-scale internet business

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Data Engineer (Data Platform) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About the Team
The mission of the Data Platform Singapore Business Partnering (DPSG BP) team is to empower the TikTok business with data. Our goal is to build a Data Warehouse that can cater to batch and streaming data, Data Products that provide useful information to build efficient data metrics & dashboards which will be used to make smarter business decisions to support business growth. If you're looking for a challenging ground to push your limits, this is the team for you.

Responsibilities
- Translate business requirements & end-to-end designs into technical implementations and responsible for building batch and real-time data warehouse;
- Manage data modeling design, writing and optimizing ETL jobs - collaborate with business teams to build data metrics based on data warehouse;
- Responsible for building and maintaining data products;
- Involvement in rollouts, upgrades, implementation and release of data system changes as required for streamlining of internal practices.

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or a related technical discipline;
- Solid computer basic knowledge (e.g. data structure & algorithms, SQL and networks);
- Strong coding capabilities and mastering at least one programming language (e.g. C/C++/Java/Python/Golang);
- Passionate about data warehouse, ETL development, data analysis and eCommerce;
- Good communication skills and a fast learner of new business and technology knowledge.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Quality Assurance Engineer Intern (Big Data),"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities

Work closely with team members to develop, test and deliver high quality products.
Understand business scenarios and tech design, and be able to design test cases.
Be able to do test automation based on existing test frameworks, or write scripts to increase efficiency.
Ability to execute test plans and identify issues through testing.
Able to track issues through to resolution, actively participate in projects and deliver on time.
Understanding project dependencies and risk mitigation.

Requirements

Undergraduate or Post-graduated students in Computer Science/Engineering or related majors.
Experience with at least one of Java, Python, Javascript or other programming languages.
Familiar with Linux, database operations or cloud services.
Strong analytical and trouble-shooting skills.
Strong verbal and written communication.
Strong work ethic and attention to detail.
Self-managed, proactive work style, ability to work well in teams.
Good knowledge in Big Data pipelines or AI is a plus.
Having software development or testing experience is a plus.

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Backend Engineer Intern (E-Commerce) - 2023,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2023. Internships at TikTok aim to offer students industry exposure and hands-on experience. Watch your ambitions become reality as your inspiration brings infinite opportunities at TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 08 May 2023 to 28 July 2023 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - Starting 09 January 2023 or 14 August 2023

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit in either internship period. Please state your availability clearly in your resume (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About the team
The mission of the Data Platform Singapore Business Partnering (DPSG BP) team is to empower the TikTok business with data. Our goal is to build a Data Warehouse that can cater to batch and streaming data, Data Products that provide useful information to build efficient data metrics & dashboards which will be used to make smarter business decisions to support business growth. If you're looking for a challenging ground to push your limits, this is the team for you!

Responsibilities
- Translate business requirements & end-to-end designs into technical implementations and responsible for building batch and real-time data warehouse;
- Manage data modeling design, writing, and optimizing ETL jobs - collaborate with business teams to build data metrics based on data warehouse;
- Responsible for building and maintaining data products;
- Involvement in rollouts, upgrades, implementation, and release of data system changes as required for streamlining of internal practices.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate or Postgraduate currently pursuing a Degree/Master/PhD in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline;
- Solid computer basic knowledge (e.g. data structure & algorithms, SQL and networks);
- Strong coding capabilities and mastering at least one programming language (e.g. C/C++/Java/Python/Golang);
- Passionate about data warehouse, ETL development, data analysis, and eCommerce;
- Good communication skills and a fast learner of new business and technology knowledge.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Machine Learning Engineer (TikTok) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the TikTok Data Team
Our TikTok team is responsible for developing state-of-the-art machine learning models and strategies to improve user consumption experience, inspire creativity, build a fair and flourishing ecosystem.

Responsibilities
- Build industry leading recommendation system; develop highly scalable classifiers and tools leveraging machine learning;
- Understand product objectives and machine learning techniques; improve model and recommendation strategy;
- Understand user behavior and apply ML algorithms to optimize content consumption and production experience;
- Understand content security strategy and apply ML algorithms to improve content audit process;
- Work with cross functional teams to grow company's product in important regional markets.

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in computer science, computer engineering, information systems or a related technical discipline from a university
- Solid experience with data structures or algorithms
- Software development experience through hands on coding in a general purpose programming language
- Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, data mining or other related areas
- Strong communication and teamwork skills
- Passion about technologies and solving challenging problems

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Backend Software Engineer (TikTok Wallet) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the TikTok Engineering Team
TikTok is a truly phenomenal app in the world we live in today. Boasting millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is the best platform for content creators to reach users. With the enormous growth of live streaming in recent years, our mission is to inspire real-time interactions and help live streamers connect to people from all corners of the globe.

We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming in TikTok. You will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for all live streamers and audience alike.

Responsibilities
- Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to continuously improve TikTok Wallet and payment system to create a stable, agile and robust in-app wallet system;
- Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability, performance and reliability of the messaging product;
- Develop large-scale software systems that power the TikTok app;

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline
- Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++
- Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms
- Possess good team communication and collaboration skills
- Prior internship experience in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications is a plus
- Highly advantageous to have experience on building large-scale and safety wallet systems

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
"Frontend Software Engineer, Global E-commerce (Platform Governance and Service)","Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the Team
Global e-commerce is content e-commerce business with international short video product as the carrier. It is committed to becoming the first choice for users to discover and purchase good products with affordable prices. Global e-commerce business team hopes to provide users with more tailored, active and efficient consumption experience, enabling merchants to receive stable and reliable platform services in different scenarios such as live e-commerce, short video content e-commerce, so as to make more affordable and high-quality products sell easily and a better life within reach.

E-Commerce’s Governance and Experience is a global team responsible for ensuring a safe and trustworthy marketplace for not only our buyers, but also our sellers and creators. We constantly work on areas such as risk detection abilities, fairness and sustainability of the E-Commerce ecosystem, content and commodity quality, friction-free experiences to drive improvement.

Responsibilities:
- Responsible for the frontend development of Governance & Experience solutions for TikTok Shop in Singapore.
- Responsible for the development of scenarios like risk management, moderation, service-care and etc
- Constantly improve customer experience through quantitative service monitoring, alerting, and the use of data and operational dashboards

Qualifications

- Bachelors or higher degree in Computer Science or related technical discipline with at least 2 years of work experience.
- Excellent web technology skills, particularly with HTML5/CSS3/JavaScript
- Experience with any major Javascript framework like ReactJS, AngularJS, VueJS, or equivalent
- Experience with any major frontend technologies like Micro Frontends, BFF, or equivalent
- Experience with Node build systems
- Experience using asynchronous APIs
- Excellent problem-solving and analytical thinking skills
- Enthusiastic about quality, design, and user experience
- Great to have large-scale website architecture experience.


TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Site Reliability Engineer,"Job Purpose

The Site Reliability Engineer (SRE) combines software development and system engineering to build and run distributed solutions in a secured multi-tier heterogeneous environment to safeguard, provide and continuously improve the software and systems behind the organization’s cloud platform solutions.

The Job
With a vigilant eye on their availability, latency, performance and capacity. Ultimately, you will view software as the primary tool to optimizing systems, building infrastructure and removing mundane work through automation.
As part of Cloud Engineering Team, the SRE Engineer engages in and improves the full lifecycle of cloud platform solutions from design, deployment, operation and refinement with accuracy and in compliance with organization policies and security requirements.
The SRE Engineer treats operations as a software problem and therefore will code to automate repetitive tasks and optimize cloud operations.
Support services before go-live through activities like system design consulting, developing software platforms and launch reviews. Maintain post-live cloud operations by measuring and monitoring availability, latency and overall system health with any prompt and remediative actions.
Support cloud adoption including new system and legacy system migration from traditional infrastructure to GEL Cloud platform
Scale sustainably through mechanisms like automation and evolve services/solutions, leveraging IaaS, CaaS and PaaS by pushing for changes that improves reliability and velocity.
Deploy product updates as required while implementing integrations when they arise. Specifying, documenting and developing new product features, and writing automating scripts.
Work with open-source technologies, CI/CD, SCM tools as necessary, and source control such as Bitbucket, implement organization containers (e.g. Docker and Kubernetes). Stay current with industry trends and propose new ways for business improvements.
Takes accountability in considering business and regulatory compliance risks and takes appropriate steps to mitigate the risks.
Maintains awareness of industry trends on regulatory compliance, emerging threats and technologies in order to understand the risk and better safeguard the company.
Highlights any potential concerns /risks and proactively shares best risk management practices.
Our Requirements
Strong hands on experience with using and designing VMware solution such as NSX-T, vRealize Suite, vSphere/vCenter is mandatory.
Strong working experience on patch management for operating systems and middleware is mandatory. Eg, Windows, RedHat, Websphere, Weblogic, MSSQL etc.
Hands on experience with creation and maintenance of VMware server templating/blueprints such as RedHat, Windows server templates.
Hands on experience with infrastructure-as-code, orchestration, configuration management and provisioning tools is mandatory.
Systematic problem-solving approach, coupled with effective communications skills and a sense of ownership and drive.
Strong experience in a Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) environment with strong appreciation of change/version control process and methodologies.
Worked with DevOps and Automation tools (E.g. Selenium, SOAPUI, Bamboo, Jenkins, Ansible, Marvin, Github, Bitbucket, Nexus, Jira, Confluence etc).
Must code, debug and optimize code and automate mundane tasks.
Experience in scripting languages such as Bash, Batch, Powershell, YAML etc.
Experience implementing distributed solutions in a secured multi-tier heterogeneous environment is mandatory.
High level of integrity, takes accountability of work and good attitude over teamwork.
Takes initiative to improve current state of things and adaptable to embrace new changes.
About Great Eastern

Established in 1908, Great Eastern places customers at the heart of everything we do. Our legacy extends beyond our products and services to our culture, which is defined by our core values and how we work. As champions of Integrity, Initiative and Involvement, our core values act as a compass, guiding and inspiring us to embrace the behaviours associated with each value, upholding our promise to our customers - to continue doing our best for them in a sustainable manner.

We work collaboratively with our stakeholders to look for candidates who exhibit or have the potential to embrace our core values and associated behaviours, as these are the key traits that we expect from our employees as they develop their careers with us.

We embrace inclusivity, giving all employees an equal opportunity to shine and play their role in exploring possibilities to deliver innovative insurance solutions.

Since 2018, Great Eastern has been a signatory to the United Nations (UN) Principles of Sustainable Insurance. Our sustainability approach around environmental, social, and governance (ESG) considerations play a key role in every business decision we make. We are committed to being a sustainability-driven company to achieve a low-carbon economy by managing the environmental footprint of our operations and incorporating ESG considerations in our investment portfolios; improving people’s lives by actively helping customers live healthier, better and longer; and drive responsible business practices through material ESG risk management.

To all recruitment agencies: Great Eastern does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our email or our employees. We will not be responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
Software Engineer/Developer,"Job Reference #

268961BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Do you want to increase visibility of advanced threats? Can you drive cross domain intelligence through risk/threat scenarios? Will you coordinate the effective identification of risks, and reduce our global attack surface?

We’re looking for software engineers to:


provide technology solutions that will solve business problems and strengthen our position as digital leaders in financial services.
analyze business requirements for Cyber Security and Cyber Threat Intelligence
design, plan and deliver sustainable solutions using modern programming languages and the latest enterprise curated platform services from Azure
providing technical expertise and recommendations in assessing new software projects and initiatives to support and enhance our existing applications
conduct code reviews and test software as needed, along with participating in application architecture and design and other phases of SDLC
see that proper operational controls and procedures are implemented to process move from test to production via the software development life cycle process

Your team

Cyber & Information Security is a global organization within the Chief Information Digital Office – Technology Services. Our services focus on identity management for users, access management for applications and infrastructure, directories, detecting/preventing measures for cyber threats, and exchanging/storing data securely. We provide consolidated and reliable security services that implement secure design principles, and create best-fit solutions.

As an expert in Cyber & Information Security and internet technologies, you'll be part of our team in Singapore & Zurich and work closely with the internal project team and also the Cyber Risk Insights Shared Platform (CRISP) team.

Our team is global, diverse and collaborative as we work across organizations to keep our technology, applications and the businesses they support secure.

Your expertise


software engineer/developer focused on UI/UX and data-driven decision making
able to code in React/JavaScript/Typescript & Python also desirable
know-how to apply standards, methods, techniques and templates as defined by our SDLC for example, code repository handling, code inspection, penetration-avoidance
produce secure and clean code that is stable, operational, consistent and well-performing
design, plan and deliver solutions in a large-scale enterprise environment
bachelor’s degree or equivalent with a focus in STEM

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Security Engineer,"Position Overview

As a part of the Security Operations department, the incumbent will review and conduct technical security risk checks. SecOps is also aligned to SOC for incident management handling, reporting and investigation. Candidate will have to work on technical risk management. Handle day-to-day incident reporting and support investigation to healthcare IT platform

Role & Responsibilities

Work closely with internal and external stakeholders to manage the technical risk, security operation and SOC.
Act as IT security expert for department in the areas of cyber security assessments, PAM, Database, WAF, Firewall and EPP/EDR.
Perform risk assessment and identify mitigation controls for the risk area identified.
Enhance and build cyber threat detection user cases and assist in analysing and reducing false positive.
Identify infection/compromise in the company utilizing threat intelligence and indicators of compromise (IOCs) from different threat Intel sources and regulators
Ensure all compliance and security control functions are performed timely and orderly.
Drive continuous improvement of procedures and processes related to cybersecurity process and operations monitoring.
Track, monitor and valid security-related and risk issues, provide an action plan to rectify the issues and prevent recurrence.
Generate security reports and metrics as required.
Provide timely and periodic update to managements on its security matters.
Stay current on the latest Cyber threats, Attacks and vulnerabilities etc

Requirements

Good diploma or degree in Computer Science, Digital Forensic or Engineering preferred

Professional security related qualification (e.g. CEH, ECIH/GCIH, ITIL) will be favourable although not mandatory technical skills

At least 3 - 6 years’ experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems

Ability to write and communicate in English is an added advantage

Added advantage to have knowledge in security technology like firewall, IPS, WAF, endpoint

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Lead Data Engineer,"Job Description
Best Practices for Data Architecture and Design Patterns for Data Engineering Use-Cases.
Real-time data feeds from database sources like MySQL, Oracle, and MS SQLServer using the “Change Data Capture Engine” aka “CDC”.
Sub-Second Real-Time Data Pipelines using AWS Kinesis, Glue, Spark, Kinesis, Lambda.
Batch Pipeline Orchestration using on Apache Airflow and Jenkins.
Auto Scalable platform using Kubernetes on EKS.
Org Wide Master Data Management, Data Catalog Engine, and Data Quality Engine.
Code Repo Pipeline to automate Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment (CI / CD).
Structure Tables with Partitioning and Clustering to increase Cost & Performance Benefits.
Guide Data Analysts and Data Scientists to write efficient queries and workloads.
Data Sharing with On-Demand Encryption/Decryption which can operate at Scale.
Running Containerized ETL workflow at scale.
Job Qualifications
Bachelor Degree of Computer Science, IT or equivalent.
At least 6-7 years of data engineering experience with team leading/guiding/mentoring experience.
Have strong fundamentals in Computer Science concepts like Cloud Computing Architecture, Distributed Computing, High-Velocity Data Processing, Lambda Architecture, etc…
Strong Data modeling and managing Distributed Computing Platforms for Data Processing.
Advance knowledge of SQL and writing resource-efficient queries.
Have at least 2+ years of professional programming experience in Python.
Have at least 2+ years of experience in running a data processing pipelines on either of these: Google BigQuery, Redshift, Hadoop, Presto, Spark, or KSQL.
Have at least 2+ years of experience in writing Sub-Second Real-Time pipelines using Google DataFlow(Apache Beam), PubSub, Kinesis Stream, Lamda, etc...
Have a good understanding of how Kubernetes clusters work and scale on-demand.
Have adequate experience using Containers for Data Engineering workload.
Implemented manual or automated tools for Data Quality, Catalog, and Lineage.
Uphold the sense of Frugality across Data Engineering teams.
Have Good Interpersonal and Presentation Skills to explain and promote Best Practices across the organization with both technical as well as non-technical stakeholders."
Site Reliability Engineer - Live Streaming Infrastructure,"Responsibilities

Live Streaming Infrastructure is a world-leading live streaming platform that provides end to end solutions for TikTok and also our external partners. We are building the next generation live streaming platform including live streaming ingestion, processing and delivery, to provide the best live streaming experience for our billions of users around the world. By joining us, you will have the opportunity to not only tackle the challenges of large scale distributed system across multi regions which generates huge amount of data from billions of users, but also the unique challenges from live streaming to provide low latency and high quality videos for different types of network connectivity even when the live event can go viral anytime to generate huge amount of traffic.

Responsibilities:
- Build global infrastructure for multi-media processing, storage and transport, to serve billions of users all over the world.
- Build live streaming CDN, and deploy nodes globally.
- Build tools, automations, visualisations and monitors to facilitate the operation and optimisation of the global infrastructure.
- Engage in and improve the whole service lifecycle, from inception and design, through deployment, operation and refinement.
- Scale up systems sustainably through mechanisms like automation, and initiate changes that improve system reliability and processing speed.

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical background involving software/system engineering, or equivalent working experience.
- Good programming experience with at least one of the following languages: C, C++, Java, Python, or Go.
- Strong in analytical skills and the ability to solve real world problems in a fast moving environment
- Experience in designing, analyzing and building automation and tools for large scale systems
- Experience in building solutions for AWS, Google, Azure, and other cloud services
- Familiar with Unix/Linux operating systems.
- Good understanding of every aspect of microservice architecture, and hands on experience in troubleshooting in large scale distributed systems."
"Associate Engineer, iOS","Rakuten Group, Inc. is the largest e-commerce company in Japan, and third largest e-commerce marketplace company worldwide, with over 1.5 billion registered users worldwide. The Rakuten brand is recognized worldwide for its leadership and innovation, and provides a variety of consumer and business-focused services including e-commerce, e-reading, travel, banking, securities, credit card, e-money, portal and media, online marketing and professional sports. The company is expanding globally and currently has operations throughout Asia, Western Europe, and the Americas.

Rakuten Viki is a premier global entertainment streaming site where millions of people discover and consume primetime shows and movies subtitled in more than 200 languages, by our community of fans. With billions of videos viewed and more than 1 billion words translated, Viki brings global entertainment to fans everywhere!

As an Associate Engineer, iOS at Viki, you will be working on improving our app. We are currently looking for a passionate and collaborative engineer who’s willing to explore new technologies and excel at existing ones. As part of the team, you will get the chance to work with an amazing team of Mobile Engineers whose work is featured in various tech blogs and news sites. Our apps are regularly featured in multiple countries around the world as well. In addition, you get the chance to learn about media streaming across multiple platforms (TV, Mobile Apps, Chromecast, and so forth).

Key Requirements Include:

Good understanding of software engineering principles and tools (such as SOLID principles git, CI/CD integration)
Experience building a native iOS app (either at work or from personal projects)
Experience with Swift and iOS frameworks (UIkit, SwiftUI)
Ability to find innovative ways to increase application efficiency and connectivity, with an emphasis on improving the core user experience
Collaborate closely with product and design teams to create innovative user interfaces and features, optimized for mobile platforms
An interest to explore, investigate and prototype leading-edge concepts
Fresh graduates are welcome to apply

Bonus Qualifications:

Video streaming experience
Product design experience with focus on user analytics
Experience testing frameworks
Prior experience working with in-app subscription

Rakuten is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, color, ethnicity, ancestry, national origin, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, marital status or any legally protected status. Women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and protected veterans are encouraged."
Machine Learning Engineer (Content Safety) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About the team
Our engineering team is responsible for developing state-of-the-art machine learning models and algorithms to protect our platform and users from the content and behaviors that violate community guidelines and related local regulations. With the continuous efforts from our team, TikTok is able to provide the best user experience and bring joy to everyone in the world.

Responsibilities
- Build industry-leading content safety systems for TikTok;
- Develop highly-scalable classifiers, tools, models and algorithms leveraging cutting-edge machine learning, computer vision and data mining technologies;
- Understand product objectives and improve trust and safety strategy and model's performance;
- Work with cross-functional teams to protect TikTok globally.

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline;
- Have a passion for computer science and Internet technology, strong interest in software quality assurance;
- Solid data structure and algorithm foundation;
- Good computer foundation, highly proficient in at least one of the programming languages: Python, Java, Go, C/C++;
- Good logical thinking and team communication skills;
- Prior internship in quality assurance work is a plus.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Associate FullStack Developer -Cloud Microservice/Platform Engineering,"610539BR

Introduction

IBM Application Consultants (Fullstack Developer)work directly with our clients on key initiatives. You will have the opportunity to build an in-depth understanding of their business issues and implement organizational strategies that drive adoption of change. We are looking for experts who can build credibility and trust with our clients and provide knowledge that addresses individual and unique business needs.

Your Role and Responsibilities

We’re looking for a real-world problem solver with the technical savvy to make the impossible, possible. As an Associate Fullstack Developer, you’ll help design, develop, and integrate solutions using future-looking technologies, techniques, and products our clients demand today. You’ll work with clients, finding solutions to major challenges by translating system requirements into the design and development of customized systems in an agile environment.

Work You Could Do As An Associate Fullstack Developer

Define, detail and scope the technical requirements into solution architecture and drive an independent project from an architectural stand point.
Design, develop and/or re-engineer application components, and integrate software packages, programs, and reusable objects residing on multiple platforms.
Support Technical Consultants and lead in building solutions and providing technical mentoring and guidance

Qualification

Demonstrated programming proficiency and experience with 1 of the following (Java, C++, Python, SQL, Hadoop, HTML, Spring Boot, Tableau, Angular, React), as well as systems design/development, and information technology course work
Exposure to web services, microservices, API, DevSecOps and multiple Java application frameworks highly desired
Familiarity with Hyperscalers (e.g. AWS, Azure, Google, IBM Cloud) and cloud-native technologies
Ability to translate business requirements into technical solutions
Ability to thrive in an ever changing, technology based consulting environment, using agile development techniques

SG_hotjobs

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

Please refer to the JD

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

Please refer to the JD

About Business Unit

IBM Services is a team of business, strategy and technology consultants that design, build, and run foundational systems and services that is the backbone of the world's economy. IBM Services partners with the world's leading companies in over 170 countries to build smarter businesses by reimagining and reinventing through technology, with its outcome-focused methodologies, industry-leading portfolio and world class research and operations expertise leading to results-driven innovation and enduring excellence.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Computer Vision Scientist - Applied Vision,"Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok global offices include Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo. Now we are building up an engineering team for the core TikTok product in Singapore.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the Team
Applied Vision team aims to empower business and optimize products with content understanding as the core driver. We carry out research, develop technology and for each scenario, provide a complete content understanding solution and capability matrix. From the perspective of technology and product, we not only provide several standard technical capability, but also go deep into business. Starting from user requests, we incubate solutions and capability matrices that are close to users and scenes. From a technical perspective, all capabilities share basic technologies. From a product perspective, we take technology as the starting point to provide business-oriented solutions.

Responsibilities
- Conduct cutting-edge research in the fields of computer vision and machine learning;
- Ensure technologies get successfully applied to ByteDance's products;
- Incubate new products with computer vision and machine learning technologies.

Qualifications

1. Master's degree or above in Computer Science or equivalent majors with 4+ years of relevant working experience
2. Research experience in but not limited to the following areas (as main authors of published papers at CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, etc.):
- Image/video search
- Image/video classification/understanding
- Object detection, segmentation, and tracking
- Scene understanding
- Facial analysis
- Pose and gesture
- 3D vision
3. Highly competent in algorithms and programming, prefer winners in ACMICPC, NOI/IOI, Top coder and Kaggle;
4. Ability to work and collaborate well with team members;
5. Ability to work independently

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Cloud Native Java Full Stack Developer,"Job Reference #

267056BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Are you an enthusiastic technology professional? Are you excited about seeking an enriching career; working for one of finest financial institutions in world? If so, you are the right person for this role. We’re seeking technology and domain leaders to join our development team within WMPC IT (Wealth Management Personal Corporate) We are looking someone who can:


implement and deliver high quality software solutions / components for the Credit Services platform that conform to architectural standards
manage and 'own' significant development tasks end-to-end
demonstrate superior collaboration skills in working closely with other development, testing and implementation teams to roll-out important regulatory and business improvement programs

The role will be based in Singapore.

Your team

You will be part of the CDIO WMPC Development team that is responsible for


deliver solutions needed and L3 support to CA's and Credit Risk Control (CRC) personnel to support the UBS lending business
providing the systems that ensure Bank's compliance to various regulatory requirements.

Your expertise


minimum of 7 years of experience in enterprise application and system design with OOA/OOD, UML Modeling
project / hands-on experience with J2EE standard and Test Driven Development (TDD) approach
strong programming experience in Java8 and above version, Application Server/Tomcat in Unix, Windows platforms, Spring boot, Spring MVC frameworks, Hibernate, Junit, Gradle, Maven and Gitlab
strong experience in UI frameworks, REACT and Angular
sound knowledge of Spring security framework’s authentication and authorization and resolving application security issues identified
working experience in designing and developing Rest Microservices, Pivotal Cloud Foundry (PCF), Ansible playbook for deployment, multi-threaded and batch systems, database design and PL/SQL
good to have skills: Good knowledge of Mockito, Liquibase, PostgreSQL, APIGEE, Azure cloud

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Backend Engineer Intern (Cloud Infrastructure) - 2022,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 09 May 2022 to 29 July 2022 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the two above internship period.
Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.


About the Cloud Infrastructure team
Our Cloud Infrastructure team is primarily responsible of the infrastructure and technical architecture. We are the bottom layer of the company's technologies, supporting all of our core products and business lines (including TikTok, Douyin and Toutiao), serving hundreds of millions of users every single day.
In our team, you will develop and work on next-generation infrastructure technologies. We design and build fast, scalable, reliable and efficient systems that can support industry leading volumes and highly dynamic workloads - reaching millions of people across the world. You will tackle world-class challenges in distributed computing, large-scale system design, mass data storage, orchestration & scheduling, messaging middleware, etc.
You can also expect to work within a highly talented and diverse team, motivated to solve the world's toughest technical challenges. Joining our team, you will be put through a structured and effective training and mentoring plan that is focused on your personal and technical development.
If you are someone aiming for high, enthusiastic about tackling the world-class hard problems in technology, and enjoy working in a highly-collaborative and diverse environment, this would be the right place for you!


Responsibilities
- Engage in projects that relate to the underlying infrastructure and technical architecture for all mid-platform and business lines, including but not limited to distributed storage, big-data computing, orchestration & scheduling, as well as messaging middleware;
- Participate in the development of products such as large-scale PaaS services, DevOps platforms, R&D infrastructure for cloud-native, mass data storage systems, and distributed computing systems.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate or Postgraduate currently pursuing a degree/master in software development, computer science, computer engineering, information systems or a related technical discipline;
- Strong interest in computer science and internet technology;
- Proficient in at least one general programming language (e.g. Java, C, C++, Golang, Python, etc.);
- Excellent communication skills with a strong thirst for knowledge and a keen desire to learn.


By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@tiktok.com."
Senior Pega Developer,"Key Responsibilities
Assure the quality of all deliverables. Co-ordinate with delivery manager/team
Ensure implementation are done as per Pega Guardrails
Bring in design/coding best practices
Work closely with key stakeholders to deliver projects and solutions.
Follow Pega PRPC best practices and guideline. Perform regular code and design reviews.
Manages code migration from development through to production.
May provide technical direction and system architecture for individual initiatives.
Job Responsibilities
Certified Pega SSA with 5-6 years expr in Pega Design & Build
Atleast 4 years of experience in building and implementing model-driven, enterprise-level business solutions using Pega Systems PRPC tool
Hands on Experience in Designing and Implementing Enterprise Class Rules, PRPC Flows, Activities, Repots and Correspondence, PRPC Case Management and various PRPC Integrations
Experienced in integration with Database, Web Services, MQ and Middleware technologies.
Exposure to a variety of technologies, including, but not limited to J2EE (JSP, Servlets, EJB, XML, Java) & SQL Server.
Demonstrated knowledge of and applicability of Object-Oriented techniques and principles.
Previous experience delivering users stories on an Agile delivery team.
Integrates applications by interface specification and designing database architecture and server scripting.
Participates in the design, development and implementation of complex applications, often using new technologies.
Works under minimal supervision, with general guidance from more seasoned consultants.
Strong communication and presentation skills. Mentor other developers.
Employee Status : Full Time Employee

Shift : Day Job

Travel : No

Job Posting : Jan 04 2023

About Cognizant

Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 185 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @Cognizant."
"System Engineer, Infrastructure (Office 365 / O365)","Exposure to latest technologies
Concrete project timeline
About The Company

Our Client is a fast growing company within their industry. They have a well-established presence of more than 10 years. With rapid expansion plan, they are now looking for an IT Infrastructure Specialist (O365) to join their team.

About The Job

Reporting to the IT Manager, your role involves:

Supporting and maintaining the Windows Servers and Office 365

Managing Active Directory (Print Servers, Backup and etc)

Providing technical support (Computer, printer, mobile device and etc) to users

Handling networks (Routers, switches, VoIP)

Handling disaster recovery planning

Managing external vendors, ensuring SLA is being adhered to

Skills And Experience Required

As a successful applicant, you will have at least 2 years of experience in Office 365. Proven track record in Windows server and IT networks or system will be of added advantage.

Exposure to Office 365 ATP / Advanced Threat Protection will be highly preferred.

Whats on offer

This is an excellent opportunity to join an established MNC.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may contact Hoon Teck TAN at 6510 3633. (EA: 94C3609/ R1219669).

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
Senior Front-end Developer (Futures),"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities

Implement new user-facing features in Binance’s products which have a huge amount of PV everyday.
Write client-side code to create super-fast, easy-to-use, web-based applications which include website for both desktop and mobile browsers, and hybrid in-app pages.
Optimize web applications to maximize speed and scale.
Build libraries and frameworks that support complex web applications, speedup development efficiency and improve code quality.

Requirements

3-5+ years developing production JavaScript code and strong knowledge of Vue/React.
Understanding of state-management patterns such as Redux, Flux or similar.
Proven track record of delivering projects with high quality UI.
Bachelor’s/Master's degree in computer science, engineering or equivalent industry experience.
Experience in developing responsive web sites for diverse clients from high powered desktop computers to small footprint mobile devices.
Experience with modern front end technologies (styled system, webpack, etc).

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Software Engineer,"Job description:

Job Description

Interface with end-customers to understand system needs.
Translate user requirements into software design.
Document write-up, including design manual, operation manual, test cases and software manual.
Design and develop secure applications, either standalone interfaces or serverside programming.
Work with team members for software development and integration and testing to meet delivery.
Debug and resolve technical issues to ensure application availability.
Continuous enhancements to better meet evolving requirements and changes.
Assist in executing post project support and implementation for the company.


Requirements

Degree in Electrical Engineering or Computer Engineering, or related disciplines.
Experience in C/C++ and/or C# software development.
Good working knowledge experience in development tools.
Knowledge in networking, information security and standards is an added advantage.
Lab-based design and development environment with vendor liaison meetings & presentations, and site works.
Able to work with minimum supervision and work on any ad-hoc assignment tasks.
Good documentation practice and well version control on document updates.
Good communication skills, meticulous and organized.
Able to work well with tight deadlines.
A good team member."
ETL Developer,"About Us

Beyondsoft International (Singapore) Pte. Ltd. was set up in 2007 and established as the regional headquarters for the Southeast Asia (SEA) and European markets in September 2015. Based on our vision of ""Using technology to promote social progress, economic development and become a global customer preferred partner"" and our concept of ""Beyond your expectations"", Beyondsoft is committed to provide our customers in countries along the ""Belt and Road"" with comprehensive solutions and products and creating commercial value for customers to realizing continuous businesses development.

Our Core Business Includes

IT development servicesProviding customers with IT consulting, software research and development, software and hardware testing, system integration and operation and maintenance, data analysis and other services;
New retail solutions and productsThrough intelligent products, helping small and medium-sized enterprises (SMEs) realize the digital transformation of their daily operations;
Internet of Things (IoT) platform and solutionsComprehensive use of IoT, artificial intelligence, big data, cloud computing and other technologies to provide IoT solutions for intelligent upgrades in cities, parks, buildings and industries, to create a smart future.
For more information, please visit www.beyondsoft.com.

Job Description

System analysis to develop/ maintain/ modify application based on requirement
Error handling and user support for any inquire
Gathering user requirements, defining system functionality, and writing code
Create and modify Database Table/View/Function etc.
Maintain and develop report in Tableau
Develop and implement ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) data flows required for reporting or dashboard solutions
Documenting all technical and system specifications for all ETL processes and perform unit tests on all processes and prepare required programs and scripts
Analyze and interpretation of all complex data from source systems and provide resolutions to all data issues and coordinate with the BI Team to validate all requirements
Perform testing and validating all data flows and prepare all ETL processes per business requirements and incorporate all business requirements into all design specifications
Extensive experience in performing root cause analysis on ETL processes to resolve issues and validate all data

 Qualification & Skills

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/ Information System/ Information Technology or equivalent
Minimum 3 years of experience writing complex SQLs, expertise in performance tuning of SQL
Experience in the scheduling of all ETL processes and prepare documents for all data flow diagrams
Knowledge and prior experience in Tableau, Python, R, Power BI, etc.
Extensive experience in using SAP Data Services is added advantage
Good communication skills and able to work independently
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills"
ICT Infrastructure System Engineer (Entry level),"What The Role Is
As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.
Information Technology
IT systems form the backbone of our operations. We are looking for individuals with passion and IT expertise, to help us improve the delivery of our systems and services. The Board’s IT systems support a high daily volume of financial transactions for CPF members. In addition to keeping the lights on, the Board also keeps pace with the external environment through innovation in its IT systems.
What You Will Be Working On
You will be involved in the plan, design, install, test, deploy and maintenance for a variety of operating systems including
middleware, storage and VMware. In your role, you will protect our critical information and systems to build solutions and
maintain systems changes through monitoring, configuration, patch management, to achieve high availability, security and
resiliency.
What We Are Looking For
Interest in servers administration, operating systems, current equipment and technologies where you will respond to
hardware issues as they arise to help build, test and maintain the servers
Academic or working knowledge of a range of products such as Linux, Unix, Active Directory, VMware, Microsoft
Windows, Netbackup, etc
Good understanding of server, storage and networking concept
Enjoy troubleshooting to perform root cause analysis and to provide technical support
Ability to perform routine/scheduled maintenance of the systems including all backups
What You Can Expect
A challenging and rewarding career
A variety of formal and informal training where you can hone your skills in the evolving technology landscape
Promotion opportunities through your capability and on the job performance
A friendly work environment with like-minded colleagues to co-create and collaborate together
A hybrid work model where you can work remotely up to 50% of the time
A productive yet growth-oriented workplace with flexible dress code where you are empowered to decide your appropriate outfit for the day
Comprehensive rewards package
Annual leave and pro-family leave
Medical and dental benefits
Access to recreational activities
Position is on 2-year full time contract directly under the payroll of CPF Board with potential for emplacement into permanent position"
DevOps Developer,"609992BR

Introduction

At IBM, work is more than a job - it's a calling: To build. To design. To code. To consult. To think along with clients and sell. To make markets. To invent. To collaborate. Not just to do something better, but to attempt things you've never thought possible. Are you ready to lead in this new era of technology and solve some of the world's most challenging problems? If so, lets talk.

Your Role and Responsibilities

Work along with the Project teams to onboard new squads in the DevOps environment.
Guiding the continuous integration, continuous deployment and continuous testing.
Work closely with the development team and operation team to create DevOps strategy and toolset that suits the individual squads.
Setup, deploy and maintain scalable, high availability systems
Perform and automate deployment and security hardening of systems
Automate and build up scalable systems/environment using latest technologies (e.g. Kubernetes)
Automate security hardening in testing, deployment and production setup based on industrial best practices
Setup and maintain CI/CD, automated testing, development and delivery environments
Writing scripts/programs for service monitoring and health check of systems
Day-to-day monitoring, backup, deployment and maintenance of systems

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

Experience with cloud orchestration, configuration management and auto-scaling techniques
Thorough knowledge of networking, routers, switches, and WiFi setup.
Good knowledge of storage technologies, such as NAS, SAN, SDS
Experience with automation tools such as Salt/Chef/Puppet/Ansible
Experience with load balancing setup for TCP/IP, HTTP, DNS, routings.
Knowledge of IT security standards, for instance from CIS or IM8.
Experience on building and developing CI/CD pipeline and workflow (Gitlab CI/CD preferred)
Good hands-on experience on using AWS Cloud Formation scripts for configuration management and application deployment
Overall knowledge on one or more of the following programming language (Java, Spring Boot, Node JS, Angular JS, React Native)
Knowledge on continuous integration, test automation, version control, and software configuration management.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

Diploma/Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Communications Engineering or equivalent
Minimum 3 years in software development industry or server infrastructure setup
Experience in software-defined infrastructure (OpenStack, CloudStack, VSphere).
Experience with infrastructure provision tools (Docker, Ansible, Puppet, Chef etc.).
Good understanding of hardware infrastructure systems (network switches, firewalls, routers etc.) and Linux operating system.
Basic understanding of DevOps principles and practices. Knowledge in DecSecOps will be an added advantage.
Self-motivated and good communication skills. Good hands-on experience on using AWS Cloud Formation scripts for configuration management and application deployment.
At least 1-year experience working closely with infrastructure. Experience in Linux, Windows, network troubleshooting is a plus,
Experience on working in an Agile environment, in a close collaboration with developers, Knowledge on continuous integration, test automation, version control, and software configuration management
Excellent communication skills

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Senior Software Developer (React JS + React Native) (1-Yr Contract),"Key Responsibilities
Analysis and interpretation of business requirements to functional and development specification
Implementation of web-based and mobile applications within all phases of the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC)
Implement pixel perfect UI’s that matches design
Drive components contribution and reusability across platforms
Will need to build the Design Library system and which will be used horizontal across all the application.
Understand notion of Web and Mobile framework and how it applies to overall standardization and re-use
Work as part of the squad and deliver in agile model


The ideal candidate should possess
7+ years professional Frontend (Web + Mobile) development experience
Strong communication to collaborate with stakeholders in all levels – (business, product, design, and development)
Strong individual contributor.
Demonstrable experience in Object Oriented JavaScript without the use of a library or framework
Deep understanding of ReactJS & React Native best practices and adherence to it
Passionate about code quality.
Should be hands on Mobile and Web development.
Appreciates automation and devops practices
Knowledgeable in TypeScript , WebPack, ES6/7/8, Redux, CSS3, Styled Components
Experience with Gatsby, Swift, Objective-C, Java, and Kotlin a big plus
Implement pixel perfect UI’s that matches design
Drive components contribution and reusability across platforms
Will need to build the Design Library system and which will be used horizontal across all the application.
Understand notion of Web and Mobile framework and how it applies to overall standardization and re-use
Work as part of the squad and deliver in agile model


We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated."
Release Train Engineer,"About Us

The Dyson software team are responsible for all aspects of the product development lifecycle. Our teams support Research & NPI with bringing their new ideas to like as well as the delivery of all the Embedded software inside the products, the Dyson Link Mobile Apps (iOS, Android & WeChat) as well as the Cloud systems which support our analytics, machine learning and data science teams.

Dyson is moving into new product categories and we are looking to build out a new team to support our ambitions. This team will look at building products based using the Android platform. Over time the team will grow further in the UK, and Singapore. We all come from a variety of backgrounds and experience levels. We believe that teams composed of people from diverse backgrounds are more successful and innovative.

Our teams have the autonomy to manage their own work using Scrum or Kanban frameworks, each honing their ways of working through regular retrospectives and knowledge sharing. We all share a commitment to creating high-quality code, and engineers choose to follow practices such as pair programming, mobbing, and test-driven development. We also regularly share our knowledge and interests peer-to-peer through ‘community meetings’, which have led to the adoption of new technologies and improved cross-team collaboration.

We often need to interact with people from different parts of the business, such as mobile app development, cloud development as well as product management. We plan in 5-sprint ‘increments’, based on the best bits of the Scaled Agile Framework. This gives us more visibility of upcoming work while remaining responsive and allows us to collaborate effectively with other teams within our 15,000-person organisation. Our programs also work with some exciting external partners in USA & Asia.

Mutual trust and respect between team members is important to build a supportive environment where people can do their best work.

About The Role

We have a great opportunity for a Release Train Engineer within the Wearables Software Team based in SEA.

Key Responsibilities

Organize and facilitate SAFe programme activities and ceremonies across the team:- PI Planning day(s), retrospectives, scrum of scrums to ensure teams are aligned and delivery progress is made.
Co-ordinate and facilitate key inter- and intra- ART activties:- The RTEs work together with the Scrum Masters to ensure that dependencies, commitments, impediments, risks and synch-ups are identified, tracked, managed and accurately reported on, whether they be intra-ART, cross-ART or with 3rd parties.
Help 3rd party teams working on Wearables deliver work against objectives efficiently and effectively. Ensure the team are not blocked from progressing. Work with the RTE's from other ART's and scrum masters to deliver to the Agile Release Train objectives. Be a member of the Scrum Master Community of Practice and contribute to the continual improvement of scrum- agile within the Wearables SW Release Train.
Day-to-day work with scrum teams and external development partners to help them remove impediments, coach team members, and help facilitate team agile ceremonies.
Challenge and develop best practice and process improvements within software team and across the wider RDD function.
Agile champion: - The RTE champions agility and the agile principles both upwards into the wider business and through into their ART. Promote self-managing teams whilst providing the support to enable those teams to work as effectively and efficiently as possible.
You will not necessarily have an in-depth understanding of technical aspects, but you will be able to quickly pick-up new concepts and be comfortable with portraying technical information.
Collaborate with colleagues from other disciplines, including test engineers, product owners, Scrum Masters, UX/UI designers and software engineers from both internal & external teams.
Clarification and refinement of user stories and non-functional requirements with the wider Team
About You

Software development experience in requirement analysis, architecture, design, coding and testing of software system.
3 to 5 years’ experience in Scrum Master, experience in Agile delivery, ideally for multiple teams.
Ability to coach, empower and lead teams to self-organisation.
Demonstrable experience of driving continual improvement.
Demonstrable experience of identifying and resolving team impediments.
We expect excellent technical leadership skills and the ability to influence the work of others.
Comfortable engaging with multiple stakeholders.
Good understanding of software development life cycles (Agile) and basic electronics hardware (interface to software systems).
Excellent communication skills (written and verbal); fluent in spoken and written English Independent and reliable.
Able to work with others within and across scrum teams, to ensure that the whole project team succeeds in its goals.

Behaviours

Clear focus and drive for quality & perfection – you’ll be able to find and maintain focus and priority in a rapidly evolving environment.
Curious, inventive and creative - be prepared to solve tough problems and look beyond convention.
Effective communicator - concise and timely communication, managing facts and emotion
Global collaborator - open minded to ideas from other perspectives
Resilient - prepared to be challenged and thrive in change

We Would Love It If You Also Had

Preferable an experienced Release Train Engineer with SAFe Release Train Engineer certification.
Certified Scrum Master
Experience in usage of the Atlassian suite (JIRA, Confluence, bitbucket).
Experience with Android, Linux, C / C++, UML, Python.
A passion for Android, Apps, Data, IoT & software which makes people’s lives better
Knowledge of Android, Embedded Linux or Realtime operating systems
Benefits

Dyson Singapore monitors the market to ensure competitive salaries and bonuses. Beyond that, you’ll enjoy a transport allowance and comprehensive medical care and insurance. But financial benefits are just the start of a Dyson career. Professional growth, leadership development and new opportunities abound, driven by regular reviews and dynamic workshops. And with a vibrant culture, the latest devices and a relaxed dress code reflecting our engineering spirit, it’s an exciting team environment geared to fuelling and realising ambition.

Dyson is an equal opportunity employer. We know that great minds don’t think alike, and it takes all kinds of minds to make our technology so unique. We welcome applications from all backgrounds and employment decisions are made without regard to race, colour, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other any other dimension of diversity."
Full Stack Developer - Hire & Train Program,"Are you looking to start your career as a Full Stack Developer?

A growing number of companies are hiring Developers, and other technology workers who use technical skills to leverage the power of technology within their organizations.

This hire and train program will expose you in working with industry experts across top MNC Companies. It will cover every concept through hands on training, live projects, practical approaches and many more.

What is Hire and Train Program?

Shortlisted candidates have to go for 6-8 weeks virtual classroom training. (You will receive a stipend during training period)
After successful completion of training , you will be assigned to a Project in which you will have to use the technology stack you have learned during your training period.
Evaluation will be done by presenting the assigned Project, and you should be able to showcase all skills you have acquired.
If you are successful, you will be deployed to work with our MNC client.

What is the minimum requirement to join this Program?

Educational Background in Information Technology/Infocomm/Software/Computer Science or any related field
Good communication skills
Basic programming skills is a plus
Willingness to be trained, and commitment to learn Java

Interested Applicants, please email your resume to charmane.lalog@manpower.com.sg (R1767650), stating the position as the subject title in the email.

Charmane Castillo Lalog License No.: 02C3423 Personnel Registration No.: R1767650

Please note that your response to this advertisement and communications with us pursuant to this advertisement will constitute informed consent to the collection, use and/or disclosure of personal data by ManpowerGroup Singapore for the purpose of carrying out its business, in compliance with the relevant provisions of the Personal Data Protection Act 2012. To learn more about ManpowerGroup's Global Privacy Policy, please visit https://www.manpower.com.sg/privacy-policy"
"Staff Engineer, Android","Why apply to Circles.Life?

Circles.Life is not just your digital telco provider. Since our launch, we revolutionised the telco industry by seamlessly integrating both telco and digital lifestyle services on our Circles-X platform. Over the past years, we have captured more than 5% market share in Singapore, launched in Australia and Taiwan while attaining record breaking CSAT and NPS (+50). We were voted the Top Employer in Digital Telco and also became an accredited winner in showcasing excellence in workplace culture in 2019.

About Circles.life

Circles.Life is Asia's first and most successful digital telco and we are on a mission to re-imagine the customer experience for the digital consumer and disrupt the multi-trillion dollar industry. We launched our services in Singapore in 2016, and have since expanded to Australia, Taiwan, Indonesia and Japan. We are leading the market in innovation, customer satisfaction and growth.

Circles.Life was founded by Rameez Ansar (ex-Temasek, BCG), Abhishek Gupta (ex-McKinsey, Bain Capital, StanChart PE) & Adeel Najam (ex- Nokia, Huawei, Starhub), who are supported by an all-star leadership team including C-suite executives from Tata Docomo, Paypal, Vodafone, Bharti Airtel, Hooq/ Singtel, and Flipkart (to name a few)

It now employs 400+ people over 5 APAC offices. It is the portfolio company of Warburg Pincus and Sequoia

Notable accolades from past years include: Top 5 most loved Singapore brands (2nd year running)- YouGov Customer's Choice; Top Telco for Customer Service- Seedly; and Top Employer- Influential Brands (2019)

About This Role

As a Staff Engineer - Android, your key objectives will be to…
Designing, implementing, and extending new and existing product features and platforms, working closely with product, design, and backend development teams
Leading a core group of mobile developers in delivering high-quality software through code reviews and mentoring
Monitoring the performance of live apps and work on optimizing them at the code level
Performing unit and instrumentation tests on code
Helping design and build a reusable mobile development framework and framework components to streamline app development
Taking end to end ownership of the Mobile application and be responsible for driving engineering excellence of the mobile application
Collaborating with the entire development team on a continuous integration and delivery (CI/CD) process for app delivery
We Are Looking For Individuals Who...
Bachelor's degree in computer science, computer engineering or information systems,
Knowledge of CS fundamentals and knowledge of object-oriented or functional reactive programming concepts.
Deep technical knowledge of Java/Kotlin and at least 10 years' experience in Android app development, with at least 2 years of experience at lead level
Strong leadership skills with the ability to convey technical requirements to non-technical stakeholders (Product Managers, Marketing etc.)
Nice To Have
Experience in iOS Development (Objective-C / Swift)
Experience in Backend Development (GoLang, Java, Node js)
Experience in Hybrid Frameworks (Flutter, React Native, Ionic etc.)
Interested to know more about us?
LinkedIn | Facebook | Instagram | Twitter
“Telco start-up Circles.Life snags funding from Warburg Pincus”
“A deep-dive into how Circles.Life can become Singapore's unicorn”
Circles.Life is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, disability or age.

To all recruitment agencies: Circles.Life will only acknowledge resumes from agencies specifically retained for the role.

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted for interviews."
"Solutions Engineer, Singapore","At F5, we strive to bring a better digital world to life. Our teams empower organizations across the globe to create, secure, and run applications that enhance how we experience our evolving digital world. We are passionate about cybersecurity, from protecting consumers from fraud to enabling companies to focus on innovation.

Everything we do centers around people. That means we obsess over how to make the lives of our customers, and their customers, better. And it means we prioritize a diverse F5 community where each individual can thrive.

At F5, we strive to bring a better digital world to life. Our teams empower organizations across the globe to create, secure, and run applications that enhance how we experience our evolving digital world. We are passionate about cybersecurity, from protecting consumers from fraud to enabling companies to focus on innovation.

Everything we do centers around people. That means we obsess over how to make the lives of our customers, and their customers, better. And it means we prioritize a diverse F5 community where each individual can thrive.

Our employees are valued and empowered, collaborative and team oriented, innovative in their approach and passionate about their work. They are reliable, trustworthy and open with a high level of integrity. They value diversity, are inclusive and are committed to a global mindset

Job Overview:

The Solutions Engineer (SE) is a sales and technical role with focus on customer/partners and is part of the sales organization. The SE’s primary responsibility is to support the sales team with technical skills and provide technical knowledge around F5 solutions to our customers. To be effective, an SE needs to have excellent technical skills and knowledge on both F5 products and the “eco-system” that we work in. Fear not, we do provide training and certification to keep abreast with these critical skills!

The high-level objective is to achieve the allocated sales target and selling relevant F5 solutions and products to our customers business needs, in partnership with the Sales Account Manager. From our customer(s) perspective, the SE is a trusted adviser who proactively learns and understands their technical and business challenges and is able to propose effective solutions to mitigate their concerns/offer gainful solutions. The F5 SE not only presents the technical features but also business benefits in the Technical Value Proposition.

This position is based in Singapore.

Sounds interesting? Read on!

What You’ll Do:

Articulate the F5 product strategy, messaging and positioning F5’s value proposition and solutions for customer business objectives
Provide technical expertise through sales presentations, solution designs, solution demonstrations, proof of concepts by various mediums – in-person/virtual presentations, white boards etc
Determine viability of opportunity and map out organizational structure.
Drive the sales process in partnership with the Account Manager, by identifying the Technical Decision Maker, getting their technical validation, support, and sponsorship.
Consistently provide world-class customer service through the customer life cycle
Work collaboratively with internal technical and sales resources, share best practices, updates, offer and seek expertise as the need arises in various opportunities.

How You’ll Do It:

Experience in secure Cloud architectures
Experience with one or more public/private cloud vendors and automation toolsets
Experience with multi-cloud design
Experience with container orchestration solutions (eg: OpenShift, Kubernetes)
Proficient in one or more programming languages (Python, JavaScript, Golang, etc.)

What You’ll Bring:

8 + years of related industry experience
BS/BA or equivalent work experience
Familiarity/experience with F5 or similar industry solution deployment a plus
Relevant certifications a plus

What You’ll Get:

This role reports to the Solutions Engineering Manager who is primarily based out of Singapore with flexibility to work remotely as well.
While we encourage remote/virtual meetings, the nature of the role could require travel
This is a self-driven role, so career growth and development is available at every stage of your career.
Competitive pay, family friendly benefits, and cool perks
Tuition assistance for professional development
Culture of giving back, strong diversity and inclusion interest groups

The Job Description is intended to be a general representation of the responsibilities and requirements of the job. However, the description may not be all-inclusive, and responsibilities and requirements are subject to change.

Please note that F5 only contacts candidates through F5 email address (ending with @f5.com) or auto email notification from Yello/Workday (ending with f5.com or @myworkday.com).

Equal Employment Opportunity

It is the policy of F5 to provide equal employment opportunities to all employees and employment applicants without regard to unlawful considerations of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, sensory, physical, or mental disability, marital status, veteran or military status, genetic information, or any other classification protected by applicable local, state, or federal laws. This policy applies to all aspects of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, job assignment, compensation, promotion, benefits, training, discipline, and termination. F5 offers a variety of reasonable accommodations for candidates. Requesting an accommodation is completely voluntary. F5 will assess the need for accommodations in the application process separately from those that may be needed to perform the job. Request by contacting accommodations@f5.com."
"Solutions Engineer, Entry","Keysight is on the forefront of technology innovation, delivering breakthroughs and trusted insights to the world’s visionaries and innovators in electronic design, test, manufacturing, and optimization. Our ~14,000 employees create world-class solutions in wireless communications, 5G, automotive, quantum, aerospace, defense, and semiconductor markets for customers in over 100 countries. Our technical solutions – and our methods for creating them – help connect and secure the world. Learn more about what we do and how we do it.

Our powerful culture has led to us being independently recognized on Fortune 100’s Best Companies List and we are “Great Place to Work” Certified. We’re driven, collaborative, ethical, and curious, and we value all ideas, especially bold ones. And our culture extends far beyond our own walls. Our corporate social responsibility efforts support our communities, nurture the next generation of engineers, and promote environmental sustainability.

At Keysight, Inclusion & Diversity is an integral part of our core values. We believe that when people feel a sense of belonging, they can be more creative, innovative, and thrive at all points in their careers. We believe everyone should be respected in the workplace and in their communities regardless of race, color, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, ethnicity, religion, disability, veteran status, national origin, or any protected class. We continuously challenge ourselves to grow in our understanding of inclusion by engaging in a wide variety of diversity programs, initiatives, employee network groups and mentoring/development. This is Keysight – People and Culture - YouTube

Job Description
Delivers technical expertise for solution implementation to customer based on Keysight products and services. Focuses mostly on the pre-sales process.
Assists the field organization to meet or exceed sales quota, through the provision of technical expertise. May be client or product oriented.
Contributes to sales account planning. Participates actively in the sales process from deal qualification to deal closure. Owns the deal’s technical closure.
Is knowledgeable of competition and able to identify lockout specification (identify Keysight's competitive advantage over competition).
Analyzes customer requirements and recommends appropriate solution. Is responsible for demos and for enhancing customers’ experience and satisfaction.
Acts as the customer voice to influence future product design that meets customer needs. May also contribute to post-sales activities. Carries overlay quota.
Works on customers' system and solutions engineering assignments with clearly defined objectives
Solves problems of limited scope and complexity

Job Qualifications
Bachelors or Masters Degree or University Degree or equivalent.
No prior experience required: may have up to 2 years' relevant experience.

Job Function

Shift:

Day Job

Schedule:

Full Time (F)

Travel Required:

25 - 50%

Employment Program:

Campus

Duration (Temp Positions Only):

Not Applicable

__________________________________________________________________________________

Careers Privacy Statement

***Keysight is an Equal Opportunity Employer.***

Candidates can be considered to work from the following locations:

APAC : Singapore : Singapore : Singapore

Job ID : 49259"
Front End Developer,"Job Reference #

267639BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Do you believe in collaboration between business- and technical experts to achieve best results? Do you want to design and build next generation business applications using the latest technologies? Do you like to be challenged and encouraged to learn and grow professionally?

Great, we may be the right place for you! We’re looking for a Software Engineer to:


provide technology solutions that will solve business problems and strengthen our position as digital leaders in financial services
design, plan and deliver sustainable solutions using modern programming languages
conduct code reviews and test software as needed, along with participating in application architecture and design and other phases of SDLC
see that proper operational controls and procedures are implemented to process move from test to production

Your team

You will join the crew Client Self Service where we work according to Agile@UBS, this represents the new way of working at UBS with the aim to quickly develop innovative solutions and to digitize key client products end to end. In this crew you will be working in one of our 10 pods running Scrum focused on building digital self-service solutions for existing and prospective clients. Our pods have a proven track record of being first to market and having direct client impact by evolving our solutions accessed by thousands of users every day. Furthermore, while you are working on creating the world's best banking platform you get the chance to join broaden your skills by joining various trainings according to your personal interest, sessions on innovation topics, social events and much more.

Your expertise

In addition to having an open mindset and high motivation you also recognize yourself in this description:


able to code in Java Script
experience with React JS, Redux, Webpack and up to date with the latest Java Script features
knowledge of HTML 5, CSS 3, CSS preprocessor sand responsive web design
developer focused on web applications with REST interfaces ideally within the finance

sector


know-how to apply standards, methods, techniques and templates as defined by our SDLC, for example code reviews and test driven development
produce secure and clean code that is stable, operational, consistent and well-performing
Information technology degree or equivalent with a focus in software development

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
"Data Engineer, Management Insights","As a Data Engineer, your responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Work with data engineering related groups in the support of deployment of processing jobs
Design, build and support data processing pipelines and APIs
Build ETLs/ELTs to extract data from various sources and craft a unified dimensional or star schema data model for analytics and reporting
Continually improve ongoing reporting and analysis processes, automating or simplifying self-service support for business
Architect and build data pipelines to optimize for performance, data quality, scalability, ease of future development, and cost
Work with data science and feature teams to develop and maintain ETL pipelines
Work closely with the Data Architect and Data Scientists to develop plans to enhance the Data Science practice
Build tools and datamarts to enable analytics at a deeper level
Gather requirements, assess gaps and build roadmaps and architectures to help the analytics driven organization achieve its goals
Develop data-related Proof of Concepts to demonstrate feasibility and value to business users
Architect, design, develop and engineering end-to-end data pipelines across multiple data sources and systems of record

Experience and Skills
5+ Years as a data engineer or in a similar role
Technical expertise with SQL Server database, Azure SQL database, Stored Procedures, Azure Data Factory / Synapse, data modeling, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Hands-on experience with SQL Server database, Azure SQL database, Stored Procedures, Azure Data Factory/ Synapse Pipelines
Great numerical and analytical skills
Degree in Computer Science, IT, or similar field
Knowledge on variety of data stores in Microsoft Azure stack (e. g., Azure Data Lake, Azure Blob Storage, Azure SQL DW), messaging systems (e.g. Apache Kafka, Azure Event Hubs) and data processing engines (e. g., Apache Spark, Azure HDInsight) is a plus
Knowledge on PowerBI, Tableau or any other reporting tools
Strong verbal and written communication skills, with an ability to express complex concepts in clear business terminology


Only shortlisted candidates will be contacted by KPMG Talent Acquisition team, personal data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only.

At KPMG in Singapore we are committed to creating a diverse and inclusive workplace. We believe that diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. As an equal opportunity employer, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of age, race, gender identity or expression, colour, marital status, religion, sexual orientation, disability, or other non-merit factors. We celebrate the different talents that our people bring and support every staff member in their journey to achieve personal and professional growth. One of the ways we do this is through Take Charge: Flexi-work, our flexible working framework which enables agile and innovative teams to help deliver our business goals."
Android Developer,"Job description:

Job Responsibilities:

Clarify with client’s business analyst, Business Users and originators of service request.
Analyse user requirements.
Perform impact analyst and recommend technical solutions.
Perform application design.
Perform application build.
Plan and perform Unit, System and Integration Test.
Perform design and code reviews.
Perform code merge and code integration from multiple projects.
Develop a technical deployment approach / plan / solution.
Formulate and execute data migration approach (where required).
Enforce configuration management / version control and other development disciplines.
Control and administer the application environment in the developer and test environment.
Develop technical and user documentation.
Evaluate new technology where required.
Support Disaster Recovery.
Support Production problem solving.
Job Requirements:

At least THREE (3) years of experience in Android mobile app development.
Experience in Android native app development (Java and Kotlin).
Solid understanding of the full mobile development lifecycle
Familiarity with CI/CD, release process and Google Play Console administration
Hands on experience with version control tool such as Git
Strong understanding of mobile app security
Proficiency with RESTful API integration
Knowledge on the latest Android Jetpack Components will be an advantage
Good communication and documentation skills"
Internship - DevOps Engineer,"Who is Equinix?

Equinix is the world’s digital infrastructure company, operating 240+ data centers across the globe and providing interconnections to all the key clouds and networks. We provide 10,000+ customers across almost every industry access to 2,000+ network services, 3000+ cloud and IT services, 450+ content and digital media services, and 4,700+ enterprises.

An internship with Equinix means you will collaborate on work that impacts the world and be surrounded by endless opportunities to learn new skills and grow in varied directions. If you’re a forward-thinking, hard-working college student who loves to learn and wants to make a positive impact on the world while growing your career, join us and help shape the digital world.

Why Join Equinix?

We pride ourselves on our Global Program being an immersive and impactful experience designed to kick start your corporate career and set you up for future success.

Work on real business challenges: You will be assigned with a project and work directly with teams to gain real-work experience, contribute to the business, and impact the digital world.
Be supported throughout your journey: You will be mentored and coached by numerous colleagues, including your managers, subject experts, an assigned buddy and a formal mentor.
Participate in a curated program of workshops and events: Learn from our leaders through our Executive Speaker Series, continue to grow through our workshops and build meaningful worldwide connections through our networking events.
Gain global recognition: We celebrate your time with Equinix and the work you have completed through our Global Ideas Competition “Shark Tank.” This competition provides you with the recognition you deserve and lets you share your work with the global community of Equinix.

Joining our internship program means you will have a chance to secure a future role at Equinix when you graduate!

Opportunity in the Software Engineering Division

As an Intern in the Software engineering division; you will have a great opportunity to work on the latest and greatest technology which helps the application team to roll out new changes faster by the click of a button.

Responsibilities

Learn and adapt to new technologies in a short duration.
Automate application deployment in AWS & on-prem.
Work with the team of engineers to understand deployment challenges.
Design, implement and test code.

Minimum Qualifications

You will be graduating in 2024
You must be available for a full-time internship between May – August 2023
Basic programming ability with at least one programming language.
Good analytical and problem-solving ability
Good academic score

Preferred Qualifications

Preference to computer science, mathematics, and related fields of study
Proficient in any one of the below programming languages.
NodeJS or Python or Go

Good To Have

Basics of IaaS(Infrastructure as a Service), PaaS(Platform as a Service), & SaaS(Software as a Service).
Basics of AWS services
Basics of infrastructure as code (IaS)
Basics of Kubernetes

Equinix will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require sponsorship of a visa

How To Apply

Please submit your application by providing the following.

Up to date resume that includes your availability (start and end date) and expected graduation
Please apply to this job posting only if you are available full time for an internship during the stated period.

What’s Next

The Equinix New to Career team will be reviewing applicants on a rolling basis throughout November and December and will reach out to applicants accordingly. We appreciate your patience while we consider your application.  If you would like to learn about other career opportunities, we have to offer check out our careers page!

Learn more about the program and what former interns have to say about their experience - https://careers.equinix.com/students-recent-grads
Watch this video to learn more on how Equinix is powering the worlds digital infrastructure. https://youtu.be/aTTIbsfP8j0

Visit our Career page here to understand about Equinix COVID-19 Vaccine Policy."
Dotnet Developer,"A global top IT Consultancy firm is hiring for experienced .NET Developers! This is for you if you are experienced in .NET development and CMS!

Apply to this advertisement to not miss out on this great opportunity!
Open to all candidates located in Singapore.

Responsibilities:

Utilizing Microsoft's .NET infrastructure to create software solutions that meet clients' requirements.
Collaborating with coworkers to facilitate the creation of large, complex developments, as required.
Reformulating existing code to ensure adherence to stipulated guidelines.
Checking your code to detect and remedy errors and omissions.
Testing your outputs to ensure that they are in excellent working order.
Ensuring that outputs are visually appealing, user-friendly, and engaging.
Deploying developments and monitoring uptake by the target audience.
Using clients' feedback to inform the creation of subsequent versions of each development.
Remaining abreast of coding and technological changes that will impact your work.

Requirements:
Degree in web design, software engineering, or similar.
Minimum 4 Years’ experience in developing the customer website using .Net technologies C#, .Net Core, ASP.NET Core, Entity Framework.
Understanding of Front end technologies like ANGULAR 6, CSS 3, jQuery
Capacity to use SQL or Postgresql with ease.
Familiar with Test Driven Development and .Net Unit Testing using frameworks like MsTest, xUnit
Outstanding analytical, problem-solving, and communication skills.
Excellent organizational and time management skills.
Experience in Container based development using Docker, Kubernetes.
Experience in AWS ECS/EKS based deployment will be highly advantageous"
Data Engineer | New Projects,"Job description:

Scope of work:

Able to extract, transform and load data into databases.
Able to generate analytics results from the data collected to answer questions from customers' business use cases.
Familiar with DotNetCore Framework and MSSQL.
Knowledge of NGINX and REACT JS is an advantage.
Able to interpret and write technical documents.


What is needed:

Minimum Degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science and Electronics Engineering or its equivalent.
Strong C++ and C# programming skills with at least 1-2 years as a data engineer.
Possess good understanding of software development life cycles.
Working experience in handling projects involving Data Analytics related work is a plus
Attained Agile-related certification such as Certified Scrum Master is a plus"
41041 - Full Stack Developer and SME #222288,"Your field of responsibility

Your responsibilities include
Participate in requirements, design, coding, review & test strategy for technical solutions
Develop functional & technical solutions for the project BOW
Coordinate and manage the integration and UAT phases; ensure resolution of any issues / defects
Coordinate and resolve L3 issues and escalations
Engage and coordinate with our vendor partners to drive the quality of our delivery by using process standardization and best-practices
Act as a SME for Tax domain from Singapore
Propose ideas/detailed technical plans on improvements
Your future colleagues

The team looking for the candidate is Tax IT and part of FSG Tech. It is a global-team with members in Singapore, India, EMEA and the US. This position is for Pune. Majority of the Tax IT team is based out of India, and is led by multiple architects and senior engineers, with experience on a wide horizon of technologies including Big-Data, Reporting & Analytics, GUI etc.

We are a department which values Diversity and Inclusion (D&I) and is committed to realizing the firm’s D&I ambition which is an integral part of our global cultural values.

Your skills and experience

To excel in this role, you should possess
Developer (8-10 Years Exp.) with deep technical skills in DotNet, Java and Database
8-10 years of hands-on working experience in front end technologies like .Net, Java, Angular and Python Technologies/ Database experiences
Database Oracle and MSsql
SQL
Languages - .Net, Java, Angular and Python.
Visualization toolsets - Tableau / Qlik Sense/PowerBI (Optional)
IT Architecture
Knowledge of MS Azure cloud
Strong knowledge in Unix Commands/Shell scripting
Experience with integration of data from multiple data sources
Prepare documentation for design and implementation
Perform design and code review for the team members
Outstanding communication skills, and ability to perform Multi Tasking
Dedication to fostering an inclusive culture and value diverse perspectives
Good to have skills
Knowledge of NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Neo4j.
Knowledge of various ETL techniques and frameworks, such as Flume, kafka
Exposure to SDLC tools, such as JIRA, Confluence, SVN, TeamCity, GIT, Dev-ops, Service-Now
Exposure to L3 application support - analyze and resolve issues
Exposure to Banking / Financial Services and preferably Investment Banking
Familiar with scheduling tools i.e. Control M or AutoSys
Singapore-Singapore-Singapore

222288"
Cloud Engineer,"Job Description
At eazy, our purpose is to love what we do, and constantly challenge the status quo. We strongly believe in a good company culture, having “happy” employees, who provide the best customer service.
We recently rebranded ourselves from previously known as g&m where our journey began in 1975 helping friends with both their personal and business insurance needs. Believing in transparency, we focused on creating an online platform for all consumers to be able to make their own well-informed choices for insurance and services. We hope that in the future, people will see eazy as “the” trustworthy platform for their insurance needs and beyond.
We are looking for an individual who is passionate about designing, implementing and maintaining our cloud infrastructure and ecosystem. He/she will participate in projects that play an important and major role in shaping how our customers will interact with us. These projects include customer-facing website and portal to acquire and retain potential and existing customers. The candidate will understand business requirements, design, implement and maintain the cloud infrastructure and architecture to support the ongoing application developments and integration with other cloud services. He/she needs to be comfortable with cloud technology and architecture. Reports directly to Technology Manager.
A day in the life:
Collaborating with engineering and development teams to evaluate and identify optimal cloud solutions.
Modifying, patching and improving existing systems.
Educating teams on the implementation of new cloud technologies and initiatives.
Designing, developing and deploying modular cloud-based systems.
Developing and maintaining cloud solutions in accordance with best practices.
Ensuring efficient functioning of data storage and processing functions in accordance with company security policies and best practices in cloud security.
Identifying, analyzing, and resolving infrastructure vulnerabilities and application deployment issues.
Regularly reviewing existing systems and making recommendations for improvements.
What you need:
Diploma/bachelor’s degree in computer science or Information Systems, Computer Engineering or an equivalent qualification
Azure Cloud Certification is preferred for this role
At least 3 years' hands on experience deploying, maintaining and troubleshooting cloud infrastructure.
Familiar in Azure Virtual Desktop/Windows Virtual Desktop environment
Preferred experience working in Azure cloud infrastructure.
Experience in SQL Server and Web Server is bonus
Team player and able to work collaboratively with other members in team
Troubleshooting and analytical skills.
Able to multi-task and handle multiple assignments with tight timelines
Please provide your portfolio in addition to your resume. It can be attached softcopy or an URL
What we offer:
Centrally located office in Anson Road, connected to Tanjong Pagar MRT
Empowering of People
Draw your own career map
Promote Agile working environment with Hybrid work option
Passion for building and motivating a dynamic competent team
Collaborative culture that cherishes ideas in a respectful work environment
Competitive Employee Benefits (flexible benefits, medical and wellness program)
Creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives.
Why eazy?
We believe that happy employees are the most productive employees. And that has always been our motto for the office environment."
Software Engineer,"Job description:

Key Responsibilities:

C++ engineer that is responsible for writing, modifying software modules.
To design, build, and maintain efficient, reusable, and reliable code.
Able to translate design specifications into functional modules.
Identify bottlenecks and bugs, and devise solutions to address and mitigate these problems.


Key Requirements:

Diploma or Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a similar field.
Proficient in C++ with fair knowledge of the language specifications.
Strong understanding of object-oriented programming like Inheritance, Encapsulation, Abstraction and Polymorphism.
Knowledge of Unity3D software will be an advantage.
C# with knowledge of scripting, animation, session management, and textures. (will be an added advantage)"
Azure Cloud Engineer,"Our team in Singapore currently has an opening for a Azure Cloud Engineer

<<>>

YOUR ROLE & RESPONSIBILITIES
Create a strategy for establishing a secure and well-managed enterprise environment in Azure
Configure and manage Brenntag's network in Azure, establish our core services in the VNET, enable Azure to serve as a part of our enterprise network
Automation of deployment of resource stacks and associated configurations
Utilize native Azure services to meet Brenntag's technology and resiliency requirements
Drive Identity, access and configuration management as well as monitoring strategy for Azure
Design and implement data protection options, including HA and BCP protection in Azure
Implement security measures as requested by Brenntag's security team


YOUR PROFILE
Bachelor's degree (in Computer Science, Math or Engineering)
10+ years of experience as a full time IT professional
3+ years of experience designing and supporting Azure environments, including IaaS, SaaS and PaaS
Microsoft Azure Certification (MCSE: Cloud Platform and Infrastructure or equivalent)
Hands on experience using the Azure administration available tools
Hands on experience with Azure functions and AVD
Knowledge of at least one other cloud hosting solution in addition to Azure (e.g. Google, AWS).
Experience designing and supporting enterprise core services as well as cloud deployments of such services
Extensive knowledge of the Microsoft Enterprise software products and services
Extensive knowledge in Windows 2019 server roles
Security embedded by nature
Business Continuity and Disaster Recovery planning experience


OUR OFFER

<<>>

INTERESTED?

We look forward receiving your application."
Solutions Engineer,"Reporting to: VP Forward Engineering

Responsibilities :
• Owns and delivers installation, configuration of AI products.
• Participates in solution architecture discussions to estimate hardware sizing.
• Analyses defects and conducts effective triaging.
• Works closely with engineering, product, solution architects in resolving defects.
• Proactively participates in product release cycle and sign off on client releases.
• Supports current ETL designs and code to resolves defects on existing solutions.
• Develops logical and physical data flow models for ETL applications.
Must-Have Skills:
• 2+ years of experience in working with big data application stack
including HDFS, YARN, Spark, Hive and HBase
• 1+ years of experience in AWS Cloud Setup, Cloudera (CDH, CDP).
• 1+ years of experience in Enterprise SW installation especially
packages.

Good to Have Skills:
• 1- or 2-year Experience in ETL in Big Data hadoop environment
(Hive/Hbase knowledge)
• 1 or 2 years of experience in shell scripting or python
• 2+ years of experience in Hadoop Big Data projects Experience with
developing, tuning and debugging code, python/shell scripts loading
into Hive, Mariadb, mysql
• Experience setting up enterprise security solutions including setting
up active directories, firewalls, SSL certificates, Kerberos KDC
servers, etc.
• Experience working with CI/CD tools like Jenkins and various test
report and coverage.

Job Perks:
• Attractive variable compensation package.
• Flexible working hours - everything is results-oriented.
• Opportunity to work with an award-winning organization in the hottest space in tech - artificial intelligence and advanced
machine learning"
NLP Engineer Intern (AI Lab) - 2022,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 09 May 2022 to 29 July 2022 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the two above internship periods.
Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.


About the NLP AI Lab team
Our NLP AI Lab team focuses on solving language barriers and promoting information flowing all over the world. We invite researchers and engineers in machine learning and natural language processing at all levels. We aim at pushing the limits of machine intelligence.


Responsibilities
- Responsible for development of NLP technologies in our products;
- Participate in and support incubation of new NLP technologies;
- Participate in research on NLP technologies.

Qualifications

- Penultimate year undergraduate students with a background in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or a related technical major;
- Rich experiences and strong skills in development of technologies in some of the following areas:
- Machine Translation;
- Natural language understanding;
- Natural language generation;
- Knowledge and reasoning;
- Reinforcement learning;
- Deep learning and representation learning;
- Strong analytical and problem-solving skills;
- Strong computer science and coding skills;
- Able to work and collaborate well with team members.


By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@tiktok.com."
Senior Java Developer - Risk,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities:

Translate business requirements and use cases into functional applications
Design, build, and maintain efficient, reusable, and reliable Java code
Review, test, and verify code for adherence to quality and security standards
Ensure, the best possible performance, quality, and responsiveness of the applications
Identify bottlenecks and bugs, and devise solutions to these problems
Help maintain code quality and organization

Requirements:

5+ years of experience with full lifecycle of project development for Java Applications
Strong skills in Core Java, server-side Java technologies, and Spring frameworks
Extensive experience in software design, architecture, development integration
Solid knowledge of event processing models, multi-threading, enterprise integration pattern, Web Service and REST
Ability to supervise and mentor junior developers on the team
Experience creating React-based UIs
Bonus for degrees in: Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Software Engineering

Preferred Qualifications:

Your active Github/NPM portfolio
Familiarity with the whole web stack, including protocols and server side techniques
Familiar with Server-Side Rendering
Familiar with the source code of one or two famous front-end libraries
Knowledge of TypeScript

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Data Center Critical Facility Engineer III,"Who we are?

Equinix is the world’s digital infrastructure company, operating 200+ data centers across the globe and providing interconnections to all the key clouds and networks. Businesses need one place to simplify and bring together fragmented, complex infrastructure that spans private and public cloud environments. Our global platform allows customers to place infrastructure wherever they need it and connect it to everything they need to succeed.

We are a fast-growing global company with 70+ consecutive quarters of growth. Through our innovative portfolio of high-performance products and services, we have created the largest, most active global ecosystem of nearly 10,000 companies, including 1,800+ networks and 2,900+ cloud and IT service providers in over 26 countries spanning five continents.

Joining our operations team means that you will be at the forefront of all we do, maintaining critical facilities infrastructure as part of a close-knit team delivering best in class service to our data center customers. We embrace diversity in thought and contribution and are committed to providing an equitable work environment. that is foundational to our core values as a company and is vital to our success.

Job Summary

Performs repairs, corrective maintenance, and routine installations. Able to resolve incidents as required.

Responsibilities

Facility/Infrastructure Maintenance

Performs site inspections and monitors the building and IBX alarms
Performs preventative maintenance on site infrastructure (e.g. maintenance of primary infrastructures), or manages vendors
Undertakes repairs and corrective maintenance
Operates critical infrastructure under the supervision of more senior technical staff

Site Administration

Completion of site logs and data gathering issuing for basic permits, such as MOPs and scripts

Incident Management

Responds to all on-site incidents and acts as required

Work Orders

Completes routine work requests and circuit installations

Collaboration

Provides assistance during critical maintenance activities
Effectively collaborates within the department and provides input to peers for general maintenance activities

Additional Projects

Carries out basic infrastructure projects

Qualifications

1+ years experience
High School Diploma

Equinix is an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability.

Visit our Career page here to understand about Equinix COVID-19 Vaccine Policy."
"Site Reliability Engineer, Commerce Services- Apple Media Products","Summary

The Apple Media Products Engineering team is one of the most exciting examples of Apple’s long-held passion for combining art and technology. These are the people who power the App Store, Apple TV, Apple Music, Apple Podcasts, and Apple Books. And they do it on a massive scale, meeting Apple’s high expectations with high performance to deliver a huge variety of entertainment in over 35 languages to more than 150 countries!


These engineers build secure, end-to-end solutions. They develop the custom software used to process all the creative work, the tools that providers use to deliver that media, all the server-side systems, and the APIs for many Apple services.


Thanks to Apple’s unique integration of hardware, software, and services, engineers here partner to get behind a single unified vision. That vision always includes a deep commitment to strengthening Apple’s privacy policy, one of Apple’s core values. Although services are a bigger part of Apple’s business than ever before, these teams remain small, nimble, and multi-functional, offering greater exposure to the array of opportunities here!


Key Qualifications

Strong object oriented design and analysis skills Hands-on coder, with ability to write clear, concise, coherent code Superb verbal and written communications skills.


Experience writing components/frameworks/libraries that achieve software leverage via reuse across problem domains.


Experience with relational databases, JDBC, and object relational frameworks like Hibernate, JPA, iBatis, etc.


Experience using NoSQL solutions like Cassandra, Voldemort, Memcached, Hadoop, etc.


Great debugging skills TCP/IP Networking experience, with protocols like HTTP, HTTPS, SSL.


Ability to self-direct when necessary, all the while supporting strong team dynamics.


Ability to simultaneously face multiple teams and provide excellent attention to detail.


Description

This role works on features that touch all of Apple Media Products Commerce services. This ranges from account management, App, music, and video purchase/download/entitlement, subscription management, and a lot of new features coming to the Apple product ecosystem. You will perform analysis, derive strategies, and write code to ensure that all Apple Media Products' financial transactions maintain key characteristics. This includes ACID integrity, scalability, availability, fault tolerance, and security. We will find opportunities for software reuse across problem domains. Similarly for design and code components/libraries/frameworks to support that reuse, and refactor code to achieve higher levels of use in the codebase. Using 3rd party and hand-rolled solutions, we will build infrastructure for caching, messaging, and workflow management, that will be used by other teams in the Commerce group.


Education & Experience

BS degree in computer science or equivalent field with 5+ years or MS degree with 3+ years experience, or equivalent.


Apple is an Equal Opportunity Employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We also take affirmative action to offer employment and advancement opportunities to all applicants, including minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities. Apple will not discriminate or retaliate against applicants who inquire about, disclose, or discuss their compensation or that of other applicants.


Role Number: 200393781"
Data / Java Engineer- Binance Accelerator Programme,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Job Responsibilities

Develop and maintain data engineering systems across the data lifecycle, including data pipelines for batch and streaming applications, data storage layer and data processing engines
Develop APIs to support high throughput data processing, feature engineering, risk algorithms and data science use cases.
Develop data quality monitoring and alert systems to ensure high availability and high quality data sources.
Design and upgrade data architecture to support new data applications, technical enhancements and business requirements.

Job Requirements

Only fresh graduates or candidates with 1-3 years of experience need apply.
Understand in Java language, Spring framework, and micro-service architecture.
Proficient in big data pipeline development including batch and streaming processing.
Understanding with big data components (e.g. Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Spark streaming, Flink, Presto, Hbase, Kafka, Zookeeper, Airflow, Elasticsearch, Redis)."
Senior Cloud Native Developer,"Job Reference #

268092BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Are you an enthusiastic technology professional? Are you excited about seeking an enriching career; working for one of finest financial institutions in world? If so, you are the right person for this role. We’re seeking technology and domain leaders to join our development team within WMPC IT (Wealth Management Personal Corporate). We are looking someone who can:


Implement and deliver high quality software solutions / components for the Credit Services platform that conform to architectural standards.
Manage and 'own' significant development tasks end-to-end.
Demonstrate superior collaboration skills in working closely with other development, testing and implementation teams to roll-out important regulatory and business improvement programs.

The role will be based in Singapore.

Your team

You will be part of the CDIO WMPC Development team that is responsible for


deliver solutions needed and L3 support to CA's and Credit Risk Control (CRC) personnel to monitor Credit Risk exposure of its global Front Office functions.
providing the systems that ensure Bank's compliance to various regulatory requirements.

Your expertise

Must have requirement:

– Degree in Computer Science or equivalent/higher.

– 10 years of experience in enterprise application and system design with OOA/OOD, UML Modeling.

– Project / hands-on experience with J2EE standard.

– Strong programming experience in Java8 and above version, Application Server/Tomcat in Unix and Windows platforms for more than 5 years.

– Hands on experience in Spring boot, Spring MVC frameworks, Spring Cloud Contract, various Microservice design pattern, Hibernate, TDD, Kubernetes, Postgres, Maven and Gitlab.

– Strong working experience with database design and PL/SQL a must.

– Working knowledge on Autosys.

– Sound knowledge of application security issues such as authentication, authorization and auditing.

– Strong communication skills and good command of English. Excellent technical writing skills.

– Able to work under pressure, independently and proactively in a fast-paced team environment with multiple deadlines

Good to have skills:

– Good knowledge of Mockito, Gradle, Liquibase, SOAP, Azure Cloud and Restful Webservices.

– Experience With Internet/intranet Infrastructure/integration Projects Preferred

– Working experience in Unix shell scripting, Perl scripting, Pivotal Cloud Foundry (PCF) and Ansible playbook for deployment

You are

– A team player and highly collaborative. You can work closely with other developers, requirement analysts, and testers

– A great communicator, with superior inter-personal and influencing skills.

– Someone with a flair for technology and is adept at leveraging the latest tools and technologies to increase team productivity and collaboration across dispersed teams.

– Someone who has a ""can do"" attitude.

– Someone who has an eye for Quality.

– Someone who is able to challenge the status quo.

– Able to engage with people across all levels and has excellent people management skills.

– Someone who can simultaneously work on multiple projects.

– Someone with a general ability to pick up information quickly and turn around deliverables under strict time and quality constraints.

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Software Maintenance Engineer - ST,"About Us

Beyondsoft International (Singapore) Pte. Ltd. was set up in 2007 and established as the regional headquarters for the Southeast Asia (SEA) and European markets in September 2015. Based on our vision of ""Using technology to promote social progress, economic development and become a global customer preferred partner"" and our concept of ""Beyond your expectations"", Beyondsoft is committed to provide our customers in countries along the ""Belt and Road"" with comprehensive solutions and products and creating commercial value for customers to realizing continuous businesses development.

Our Core Business Includes

IT development servicesProviding customers with IT consulting, software research and development, software and hardware testing, system integration and operation and maintenance, data analysis and other services;
New retail solutions and productsThrough intelligent products, helping small and medium-sized enterprises (SMEs) realize the digital transformation of their daily operations;
Internet of Things (IoT) platform and solutionsComprehensive use of IoT, artificial intelligence, big data, cloud computing and other technologies to provide IoT solutions for intelligent upgrades in cities, parks, buildings and industries, to create a smart future.
For more information, please visit www.beyondsoft.com.

Job Description

Provide a detailed level of technical assistance to the customers
Support customers by responding within the designated SLA
Investigate and troubleshoot issues, developing solutions for customers while understanding their needs
Perform impact analysis and coordinate implementation
Monitor and improve the system
Carry out routine maintenance work
Proactively update customers on the work progress to ensure the expectations are met
Enhance applications based on customer request or by identifying opportunities for improvement, making recommendations, designing, and implementing systems

Qualification & Skills

Bachelor’s degree or higher in Computer Science/ Information Technology/ Engineering
Minimum of 3 years of experience in software programming languages including React.js and Node.js
Experience in various Operating Systems such as Windows, Linux, and Ubuntu
Experience in AWS platform and Docker Engineer is added advantage
Knowledge in databases such as MS SQL
Ability to manage and grow existing customer relationships by delivering high-quality support
Solid software engineering experience
Advanced troubleshooting and debugging skills, with a passion for problem solving and investigation
Able to support 24x7 within team rotation arrangement will be added advantage"
Data Engineer,"Sephora is a global leader in omnichannel beauty retailing, and a division of LVMH – Moët Hennessy Louis Vuitton. At Sephora, we stand together, and we stand for something more. For the empowerment, exploration, and opportunity to impact people’s lives through the unlimited power of beauty. Every day we reimagine beauty, discover new brands, and influence positive change. Data plays a significant role in that.

We successfully operate more than three thousand points of sale across the Americas, Europe, the Middle East, and Asia. Together, we aim to animate the most loved beauty community in the world. Here in Asia, our teams run omnichannel businesses in 11 markets across the region (9 different markets in Southeast Asia), in addition to cross-border e-commerce to several more. Our success is built on innovation, a unique product portfolio, market-leading digital capability, and our unique customer experience. With ambitious growth plans, we always look for talented people who aspire to build businesses and develop themselves. Sparked by energy and excitement, our passion is contagious. We are united by a common goal – to reimagine the future of beauty.

We’re a data-driven omnichannel business with a special focus on e-commerce (our platform is built in-house!). The data team builds and maintains data management and Machine Learning capabilities to power both customer-facing services and internal data products. We manage a large-scale data platform in Google Cloud, relying heavily on BigQuery, Kubernetes, and Terraform.

The data team is looking to hire a proactive, commercially savvy Data Engineer to ensure all our data users - analysts, end users, or AI-driven systems, have access to the right data at the right time, and ensure its accuracy. You will get a chance to work on our core data pipelines (batch and streaming), machine learning platform, and cloud infrastructure, depending on your interests and previous experience. We believe in enabling our engineers to work across the stack to solve interesting problems and keep work exciting and enable this through weekly and monthly sharing sessions, pair coding, and architecture design sessions.

To be successful in this role
● You will need to be well-versed in building scalable, reliable, test-driven data pipelines to integrate data from various systems and platforms into the data warehouse on Google BigQuery.
● You will need to design the data warehouse schema, ensure extensibility, and clarity as new data sources are continuously integrated. You will oversee data reliability to build overall company trust in data to be more data-driven and continuously identify improvements to existing data architecture and data flows.
● You will need to promote and ensure technical excellence within the team. You are passionate about the culture and quality of engineering, and strive to continuously improve the quality and delivery of the team.
● You will need to enjoy working together in a team, planning and executing sprint tasks following Agile processes.
● You will need to be able to communicate clearly with our internal stakeholders, technical or non-technical, deeply understand business priorities and formalize them into challenges that can be tackled with engineering effort.

What we expect from you
● 2+ years of experience building software as a team following Agile methodologies.
● Strong production-level Python and SQL programming knowledge. Big bonus if you have also worked with BigQuery or are familiar with Golang or Javascript.
● Experience building and scaling batch ETL/ELT data pipelines, especially in Apache Airflow, Kubernetes, and DBT. Understanding of size and performance constraints.
● Experience building and scaling streaming data pipelines, especially in Apache Kafka, Spark, or Beam.
● Experience architecting and building data products with Cloud Services and Data Warehousing services in GCP or AWS (GCP is preferred).
● Knowledge of columnar databases, infrastructure automation tools like Terraform, data modeling techniques, data warehouse design patterns and google analytics is advantageous.

If these are aspects you value, please apply! Your attitude, experience and passion to excel are more important than specific experience."
Software Engineer (C/C++ / Semiconductor/ $9k x13 mths + bonus),"To Succeed In This Role, You Should Have
Min 2 years of experience in C/C++ (Windows OS) within a Semiconductor/Manufacturing environment
Degree in Computer Engineering/Science or equivalent
About The Job
Develop and implement features improvment on softwares & modules of machines
Render on-site support and troubleshoot to software issues of machines
Identifying areas for modification in existing programs and subsequently developing these modifications
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and design new features
Responsible for software feature development and enhancement based on customer requirements
Interested candidates, please click 'APPLY' or send your CV (in MS Word) to xylon.chian(@)randstad.com.sg

EA: 94C3609 | R1984287 | Xylon Chian

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM’s regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
Quantitative Developer | Singapore,"BlockTech has grown tremendously from its HQ in Amsterdam, the Netherlands, and has opened a new office in September 2022 in Singapore. Would you like to be part of the exciting growth of a scale-up in cryptocurrency derivatives trading? We are now hiring a Quantitative Developer to join the team in Singapore!

What are we looking for?
We are looking for a Quantitative Developer who is passionate about (cryptocurrency) derivatives markets and wants to join a scale-up with an excellent track record and growth potential in an innovative and fast-growing industry.
As a Quantitative Developer, you will be working on the infrastructure of our platform, e.g. the specification and implementation of our mathematical models, as part of a very ambitious Scrum/Agile team.
At BlockTech, you have the freedom to choose the path that leads to the solution and get a lot of responsibility.

What do we require from you?
An academic degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Econometrics (or any other quantitative field)
Experience working with Python, C++ and/or Rust
Good written and verbal communication skills in English
Proven versatility and ability to pick up new technologies and learn systems quickly
A positive can-do attitude and a creative mind
Willingness to commit long-term

What's in it for you?
The chance of a permanent, full-time position in a relaxed and trendy office located in Singapore
A very competitive base salary combined with a discretionary bonus based on your performance as well as the company’s results
A highly-collaborative and experienced team in the innovative and fast-growing cryptocurrency industry
The opportunity to use state-of-the-art technology and operate the trading application"
Software Engineer (Permanent Roles Available),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Responsibilities
Participate in designing solutions that meet functional requirements
Develop end-to-end specifications for solution components.
Perform testing and implementation of the solution.
Participate in impact analysis of encountered issues.
Generate relevant documentations, reports etc.
Contribute to continuous improvement of software development best practices in the areas of coding tools, languages and APIs, as well as software design and development processes.
Participate UX activities such asConduct user research/interviews, Develop user stories, storyboards to articulate current and future concepts Create wireframes, detailed visual mock ups and interactive prototypes Create style guides and digital assets for production
Job Requirements
Degree in Computing/Computer Science/ Computer Engineering/ Info Systems / EEE or equivalent
Familiar to software development lifecycle processes.
Strong programming skills and verifiable mastery of at least one of the following languages: Java, JavaScript, Python, C#.
Proficiency in Web Technologies such as HTML, CSS.
Good team player with strong communication and interpersonal skills.
Good analytical and creative problem-solving skills.
Only Shortlisted candidates will be notified.

(EA Reg No: 20C0312)
Desired Skills and Experience
Wireframes, Interpersonal Skills, HTML, User Stories, JavaScript, Web Technologies, Python, Software Design, Team Player, Articulate, Java, UX, Software Development"
Staff Software Test Engineer,"Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Job Description

Visa’s Value Added Services (VAS) team is building a new generation of products to facilitate commerce in everyone’s digital and mobile lives. Our focus is to build intuitive features that expose profound new value for our customers, merchants, and developers.

As a Staff Software Test Engineer, you will be part of our VAS Release Integration Solutions Engineering team to help design, enhance and build Release Certification by focusing on the System Integration and Client centric use cases coverage in an agile development environment. You will be working on one or more projects, developing the Integration test strategies, planning and certifying the products related to real-time transactional services, Web, Mobile applications, REST services API, VM and container based services that are highly functional, distributed, secure, scalable and resilient. We believe in self-managing Agile teams who takes care of end to end integration of products with excellent product quality. You will become part of our journey with common objective to be the best way to pay and be paid for everyone, everywhere. You will be driving innovation that makes our products stand apart from our competitors, delight the customer with faster times for market delivery.

Key Responsibilities

Lead and own end-to-end development and testing of one or more software modules
Champion System Integration Quality and Client Centric Test coverage.
Build UI and API based test automation framework to support DDP programs and applications improving quality and performance.
Execute and confirm automated/Manual test during certification cycles. Adhere to Data Driven approach to support Reporting and Metric driven Test Iterations
Implement efficient, customizable, and test automation suites by follow coding and test automation best practices and standards.
Investing appropriately in process changes, automation, tools etc. to reduce, improve and simplify the overall testing effort for the product.
Participate in an Agile Team process as Team lead to deliver features and increase the feature test coverage
Provide guidance to junior team members. Review and evaluate codes developed by team members to ensure delivery of highest-quality code.

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office two days a week, Tuesdays and Wednesdays with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% of the time based on business needs.

Basic Qualifications

Qualifications

5 or more years of relevant work experience with a Bachelors Degree or at least 2 years of work experience with an Advanced degree (e.g. Masters, MBA, JD, MD) or 0 years of work experience with a PhD
Bachelor’s in computer science or other related degree
Hands-on test engineering and automation experience in UI/API automation using Java/Spring, Soap UI, Selenium
Extensive experience in design & development of applications on multiple platforms (Linux and Windows), using Open Source products and cloud technologies.
Accomplished with Open Source Automation Framework tools (Java, Javascript Eclipse, IntelliJ, SOAPUI, TestNG, Selenium, Jmeter and similar tools). Ability to write clear and concise automation scripts.
Experienced Debugger by reviewing log file validation on a LINUX/UNIX server, Splunk
Developing comprehensive test and quality plans, debugging and testing scripts and tools.
Work with Engineering Managers to drive process improvements and improve team efficiency
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills. Good written and verbal communication skills. Ability to communicate effectively the logic and implementation plan to team members & managers.
Proven track record of Risk mitigation, Cross team collaboration with multiple stakeholders

Preferred Qualifications

6 or more years of work experience with a Bachelors Degree or 4 or more years of relevant experience with an Advanced Degree (e.g. Masters, MBA, JD, MD) or up to 3 years of relevant experience with a PhD
Knowledge of API and UI functional, automation, performance, and security testing along with familiarity of industry wide tools such as Rest Assured, SOAPUI, Cucumber, Selenium, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL and DB concepts.
Experience in Mobile application automation across Android and iOS.
Experience in Selenium/Appium.
Knowledge of iOS tools, technologies - Xcode, TestFlight, Apple developer ecosystem, AppStore
Experience working with CI/CD.
Experience using Android SDK, Android Studio, Eclipse IDE, Gradle, Microsoft AppCenter.
Knowledge on building mobile application tests using any preferred test automation framework and testing it across local and cloud based mobile devices.
Be a technologist - confident of writing code/script to test applications or build test frameworks across different technologies.
Passion for delivering high quality software products.
Demonstrated ability to meet deadlines and commitments in an environment that requires multitasking among concurrent projects.
Experience of working with distributed global teams.

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
Associate Principal Software Engineer,"About Us

Intelligent Machines (IM) Team is working on robotics and machine learning software development. You will work with a group of world-class software architects, robotics software specialists, and machine learning specialists on Dyson’s most complex products development

About The Role

You'll be an experienced real-time embedded system engineer with excellent knowledge in software build/test/release process for continuous integration and continuous deployment (CI/CD). Working in an agile cross-functional team, you will be a key member of the embedded software platform team and contribute to the development of CI/CD pipeline, sensors integration, system kernel and board bring up, and providing unified hardware abstraction layer to enable the development of more complex behaviour features in the upper application layer of edge devices.

You desire to create high quality, robust code to solve diverse real-world problems. You must be fluent in C++ and be comfortable in the whole product life cycle, including design, implementation, deployment, testing and debugging of firmware and application code.

You'll collaborate with architects, software, firmware and hardware engineers, manufacturing test engineers, and specialist engineering to help solve the wide and exciting range of AI-powered devices’ challenges posed by the ever expanding Dyson product portfolio.

Key Responsibilities

Responsible for the design, development and deployment of software build/test/release pipeline for continuous integration and continuous delivery (CI/CD) of embedded system products.
Design and develop the behavioural application running on the intelligent edge devices
Design and development of the firmware and software platforms to enable behaviours/application engineers to implement features on AI-enabled products and facilitate mass production.
Manage the entire life cycle of multiple related complex modules and systems, including the behavioural application, image build/test/release, hardware abstraction layer discussion, manufacturing test/verification methodology, documentation, design, coding, testing, maintenance, and result tracking.
Good product sense and keen focus on product performance and test automation efficiency.
Act as subject matter expert (SME) in specific domain, disseminating knowledge, guiding and mentor engineers in methodology, best practice and standards
Proactively identify technical risks within projects and influence engineering teams in their resolution
In-depth participation in cross-teams product design discussions will be required.

About You

A bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Engineer, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering Applied Mathematics, or similar.
10+ years of work experience in embedded system development, including board bring up, embedded Linux kernel/driver porting for system integration, and MCU/RTOS firmware development.
Must have industry experience in architecting software application running on embedded system.
Experience in fulfilling continuous integration and continuous delivery (CI/CD) pipeline setup.
Excellent knowledge and hands-on experience in Linux tool-chain, Yocto build system, version control tool (git), configuration, etc.
Experience in configuration and use of sensor devices over I2C, SPI, UART with DMA
Experience in sensors/camera/BT/Wifi modules integration and calibration is a plus.
Experience in automated testing and manufacturing test process is highly desired.
Good understanding of software development life cycles and basic electronics hardware (interface to software systems)
Excellent object oriented programming capability, including speed and overall quality; preferably, the candidate shall be able to write high performance product quality code with C++.
Familiar with STL, boost C++ libraries, design patterns and able to enforce it in day-to-day tasks.
Strong proficiency in multithreading programming and synchronisation mechanisms.
Proficient in scripting languages, such as Python and Bash.
Experience in Agile practices is a plus.
The ability to learn continuously and improve oneself.
Professionalism and excellent communication skills; ability to communicate complex information at every level.
Optimism and an excitement about collaborating with teammates and interdisciplinary teams (including hardware/firmware/system/software engineers and suppliers’ FAE), and technically support development (such as manufacturing test engineers).
For a highly experienced candidate, we expect excellent technical guidance skills and the ability to influence the work of others. Experience in over-sighting high complexity software development projects is an advantage
Independent, Integrity and self-driven with a strong focus on results to ensure that the whole team succeeds in its goals.
Fluent in spoken and written English
Benefits

Dyson Singapore monitors the market to ensure competitive salaries and bonuses. Beyond that, you’ll enjoy a transport allowance and comprehensive medical care and insurance. But financial benefits are just the start of a Dyson career. Professional growth, leadership development and new opportunities abound, driven by regular reviews and dynamic workshops. And with a vibrant culture, the latest devices and a relaxed dress code reflecting our engineering spirit, it’s an exciting team environment geared to fuelling and realising ambition.

Dyson is an equal opportunity employer. We know that great minds don’t think alike, and it takes all kinds of minds to make our technology so unique. We welcome applications from all backgrounds and employment decisions are made without regard to race, colour, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other any other dimension of diversity."
"Staff, Web Engineer (Coupang Play)","Staff, Web Engineer (Coupang Play)
About Coupang Play
Launched in December 2020, Coupang Play is Coupang's OTT (over-the-top) service. Coupang Play aims to become the definitive destination for digital content. Backed by our strong Product and Engineering teams in Seoul, Singapore, and Mountain View — Coupang Play has been creating and optimizing the viewing experience for our customers.

Coupang Play is available on mobile devices, tablet PCs, smart TVs, and your preferred browsers. We are building a competitive content library that includes TV for children and all ages, movies, live sports, educational content, and more. Coupang Play also creates original content, catered specifically to our customers.

If you like to work backwards and solve problems for our customers, join us. We are committed to redefining how our customers enjoy digital entertainment as one of the fastest-growing OTT services in Korea.

Role Overview
As a Web Frontend Engineer for the Web platform, you will be responsible for implementing visual elements to enhance user experience.

What You Will Do
Build and develop new user facing features on Web platform, to enhance the user experience
Develop close relationships with Product, Design, UI/UX and Backend Infrastructure
Problem Solve with Engineers and create solutions, to provide an exceptional user experience, whilst also coordinating services on the backend side
Drive best practice by writing reusable, modular, testable code and libraries
Enhance application for maximum speed and scalability

Basic Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree and 10+ years’ experience in frontend engineering, proficiency with HTML, CSS, JavaScript
Deep understanding of modern web development frameworks and building interactive web applications
Ability to interpret key design principles and apply responsive/adaptive designs
Launched 2 major product features in the last year
Proven experience in using React.js, Angular.js, Rest Services and reactive patterns

Preferred Qualifications
Experience in developing Smart TV platform (LG Web OS, Samsung Tizen OS)
Expert domain knowledge in developing application on Chromecast, Roku
Experience with Shaka Player, Video JS, W3C Media Player, web and media security (Authentication, authorization, Widevine DRM)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to speak and write in English fluently"
System Engineer (COMINT),"Your tasks

To be the technical expert of the solution and provide the necessary support to customers
Responsible for testing, verification, integration and commissioning of system projects
Perform acceptance tests in factory and on-site
Develop system design and reviews documentation according to customer requirements
Conduct training and after-sales support to customers
Perform product demonstration to customer

Your Qualifications

Degree/Diploma in Electrical & Electronic, Telecommunications or Computer Engineering
Knowledge in RF, mobile phone or satellite communications, and/or networking experience will be given priority
Fluent in English (knowledge of other languages is an advantage)
Must be comfortable and able to handle defense and security solutions
Strong problem-solving skills as well as independent, self-motivated and result-oriented
Dedicated team player with strong job commitment
Travel (international) is required
Personnel with relevant or fitting positions will be considered for senior positions

Interested?
We are looking forward to receiving your application! Ideally, you should apply online with the reference number. If you have any questions, please feel free to contact your recruiting contact via LinkedIn or XING.

Equal opportunities are important to us. We are looking forward to receiving your application regardless of gender, nationality, ethnic and social origin, religion, ideology, disability, age as well as sexual orientation and identity.

reference number

Recruiting Contact

The Rohde & Schwarz technology group is among the trailblazers when it comes to paving the way for a safer and connected world with its leading solutions in test & measurement, technology systems, and networks & cybersecurity. Founded more than 85 years ago, the group is a reliable partner for industry and government customers around the world. Rohde & Schwarz Singapore is the competence centre in the heart of Asia for sales, systems & projects, service & repair, calibration, R&D and customer support. We aim to bring Rohde & Schwarz's technical competence one step closer to our customers in the region. Together with the Asian subsidiaries and agents we form the integral part of the company's multi-cultural sales and distribution network to service our customers."
Snr Systems Engineer,"Position Overview

The Snr Systems Engineer manages the systems administration function and leads the organisation's system projects and environments. He/She focuses on setting goals and priorities and on mentoring and coordination as well as providing technical leadership. He plans and oversees systems upgrades and migrations and ensures systems are up-to-date with the latest patches and are coherent across the organisation. He directs the development and maintenance of technical documentation.

He possesses strong leadership and communication abilities, and is able to set realistic goals and implement appropriate plans to guide the team toward achieving those goals. He is able to address multi-faceted issues effectively and in a collaborative manner including across departments. Set system administration processes

Role & Responsibilities

Set system administration processes

Establish goals and priorities, design, planning, day-to-day operation, maintenance, and advanced troubleshooting of systems
Align system administration with overall strategic IT service direction and business needs
Assist with the development of business case justifications and cost/benefit analyses for spending and initiatives
Anticipate internal and/or external business challenges and/or regulatory issues
Develop policies, procedures, and controls to ensure system security

Develop New Systems

Partner with stakeholders to recommend innovative and automated approaches for system administration
Define systems requirements for new technology implementations
Prepare for system expansion by studying plans and requirements
Oversee the design, maintenance and implementation of the systems
Prioritise tasks to ensure projects are implemented in accordance with project plans and budgets

Optimise Systems Performance

Recommend process, product or service improvements, resource optimisation and cost savings
Oversee hardware and software upgrades
Recommend new technologies, methodologies, systems or opportunities for cost savings, security and service quality improvement

Manage Teams

Oversee team management including budgets, forecasting, work allocations and staffing
Develop staff through ongoing coaching, mentoring and career discussions
Define common goals, direction and accountability among staff
Drive effective performance management practices within department in accordance with company policies and procedures

Requirements

Candidates must have at least 6 years of hands-on experience in Linux with ability to work with the project team in implementation projects as well as perform system administration activities for Linux systems. Knowledge in SAP will be advantageous but not required.

At least 6 - 8 years’ experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems

Diploma/Degree in Information Technology or related

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Java Developer - Fresh Graduate,"Job Description

Applies specialized knowledge to conceptualize, design, develop, unit-test, configure, and implement portions of new or enhanced (upgrades or conversions) business and technical software solutions through application of appropriate standard software development life cycle methodologies and processes. Interacts with the Client and project roles (e.g., Project Manager, Business Analyst, Data Engineer) as required, to gain an understanding of the business environment, technical context, and organizational strategic direction. Defines scope, plans, and deliverables for assigned components. Understands and uses appropriate tools to analyze, identify, and resolve business and or technical problems. Applies metrics to monitor performance and measure key project parameters. Prepares system documentation. Conforms to security and quality standards. Stays current on emerging tools, techniques, and technologies.

Responsibilities
Participates as a member of development team
Completes development of units with designs prepared by more senior developers
Participates in code reviews
Prepares and executes unit tests
Applies growing technical knowledge to maintain a technology area (e.g. Web-site Development)
Education And Experience Required
Typically a technical Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience and a minimum of 0-2 years of related experience
May include highly experienced individuals performing entry- level equivalent work who are non- degreed or degreed in an unrelated field
Knowledge And Skills
0-2 years experience writing code using languages such as (and not limited to) COBOL, PL/1, Java, C, C++, C#,VB.Net
Basic Understanding of RDBMS databases such SQL Server and Oracle. Basic understanding of testing tools and unit test scripting
Experience using (or an understanding of the use of) an Integrated Development Environment (e.g., Eclipse, Visual Studio)"
"Site Reliability Engineer, Associate","As a Site Reliability Engineer (SRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure and reducing work through automation. You'll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you'll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an SRE, you'll be focused on running better production applications and systems.

Responsibilities

Develop, test, and debug automated tasks (Apps, Systems, Infrastructure)
Troubleshoot priority incidents, facilitate blameless post-mortems
Work with development teams throughout the software life cycle ensuring sustainable software releases
Perform analytics on previous incidents and usage patterns to better predict issues and take proactive actions
Build and drive adoption for greater self-healing and resiliency patterns
Lead and participate in performance tests; identify bottlenecks, opportunities for optimization, and capacity demands
Participate in the 24x7 support coverage as needed

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree or equivalent discipline
Minimum 5 years of relevant experience in a software engineering discipline
Mastery in at least two or more software languages (e.g. Python, Java, Go, etc.) with respect to designing, coding, testing, and software delivery
Adept in the development of automated tools, systems, and services in multiple technology domains
Advanced knowledge of one or more infrastructure components (e.g. networking, cloud services, orchestration tools, containerization, compute, and storage systems)
Proficiency in service-level changes to a system and troubleshooting components

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Appian Developer,"Job Summary
5+ years of experience with hands-on software development or technical consulting
4+ years hands on implementation experience in Appian (preferred) or any other BPM platform like Pega, IBM BPM, jPBM or Activities
Experience in translating customer requirements into working business process models, prototypes, and finished products using best practices.
Experience in analysis, design, implement and provide demonstrations of solutions
Should have experience has built products using agile methodologies
Should have at least working knowledge or exposure to Advanced Java, Oracle or MySQL.
Working experience working in JEE open-source frameworks such as; Spring, Spring Boot
Working knowledge of integration patterns, techniques and technologies for enterprise applications including XML, SOAP, JSON.
Experience working with Software Configuration Management tools and processes including Git, Rational ClearCase, SVN, etc.
Experience in IDEs, such as Eclipse, NetBeans or IntelliJ.
Significant experience in writing and deploying code on both Windows and Linux platforms.
Soft Skills
Excellent communication skills, good confidence level, and team dynamics to be able to handle the demand working with the Client teams in Agile mode
Able to handle small team.
Employee Status : Full Time Employee

Shift : Day Job

Travel : No

Job Posting : Dec 30 2022

About Cognizant

Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 185 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @Cognizant."
Java Developer - Fresh Graduate,"Job Description

DXC Technology (NYSE: DXC) where brilliant people embrace change and seize opportunities to advance their careers and amplify customer success. We live in more than 70 countries, speak multiple languages and work with over 6,000 customers on almost every continent. We use the power of technology to deliver mission-critical IT services that move the world.

What You Will Do
Create information solutions/modules by developing, implementing, and maintaining Java-based components and interfaces
Maintain existing prototypes and scripts
Participates as a member of the development team
Completes development of units with designs prepared by more senior developers
Participates in code reviews
Prepares and executes unit tests
Contribute to team meetings
To Be Successful In This Role
Bachelor’s degree/Diploma in information technology/Science /Computer Science/ Engineering or related technical area of study
Programming languages such as Java, J2EE, and Python with an understanding of development Integrated Development Environments (IDEs) such as Eclipse, and Visual Studio
Experience writing code using languages such as (and not limited to) Java, J2EE, and EJB
Basic Understanding of RDBMS databases such SQL Server and Oracle. Basic understanding of testing tools and unit test scripting
Write well-designed, testable, efficient code
Experience using (or an understanding of the use of) an Integrated Development Environment (e.g., Eclipse, Visual Studio)
Understanding of Software Testing methodologies, scripting, and tools
Able to work independently with minimal supervision
Good communications skills
A desire for a career in software applications
Our Culture And Benefits

DXC is committed to building better futures for our customers, colleagues, environment, and communities. We take care of each other and foster a culture of inclusion, belonging, and corporate citizenship. We put this to action developing and implementing societal initiatives within our Social Impact Practice. #WeAreDXC

Our “people first” philosophy means we offer competitive remuneration, benefits, training, and career opportunities that reflect our commitment to improving the lives of our employees, and the communities in which we live and work.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer

DXC is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and we welcome submissions from people from all walks of life. We celebrate our diversity and recognize it is the unique contributions of our people that give us our edge. We stand by the ‘bring your whole self to work philosophy. It is our inclusive culture that powers our results, and our company grows only if our people grow."
Data Centre Operations Engineer,"Job Purpose

This role will be responsible to manage day to day data centre service delivery with oversight on the data centre deliveries, manage project development and implementation and be involved in the Annual Review exercise for the outsourced service provider

The Job
Manage day to day data centre service delivery with oversight on data centre deliveries
Manage the service providers SLA in terms of Service Requests
Monitoring of service level performance in accordance with contractual requirements.
Analysis of data centre infrastructure components and capacity planning for future projects/growth.
Billing Management for the outsourced services
Plan for application of patches, firmware, upgrades and bug fixes necessary to maintain the safe and reliable operations of the systems and platform solutions
Manage and execute system/application installation, patching, rollouts, releases and upgrades
Adhere to GEL operation processes and procedures, aligned to the GEL group’s processes and standards, (ITMP, ITSS, TSS and etc)
Manage and maintain the service provider’s ability to meet SLA at all times
Strong leadership and influencing skills in engaging the service provider and stakeholders
Regularly review the service provider’s compliance to policies
Analyze and execute improvement plans
Prompt identification and resolution of service delivery issues including implementation of preventive measures
Work with vendors, partners and service providers to maintain SLA, resolve issues and assess root cause for remediation
Participate in planning exercises for Data Centre related matters
Takes accountability in considering business and regulatory compliance risks and takes appropriate steps to mitigate the risks.
Maintains awareness of industry trends on regulatory compliance, emerging threats and technologies in order to understand the risk and better safeguard the company.
Highlights any potential concerns /risks and proactively shares best risk management practices.
Our Requirements
A Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science / IT or Diploma with Professional Certifications.
Minimum 8 years of experience in Data Centre Management with at least 5 years of relevant experience successfully managing data centre service delivery or platform solutions or IT systems implementation and integration.
Minimum 6 years of experience in Project Management
Experience working with multiple infrastructure teams, project teams (business, IT application and infrastructure teams).
Excellent knowledge of various devices, brands and toolsets related to data centre management and patching.
Good communication skills both written and verbal
Strong technical, negotiation, trouble shooting and analytical skills
Good knowledge in Data Centre Infrastructure management and capacity planning.
Certified Data Centre Professional, 2018 and ITIL Foundation V3, 2008.
High level of integrity, takes accountability of work and good attitude over teamwork.
Takes initiative to improve current state of things and adaptable to embrace new changes.
About Great Eastern

Established in 1908, Great Eastern places customers at the heart of everything we do. Our legacy extends beyond our products and services to our culture, which is defined by our core values and how we work. As champions of Integrity, Initiative and Involvement, our core values act as a compass, guiding and inspiring us to embrace the behaviours associated with each value, upholding our promise to our customers - to continue doing our best for them in a sustainable manner.

We work collaboratively with our stakeholders to look for candidates who exhibit or have the potential to embrace our core values and associated behaviours, as these are the key traits that we expect from our employees as they develop their careers with us.

We embrace inclusivity, giving all employees an equal opportunity to shine and play their role in exploring possibilities to deliver innovative insurance solutions.

Since 2018, Great Eastern has been a signatory to the United Nations (UN) Principles of Sustainable Insurance. Our sustainability approach around environmental, social, and governance (ESG) considerations play a key role in every business decision we make. We are committed to being a sustainability-driven company to achieve a low-carbon economy by managing the environmental footprint of our operations and incorporating ESG considerations in our investment portfolios; improving people’s lives by actively helping customers live healthier, better and longer; and drive responsible business practices through material ESG risk management.

To all recruitment agencies: Great Eastern does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our email or our employees. We will not be responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
Software Engineer (Defi - Smart Contract Development),"About OKX:
Founded in 2017, OKX is one of the world’s leading cryptocurrency spot and derivatives exchanges. OKX innovatively adopted blockchain technology to reshape the financial ecosystem by offering some of the most diverse and sophisticated products, solutions, and trading tools on the market. Trusted by more than 20 million users in over 180 regions globally, OKX strives to provide an engaging platform that empowers every individual to explore the world of crypto. In addition to its world-class DeFi exchange, OKX serves its users with OKX Insights, a research arm that is at the cutting edge of the latest trends in the cryptocurrency industry. With its extensive range of crypto products and services, and unwavering commitment to innovation, OKX’s vision is a world of financial access backed by blockchain and the power of decentralized finance.

Responsibilities
Responsible for the design, development and implementation of decentralized financial (DeFi) products based on blockchain technology
Track and study the cutting-edge products and technologies of decentralized finance, and promote the innovation and development of the company's related product technologies

Requirements:
Strong interest in blockchain technology and financial product design
Bachelor degree or above (preferred) major in finance, computer, software engineering, mathematics or information technology, rich experience in Internet application development
Familiar with at least one programming language such as Golang, C/C++, Rust, Javascript, etc.
Familiar with Solidity development and optimization, familiar with Truffle, Hardhat, Remix and other development tools, familiar with three-party security contract libraries such as OpenZeppelin
Learn about one or more mainstream DeFi projects: MakerDao, Uniswap, Compound, Synthetix, etc."
Junior Software Developer (Java/ Javascript/ Python/ C),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Responsibilities
Participate in designing solutions that meet functional requirements
Develop end-to-end specifications for solution components.
Perform testing and implementation of the solution.
Participate in impact analysis of encountered issues.
Generate relevant documentations, reports etc.
Contribute to continuous improvement of software development best practices in the areas of coding tools, languages and APIs, as well as software design and development processes.
Participate UX activities such asConduct user research/interviews, Develop user stories, storyboards to articulate current and future concepts Create wireframes, detailed visual mock ups and interactive prototypes Create style guides and digital assets for production
Job Requirements
Degree in Computing/ Computer Science/ Computer Engineering/ Info Systems / EEE or equivalent
Familiar to software development lifecycle processes.
Strong programming skills and verifiable mastery of at least one of the following languages: Java, JavaScript, Python, C#.
Proficiency in Web Technologies such as HTML, CSS.
Good team player with strong communication and interpersonal skills.
Good analytical and creative problem-solving skills
(EA Reg No: 20C0312)

Only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Desired Skills and Experience
Wireframes, CSS3, Interpersonal Skills, HTML, AngularJS, User Stories, JavaScript, HTML5, Web Technologies, Python, Software Design, Team Player, Articulate, Java, UX, Software Development"
Android Developer (Entry level candidates welcome),"Key Responsibilities:

• Perform design, development and enhancement of command & control systems.
• Perform software application implementation, integration, deployment as well as troubleshooting.
• Conduct testing to evaluate the attribute or capability of the software and determine that it meets the expected results and customers' expectations.
• Generate software requirement specification, design documents and test specification.

Job Requirements:

• A degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related fields is essential.
• Fundamental knowledge in Object Orientated high-level programming languages such as Java, C# or C++.
• Knowledge and practical experience in Native Android Development & Data Distribution Service will be an advantage.
• A passion for solving problems and providing workable solutions.
• Strong analytical and reasoning skills with an ability to visualise processes and outcomes.
• Strong communication skills and ability to work collaboratively."
Data Engineer (Azure Purview & Azure Data Factory),"Job Description

As a Data Engineer, you will support the implementation of projects focused on collecting, aggregating, storing, reconciling, and making data accessible from disparate sources to enable analysis and decision making. This role will also play a critical part in the data supply chain, by ensuring stakeholders can access and manipulate data for routine and ad hoc analysis. Additionally, you will support the full lifecycle of data from ingesting through analytics to action.

Key Role Responsibilities:

Day-to-day you will:

Translate business requirements to technical solutions leveraging strong business acumen
Analyze current business practices, processes and procedures as well as identifying future business opportunities for leveraging Microsoft Azure Data & Analytics PaaS Services
Support the planning and implementation of data design services, providing sizing and configuration assistance and performing needs assessments.
Deliver of architectures for transformations and modernizations of enterprise data solutions using Azure cloud data technologies.
Design and Build Modern Data Pipelines and Data Streams.
Design and Build Data Service APIs.
Develop and maintain data warehouse schematics, layouts, architectures and relational/non-relational databases for data access and Advanced Analytics.
Expose data to end users using PowerBI, Azure API Apps or any other modern visualization platform or experience
Implement effective metrics and monitoring processes.

Skill & Capability Requirements:

Around 5 years of working experience as a Data Engineer
Demonstrated experience in turning business use cases and requirements into technical solutions
Experience in business processing mapping of data and analytics solutions.
Ability to conduct data profiling, cataloging and mapping for technical design and construction of technical data flows
The ability to apply such methods to solve business problems using one or more Azure Data and Analytics services in combination with building data pipelines, data streams, and system integration.
Ability to leverage a variety of programming languages & data crawling/processing tools to ensure data reliability, quality & efficiency
Experienced in Cloud Data Transformation using ETL/ELT tools such as Azure Data Factory, Databricks
Experienced in Dev-Ops processes (including CI/CD) and Infrastructure as code fundamentals.
Experienced in Data Governance tools like Unity Catalog / Purview, Master Data Management (MDM) and Data Quality tools and processes
Knowledge of business intelligence tools such as Power BI, Tableau, Qlik, Cognos TM1
Knowledge of Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL DW, and Azure SQL, Azure App Service is required. Azure IoT, Azure HDInsight + Spark, Azure Cosmos DB & Azure Stream Analytics are a plus.
Knowledge in data modeling and database management, such as performance tuning of the Enterprise Data Warehouse, Data Mart, and Business Intelligence Reporting environments, and support the integration of those systems with other applications
Knowledge of Python is a plus.
Experience preparing data for Data Science and Machine Learning.
Experience preparing data for use in Azure Machine Learning / Azure Databricks is a plus.
Experience preparing data and building data pipelines for AI Use Cases (text, voice, image, etc).
Designing and building Data Pipelines using streams of IoT data.
Knowledge of Lambda and Kappa architecture patterns.
Strong team collaboration and experience working with remote teams.
Working experience in Visual Studio, PowerShell Scripting, and ARM templates.
Azure certifications (AZ-900, AZ-200, and 201), Databricks certification, DevOps certifications

What We Offer You

Come for the distinctive experiences you have helping forward-thinking corporations, non-profits, and governments push the boundaries of digital innovation. Stay for the limitless learning opportunities that encourage you to master Microsoft and pursue big ideas. Enjoy ambitious growth for yourself as part of Avanade’s people-first culture with benefits like employee share purchasing, flexible work arrangements, a commitment to diversity and inclusion, and competitive pay.

About Avanade

Avanade is the leading provider of innovative digital, cloud and advisory services, industry solutions and design-led experiences across the Microsoft ecosystem. Every day, our 59,000 professionals in 26 countries make a genuine human impact for our clients, their employees and their customers.

We have been recognized as Microsoft’s Global SI Partner of the Year more than any other company. With the most Microsoft certifications (60,000+) and 18 (out of 18) Gold-level Microsoft competencies, we are uniquely positioned to help businesses grow and solve their toughest challenges.

We are a people first company, committed to providing an inclusive workplace where employees feel comfortable being their authentic selves. As a responsible business, we are building a sustainable world and helping young people from underrepresented communities fulfil their potential.

Majority owned by Accenture, Avanade was founded in 2000 by Accenture LLP and Microsoft Corporation. Learn more at www.avanade.com ."
Algorithm Engineer (TikTok e-Commerce) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About the Team
Our team is responsible for developing large scale product knowledge graphs to improve online shopping experience. We are currently looking for talented software engineers that have a deep understanding of Natural Language Processing (NLP), Computer Vision (CV), Deep Learning (DL) and Machine Learning(ML).

Responsibilities
You will be developing state-of-the-art models to solve challenging problems that impact both the platform and millions of customers, including:
- Responsible for building and continuously optimizing algorithm solutions in product matching, price comparison etc. to improve supply operational efficiencies;
- Responsible for continuously maintaining and improving the robustness, stability and computational efficiencies of algorithm solutions in live business environment.

Qualifications

- Master or Ph.D. graduate with major in computer science, computer engineering, statistics, applied mathematics, data science or other related disciplines.
- Have experience and strong skills in at least one of the technological areas:
i. Natural language generation, named entity recognition, machine translation, question answering, knowledge graph, information extraction, text mining and classification etc.
ii. Computer vision, facial recognition, multimodal learning, object detection & tracking, image classification etc.
iii. Machine learning, transfer learning, graph embedding, representative learning, large-scale optimization, recommendation, reinforcement learning, etc.
- Work experience in e-commerce or Internet industry is preferred.
- Strong coding skills in at least one of the following programming frameworks, e.g. Python, Java, C/C++, Spark etc.; Familiaer with at least one of the following deep learning frameworks, e.g., PyTorch, TensorFlow, Keras etc.
- Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
- Work and collaborate well with team members.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Lead Software Engineer,"Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Job Description

We are developing and executing a shared strategic vision for Loyalty and Marketing Services platforms and products that enable Visa to be the world-leading data-driven payments company. As a Lead Software Engineer, you will be part of world-class team of Engineers to define, drive and execute on this vision. We are looking for a self-motivated individual with software engineering skills and expertise with Java/J2EE and Big Data technologies. The candidate will be extensively involved in hands-on activities including POCs, design, development, testing, and documentation. Candidate must be flexible and willing to switch tasks based on team's needs.

Primary Responsibilities Will Include

Design and develop mission-critical systems, delivering high-availability and performance
Work on development of new products and enhancements to existing systems iteratively by building quick POCs and converting ideas into real products
Work closely with architects, business, and technical stakeholders to develop high quality products and services that meet business requirements and expectations while applying the latest available tools and technology
Instill best practices for software development, and deliver high quality work on tight schedules
Identify opportunities for further enhancements and refinements to standards and processes
Mentor junior team members, develop departmental procedures and best practices standards
Coordinate Continuous Integration activities, testing automation frameworks, and other related items in addition to contributing core product code
Present technical solutions, capabilities, considerations, and features in business terms. Effectively communicate status, issues, and risks in a precise and timely manner
Will be responsible for managing small to medium sized projects and provide guidance to other engineers, using extensive technical principles

Most Important Qualities For The Candidate Are

Academics: Bachelor or Master's degree in Computer Science or related field
Leadership: Leading solutions and working with teams to achieve it.
Curiosity: A desire to seek clarity of requirements and why tasks are done a certain way
Creativity: The ability to take a list of needs and insights and come up with other innovative ideas.
Strategic focus: Skill to understand big picture and stay focused on task to achieve goals
Attention to detail: The capability to perform any research systematically and accurately
Strong work ethic: The innate drive to do work extremely well
Enthusiasm: A passion to understand people and deliver better products and services to them

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office two days a week, Tuesdays and Wednesdays with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% of the time based on business needs.

Basic Qualifications

Qualifications

12 or more years of software development experience with a Bachelor’s Degree or 8 or more years of software development experience and an Advanced Degree (e.g. Masters, MBA, JD, MD, or PhD) in a technical field such as computer science, computer engineering or related field required.

Preferred Qualifications

Strong design and coding skills Java and Big Data technologies like Hive, Hadoop, and Spark
Understanding and working experience with shell scripting
Knowledge and working experience on Git/Stash, Ant, Maven, Jenkins and Jira
Experience with database technologies like DB2, Oracle, SQL Server
Knowledge of Unix/Linux
Strong foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in data structures, algorithms and software design optimized for building highly distributed and parallelized systems
Experience with Agile and DevOps methodologies
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with a strong automation mindset
Ability to handle multiple competing priorities in a fast-paced environment
Good written and verbal communication skills. Ability to effectively communicate the logic and implementation plan to team members and managers
Quick learner, self-starter, detailed and thorough

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
Senior Algorithm Engineer (Account),"Who are we?

At HoYoverse, we are committed to creating immersive virtual world experiences for players around the world. In addition to game products such as Genshin Impact, Honkai Impact 3rd, Tears of Themis, and Honkai: Star Rail, HoYoverse also launched the dynamic desktop software N0va Desktop, the community product HoYoLAB, and created a variety of products such as animations, comics, music, novels, and merchandise around our original creative concept.

Adhering to our mission of Tech Otakus Save the World, we have always been committed to technology research and development, exploring cutting-edge technologies, and have accumulated leading technical capabilities in cartoon rendering, artificial intelligence, cloud gaming technology, and other fields.

HoYoverse is actively engaged in globalization, with offices in Singapore, Montreal, Los Angeles, Tokyo, Seoul, and other areas.

What you will do:

Get insights into business risks, explore user risk characteristics. Build risk models using the techniques of machine learning, deep learning, migration learning, etc. Identify user risks such as plug-ins and aggregation in games and dark industries.
Understand content compliance and ideological risks as well as the laws and regulations of the game industry. Identify and handle illegal content.
Work closely with business teams. Participate in product and technique reviews. Balance the business development and security experience. Design and implement optimum risk-benefit decisions by using optimization theories and methods to ensure the sustainable development of our business.
Establish risk identification and control capabilities. Optimize and propose high-quality risk strategies constantly.

What you will need:

Master's degree or above in computer, mathematics, statistics, or other related majors.
3+ years of experience in data mining or machine learning.
Proficiency in machine learning algorithms, ability to use HQL, Python, and other tools.
Experience in graph computing and massive data processing is preferred. Experience in community detection and other risk identification is preferred. Experience in research of deep learning is preferred.
Experience in participating in contests or having papers related to machine learning and data mining are preferred.
Fluent in Mandarin and English to liaise with teams.

We are an equal opportunity employer that believes diverse backgrounds are key to bringing our concepts to life. If you're looking to play a key role in creating the best immersive virtual world experience for our users, we invite you to join our team."
Cloud Migration Engineer (Pega),"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Technology and Operations services and Accenture Song—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 721,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

Top 3 Must Have Skills / Primary Skills

Pega 8.x, Java technologies (JAVA, Tomcat, IBM WebSphere), Web Services (REST, SOAP)

Good to have skills (Optional) PEGA Certified SA/SSA, AWS

Detailed Job Description

Participate in migration from On Prem to AWS, as well as operational support.

Develop application as per requirements defined in the Change Requests.

Perform application testing and closure of application defects

Troubleshoot and provide resolution / workaround to issues and problems reported.

Liaising with external systems in resolving production issues when necessary.

Ensure all assigned deliverables are completed on time and to the required level of quality.

Ensure service level agreements are met and escalate whenever required.

All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.

Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.

Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.

Diploma and above

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."
Cybersecurity Software Developer,"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

Over at the Advanced Cyber Product Development (ACPD) team in GovTech's Cyber Security Group, we build software products to combat evolving threats and help ensure a secure baseline for ICT&SS used across the Whole-of-Government.

If you are looking for opportunities to make a difference, collaborate and surround yourself with like-minded peers, look no further! We welcome talented, passionate candidates to bring fresh ideas, perspectives and create impactful solutions to join our growing team on this journey.

What you will be working on:

Designing and developing scalable and robust platforms
Evaluating and integrating Open Source solutions into security tooling
Optimising production quality code with performance in mind
Having knowledgeable discussions about software and system architecture
Collaborating with a multidisciplinary team to deploy security tools as part of large scale CI/CD pipelines
Learning and sharing knowledge with other like minded engineers

What we are looking for:

A Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, a related technical field, or equivalent practical experience
Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages
Familiarity with the Django REST Framework and developing APIs
Familiarity with the concept of DevSecOps and experience with CI/CD pipelines
Interest and ability to learn and apply coding languages and cybersecurity concepts as needed

What Is It Like Working Here

Be part of an agile development team - With daily stand-ups, as well as a culture of open communication and idea sharing.
Continuously innovating - We constantly push the boundaries of the technologies that we build to handle data at scale, across multiple platforms. Developing with security in mind, our products often extend beyond the conventional expectations of what software is.
Making an impact - Developing meaningful and impactful software which raises the bar of cybersecurity across the government.
Taking ownership - In addition to technical responsibilities, this means generating ideas on how things should be done and taking responsibility for seeing them through. Building something that you believe in is the best way to build something good.
Having a growth mindset - Working on new ideas often means not fully understanding what you are working on. Taking time to learn new architectures, frameworks, technologies, and even languages are not just encouraged but essential.

Read about the work we do here: https: //medium.com/csg-govtech

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
SDLC and Runtime GitLab Software Engineer,"SDLC and Runtime (SDLCR) focuses on delivering engineer-first, scalable platforms for job scheduling, Compute-as-a-Service, file transfer, firmwide software distribution and software development, including CI/CD (Gitlab ecosystem).
Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) is a suite of products that provides build and deploy tooling for Engineers in the firm. It provides a modern, secure and highly available plant that facilitates source control, code review, build, test and production activation.
Primary customer base for SDLCR are Engineers at Goldman Sachs. Key customers are the Global Markets Division (GMD) and Consumer and Investment Management Division (CIMD). Also significant customer usage in the Infrastructure Group (Core Engineering) and Investment Banking Division (IBD) Engineering.

AS A SDLC ENGINEER

You will be working at the heart of the developer experience, ensuring the code that is written by thousands of GS engineers is versioned securely, reviewed expertly, compiles fast, tests comprehensively and is distributed widely. You will deliver CI/CD solutions that support cloud native development and contribute to our efforts to move the firm to a cloud-based mobile SDLC. You could be working with cutting edge build technology from AWS & Google, or the latest cloud technology in one of more backend languages including Java, Golang, and Python.

  Build / Development
GitLab - The firm's strategic vendor CI/CD platform, hosted in-house with instances on-prem and on public cloud
Proprietary SDLC, based on Subversion for source control to facilitate workflow and approvals around building and deploying software
In-house developed Continuous Deploy (CD) tools for deploying Software packages, config and Infrastructure as Code
Distribution - Linux and Windows software distribution system used by Gitlab, Conductor Software Factory and Train
Artifact Repository - Primary build artifact repository hosting terabytes of internal and external software packages and industry standard asset repos such as Mavern Central, NPMScopes and PyPi, running on Sonatype Nexus
Build out our next generation instances of GitLab to support local onshore developers. This will need to be designed such that it is secure, tested, and that meets or exceeds industry standard performance and availability
Develop features and improvements to our GitLab solution
Collaborate with Product Management and other stakeholders within Engineering to maintain and improve the functions and quality of service
Advocate for improvements to product quality, security, and performance
Diagnose and solve technical problems, both within the core GitLab environment, and the associated GS technical eco-system
Cloud native architectures in AWS.
Experience with large scale monorepos, build systems and deployment paradigms
Expertise in commercial / open source build systems (Gradle / Bazel / Make) and strong knowledge of software change management systems
Experience of DevOps, SRE, infrastructure (storage / networks / etc.)
Design and implement mid to large scale distributed systems
Partner with and provide technical guidance on best practices to the GS engineering community, the business teams, and operations teams
Associate / VP level is up to 5 years / more than 5 years of relevant industry experience respectively
Ability to use GitLab
Professional experience with Cloud deployment patterns. Specifically AWS cloud constructs and Hashicorp Terraform
General knowledge of multiple languages, and in-depth strong programming skills of at least one of: Golang, Erlang, Java, Python, C, C++, Java
Strong software engineering fundamentals
Experience with all stages in the lifecycle of developing and running large distributed systems
Experience with diagnosis, prevention and management of performance, availability and scale of mid- to large-sized systems
Passionate about the software development process and facilitating high frequency / high quality change across a vibrant and diverse user community
Strong written and verbal English language skills
ATTITUDES WE WANT
Ability to thrive in our global organization in an outputs driven, fast paced, hybrid and asynchronous work place
Team player, eager to work in a global organization.
Ability to communicate technical and organizational challenges and propose high quality solutions
Comfort working in an agile project and SDLC environment
Self-managed and organization skills
BSc / MSc / PhD in relevant field (Computer Science, Maths, Physics)
Highly knowledgeable about running key business applications on Linux platforms and Linux internals.
Knowledgeable about networking (TCP, UDP, ICMP, ARP, DNS, TLS, HTTP, SSH, etc)
Experience with Cloud and Infrastructure as Code technologies - AWS, Terraform, Docker, Kubernetes, etc
At Goldman Sachs, we commit our people, capital and ideas to help our clients, shareholders and the communities we serve to grow. Founded in 1869, we are a leading global investment banking, securities and investment management firm. Headquartered in New York, we maintain offices around the world.

We believe who you are makes you better at what you do. We're committed to fostering and advancing diversity and inclusion in our own workplace and beyond by ensuring every individual within our firm has a number of opportunities to grow professionally and personally, from our training and development opportunities and firmwide networks to benefits, wellness and personal finance offerings and mindfulness programs. Learn more about our culture, benefits, and people at GS.com/careers.

We’re committed to finding reasonable accommodations for candidates with special needs or disabilities during our recruiting process. Learn more: https://www.goldmansachs.com/careers/footer/disability-statement.html

© The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc., 2021. All rights reserved.

Goldman Sachs is an equal employment/affirmative action employer Female/Minority/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity"
ServiceNow Developer,"About DXC Technology: We are a Fortune 500 global IT services leader. Our more than 130,000 people in 70-plus countries are entrusted by our customers to deliver what matters most. We use the power of technology to deliver mission-critical IT services across the Enterprise Technology Stack to drive business impact. DXC is an employer of choice with strong values, and fosters a culture of inclusion, belonging, and corporate citizenship. We are DXC.


We are looking for a ServiceNow Developer, who can handle both business requirements and technology implementations to deliver IT Service Management solutions for clients. This role will be responsible for supporting DXC clients in the successful implementation and use of ServiceNow, including configuration, tailoring, and coaching to meet their unique business requirements. We are seeking a highly motivated individual who is looking for an opportunity to join an established but still fast-growing organization.

We are hiring for an entry-level/junior developer, who is passionate about scripting and programming. Exposure to scripting/ programming skills during academic projects or internship assignments will be an advantage. We will be providing ITSM, JIRA system, and ServiceNow training and certification.

Key Responsibilities:
Understand operation business needs and translate them into technical requirements.
Responsible for the development of workflows and applications within the ServiceNow platform, which support the streamlining and automation of business processes.
Responsible for developing and maintaining integrations between the ServiceNow platform and external systems.
To support post-implementation tasks including, troubleshooting, administration, patching, and upgrades.

Experience and Skill Sets:
Must be a Singaporean citizen due to G50 security clearance requirements by the client.
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Software Engineering, or related discipline.
0 to 2 years of technical expertise in scripting/ programming, fresh graduates are welcome to apply
Hands-on experience and strong interest in scripting/ programming using HTML, CSS, JavaScript, JQuery, or Angular JS.
Knowledge of the Agile sprint method will be an advantage.
Strong analytical /problem-solving skills.
Good communication skills with strong people skills. Comfortable working with geographically dispersed offshore and cross-functional teams.
Proactive attitude, willing to take up challenges to learn new systems and processes."
Software Developer JO-221219-300968,"Our Client:

Our client is a leading global quantitative trading company based in Chicago, Austin & Amsterdam. The business develops and implements quantitative trading strategies in exchange-traded financial products, trading exclusively for its own account. The company trades in a variety of asset classes, markets, and geographies.

As a software developer, you will design, engineer, and implement the Firm's trading software in the C++ programming language. You will work in close collaboration with the research, systems, and operations teams to architect, implement and analyze new automated electronic trading algorithms. You will play a key role in designing and constructing the Firm's software infrastructure to support new and existing lines of business. In addition, you will expand the Firm's proprietary research platform to improve performance and support new exchanges, products, and functionality.

The Responsibilities:

Developing and maintaining a large-scale 24-hour automated trading system
Solving technical problems and implementing solutions
Leverage existing infrastructure, extending functionality when necessary
Build a deep understanding of exchange behavior to integrate into the existing trading system
Design, implement and maintain distributed storage system with various performance and reliability requirements
Address performance limitations within own business software, open-source libraries and application
Investigate new technologies to improve stability, scalability, and performance
Implement new trading strategies in collaboration with research and operations teams
Investigate signal issues for trading system
Reconcile differences between trading strategies performance in simulation versus production
Optimize the performance of the live trading system and existing code using lock-free data structures, compiler intrinsic, etc.
The Requirements:

Bachelor's degree required in Computer Science/ Information Technology or equivalent
Experience with C++/Java
At least 3 years of experience in the trading industry
Well-versed in the fundamentals of software engineering
Committed to designing and implementing fully automated, scalable, and maintainable solutions with extensive testing
Strong problem solving and communication skills
Experience using Linux operating system
Experience in software analysis for bug fixing and development
What's on Offer:

Competitive salary and benefit package
Working for one of the globally acknowledged company within the industry. A truly established and global leader in the industry
Available avenues to contributes positively for the organization to grow and being recognized for it
Disclaimer: The Company complies with the Tripartite Guidelines on Fair Employment Practices (TGFEP), including the prevailing guidelines on recruitment. All qualified applicants will be considered for the position regardless of their age, race, religion, nationality, marital status, or family responsibilities. A more detailed discussion of the TGFEP is available on the Tripartite Alliance for Fair and Progressive Employment Practices (TAFEP) website at https://www.tal.sg/tafep"
System Engineer (SPM),"Your tasks

To be the technical expert of the solution and provide the necessary support to customers
Responsible for testing, verification, integration and commissioning of system projects
Perform acceptance tests in factory and on-site
Develop system design and reviews documentation according to customer requirements
Conduct training and after-sales support to customers
Perform product demonstration to customer

Your Qualifications

Degree/Diploma in Electrical & Electronic, Telecommunications or Computer Engineering
Knowledge in RF, Spectrum Monitoring, CUAS, and/or networking experience will be given priority
Fluent in English (knowledge of other languages is an advantage)
Must be comfortable and able to handle defense and security solutions
Strong problem-solving skills as well as independent, self-motivated and result-oriented
Dedicated team player with strong job commitment
Travel (international) is required
Personnel with relevant or fitting positions will be considered for senior positions

Interested?
We are looking forward to receiving your application! Ideally, you should apply online with the reference number. If you have any questions, please feel free to contact your recruiting contact via LinkedIn or XING.

Equal opportunities are important to us. We are looking forward to receiving your application regardless of gender, nationality, ethnic and social origin, religion, ideology, disability, age as well as sexual orientation and identity.

reference number

Recruiting Contact

The Rohde & Schwarz technology group is among the trailblazers when it comes to paving the way for a safer and connected world with its leading solutions in test & measurement, technology systems, and networks & cybersecurity. Founded more than 85 years ago, the group is a reliable partner for industry and government customers around the world. Rohde & Schwarz Singapore is the competence centre in the heart of Asia for sales, systems & projects, service & repair, calibration, R&D and customer support. We aim to bring Rohde & Schwarz's technical competence one step closer to our customers in the region. Together with the Asian subsidiaries and agents we form the integral part of the company's multi-cultural sales and distribution network to service our customers."
Platform Reliability Engineer,"Job Purpose

The Platform Reliability Engineer (PRE) combines software development and system engineering to build and run distributed solutions in VMware Pivotal platforms to safeguard, provide and continuously improve the cloud-native software and applications behind the organization’s cloud platform.

The Job
With a vigilant eye on it’s availability, latency, performance and capacity. Ultimately, you will view software as the primary tool to optimizing systems, building infrastructure and removing mundane work through automation.
As part of Cloud Engineering team, the PRE Engineer engages in and improves the full lifecycle of cloud platform solutions and containerization from design, deployment, operation and refinement with accuracy and in compliance with organization policies and security requirements
The PRE Engineer treats operations as a software problem and therefore will code to automate repetitive tasks and optimize practices. Support services before go live through activities like system design consulting, developing software platforms and launch reviews
Maintain post-live cloud operations by measuring and monitoring availability, latency and overall system health with any prompt and remediative actions. To practice sustainable incident response and blameless postmortems
Scale sustainably through mechanisms like automation and evolve services/solutions, leveraging IaaS, CaaS and PaaS by pushing for changes that improves reliability and velocity
Deploy product updates as required while implementing integrations when they arise. Specifying, documenting and developing new product features, and writing automating scripts.
Work with open-source technologies, CI/CD, SCM tools as necessary, and source control such as Bitbucket, implement organization containers (eg, Docker and Kubernetes). Stay current with industry trends and propose new ways for our business to improve
Takes accountability in considering business and regulatory compliance risks and takes appropriate steps to mitigate the risks.
Maintains awareness of industry trends on regulatory compliance, emerging threats and technologies in order to understand the risk and better safeguard the company.
Highlights any potential concerns /risks and proactively shares best risk management practices.
Our Requirements
Working experience as a Platform Reliability Engineer or strong working experience as a Site Reliability Engineer in a cloud operating environment. Candidates with excellent DevOps experience will be considered.
Strong experience in Pivotal’s PAS, PKS & PCF is advantageous as training will be provided.
Good working knowledge of DevOps pipeline and automation tools (E.g. Selenium, SOAPUI, Bamboo, Jenkins, Ansible, Marvin, Github, Bitbucket, Nexus, Jira, Confluence etc).
Strong technical and business acumen with the ability to lead a small technical team.
Experience with infrastructure-as-code, server templating, orchestration, configuration management and provisioning tools is advantageous e.g. Terraform, Chef, Docker, Packer, Kubernetes.
Must code, debug and optimize code and automate mundane tasks.
Systematic problem-solving approach, coupled with effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive.
Experienced in one or more of the following: C, C++, Java, Python, Go, Perl or Ruby.
Strong experience in a Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) environment with strong appreciation of change/version control process and methodologies
High level of integrity, takes accountability of work and good attitude over teamwork.
Takes initiative to improve current state of things and adaptable to embrace new changes.
About Great Eastern

Established in 1908, Great Eastern places customers at the heart of everything we do. Our legacy extends beyond our products and services to our culture, which is defined by our core values and how we work. As champions of Integrity, Initiative and Involvement, our core values act as a compass, guiding and inspiring us to embrace the behaviours associated with each value, upholding our promise to our customers - to continue doing our best for them in a sustainable manner.

We work collaboratively with our stakeholders to look for candidates who exhibit or have the potential to embrace our core values and associated behaviours, as these are the key traits that we expect from our employees as they develop their careers with us.

We embrace inclusivity, giving all employees an equal opportunity to shine and play their role in exploring possibilities to deliver innovative insurance solutions.

Since 2018, Great Eastern has been a signatory to the United Nations (UN) Principles of Sustainable Insurance. Our sustainability approach around environmental, social, and governance (ESG) considerations play a key role in every business decision we make. We are committed to being a sustainability-driven company to achieve a low-carbon economy by managing the environmental footprint of our operations and incorporating ESG considerations in our investment portfolios; improving people’s lives by actively helping customers live healthier, better and longer; and drive responsible business practices through material ESG risk management.

To all recruitment agencies: Great Eastern does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our email or our employees. We will not be responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
Java Developer - Tech Compliance,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities

Development and implementation of the core products
Communicate effectively with product managers, designing and implementing product features to support the system
Performance tuning, online incidents troubleshooting, and system refactoring
Write high-quality, clean, and maintainable code using engineering best practices
Identify, log and resolve compliance issues
Collaborating with other departments on particular projects and special compliance projects as necessary

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor's/Master's degree in computer science, engineering, or equivalent industry experience.
Proficient in core java, and familiar with spring framework
Proficient in MySQL, and familiar with at least one NoSQL DB
Proficient in distributed system design, and familiar with at least one messaging middleware and the underlying design principles
Capable to cope with stress, and quickly learn new knowledge.
Good cross-team communication skills

Preferred Qualification

Proficient in spring cloud and microservice design
Related domain experience in the Fin-Tech industry
Experience or interest in developing backends, APIs, libraries, and SDKs
Performance tuning experience on JVM, SQL, RPC, etc.
Global team management experiences

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Principal Software Engineer,"About Us

Intelligent Machines (IM) Team is working on robotics and machine learning software development. You will work with a group of world-class software architects, robotics software specialists, and machine learning specialists on Dyson’s most complex products development.

About The Role

You’ll be an experienced robotics algorithm engineer with practical software coding skills. Working in an agile cross-functional team, you will contribute to the development of complex features to ensure Dyson continues to create innovative products that will delight our customers.

You'll collaborate with architects, tech leads, software engineers, and specialist engineering to help solve the wide and exciting range of algorithmic challenges posed by the ever expanding Dyson product portfolio.

You'll have a desire to explore and share ideas and techniques across different technical domains and will ideally have expert knowledge of algorithm development for complex, sophisticated systems including hardware, embedded software and robotics subsystems with a focus on behavioural software.

Key Responsibilities

Ability to generate novel and robust robotics algorithms and solutions that work in the real-world.
Work closely with software engineers to implement and test robotics behaviours to production quality with a focus on the underlying algorithms.
Lead the analysis and assessment of the performance of robotics behaviours in both laboratory and home environments.
Lead algorithmic investigations and research alternative algorithmic solutions.
Develop prototype demonstrators utilising rapid prototyping techniques.
Identify key enabler and risk areas of proposed algorithmic solutions.
Work with the architecture team to identify the feature development roadmap.
Collaborate with test teams to define testing strategies for new algorithms.
Provide documentation that is complete and with sufficient detail to support maintenance and future development.
Good product sense and keen focus on product performance.
Act as subject matter expert (SME) in specific domain, disseminating knowledge, guiding and mentor engineers in methodology, best practice and standards
Proactively identify technical risks within projects and influence engineering teams in their resolution
In-depth participation in feature design discussions will be required
About You

A strong quantitative background in Computer Science, Electronics Engineering, Computer Engineering, Mathematics, or robotics engineering related fields.
10+ working experience in development of robotics related products.
Strong mathematical modelling and analytical skills (e.g. Python, MATLAB or similar).
Experience in one or more of the following domains: Localisation, SLAM, motion trajectory control, image processing, object detection/recognition, task management, manipulation, path planning, automatic control, robotics systems or machine learning.
Excellent object-oriented programming , including speed and overall quality; preferably, the candidate shall be able to write high performance product quality code with modern C++.
Familiar with STL, boost C++ libraries, design patterns and able to enforce it in day-to-day tasks is a favoured.
Strong proficiency in multithreading programming and synchronisation mechanisms is a plus.
Experience in Agile practices is a plus.
The ability to learn continuously and improve oneself.
Expertise and experience in embedded system development, including protocol, architecture, behaviours, security, etc, is a plus.
Professionalism and excellent communication skills; ability to communicate complex information at every level.
Optimism and an excitement about collaborating with teammates and interdisciplinary teams, and technically support development.
For a highly experienced candidate, we expect excellent technical guidance skills and the ability to influence the work of others. Experience in overseeing high complexity software development projects is an advantage
Independent, Integrity and self-driven with a strong focus on results to ensure that the whole team succeeds in its goals.
Fluent in spoken and written English.
Benefits

Dyson Singapore monitors the market to ensure competitive salaries and bonuses. Beyond that, you’ll enjoy a transport allowance and comprehensive medical care and insurance. But financial benefits are just the start of a Dyson career. Professional growth, leadership development and new opportunities abound, driven by regular reviews and dynamic workshops. And with a vibrant culture, the latest devices and a relaxed dress code reflecting our engineering spirit, it’s an exciting team environment geared to fuelling and realising ambition.

Dyson is an equal opportunity employer. We know that great minds don’t think alike, and it takes all kinds of minds to make our technology so unique. We welcome applications from all backgrounds and employment decisions are made without regard to race, colour, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other any other dimension of diversity."
"Infrastructure Engineer, Associate","To support the pioneering Core Payments Banking team Affinity teams are created to improve stability by Providing deep dive analysis and troubleshooting expertise to derive Root Cause Analysis for Major P1 incidents. Driving service improvement initiatives and taking care of major hygiene and infrastructure configuration breaks by working closely with Critical RTP Application Teams. Apart from advanced systems administration and infrastructure automation, we deal with SR/DR planning and implementations. We continuously thrive in achieving clean and stable environment for the critical Real time Payments applications.

You will join a high caliber team of innovative, forward thinking technologists whose mission is to identify and implement critical thinking, problem solving, autonomous solutions which modernize and improve the way technology is supported in our firm.

Responsibilities

Act as primary customer interface for Major Incidents, RCA's and service improvement projects.
Responsible for the incident, problem, change management, risk, vendor and client relationship, internal and external communications, service delivery, lifecycle management and service evolution functions for the Infrastructure
Develop and support routine operational activities with automation
Lead root cause analysis meetings as part of process improvement
Work closely with peer teams to deliver high availability and optimum performance for customers
Do trend analysis, drift analysis and create dashboards using Splunk, Grafana and Evolven
Take part in Infrastructure resiliency automation and executions
Learning and facilitating new technologies
Work closely with customers to drive the system stability programs

This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:

BS/BA Degree in Computer Engineering or equivalent
5 years of RedHat Enterprise Linux (RHEL) administration / engineering experience with strong troubleshooting skills
Advanced understanding of business technology drivers and their impact on architecture design, performance and monitoring, best practices.
Proficient in multiple infrastructure technologies and have the operations skills to identify and mitigate difficult and complex technical problems
Ability to articulate to more experienced management a technical strategy in clear, concise, understandable terms
Knowledge on Veritas/RHEL cluster, Block and object storage, Networking
Good knowledge in Splunk, Prometheus and Grafana
Understanding of Virtualization technologies
Experience with Capacity management, Resiliency and Business Continuity Planning and execution
Experience with Infrastructure automation - python, Ansible
Experience working on multiple service improvement programs and able to prioritize work loads
Knowledge of cybersecurity and system security best practices
Experience with multi-tiered application architecture
Familiarity with agile development methodologies and development tools such as JIRA, GIT & Bitbucket
A proven track record of developing and implementing IT strategy and plans
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Self-motivated team player, with strong organizational and time management skills

Preferred Skills

Knowledge of DevOps and Site Reliability Engineer related experience
Working experience in Financial Institutions

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Senior Java Engineer - Core Exchange System,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

The role:

We are on the lookout for several Java Engineers to help facilitate the development and implementation of effective technical solutions for compliance requirements.

NOTE: This is a remote position and we are open to all locations and time zones.

Responsibilities

Design, build, and maintain efficient, reusable, and reliable Java code
Review, test, and verify code for adherence to quality and security standards
Ensure, the best possible performance, quality, and responsiveness of the applications
Identify bottlenecks and bugs, and devise solutions to these problems
Help maintain code quality and organization
Identify, log and resolve compliance issues
Collaborating with other departments on particular projects and special compliance projects as necessary

Requirements

5+ years of experience with full lifecycle of project development for Java Applications
Strong skills in Core Java, server-side Java technologies, and Spring frameworks
Extensive experience in software design, architecture, development integration
Solid knowledge of event processing models, multi-threading, enterprise integration pattern, Web Service and REST
Ability to supervise and mentor junior developers on the team
Bonus for degrees in: Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Software Engineering

Additional Preferred Skills

Proficient in spring cloud and micro-service design
Working experience on backend system of large internet company
Performance tuning experience on JVM, SQL, RPC, etc.
Experience creating React-based UIs

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Data Center Critical Facilities Engineer III,"Who are we?

Equinix is the world’s digital infrastructure company, operating 200+ data centers across the globe and providing interconnections to all the key clouds and networks. Businesses need one place to simplify and bring together fragmented, complex infrastructure that spans private and public cloud environments. Our global platform allows customers to place infrastructure wherever they need it and connect it to everything they need to succeed.

We are a fast-growing global company with 70+ consecutive quarters of growth. Through our innovative portfolio of high-performance products and services, we have created the largest, most active global ecosystem of nearly 10,000 companies, including 1,800+ networks and 2,900+ cloud and IT service providers in over 26 countries spanning five continents.

Joining our operations team means that you will be at the forefront of all we do, maintaining critical facilities infrastructure as part of a close-knit team delivering best in class service to our data center customers. We embrace diversity in thought and contribution and are committed to providing an equitable work environment. that is foundational to our core values as a company and is vital to our success.

Job Summary

Applies acquired job skills to work on tasks that are semi-routine in nature. Focus is on semi-routine tasks within standard operating procedures. Supports the overall team.

Responsibilities

Facility/Infrastructure Maintenance

Performs semi-routine preventative maintence checks on-site to non-critical, facility components.
Performs semi-routine repairs, maintenance and installations to non-critical facility components.
Monitors the Builiding Monitoring System (BMS) and responds timely to semi-routine alarms according to standard operating procedures.
Assists more senior staff in higher facility repairs and corrective maintenance measures.
Operates plumbing, fire suppression, and safety systems, under the supervision of more senior technical staff.
Normally follows established procedures on routine work, requires instructions only on new assignments

Vendor Support

Coordinates with vendors to ensure maintenance activities are carried out as per Equinix's requirements.
Supports the work order approval process for service providers on routine maintenance work, for tracking: briefing at the start of work, work during the day workday/shift and final review of the work carried out.
Ensures vendor maintenance activities are carried out as per Equinix's standard operating procedures.

Site Administration & Incident Support

Performs semi-routine site logs for permits, such as Maintenance Operation Protocol (MOPs) and scripts.
Uses acquired job skills in following operating procedures to support on-site administration.

Work Orders & Additional Projects

Completes semi-routine work requests and circuit installations.
Follows established procedures with troubleshooting and maintaining office equipment (if necessary); supports auxiliary equipment and machines.
Assists more senior staff with responding on-site incidents and acts as directed.

Collaboration

Collaborates with others to resolve semi-routine facility incidents.
Provides assistance to more senior staff on infrastructure projects.
Informs stakeholders of inventory needs to maintain stock levels of parts and equipment.

Qualifications

Typical Degree & Years of Experience
Typically requires a high school diploma and 1-2 years of equivalent work experience.

Equinix is an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability.

Visit our Career page here to understand about Equinix COVID-19 Vaccine Policy."
Data Engineer (ETL & Big Data),"Newly created role due to business expansion
Regional role
About The Company

Our client is a end user with multiple offices across Asia. With massive expansion plan, they are looking to recruit a new Data Analyst / Big Data Engineer ( Snowflake, Azure Data, Azure Synapse, Azure Data Factory / Data Lake) to join their team.

About The Job

You will be responsible for:

Building data ingestion pipeline. This includes maintaining optimal data pipeline architecture

Assembling large, complex data sets to be ready for data analytics to support analytics initiatives

Implementing the delivery of data solution for business stakeholders across different departments (Manufacturing, Operations and etc)

Implementing Data governance Framework (Policies, Standards and Roles). This includes driving Data governance initiative over the design and implementation of data analytics projects

Analyse current business processes, identifying and translating data requirements into business improvement through data analytics. This includes developing technical solutions in areas of big data platform to fulfil various business use cases.

Skills And Experience Required

As a successful applicant, you will have at least 3 years of big data experience. Exposure to Snowflake, Microsoft Azure Data Services - Azure Synapse, Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Lake, Azure Databricks, Azure HDInsight or Azure Machine Learning will be highly preferred.

Whats on offer

This is an excellent opportunity to join a leading company with the opportunity to participate in high value Data projects with exposure to latest technology.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may contact Hoon Teck TAN at 6510 3633. (EA: 94C3609/ R1219669)

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
Software Engineer,"Job Reference #

261633BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Are you passionate about connecting and integrating financial trading platforms and resolving complex requirements and/or problems? Are you a solid and resilient performer when juggling multiple projects and working with various teams to focus on the agreed deliveries?

We would look forward meeting you to:


complementing the engineering team and delivering the many requirements along with the Software-, Requirements- and Test Engineers
working with the Product Owner and POD members to organize and plan the development backlog, sprints and production releases
assisting with issue analysis during and outside of working hours
develop software in Java

Your team

Our team is responsible for the development and maintenance of TCP/IP connections on client and market side build on a common platform using financial protocols like FIX and Swift. The interfaces support 24/6 trading on all products (Equities, Fixed Income, ETFs, Derivatives, Structured Products, etc) on buy-side and sell-side. This interfaces are used UBS Group wide and are also offered to external client & institutions.

Our team is operating out of Switzerland, Poland and Singapore.

Diversity helps us grow, together. That’s why we are committed to fostering and advancing diversity, equity, and inclusion. It strengthens our business and brings value to our clients.

Your expertise


Ideally 7 years of strong Java knowledge, with hands on software development with a good understanding of memory management
knowledge of Trading Flow and Investment Products
knowledge in FIX protocol
SOAP / REST
knowledge of TCP/IP / UDP/IP / MQ
GIT/Scrum/JIRA

Good to have:


IntelliJ IDE / Eclipse
JUnit / Mockito
Linux
SQL / OracleDB
JPA / Hibernate

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
DevOps Engineer,"At Singtel, we're working on projects that push the boundaries of digital, realising our vision and purpose to Empower Every Generation. We have a dynamic and diverse team, with a passion for innovation, and talent to deliver cutting-edge digital solutions and immersive customer experience.

In Group IT, we create great technology that can change the future, and we're looking for people to be part of our digital and 5G journey. If you like to work in a dynamic, leading communications technology group to deliver innovations and excellence across the region, come join our digital, software engineering, data and cyber security teams!

Key Responsibilities
Define/Refine tagging and billing strategies in the Cloud.
Define/Refine the standard operating procedures and services used in the Cloud.
Provide tools to deploy workloads safely to AWS, Azure, and Google. Constantly improving CI/CD pipelines.
Use automation tools such as CloudFormation and Terraform to build service catalogues for development teams.
Work on configuring and supporting all the automated tools across all stages of the development pipeline including Integration, Test, Staging and Production.
Be involved in discussions of development pipeline with key stakeholders including developers, architects and project managers.
Work closely with Information security and infrastructure team in working out an appropriate approach
Be responsible for creating, versioning and testing of scripts for backup, deployment, patching.
Build and define the infrastructure in AWS for the continuous delivery pipeline
Be able to pick up the right level and parameters to monitor within any environment and use the right tools to put in place those monitoring implements.
Constantly upgrade skills and update knowledge along with the latest developments in the world of DevOps and DevSecOps.
Work with 3rd party vendors/subject matter experts and picking up tooling knowledge in delivering DevOps environments to a number of multi-disciplined teams
The ideal candidate should possess
Bachelor’s degree in a relevant field (i.e. IT, Computer Science or Software Engineering)
At least 5 years of relevant experience
Working knowledge of cloud environments with Amazon Web Services: EC2, EBS, S3, ELB, SQS, ElasticCache, CloudFront, ElasticIP, Route53, RDS/Aurora, DynamoDb. You must now how to configure and optimize these services and deploy/manage them in CI/CD pipelines.
A clear understanding of computing principles such as networking, and service operations.
The ability to code is essential. You are able to script in Bash/Zsh, Python, Ruby, Powershell and Java. PowerShell a plus.
You must be at home with Linux and Windows operating systems including package management, scheduling, security, configuration, monitoring.
You are able to use tools such as Git, Jenkins, Puppet, Chef/Ansible, Dynatrace, Nagios, Maven/Ant, Gradle. (Bamboo is a plus)
Deep understanding of load balancing, containerization, NAT services, proxy services.
You have experience with monitoring tools such as OpenView, Dynastrace, NewRelic or Datadog
Familiarity with, SaltStack, Docker/BuildKit/BuildAh is a plus
Good oral and written communication skills.
Must be proactive, resourceful and self-motivated with strong analytical skills.
Good interpersonal, written and communication skills.
Experience in software and application development that requires analysis and design work.
Review of test plans and test cases for SIT
Knowledge/Experience in Gitlab/Github/Bitbucket.
Knowledge/Experience in Continuous Integration and Automated Testing
Knowledge/Experience in Agile Development and Management tools, e.g. Jira, Confluence, Butbucket, Bamboo, SonarQubue, Nexus, Artifactory, Jenkins, Selenium, etc.
Must know CloduFromation and Terraform
Must understand Kubernetes, Istio, API Gateways (Kong/Apigee), and principles of service publication and traffic routing and metering.
Must understand security principles of firewalls and attack prevention techniques.
We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated.

Apply now, and ignite our digital future together."
Senior Mobile Application Developer,"Job Reference #

266477BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Are you passionate about mobile development? Are you able to communicate with global stakeholders? We are looking for someone to:


develop native iOS mobile application
design and develop solutions to meet business specifications;
collaborate with the technical members to suggest appropriate alternatives

Your team

You will be part of the APAC Touchpoint Development team based in Singapore; working with local & global developers, and business across APAC and Switzerland.

Your expertise


an engineering degree with proven 10+ years of experience in software development
8+ years of native Android (Java/Koltin) or native iOS (Swift) development experience
understanding of Google’s Android or iOS design principles and interface guidelines
knowledge of Version Control System (Git)
experience in consuming RESTful services, JSON, and HTTP (and able to help other teams in their backend debuging)

It’ll be a bonus if you have:


knowledge in other mobile (such as React Native, Cordova)
understanding on mobile app deployment process to different AppStores
mobile automated testing experience

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Systems Engineer,"Position Overview

The Systems Engineer undertakes complex projects related to systems provisioning, installations, configurations as well as monitoring and maintenance. He/She applies highly developed specialist knowledge and skills in systems administration and works toward continuous optimisation of systems performance. He implements systems improvements and instructs other IT staff in the resolution of complex issues. He is required to be on standby with on-call availability with varied shifts including nights, weekends and holidays.

He is able to quickly and effectively solve issues as they arise. He is able to methodically identify the cause of the issue, evaluate it and develop a solution in

collaboration with the team. He communicates effectively and displays high level of service standards.

Role & Responsibilities

Execute Systems Administration Service Levels

Monitor systems performance and usage, including response times
Supervise backups, optimisation, initiation of recovery procedures and routine troubleshooting
Communicate regularly with technical, applications and operational staff to ensure systems integrity and security
Determine the systems’ short- and long-term requirements
Manage systems report production

Advise On System Capabilities

Advise senior leaders on system concepts and functional capabilities
Provide technical advice to the team and clients on installation, setup, configuration of systems
Interpret internal or external business issues and recommends solutions/best practices
Implement plans to make systems available to users in a shared, secure and controlled manner

Develop New Systems

Lead the development of new systems as per the system requirements
Design security and integrity controls
Conduct new systems testing and implementation
Define the system maintenance procedures
Analyse the use of new systems to identify enhancement needs
Lead research initiatives for the development of advanced and automated approaches for system administration

Optimise systems performance

Seek opportunities to optimise the delivery of systems services with emphasis on availability, reliability, scalability, and security
Conduct regular system audits and upgrades
Develop automated processes to define, measure, and report on service quality, stability and capacity

Resolve issues

Oversee the assessment of risks to systems
Identify complex system issues to provide advisory to the stakeholders
Investigate cause of systems issues
Resolve complex issues
Provide escalation support for issues presented by the user

Requirements

Qualifications and experience: Senior System Engineer

At least 5 - 6 years’ experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems

Systematic in approach and familiar with enterprise level trouble shooting.

Strong communications skills with stakeholders and ROs.

Experience in healthcare applications preferred and/or willing to take up the challenges in a healthcare related industry.

Degree/Diploma in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalen

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Data Engineer,"What The Role Is

As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.

What You Will Be Working On

Job Responsibilities
Develop, test and maintain the data infrastructure, the data ingestion pipeline, data store and data processing on-premises and cloud
Design, build, deploy and manage end-to-end data pipelines for batch and stream processing that can adequately handle the needs of a rapidly growing data-driven organisation
Responsible for the building of scalable and reliable ETL processes for the ingestion and integration of large, structured and unstructured data from variety of data sources on-premises and on the cloud platforms
Implement and execute data security and data quality measurements to ensure compliance to data security and data governance policies
Implement analytic tools, analytic applications and user self-service portal for data scientists and business users

What We Are Looking For

Required Attributes
At least 5 years of relevant working experience as a data engineer on data lake
Experience with cloud computing environment and familiar with government commercial cloud
Experience working with big data ecosystems, Hadoop & Spark architecture and building data-intensive applications and pipelines
Experience in installing, configuring and supporting Linux and Microsoft Windows Servers

For a start, selected candidates will be offered 1 year contract ."
Full-stack Developer | Singapore,"BlockTech has grown tremendously from its HQ in Amsterdam, the Netherlands, and has opened a new office in September 2022 in Singapore. Would you like to be part of the exciting growth of a scale-up in cryptocurrency derivatives trading? We are now hiring a Full-stack Developer to join the team in Singapore!

What are we looking for?
We are looking for a Full-stack Developer who is passionate about (cryptocurrency) derivatives markets and wants to join a scale-up with an excellent track record and growth potential in an innovative and fast-growing industry.
With us, you will have the possibility to develop components completely from scratch, which will enable us to obtain top-notch performance and stay ahead of the game. This means that you will carry a high level of responsibility since you will have the ability to steer the direction of the company with your newly developed components. When you are not working on new code, you will maintain and improve the current infrastructure and logic.

What do we require from you?
An academic degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Econometrics (or any other quantitative field)
3+ years of professional working experience as a Software Developer working with object-oriented programming languages
Willingness to work with Rust, Python and React
Good written and verbal communication skills in English
Proven versatility and ability to pick up new technologies and learn systems quickly
A positive can-do attitude and a creative mind
A high level of responsibility and ownership
Willingness to commit long-term

What's in it for you?
The chance of a permanent, full-time position in a relaxed and trendy office located in Singapore
A very competitive base salary combined with a discretionary bonus based on your performance as well as the company’s results
A highly-collaborative and experienced team in the innovative and fast-growing cryptocurrency industry
The opportunity to use state-of-the-art technology"
Internship ServiceNow Developer,"Location: Singapore, Singapore

Thales people architect identity management and data protection solutions at the heart of digital security. Business and governments rely on us to bring trust to the billons of digital interactions they have with people. Our technologies and services help banks exchange funds, people cross borders, energy become smarter and much more. More than 30,000 organizations already rely on us to verify the identities of people and things, grant access to digital services, analyze vast quantities of information and encrypt data to make the connected world more secure.

Thales established its presence in Singapore in 1973 to support the expansion of aerospace-related activities in the Asia-Pacific region. Throughout the last four decades, the company grew from strength to strength and is today involved in the primary businesses of Aerospace (including Air Traffic Management), Defence & Security, Ground Transportation and Digital Identity & Security. Thales today employs over 2,100 people in Singapore across all its business areas.

General Description Of Job/team

Our department is responsible for operation of Thales DIS infrastructures in our Private and Public clouds. We are using ServiceNow to manage our CMDB (Configuration Management DataBase) and to support the main ITSM processes as financial management, incident management, request management and change management.

ServiceNow is a very powerful framework, widely known and used worldwide. It allows deep parametrization and customization to adapt to the need.

In the context of this deployment, we are proposing an internship in link with configuration management database for a student in 3rd year of an engineering school or university master.

What To Expect From This Internship

In this internship, you will take in charge the analysis, development & documentation of Data Analysis tooling to support the operation of our Configuration Management Data Base (CMDB) and contribute to SRE’s (Site Reliability Engineering) team continuous improvement tasks.

Cmdb

This internship, has 2 main objectives:
Rework of the generic naming scheme generation script. The idea is to have a single source of CMDB CIs naming convention.
SRE Related Tasks
Review existing API with other tools and homogenise the monitoring.
Analysis, development and documenting the automation of some of time-consuming tasks.
To contribute on reducing minor technical debts of the team
Depending, on the progress and priorities, additional topics may be added to the scope as interfaces with other tools, (JIRA , PagerDuty, Slack.. )

Requirements

With this internship, you will have the opportunity to have a wide view and understanding of IT infrastructure management activities;
You will acquire knowledge in ITIL standards for IT service management activities.
You will develop analyst skills and acquire competencies on a widely deployed software suite – ServiceNow.
You will work within ServiceNow framework, develop JavaScript pieces for interfaces or customization.
You will also have an overview of operation activities and be involved in SRE (Site Reliability Engineering activity ).
We Will Appreciate If

Other requirements:
You have already experienced working with big software suites(i.e.ServiceNow , Sales Force, SAP , .. ) and be interested in the analyst part of the work, as much as development and deployment.
You have some useful experience in Java Development, Javascript, and REST interface development.
Basic knowledge & experience in Unix scripting (shell , perl)
Looking for undergraduates/master students to join us in March 2023 and commit for a minimum period of 6 months.

At Thales we provide CAREERS and not only jobs. With Thales employing 80,000 employees in 68 countries our mobility policy enables thousands of employees each year to develop their careers at home and abroad, in their existing areas of expertise or by branching out into new fields. Together we believe that embracing flexibility is a smarter way of working. Great journeys start here, apply now!"
Mobile Software Engineer Intern (TikTok Live) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2023. Internships at TikTok aim to offer students industry exposure and hands-on experience. Watch your ambitions become reality as your inspiration brings infinite opportunities at TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 08 May 2023 to 28 July 2023 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - Starting 09 January 2023 or 14 August 2023

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit in either internship period. Please state your availability clearly in your resume (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the TikTok Live Client team
TikTok Live Client team focus has been focusing on delivery engaging and the best live streaming experience to global users. Our team develops creative and interesting features for streamers and viewers to express themselves and interact with others instantly. We are looking for passionate mobile software engineers to join us in this fast growing industry.

Responsibilities
- Design, implement the new-user features of our mobile application;
- Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a world-class mobile experience;
- Optimize mobile applications and user experience on the Android / iOS platforms;
- Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science or a related technical discipline;
- Proficiency in coding & scripting languages such as C/C++, Java, Kotlin, Objective-C, Swift, JavaScript or Python
- Solid understanding of computer science and strong problem solving skills
- Good team communication and collaboration skills
- Experience in mobile development (Android/iOS apps) is a plus but not a must-have

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
URGENT / Firmware Engineer / Embedded (C / C++ / Linux / MCU ),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Permanent job opportunity
Great remuneration and benefits
Great career progression
Responsibilities
Design, develop and perform system/software verification & validation on embedded systems
Maintain and improve the performance of existing software
Develop system on gateways and embedded controllers system communicating over wire and
wireless channels
Conduct design review, bug fix and update/create design documentation
Work with other teams to implement and test on various devices for interconnectivity.
Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology,
Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Electrical/Electronic) or equivalent.
At least 3 year(s) of working experience in firmware development
Extensive experience in Embedded Programming using C/C++ in Embedded Linux and MCU
Good experience with various communication interface (peripherals) and protocols (especially SPI, I2C, UART, MODBUS TCP/IP and RS232/RS485)
Experience in wireless communication system/protocols eg. Bluetooth, Zigbee, Wi-Fi, Lora will be an advantage
Ability to work independently and multi-task effectively
Flexible and willing to accept a change in priorities as necessary
Good interpersonal communication and documentation/presentation skills
How To Apply

Interested applicants please click on “Apply Now”.

We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).

Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.

Trust Recruit Pte Ltd

EA License No: 19C9950

EA Personnel: Tan Yee Chean (Chester)

EA Personnel Reg No: R22110448
Desired Skills and Experience
RTOS, Technical Documentation, Embedded Linux, Embedded Software, Applied Research, Hardware, Ability To Work Independently, Wireless, Bluetooth, Embedded Systems, Firmware, ZigBee, Software Design, Electrical Engineering, C++"
Backend Software Engineer -Content discovery（Search）- Singapore,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

Our team is responsible for providing TikTok search users with first-class search experience by building a strong and robust infrastructure and platform to support product fast iteration and key feature development. In our team, you'll have the opportunity to take part in developing the key features on TikTok Search, understand how TikTok Search could be evolved to be a multi-billion-user product and first-handed experience how user request varies on this giant from time to time. We encourage a culture of self-driven, intellectual curiosity, openness and problem-solving.

Responsibilities
- Support business development of TikTok Search, provide the best search experience for TikTok users. Detailed responsibilities include but not limited to:
- Product Development: Support fast iterations of TikTok Search business and further enable the product growth.
- Performance & Stability: Build a fast and robust Search product by keeping optimizing system performance and improving service stability.
- Search Engineering Infrastructure: Guarantee reasonable Search architecture governance to ensure that the overall system operates smoothly.
- Search offline processing: Construct a high freshness multi-media index and provide a reliable offline data support for Search Engine.
- Backend engineering team building, management and development.

Qualifications

- BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other relevant majors.
- Excellent understanding on how modern Search system is built or/and how modern Seach product should be evolved.
- Must have industry experience in building a consumer-facing Search product.
- Experience in building a medium-size backend technical team from scratch
- Excellent problem-analysis and -solving skills, have industry experience in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
- Good at coding, data structure and basic algorithm
- Good team communication and collaboration skills.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Senior Machine Learning Engineer (Python, C++)","About The Company

Our client is a pioneer in the F&B sector to provide best in class robotic automation and digital solutions to restaurants worldwide. Due to their expanding businesses, my client is seeking to introduce and implement machine vision to further enhance the performance and reliability of the existing robotics and automation solutions.

About The Job
Lead and collaborate with local research institutes to drive and derive computer vision solutions to improve overall system performance
Work with raw image data, research, develop, evaluate, and optimize various computer vision and deep learning models for various automation applications
Define and supervise the data acquisition process to build up a training database
Explore and visualize data acquired to identify features, and differences in data distribution that could improve performance when deploying the model in the real world
Analyze the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them
Deploy machine vision models on edge devices after optimization to meet customer requirements and maintain them to later improve to address additional customer requirements in the future
Defining validation strategies and deploy models to production
Work and collaborate with industry experts and scientists to realize and implement end-to-end solutions.
Skills And Experience Required
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Machine Learning, or in related fields preferred
Bachelor’s degree and relevant technical knowledge and experience in computer vision will be considered
At least 2 years of experience in computer vision and/or deep learning for object detection and tracking along with semantic or instance segmentation either in the academic or industrial domain
In-depth understanding and breadth of computer vision and deep learning algorithms
Strong foundation in data structures and algorithms in Python or C++
Proficiency with a deep learning framework and tools such as TensorFlow or Keras
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model with the required latency including exposure to IoT technology like edge computing principles and architecture preferably for Raspberry Pi
Experience in different model optimization techniques apart from hyperparameter tuning to reduce memory usage without hindering the performance of deploying on-edge devices
Must be able to produce solutions independently in an organized manner and be able to work in a team
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for effectively communicating with the team and ability to present information to a varied technical and non-technical audience.
Willing to learn and positive, can-do attitude
To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may contact Kaixinn.

(EA: 94C3609/ R2196712 )

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM’s regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
Senior Algorithm Engineer,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

We are looking for Senior Algorithm Engineer to join our TechOps team.

This is a full-time onsite/remote position.

Responsibilities:

Responsible for the development and algorithm optimization of abnormal detection, root cause analysis and other functions of monitoring products
Focus on cutting-edge technologies and trends in AiOps field to drive algorithm and product optimization

Requirements:

At least 5 years of work experience
Good foundation of program development, familiar with Python, Java, spark, Flink and other distributed computing platforms
Familiar with machine learning and deep learning algorithms, such as logistic regression, tree model, ensemble learning, temporal data correlation algorithms ARIMA, LSTM, CNN, etc
Familiar with machine learning related development frameworks, such as Numpy, Sklearn, Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc., experience in practical application and optimization of algorithm projects
Experience in anomaly detection or root cause analysis related to monitoring products is preferred
AiOps related experience is preferred

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Cloud Migration Engineer (DWH / Reporting / GIS),"About Us

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 624,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities.

Top 3 Must have skills / Primary skills
• ETL data processing, e.g. Informatica, SSIS, etc.
• Dashboard / reporting, e.g. Cognos, SSRS, Qlik, etc.
• Database (SQL) and GIS (ArcGIS, FME)

Good to have skills (Optional)
• Cloud Technologies (AWS Glue, AWS QuickSight etc)
• Strong analytical skills and problem-solving skills
• Aptitude to learn new technologies
• Excellent communication skills.


Detailed Job Description
• Participate in migration from On Prem to AWS, as well as operational support.
• Creating, enhancing and maintaining Framework Manager models to support business requirements
• To design and develop reports using Cognos or other reporting tools
• Manages daily and monthly processing and maintenance of Data Warehouse and ETL workflow jobs
• To provide production support for the existing Cognos reports and dashboards
• To resolve production tickets raised by users within SLA.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.

Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.

Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women."
Associate Application Developer (ServiceNow),"610546BR

Introduction

As an Application Developer, you will lead IBM into the future by translating system requirements into the design and development of customized systems in an agile environment. The success of IBM is in your hands as you transform vital business needs into code and drive innovation. Your work will power IBM and its clients globally, collaborating and integrating code into enterprise systems. You will have access to the latest education, tools and technology, and a limitless career path with the world’s technology leader. Come to IBM and make a global impact!

Your Role and Responsibilities

Work You Could Do As An Associate ServiceNow Developer

To solution, design, develop, implement and support ServiceNow tools
To support post implementation tasks including, troubleshooting, administration, patching and upgrades;
To design, develop, configure, test, implement, support and maintain ServiceNow solutions.
Advise on tools technology adoption based on business & technical consideration.
Propose integration strategies for the various technology components to achieve a holistic solution.

SG_hotjobs

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

Please refer to the JD

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

Please refer to the JD

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Cloud Application Developer,"Responsibilities

DSO National Laboratories (DSO) is Singapore’s largest defence research and development (R&D) organisation, with the critical mission to develop technological solutions to sharpen the cutting edge of Singapore's national security. At DSO, you will develop more than just a career. This is where you will make a real impact and shape the future of defence across the spectrum of air, land, sea, space and cyberspace.

The Digital Division leads the digital transformation of DSO through the master planning and policies, delivering digital capabilities through IT infrastructure, and providing one stop service to corporate and R&D Divisions. The Digital Division will transform the way we work, our workplace, and the capabilities we deliver to the MINDEF/SAF and for the security of Singapore.

People are DSO’s greatest asset. You will get to realise your career aspirations and develop your own niche either as a deep technical expert or a leader in the team. With frequent career dialogues and a robust training and development framework, we will provide you with the necessary development tools for you to reach your potential. You will also be recognised and rewarded through competitive remuneration packages and scholarship opportunities.

Digital Division’s IT Group (ITG) supports the IT needs for DSO’s enterprise and R&D functions. ITG oversee the development and operations of core IT infrastructure, enterprise networks, and enterprise applications.

Cloud Application Developer

In this role, you will:

 Develop Enterprise IT Applications on the Cloud platforms such as AWS and Azure
 Use technologies such as API, serverless-applications, IAM, etc, to develop the enterprise applications
 Develop effective and secure software, using the DevSecOps methodology
 Familiar with full stack web development and have good fundamentals in UI design

Requirements

 Degree in Computer Science
 Experience with Cloud Development is preferred
 Preferably: Microsoft Certified: Azure Developer Associate"
Salesforce Architect,"My client is a globally renowned systems integrator, seeking an experienced Salesforce Architect to join their team.

The primary role as a Salesforce Architect is a trusted advisor and leader who partners with business stakeholders and executives to design a vision and architecture for a solution to a business problem.

Responsibilities:
Offers best practice advice and recommendations to clients often extending beyond Salesforce to topics around overall systems architecture and CRM strategy
Leads technical requirements gathering or design workshops to derive the envisioned solution along with detailed architecture design and technical specifications
Provides Salesforce architecture design expertise in integrating the Salesforce solution to client’s ecosystems
Provide Solution Blueprinting, mapping Salesforce features to Business requirements. In line with the 80:20 rule.
Provide technical governance and risk management during presales and delivery
Develop creative solutions that solve our client’s business and technical problems
Leads and facilitates project delivery to define business, functional, and technical requirements
Capable of defining business processes using CRM & SFDC best practices
Develops data integration, data migration and DevOps deployment strategies
Provide coaching and establishing standards to development team during the implementation phase
Preparation of Demonstration, orchestrating Proof of Concepts and benefit realization
Manages direct reports and mentors junior team members
Engagement with clients’ stakeholders to understand their needs, provide meaningful solutions and build strong relationships to be the trusted partner
Perform solution effort sizing and define delivery plan
Assess, advocate for and approve external technologies, such as Salesforce AppExchange packages, for their suitability
Engage in practice development initiatives and runs knowledge sharing forum
Identify and develop employee skill matrix on technology, industry and soft skills to cater for the pipeline demand
Proactive problem solving skills and ability to suggest trade off on solutions between OOTB and custom code
Identify and work on the Account Mining activities to generate more revenue

Requirements:
8 to 10 years of practical experience in presales and execution of medium and large-scale Salesforce implementation and support projects
Rapid comprehension of client’s system architecture to provide an envisioned future technology stack via roadmap
Hands-on knowledge of Salesforce Core Cloud and AppExchange solution
Wide knowledge of Customer Engagement solution on various industries
Salesforce Architect & MuleSoft certifications
Excellent communication skill in customer interaction, presentation, story-telling and engagement skills
· Excellent technical writing skills in solution illustration, proposal and contract writing
· Excellent team management skills
· Excellent problem-solving skills in articulation of complex problems and solutions in a simple, visual and impactful manner
· Experience working in an IT services/consulting firm is highly preferred
· Experience with Data modelling, SQL, integration with Web Services (SOAP / REST / XML)) WS-* stack and WSDL are added advantage to support user testing
· Excellent understanding of Salesforce Sharing Security: Profiles, Permission Sets, Roles, Record Visibility etc
· Excellent understanding of the Salesforce development and deployment lifecycles: Sandboxes, Licenses, Deployment tools, SFDX, etc
· In-depth knowledge of software development fundamentals such as: knowledge of data structures, object-oriented programming, relational database design, and design patterns
· In-depth knowledge to Web development skills including CSS, JavaScript, HTML, XML are added advantage
· Proven leadership ability to build, manage and foster a team-orientated environment

This position is open to candidates who are able to relocate to Singapore."
Full Stack Developer,"TThis role is with Polybee, a startup supported by SGInnovate.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Polybee is on a mission to enhance food security. We aim to achieve our mission by increasing productivity in agriculture. The first problem we are working on is automation of pollination. Pollination is critical to productivity; nearly a third of agricultural production depends on it. However, this process is largely left to chance.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
There are sectors, strategic to global food security, that suffer from poor pollination. This is because either it must be done manually, or natural pollinators are ineffective. Examples include seed companies, greenhouses and indoor vertical farms.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Our thesis is that autonomous pollination will be achieved at scale with drones. Moreover, taking control of the most critical step in production enables us to trace and predict yields.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Our technology has three main pillars:
• Control systems of miniature drones
• Computer vision for perception and crop analytics
• Software platform for data visualization and autonomous operations

Description:

As a Full Stack Developer, you will be responsible for designing and developing web-based platforms specifically tailored for Polybee’s precision agriculture services. The aim of this project is to develop and maintain Polybee’s web app for plant measurements, called Phenobee, in addition to designing and developing a web-based remote monitoring and control centre for Unmanned Aerial Vehicles (UAVs). You will find yourself working closely with our talented sub-teams in several interesting domains, be it robotics, horticulture, or computer vision. Through this position, you will build products that our users find pretty, efficient, and easy-to-use.

Duties & Responsbilities:

Developing and maintaining Polybee’s plant measurement platform, Phenobee.
Designing and developing front end web app architecture for a remote UAV monitoring and control dashboard.
Designing user interactions and experience on web pages.
Developing and maintaining back-end website applications.
Deploying deep learning models and computer vision stacks in the cloud.
Ensuring responsiveness of applications.
Working alongside engineers and horticulturists for core functionality integration.
Working alongside graphic designers for web design features.
Designing and developing APIs for data management and retrieval.
Designing and developing security and data protection measures.
Writing technical documentation.
Designing and developing unit tests.
Participating in code reviews.
Supporting the company’s future web development initiatives.

Required Skills:

Proficiency with fundamental front-end languages such as HTML, CSS and JavaScript.
Proficiency with AngularJS and familiarity with other JavaScript frameworks such as React.
Proficiency with MySQL and familiarity with other database technologies such as MSSQL, Oracle and MongoDB.
Proficiency with web servers such as IIS and Apache, and UI/UX design.
Proficiency with cloud services such as AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud.
Experience with building efficient and secure web APIs.
Experience in developing security and data protection measures including but not limited to Web Application Firewalls (WAFs) and data encryption.
Experience in software engineering practices, including but not limited to software design and implementation, unit testing, code reviews, continuous integration, source control, and coding standards compliance.

Good-to-Have Skills:

Experience with Git is preferred.
DevOps experience preferred.
Experience with deploying deep learning models in the cloud and web-integration.
Prior experience with Robot Operating System (ROS) and integration of ROS with web apps.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, self-directed, entrepreneurial environment.
Decision-making, problem resolution, and critical thinking skills.
Ability to multi-task activities with shifting priorities.

Interested applicants may apply directly on STARS Marketplace
https://stars.sginnovate.com/viewrole?type=tm&jobid=MKT_2022_POLYBEE_1844"
Staff Software Engineer (API Development),"Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Job Description

We are creating a set of Fintech APIs to enable our business partners to create innovative products powered by Visa’s services and networks. You are a full stack software engineer who is creative, adaptable, and fun to work with. You will need the following to succeed in this position:

Experience developing, documenting and maintaining secure RESTful APIs for financial transactions (OOP)
Experience documenting SDKs and APIs with clear tutorials and sample apps that other developers can identify with (Swagger & OpenAPI Specification 3.0)
Experience in building high throughput, scalable distributed system

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office two days a week, Tuesdays and Wednesdays with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% of the time based on business needs.

Basic Qualifications

Qualifications

8 or more years of relevant work experience with a Bachelor Degree or at least an advance degree (e.g. Masters, MBA, JD, MD) with 2 or more years of relevant work experience

Preferred Qualifications

Quick learner, self-starter, detailed and thorough
Strong experience working in an Agile environment, commitment to Agile values and team-based work
Experience in all phases of software development life cycle including project management, functional requirements definition, technical design, development, testing, quality assurance, system certification, systems implementation and system validation
Knowledgeable of common developer tool sets such as Java, XML, JSON, REST, Spring, etc.
Experience in Behaviour Driven Development (BDD) and/or Test-Driven Development (TDD) is required
Experience in creating performing tests and produce results to ensure accurate compliance with business requirements, project design, load and performance testing
Strong secure coding practices
Experienced in devops fundamental practices
Consistently able to assess and evaluate problems in a production environment and manage risk to the service when recommending change
Experience in best practices for API development and design patterns
Experience in building RESTful services
Experience in developing real-time multithreaded Java applications that are fault-tolerant, scalable and can handle high volumes
Experience in architecture design work considered a plus
Working knowledge NoSQL DB considered a plus

Please Note: Due to the COVID-19 pandemic and the evolving visa/travel restrictions in place, we are currently only able to extend offers to candidates with the right to work in Singapore. We are keeping the situation under close review and will adjust accordingly should the restrictive measures be lifted.

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
SDLC and Runtime GitLab Software Engineer,"Job Description

SDLC and Runtime (SDLCR) focuses on delivering engineer-first, scalable platforms for job scheduling, Compute-as-a-Service, file transfer, firmwide software distribution and software development, including CI/CD (Gitlab ecosystem).
Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) is a suite of products that provides build and deploy tooling for Engineers in the firm. It provides a modern, secure and highly available plant that facilitates source control, code review, build, test and production activation.
Primary customer base for SDLCR are Engineers at Goldman Sachs. Key customers are the Global Markets Division (GMD) and Consumer and Investment Management Division (CIMD). Also significant customer usage in the Infrastructure Group (Core Engineering) and Investment Banking Division (IBD) Engineering.

AS A SDLC ENGINEER

You will be working at the heart of the developer experience, ensuring the code that is written by thousands of GS engineers is versioned securely, reviewed expertly, compiles fast, tests comprehensively and is distributed widely. You will deliver CI/CD solutions that support cloud native development and contribute to our efforts to move the firm to a cloud-based mobile SDLC. You could be working with cutting edge build technology from AWS & Google, or the latest cloud technology in one of more backend languages including Java, Golang, and Python.

SDLC Platforms Include
Build / Development
GitLab - The firm's strategic vendor CI/CD platform, hosted in-house with instances on-prem and on public cloud
Proprietary SDLC, based on Subversion for source control to facilitate workflow and approvals around building and deploying software
In-house developed Continuous Deploy (CD) tools for deploying Software packages, config and Infrastructure as Code
Distribution - Linux and Windows software distribution system used by Gitlab, Conductor Software Factory and Train
Artifact Repository - Primary build artifact repository hosting terabytes of internal and external software packages and industry standard asset repos such as Mavern Central, NPMScopes and PyPi, running on Sonatype Nexus
Your Responsibilities Will Be
Build out our next generation instances of GitLab to support local onshore developers. This will need to be designed such that it is secure, tested, and that meets or exceeds industry standard performance and availability
Develop features and improvements to our GitLab solution
Collaborate with Product Management and other stakeholders within Engineering to maintain and improve the functions and quality of service
Advocate for improvements to product quality, security, and performance
Diagnose and solve technical problems, both within the core GitLab environment, and the associated GS technical eco-system
What You Will Learn When You Join Us
Cloud native architectures in AWS.
Experience with large scale monorepos, build systems and deployment paradigms
Expertise in commercial / open source build systems (Gradle / Bazel / Make) and strong knowledge of software change management systems
Experience of DevOps, SRE, infrastructure (storage / networks / etc.)
Design and implement mid to large scale distributed systems
Partner with and provide technical guidance on best practices to the GS engineering community, the business teams, and operations teams
Core Skills And Experience We Are Looking For
Associate / VP level is up to 5 years / more than 5 years of relevant industry experience respectively
Ability to use GitLab
Professional experience with Cloud deployment patterns. Specifically AWS cloud constructs and Hashicorp Terraform
General knowledge of multiple languages, and in-depth strong programming skills of at least one of: Golang, Erlang, Java, Python, C, C++, Java
Strong software engineering fundamentals
Experience with all stages in the lifecycle of developing and running large distributed systems
Experience with diagnosis, prevention and management of performance, availability and scale of mid- to large-sized systems
Passionate about the software development process and facilitating high frequency / high quality change across a vibrant and diverse user community
Strong written and verbal English language skills
ATTITUDES WE WANT
Ability to thrive in our global organization in an outputs driven, fast paced, hybrid and asynchronous work place
Team player, eager to work in a global organization.
Ability to communicate technical and organizational challenges and propose high quality solutions
Comfort working in an agile project and SDLC environment
Self-managed and organization skills
Preferred Qualifications
BSc / MSc / PhD in relevant field (Computer Science, Maths, Physics)
Highly knowledgeable about running key business applications on Linux platforms and Linux internals.
Knowledgeable about networking (TCP, UDP, ICMP, ARP, DNS, TLS, HTTP, SSH, etc)
Experience with Cloud and Infrastructure as Code technologies - AWS, Terraform, Docker, Kubernetes, etc
About Goldman Sachs

At Goldman Sachs, we commit our people, capital and ideas to help our clients, shareholders and the communities we serve to grow. Founded in 1869, we are a leading global investment banking, securities and investment management firm. Headquartered in New York, we maintain offices around the world.

We believe who you are makes you better at what you do. We're committed to fostering and advancing diversity and inclusion in our own workplace and beyond by ensuring every individual within our firm has a number of opportunities to grow professionally and personally, from our training and development opportunities and firmwide networks to benefits, wellness and personal finance offerings and mindfulness programs. Learn more about our culture, benefits, and people at GS.com/careers.

We’re committed to finding reasonable accommodations for candidates with special needs or disabilities during our recruiting process. Learn more: https://www.goldmansachs.com/careers/footer/disability-statement.html

© The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc., 2021. All rights reserved.

Goldman Sachs is an equal employment/affirmative action employer Female/Minority/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity"
Backend Engineer Intern (TikTok DM) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2023. Internships at TikTok aim to offer students industry exposure and hands-on experience. Watch your ambitions become reality as your inspiration brings infinite opportunities at TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycle below: -
1. Off-cycle Internship - Starting 09 January 2023

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the internship period. Please state your availability clearly in your resume (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the TikTok Social Team
We are the messaging team on TikTok. Our team's mission is to facilitate meaningful user connections through TikTok's messaging experience, which is still in its infancy. We achieve our mission by building and shipping tools that help our users more easily connect and share the things they care about.
Our team is diverse, cross-functional and growing and we are seeking mobile and backend engineers based in our Singapore office.

Responsibilities:
1. We are building next generation IM system to support core social scenarios.
2. Develop large-scale software systems that powers TikTok app.
3. Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability, performance and reliability of the Messaging product.
4. Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to deliver high-quality work in rapid product development.

Qualifications

1. Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or a related technical discipline;
2. Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
3. Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
4. Possess good team communication and collaboration skills
5. Prior internship experience in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications is a plus
6. Highly advantageous to have experience on building large-scale instant messaging systems (like Facebook Messages, Instagram, Snapchat or WeChat), or in-app chats.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com"
Senior Java Developer,"Job Reference #

266112BR

Job Type

Full Time, Part Time

Your role

Are you motivated to deliver comprehensive technology solutions to complex business challenges? Are you a multitasker and experienced in developing web based IT application using Java/J2ee? We are looking for someone like you to develop and maintain IT applications in Be a Client Stream. You will be contributing by:


develop and maintain Java based web applications
work Closely with Senior Tech lead & Solution Architect to drive solutions
drive & implement good practice in the team to ensure highest quality of deliveries
manage and maintain code repositories
prepare & maintain automated deployment scripts
maintain Dev & Test servers and keep them in sync
provide details to Technical Lead & BA to prepare Tech design as well as Requirement Specification documents
ensuring on time delivery of your tasks assigned by Tech lead & project manager
participate in daily scrum and provide updates on work assigned

Your team

You’ll be working in the Crew Client Contract & Sign Unit with colleagues based across the region in at least six distinct locations. We work as a team together with the aspiration to provide trusted IT services and project support to the bank to support the ambitious growth plans. As an IT Solution Architect / Development lead, you’ll play an important role in making sure we achieve both business and technology objectives.

Your expertise


bachelor or equivalent focusing on Computer Science, Software Engineering, etc.
ideally 6+ years of experience in a similar position focused on full stack java development within the financial sector
interested in learning new technologies and practices, reuse strategic platforms and standards, evaluate options, and make decisions with long-term sustainability in mind
strong communicator, from making presentations to technical writing
experience with Java and Spring (Container, MVC, JDBC, Boot)
experience with Cloud technologies (Azure, AKS, Functions) & knowledge of Container technologies (Docker)
data streaming architecture (Kafka) or messaging (ASB, Tibco)
relational databases (Oracle, Postgres)
client-side web technologies (JavaScript, React JS, JSON, HTML, CSS

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Infrastructure Engineer Intern (Data Systems) - 2022,"Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with ByteDance.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -

Summer Internship - 09 May 2022 to 29 July 2022 (12 weeks)
Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the two above internship periods.

Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About The Data Systems Team

The Data Systems team supports the company's fast growth by building and operating hyperscale datacenters. The team manages the end to end lifecycle of server fleet, providing cloud solutions and various infrastructure services ensuring that they are scalable and are reliable.

Responsibilities

Design and build infrastructure services, systems, and platforms;
Develop tools, automation, and monitors to operate infrastructure efficiently;
Work in a fast-paced environment and be responsible end-to-end for the production environment by responding to performance and reliability issues and participating in on-call rotations;
Help improve the whole lifecycle of infrastructure services from inception and design throughout development, to deployment, user support and refinement.

Qualifications

Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or a related technical discipline;
Experience in one or more programming languages such as Java, C++, Go, or scripting experience in Shell and Python.

Preferred Qualifications

Experience or knowledge in Unix/Linux systems from kernel to shell and beyond;
Experience or knowledge in infrastructure solutions, AWS, Google, Azures, and other cloud services;
Experience or knowledge in networking systems (TCP/IP, BGP, DNS, etc.);
Experience or knowledge in traffic systems such as load balancers, NAT, and proxies, etc.;
Experience or knowledge in big data solutions such as Elasticsearch, Spark and Hadoop, which handle Terabytes of data;
Experience or knowledge in building platforms, automation, and tools to manage server fleet, their life cycles and systems running on top;
Experience or knowledge in developing and operating one or more of the following systems - OpenStack, Kubernetes, Nginx, ipvs, ELK stack, Hadoop, etc.
Self-driven and capable of coping with ambiguity and moving projects from concept to delivery;
Strong analytical skills and the ability to solve real world problems in a fast-paced environment.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://jobs.bytedance.com/en/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@bytedance.com."
"Software Engineer (Android), TikTok Mobile Infrastructure - Singapore","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok Mobile Architecture & Infrastructure Team is dedicated to productivity and quality of TikTok APP's engineering projects, empowering hundreds of TikTok mobile developers in areas including infrastructure, app architecture, engineering tool chains, and app foundations.

You will join a team consisting of creative, passionate developers who always strive to stay at the forefront of technologies. We constantly push the limits of what our technology is capable of, strive to be leaders in innovation, and deeply value the diversity of team's background. We share our learning through regular weekly meetings, tech talks, and internal tech journals.

If you are interested in joining a world-class team and ready for taking up challenges of huge complexity and scale, we look forward to hearing from you soon!

Responsibilities:
- Build mobile infrastructure and tools to enhance engineering efficiency
- Analyze and optimize UI and infrastructure application code for better performance
- Develop and maintain reusable Android app components
- Collaborate with product engineering teams to deliver technical solutions and best practices
- Optimize the project structure and workflow to improve engineering productivity, efficiency, and quality
- Drive architecture innovations to support world-class mobile app development

Qualifications

Requirements:
- Bachelor's degree or equivalent practical experience
- Experience in building and shipping complex, business critical Android app products with frequent iteration
- Deep understanding of design patterns and principles with a broad knowledge of Android techstack
- Familiar with Jetpack and/or other open source Android libraries, such as RxJava, Retrofit, Litho, etc.
- Deep understanding of Android SDK to create scalable, dynamic, and highly performant UI components
- Working knowledge of remote APIs, concurrency, layouts, transitions, animations, client side persistence, and architectural patterns on mobile apps
Nice-to-haves:
- Experience working in a complex, matrix organization involving cross-functional and/or cross-business projects
- Experience working in a mobile architecture/infrastructure team with deep understanding of the techstack in these projects
- Experience in sub-engineering areas such as performance optimization, toolchain, automated testing, design pattern, etc.
- Strong communication skills; enjoy working as a team while being comfortable with delivering large business outcomes independently

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Data Engineer,"The Coca-Cola Company is a 135+ years old total beverage company, offering over 500 brands in more than 200 countries and territories. We’re constantly transforming our portfolio, from reducing sugar in our drinks to bringing innovative new products to market. We’re also working to reduce our environmental impact by replenishing water and promoting recycling. With our bottling partners, we employ more than 700,000 people, helping bring economic opportunity to local communities worldwide.

Learn more at Coca-Cola Journey at www.coca-colacompany.com and follow us on Twitter (@CocaColaCo), Instagram (@thecocacolaco), Facebook (@thecocacolaco) and LinkedIn.

Position Overview

The Data Engineer’s role is to create BI solutions that impart insights by telling visual stories to users. This is a hands-on development position mainly using Microsoft Azure data engineering skills.

The engineer will work with end users and the data team to 1) define the requirements for the data & analytics projects, 2) establish data ingestions & pipelines to enable insights 3) Creation of Data Models to enable self-service analytics. During periods of heavy development, engineer will work with external consultants for development as needed.

The role will report into the project manager/ team lead in the Singapore regional development centre

The mission of the RDC is to leverage the power of data & analytics to identify opportunities to drive growth of the company and enable timely and quality decision making.

Key Results

Compliance with industry best practice software and company technical architecture standards
Stable & sustainable automated data pipeline and infrastructure.
Deploy solutions using the System Data Lake platform.
Design & maintain Data & Analytics product offerings to ensure continuous supply of superior insights

Responsibilities

Identifying relevant data to be gathered and implementing a solution to do so, including knowledge of where to get the data, how to extract it in the right format, and how to augment the data to support data science/analysis requirements.
Able to build a robust, fault-tolerant data pipeline that cleans, transforms, and aggregates un-organized and messy data into databases or data sources using MS Azure Tech stack. Able to ensure that data flows smoothly from source to destination so that it can be processed.
Apply and improve application development environment standards (including solution delivery methods/tools/technology) in order to enable consistent, reusable, and efficient full-lifecycle practices.
Manage or participate in cross-functional teams to promote technology strategies, analyze and test products, perform proofs-of-concept, and pilot new technologies and/or methods.
Establish and document standards, guidelines, and best practices for teams utilizing the solutions.
Review vendor solution designs to ensure informational and technical appropriateness, standards compliance, and platform alignment.
Keep current on industry best practices and products that can be leveraged to support the company’s business objectives.
Help to communicate and evangelize concepts and methods including open source, cloud, agile, and dev/ops throughout the organization.
Represent the BI team in strategy reviews, leadership briefings, and cross-organization events.

Job Requirements

The following is a listing of minimum indicated requirements for this job

Education

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Management Information Systems, Data Science, or related field.

Related Work Experience

3+ years of experience building BI/Analytics solutions.
0.5+ years of experience with cloud-based architectures
Experience developing enterprise-class solutions

Qualifications

Good written and verbal communication skills (English)
Ability to work with geographically diverse teams via collaborative technologies.
Expert level skill in SQL
Skill in Shell Scripting, and/or Python will be advantageous
Working knowledge or experience in one, or more, Big Data Technologies such as (Azure SQL DW, BigQuery, Cloudera, CosmosDB, Hortonworks, Hive, HBase, Kafka, Pivotal, Redshift, Spark). Strong preference for Azure experience.
Working knowledge or experience in Dev/Ops

Core Competencies

The following is a list of top Core Competencies needed for the job.

Drives Innovative Business Improvements: Develops new insights into solutions that result in organizational improvements; promotes a work environment that fosters creative thinking, innovation and rational risk-taking.
Balances Immediate and Long-Term Priorities: Seeks to meet critical objectives while considering the impact of those decisions and activities on the ability to achieve long-term goals.
Delivers Results: Focuses on the critical few objectives that add the most value and channels own and others' energy to consistently deliver results that meet or exceed expectations.
Imports and Exports Good Ideas: Relentlessly seeks, shares and adopts ideas and best practices in and outside the Company and embraces change introduced by others.
Develops and Inspires Others: Builds and maintains relationships that motivate, guide, and/or reinforce the performance of others toward goal accomplishments. Develops self and others to improve performance in current role and to prepare for future roles; seeks and provides feedback and coaching to enhance performance.
Lives the Values: Demonstrates the values of The Coca-Cola Company through words, actions, and by example; fosters an environment that reflects the values of the company.

What We Bring To You

Iconic & Innovative Brands: Our portfolio represents over 250 products with some of the most popular brands in the world, including Coca-Cola, Costa Coffee, Innocent, Simply, Fairlife & Topo Chico.
Expansive & Diverse Customers: We work with a diversified group of customers which range from retail & grocery outlets, theme parks, movie theatres, restaurant
Purpose Driven: Purpose driven approach that empowers our people to protect the environment and communities we serve while delivering safe & quality products.
Global Connections: Allows you to develop, enhance and maintain global connections that allow us to move faster and learn from others.
Community of Belonging: We’re an organization that believes our ability to continually grow and build the right atmosphere where people feel safe and empowered, lets you bring your best self to work.

Our Purpose And Growth Culture

We are taking deliberate action to nurture an inclusive culture that is grounded in our company purpose, to refresh the world and make a difference. We act with a growth mindset, take an expansive approach to what’s possible and believe in continuous learning to improve our business and ourselves. We focus on four key behaviours – curious, empowered, inclusive and agile – and value how we work as much as what we achieve. We believe that our culture is one of the reasons our company continues to thrive after 130+ years.

Visit Our Purpose and Vision to learn more about these behaviours and how you can bring them to life in your next role at Coca-Cola.

Our Purpose And Growth Culture

We are taking deliberate action to nurture an inclusive culture that is grounded in our company purpose, to refresh the world and make a difference. We act with a growth mindset, take an expansive approach to what’s possible and believe in continuous learning to improve our business and ourselves. We focus on four key behaviors – curious, empowered, inclusive and agile – and value how we work as much as what we achieve. We believe that our culture is one of the reasons our company continues to thrive after 130+ years. Visit Our Purpose and Vision to learn more about these behaviors and how you can bring them to life in your next role at Coca-Cola.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. When we collect your personal information as part of a job application or offer of employment, we do so in accordance with industry standards and best practices and in compliance with applicable privacy laws.

R-81593"
Software Applications Development Engineer,"Want to be a part of our team?

Analyzes, designs, programs, debugs, and modifies software enhancements and/or new products used in local, networked, cloud-based, or Internet-related computer programs.

Code may be used in commercial or end-user applications, such as materials management, financial management, HRIS, mobile apps, or desktop applications products.

Using current programming language and technologies, writes code, completes programming, and performs testing and debugging of applications.

Completes documentation and procedures for installation and maintenance.

May interact with users to define system requirements and/or necessary modifications.

Working at NTT

The primary responsibility of the Software Applications Development Engineer is to develop new applications and improve upon existing ones that will our client and business needs.

Key Roles and Responsibilities:

Develop applications that effectively accomplish client objectives and user needs.

Design and write code for applications and maintain applications databases.

Analyze and edit existing software applications to improve and optimize functionality, fix problems, and enable their use on new hardware platforms.

Remodel and adapt applications as needed to optimize performance.

Identify specific customer and client needs and preferences related to the application.

Test applications extensively to ensure they are error and bug-free.

Install applications and act as technical advisor.

Communicate with relevant internal technical stakeholders to obtain information on project limitations, performance requirements, and interfaces.

Consult with clients in the design phase to determine client needs.

Produce software documentation following company software process and templates.

Participates in software product review meetings and team meetings.

Knowledge, Skills, and Attributes:
Broad understanding of computer science, with specific knowledge of computer programming, application design, and user-focused features
Creative problem solvers
Good interpersonal, communication, and organizational skills
Good team players and maintain the integrity and display good attention to detail
Ability to understand and analyze complex systems
Proficient in writing software using the Java Programming Language and a standard object library
Sound knowledge of software development process
Familiarity with agile development such as Scrum
Knowledge of software integrated development environments
Extensive knowledge in various programming languages (Java, Perl, Python, C++, etc.)
Demonstrated analytical, organizational, and project management skills, using relevant information to make timely and critical decisions that affect cross-functional teams
Ability to handle client and customer issues tactfully and professionally

Academic Qualifications and Certifications:
Bachelor's degree in computer science or software engineering
Relevant certifications

Required Experience:
Software Applications Engineering, Software Development experience, or related work experience
Experience with Programming Languages such as C, C++, Java, Python, etc.
Experienced with Linux or Unix and Windows operating systems
Experience working with SQL
Project management experience and/or experience working in an Agile environment

What will make you a good fit for the role?"
"Software Engineer, Search Science - Apple Media Products","Summary

YOU WILL

- Have a major impact on the way people search & discover Apple Media content on Apple devices worldwide.


- Be part of a team with strong expertise in software engineering, information retrieval, language processing, data mining, machine learning, scalable systems, and offline parallel processing (Hadoop, Scala, Spark).


- Be responsible for improving search recall and ranking.


- Use big data technology to evaluate and prioritize content discovery features.


- Conduct AB Tests to ensure we objectively measure improvements.


- Ensure successful deployment of features, code, data, and models to production.


- Collaborate with other world-class engineers, researchers, and statisticians to ensure that features and models are functioning at or above expected performance levels.


- Design & Implement solutions for automated unit and integration tests that enable continuous integration and delivery


- Support search features


1. On all devices (macOS, iOS, tvOS, watchOS, Siri/HomePod, and more)


2. Across media products (App Store, iTunes, Music, Video, Books, Podcasts)


3. Globally in languages from Arabic to Russian and everything in between


Key Qualifications

KEY QUALIFICATIONS


5+ years of relevant industry experience


Experience with Search, Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence


Experience building big data pipelines with Hadoop, Java, Scala, and Spark


Passion. Our customers love what we do at Apple and we want the same from our engineers

==PREFERRED SKILLS==

Deep understanding of the search and information retrieval fundamentals including indexing, query understanding, retrieval and ranking


Knowledge of search technologies such as Lucene / Solr or Elasticsearch


Familiarity with A/B experimentation and data/metric-driven product development


Description

Engineer in Singapore. Innovate at Apple.


Our engineers have created some tough acts to follow, and they continue to lead us to innovative breakthroughs. Because they’re driven not by what would be easy, but by what would be amazing.

TEAM

We’re a diverse collective of thinkers and doers, continually reimagining what’s possible to help us all find what we love in new ways. The AMP Search team powers search for iTunes, App Store, Apple Music, Apple TV, Podcasts, Books and more on iOS, macOS, tvOS, watchOS, web browsers, 3rd party devices, and Windows.


As a member of the Apple Media Products Search team you will be working on various components of the Search platform - ranking, query understanding, feature engineering, data pipelines, indexing, knowledge graph integration, and platform improvements.


Responsibilities will include design, development and maintenance of search components that serve customers worldwide. You will also be responsible for bringing the latest in search and discovery research to production at scale. If you want to craft new ways for customers to discover content in a rapidly growing catalog on the Apple ecosystem of devices and platforms, this is the place to be.


The Apple Media Products Search Team is looking for extraordinary engineers to help build next-generation search features for Apple's ground breaking devices and platforms. We are a key part of the Apple ecosystem, supporting all of users. We operate globally in languages around the world. We strive to provide the best search experience for our customers.


Education & Experience

Bachelors in Computer Science or related field, Masters or PhD preferred.


Additional Requirements

Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, colour, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics.


We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.


Role Number: 200440962"
40177 - Full Stack Developer (.NET/Kotlin) – BioMe Risk Technology (#219436),"Your field of responsibility

You will join the BioMe Risk Technology team, working under the Global Technology Solutions group in Singapore.
You will contribute to the development of a suite of full stack applications and associated micro-services that expose similar capabilities across various Risk Management Systems
You will work closely with business partners including risk platform owners, front office trading and core technology teams in developing solutions
You will work in a team which focuses on delivering software using agile principles including TDD, strong CI/CD setup and DevOps mentality
You will be responsible for keeping production environments stable and providing L3 support
You will contribute to the evaluation of new technologies and help establish technical biases for the group
You will maintain a proven focus on quality, be willing and able to adapt to changes in priorities & requirements and remain open and alert to new technology opportunities.
We value
Completion. Delivery. Shipping working software solutions with high usability to our customers is what matters most. Your biggest thrill from a big new idea comes when you see it working in the real world
Collaboration. You are a team-player with outstanding communication skills
Pragmatism. You have a detailed understanding of, and are highly informed by the purist approaches and you have an understanding of what it takes to engineer working technological solutions
Curiosity. You like to learn. You continually, and deliberately, learn. You also enjoy sharing new technologies and best-practices with your peers
Passion. You are passionate about software and technology. You live and breathe software. It is not just a job; it is a way of life
Diversity. You value everyone's ideas, background, thoughts, and culture.
Your future colleagues

You will become part of the Global Technology Solutions team is a group of highly skilled engineers passionate about providing cutting edge software solutions across multi-tiered, distributed risk systems, associated micro-services and APIs. You will work closely with partners including business product owners, front office trading and quantitative modelers in developing technology solutions that improve the capability, consistency and scale of this risk management and analytics platforms.

We are a department which values Diversity and Inclusion (D&I) and is committed to realizing the firm’s D&I ambition which is an integral part of our global cultural values.

Your skills and experience

To excel in this role, you should possess below
Good Degree in IT (but will consider a Mathematics, Engineering, or other Science Degree) with proven coding experience
Broad understanding of object-oriented programming and/or functional programming paradigms
Proficient in either .NET or Kotlin, with a good knowledge of popular frameworks in their ecosystems
Experience in working on JS based full stack apps with React Frontend
Deep understanding of test driven, agile software methodologies and associated tools/technologies
Sound knowledge of application architecture and design
Excellent problem solving and analytical skills
Strong team-building and social skills, able to communicate effectively
Dedication to fostering an inclusive culture and value diverse perspectives.
Singapore-Singapore-Singapore

219436"
Backend Engineer (TikTok Engineering) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the TikTok Engineering Team
We are building up an engineering team for core TikTok product in Singapore, to ensure TikTok continues a healthy growth, deliver the best product experience to all of our users, build the most attractive features to help users on enjoying their time on TikTok, earn trust on privacy protection, and more.

Responsibilities
- Optimize TikTok's core function architecture and design a highly available, high performance, and highly maintainable system to ensure the stability of core functions;
- Design and achieve the guarantee system of end-to-end full-link stability for the core functions

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline
- Good programming experience with high concurrency/complex business system/service management
- Proficient in at least one of the following backend languages: C, C++, Java, Go, Python, Shell, PHP
- Positive and optimistic, strong sense of responsibility, self-driven, good team communication and collaboration skills

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Frontend Engineer Intern (Global Payments) - 2022,"Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with ByteDance.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -

Summer Internship - 09 May 2022 to 29 July 2022 (12 weeks)
Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the two above internship periods.

Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About The Global Payments Team

The Global Payments team builds a platform to provide cross-border payment solutions for all our products and services, that are growing rapidly worldwide. We serve multiple overseas businesses within ByteDance, such as Advertising, Live Broadcasting, E-commerce, Games, etc.

As Frontend Engineers, our mission is to provide multi-scenario, standardized Web solutions to serve the global payment network and rich product capabilities.

Responsibilities

Architect and develop efficient and highly reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications;
Build modular, reusable components and features;
Focus on rendering performance in order to ensure superior experience for a heavy interaction platform;
Continuously work to bolster front-end design and implementation processes in order to improve quality and efficiency;
Code optimization to improve scalability, reliability, security and performance of web applications;
Collaborate with product design, product management and software engineering teams to deliver best in class user experience.

Qualifications

Undergraduate or Postgraduate currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or a related technical discipline;
Familiar with key concepts like functional and asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility, data security and accessibility;
Familiar with backend technologies, including Database, concurrency, multithreading, synchronization, loading balancing, etc.;
Good understanding of multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process;
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver;
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications;
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://jobs.bytedance.com/en/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@bytedance.com."
Software Developer (Digital Billing),"At Singtel, we believe in the strength of a vibrant, diverse and inclusive workforce where backgrounds, perspectives and life experiences of our people help us innovate and create strong connections with our customers. We strive to ensure all our people practices are non-discriminatory and provide a fair, performance-based work culture that is diverse, inclusive and collaborative.

Join us and experience what it’s like to be with an Employer of Choice*. Together, let’s create a brighter digital future for all. *Awarded at the HR Fest Awards 2020.

A Digital Billing Executive will be responsible for writing and testing scalable code, developing back-end components, and integrating user-facing elements in collaboration with front-end developers. The role is also responsible for the monitoring and execution of scripts and to make regular, incremental improvements to improve efficacy.
Code Development / Process Improvement: Build or improve upon code to automate processes across the department
Support Key Projects: Work in tandem with front-end developers to deliver effective and robust solutions to automation requests.
Key Responsibilities
Leverage upon Microsoft suite of applications and python to fulfil automation requests.
Ensure code is properly annotated and efficient.
Prepare documentation and work instructions for assigned projects
Document business rules for data
Profile data using standard and complex rules to identify potential data issues and the need for data standards.
Ensure the quality, completeness, and accuracy of data definitions.
Ensure that scheduled applications are executed to completion and manage exception handling processes
Communicate on the impact of change arising from code development perspective on projects implementation to stakeholders.
The Ideal Candidate Should Possess
Tertiary Diploma in IT
Experience in code development and programming languages i.e. Python
Experience using MS tools such as Power Apps and Flow
Possess critical thinking with a growth mindset
Able to respond quickly with analytical, problem-solving skills and attention to details
Possess communication skills (Written & Verbal) and interpersonal skills as well as personal accountability
We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated."
Web Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
4 Years Of Full Stack Expertise Required In
Web-markup - HTML5 & CSS3
Typescript/JavaScript/JQuery including frameworks (must be Angular)
Experience in back-end development in Microsoft technologies: .NET, .NET Core, C#, ASP.NET, MVC 4/5, Silverlight/WPF, NHibernate
OOP Principles and Design Patterns
SQL, Databases – Sybase, Oracle or SQL Server
Responsive Web Design, Bootstrap material
Testing frameworks like Protractor, Selenium Cucumber, Jasmine
Understanding of cross-browser compatibility issues and ways to work around them
Excellent taste in visual layout, and user experience design
Common browser developer tools and performance-tuning techniques
Kindly forward your resume in Word format to apply(at)tekvillage.com

EA Licence No: 18C9120

EA Personnel: R1764354

Note: Only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Desired Skills and Experience
Microsoft Technologies, MVC, CSS3, Web Design, .NET, HTML5, SQL, User Experience Design, SQL Server, Angular, OOP, C#, Databases, Layout, Aspnet MVC"
Junior Software Developer,"Job Summary

Frontend/Backend Junior Software Developer

Working in a team, you will be responsible for the development of one or more software component that is part of a backend system. You will be involved in the software development lifecycle from definition of requirements to design and development, and testing.

Job Responsibilities
Works with multi-disciplinary team to understand system / application requirements.
As part of a team, develops enterprise software solutions that meets client’s needs and perform as designed.
Consistently improves skills and knowledge in order to deliver high-quality output and gain increased responsibility.
Communicates professionally with clients and internal staff to identify needs and evaluate solutions.
Willingness to explore new technologies, learn new concepts and share ideas with others.
Requirements
You have at least a /Degree in Electrical/Electronics Engineering/Computer Sciences or any IT related field.
You ideally have 1 year of experience or academic training in coding and software development. Fresh graduates are welcome to apply as training will be provided.
Proficient in programming languages such as C++ or J2EE, Java, PL/SQL, Java Struts, Spring, Hibernate Enterprise framework, Agile Development environments and/or Application Servers like WebSphere.
Experience in handling multiple tasks while meeting deadlines.
Ability to thrive in a team development environment while also being able to work
independently.
Good understanding of the benefits of the various design patterns and object- oriented programming will be an advantage."
Application Developer,"Our client is a globally renowned IT Services & Consulting company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Our client offers each talent and exceptional career experience by giving individuals to inspire, innovate and make an impact to the clients, people and the society.

Roles & Responsibilities
Responsible for all aspects of software development for all applications including API Gateway (Axway) in the external API domain.
Work together with a team of subject matter experts, architects, and software developers to deliver projects and change requests via in-house development.
Support regular deployment activities.

Main Languages & Knowledge
Axway API Gateway
Groovy / Javascript
Security (SSL, JWT, JKS, OAuth, SAML, Threat Protection, Cryptography, WS-Security)
DevOps (Bitbucket, Jenkins, SonarQube, Veracode, TOSCA)

Other Requirements:
Experience in API Definition, Implementation and Testing
Experience in project Software Development Methodology - design, development, testing and implementation
Experience in Axway API Portal experience would be a plus
Team player, ability to work in a fast-paced environment.

Interested applicants please send your resume to:

Kary Ng Pui Yan [R22110557]

Email: kary.ng@jac-recruitment.com

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

#countrysingapore"
Backend Engineer Intern (Treasury) - 2022,"Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with ByteDance.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -

Summer Internship - 09 May 2022 to 29 July 2022 (12 weeks)
Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the two above internship periods.

Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About The Global Payments Team

The Global Payments team is building a platform to provide cross-border payment solutions for ByteDance's products and services, that are growing rapidly worldwide. We serve multiple overseas businesses within ByteDance, such as Advertising, Live Broadcasting, E-commerce , Games, etc.

The treasury team in Global Payments is mainly responsible for building a solid financial data foundation and robust reconciliation/accounting systems that produces correct financial reports. Also, the team is responsible for optimizing money movements via automation and advanced algorithms.

Responsibilities

Design and develop the Global Payments Treasury platform, including reconciliation, accounting, financial reporting, liquidity management, settlement and clearing, etc.;
Ensure accuracy and stability of the system. Continuously improve system quality from different perspectives including functionalities, dataflow, operations, and maintainability;
Work with fellow engineers, product managers, and business owners in the team to ensure timely delivery of business requirements.

Qualifications

Undergraduate or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or a related technical discipline;
Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages;
Excellent proficiency in backend server development and expertise in relational database;
Strong analytical thinking and exceptional attention to details.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://jobs.bytedance.com/en/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@bytedance.com."
Machine Learning Engineer - TikTok Ads Vertical Solutions,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are growing our TikTok Ads Vertical Solutions team. On this team, you have opportunities to help people discover products, content, and services that bring joy to their lives and support all kinds of businesses to thrive on TikTok. We work with advertisers from all verticals, such as E-commerce, Retail, Auto, Travel, Financial Service, Entertainment, Local Business, and Gaming. Our goal is to make TikTok an irreplaceable growth channel for businesses of all sizes and a favourite destination for consumers to discover and purchase products, content, and services. favourite

TikTok Ads Vertical Solutions team has a strong user focus and a dedication to technical excellence. We aim to meet our users' needs with reliable and high-performing platforms and services. We are looking for strong Machine Learning Engineers who are excited to grow their business understanding, build highly scalable and reliable software, and partner across disciplines with global teams in pursuit of excellence.

What You'll Do:
- Apply state-of-the-art machine learning techniques optimize advertisers' marketing strategies.
- Connect with businesses directly to understand and develop solutions for their Jobs-to-be-done.
- Collaborate with Product Managers, Designers, and other disciplines to explore the next generation of shopping experiences on TikTok.
- Capitalize on the organic shopping behaviours on TikTok today and facilitate retentive behaviours to provide more people value and business value.

Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
- At least 3 years of work experience in related field
- Solid programming skills, proficient in C/C++.
- Familiarity with at least one mainstream deep learning programming framework (TensorFlow/Caffe/MXNet) and its architecture and implementation mechanism.
- Familiarity with deep learning algorithms (CNN/RNN/LSTM, etc.).
- Team-player with strong communication skills who can also work independently.

Preferred Qualifications:
- Familiarity with main components for Ads systems, including bidding, ranking, and auction.
- Experience in resource management and task scheduling with large-scale distributed software (such as Spark and TensorFlow).

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Senior to Mid level Data Backend Engineer (Central Data Service Team),"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

We are looking for several seasoned/talented Data backend engineers to join our Data service team to level up our current data processing platform to the next stage, including but not limited to existed features maintenance, new features design&implementations, and legacy codebase debottlenecking.

Responsibilities

Develop and maintain data engineering systems across the data lifecycle, including data pipelines for batch and streaming applications
Develop APIs to support high throughput data processing, feature engineering, risk algorithms, and data science use cases
Develop data quality monitoring and alert systems to ensure high availability and high-quality data sources
Design and upgrade of data architecture to support new data applications, technical enhancements, and business requirements

Requirements

4+ years experiences of developing big data-related applications
Proficient in Java/Scala language, familiar with the backend micro-service architecture
Proficient in big data pipeline development including batch and streaming processing
Familiar with big data components like Hadoop ecosystem, Spark, Spark streaming, Airflow, Presto, Kafka
Experience in big data product development is a plus, including data warehouse, query platform, streaming, recommendation, user profiling, risk management, etc.
Team working, analytical mind, optimistic, willing to accept challenges, and quick response to incidents

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Cloud Engineer,"Job Description

Cloud Engineer

Cloud Engineer provides support in installing, planning, designing, developing, managing, maintaining, and support of ABS applications on Cloud or associated infrastructures.

What You Will Do

Evaluate the cloud strategy, program architecture, and system requirements and work together with application architects and owners.
Generate scripts and templates required for the automatic provisioning of resources.
Design, implement, support, and evaluate Cloud tools and services, develop, and interoperate security policies and procedures, and advise and consult on risk assessments.
Constantly explore new solutions and technologies, and integrate learning and recommendations into the development process.
Demonstrate good expertise in all major Cloud Service Providers’ products and solutions.
Specialize in the best practice design, operations, and support of private/public/hybrid cloud infrastructure including Network, Storage, Compute, and Security.
Ensure proposed designs align with Application, Enterprise, and Security architecture as well as the other applied policies and framework.
Create architecture artifacts and documentation to effectively explain architecture design concepts and solutions to various levels of stakeholders.
Recommend new services to complement and enhance infrastructure elements to streamline and support applications development and deployment
Identify potential and emerging technologies relevant to innovation to improve product offerings.
Project management of cloud infrastructure setup and implementation
Responsible for gathering system requirements and working together with application architects and owners.
Responsible for generating scripts and templates required for the automatic provisioning of resources.
Collaborate with the application development teams to enable their applications to run on Cloud infrastructure.
Employ exceptional problem-solving skills and be responsible for debugging technical issues inside a complex stack involving virtualization, containers, microservices, etc.

What You Will Need

Education & Experience
5+ years of experience in deploying, managing, and optimizing Enterprise applications
3+ years of working experience with a broad range of technical solutions around cloud architectures, solution design, and implementations
Bachelor's degree in Computer Engineering or a related science, from an accredited university or comparable on-the-job experience
Proven work experience with Azure services (AWS services are nice to have)
Current and up-to-date MS Azure (or equivalent) certifications.
Experience with managing enterprise software deployments.
You have strong experience in resilient and distributed cloud network infrastructure, including VPN architecture, firewall configuration, and network segmentation and routing in a cloud-native environment.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities
Solid foundation and background in Microsoft products and technologies,
Ability to manage multiple projects and tasks, and be a “taskmaster.”
Demonstrate Strong technical skills in enterprise application integrations and Microsoft Azure technologies.
Ability to understand customer business problems and clearly formulate and articulate high-level solution plans.
Build and Manage Azure DevOps pipelines for CI/CD and Release Management workflows.
Manage Azure DevOps repos and branch policies.
The candidate should have attained professional certifications or demonstrate experience with at least 5 years of cloud Ops experience in one or more of Azure/AWS/Google Cloud/VMware/Terraform
Good technical skills with proven track records in IT infrastructure and/or emerging IT technologies engineering in the following area:
Platform, storage, database, and virtualization
Cloud infrastructure (IaaS/PaaS)
Knowledge of DevOps techniques and Agile practices is an added advantage
Proficient in multi-tiered architecture, design, and implementation
Familiarity with containers (i.e. Dockers) is a plus
Strong working knowledge and ability to apply architecture concepts, frameworks, and methodologies to projects
Ability to communicate IT architecture methods, concepts, standards, and policies
Good written and verbal communication and presentation skills, able to interact professionally with all levels of the organization
Previous Development experience in Python, PowerShell, Ruby, or other scripting languages is a big plus.

Reporting Relationships

Reports directly to a Manager, Director, or Executive level position.

Working Conditions

Work is primarily sedentary; exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally, and/or, a negligible amount of force frequently, or, constantly to lift, carry, push, pull or otherwise move objects.

Other

This job description is not intended, and should not be construed, to be an all-inclusive list of responsibilities, skills, efforts, or working conditions associated with the job of the incumbent. It is intended to be an accurate reflection of the principal job elements essential for making a fair decision regarding the pay structure of the job.

ABS Digital Solutions is committed to the equal employment opportunity of its employees and prohibits discrimination against any employee or qualified applicant on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, marital status, sexual orientation, citizenship status or veteran status, or other non-work-related characteristics that may be protected under the law of the Federal Government or specific state employment laws.

About Us

We set out more than 160 years ago to promote the security of life and property at sea and preserve the natural environment. Today, we remain true to our mission and continue to support organizations facing a rapidly evolving seascape of challenging regulations and new technologies. Through it all, we are anchored by a vision and mission that help our clients find clarity in uncertain times.

ABS is a global leader in marine and offshore classification and other innovative safety, quality, and environmental services. We’re at the forefront of supporting the global energy transition at sea, the application of remote and autonomous marine systems, cutting-edge technical solutions, and many more exciting advancements. Our commitment to safety, reliability, and efficiency is ever-present, guiding our clients to safer and more efficient operations.

Equal Opportunity

The American Bureau of Shipping is committed to the equal employment opportunity of its employees and prohibits discrimination against any employee or qualified applicant based on race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, sexual orientation, citizenship status or veteran status, or other non-work-related characteristics that may be protected under the law of the Federal Government or specific state employment laws.

Other

This job description is not intended, and should not be construed, to be an all-inclusive list of responsibilities, skills, efforts or working conditions associated with the job of the incumbent. It is intended to be an accurate reflection of the principal job elements essential for making a fair decision regarding the pay structure of the job."
Senior Firmware Engineer,"STMicroelectronics is a world leader in providing the semiconductor solutions that make a positive contribution to people’s lives, both today and in the future. ST is one of the world’s largest semiconductor companies as a leading Integrated Device Manufacturer serving all electronics segments with key strengths in Sense and Power, Automotive, and Embedded Processing Solutions.

STMicroelectronics has the need for a Distribution Account Executive in Schaumburg, IL to generate sales in conjunction with distribution partners for customers in one or more territories by developing business relations through promoting ST image and product portfolio to customers and distributors.

Role Overview:
Work Location : Ang Mo Kio BHQ Site at 5A Serangoon North Avenue 5 Singapore 554574

As a Firmware engineer, you are at the center of many activities. You are the one making the bridge between the system requirements and the IC capabilities. You interface with architects and IC design teams. Software is a key element when it comes to get the quintessence and the ultimate performances from the IC.
In complex systems, some critical functions can also be implemented in software. You can have to deal with real time software, including real time operating system, communication protocols. You can have to deal with filtering and signal processing. You are responsible of all the project steps, from the specification, development, testing to the integration and validation on the IC.
From this software view, you are also involved in customer related activities like documentation (user manual, …) and customer support for complex cases.
In this role it is important to keep pace on the latest technical solutions and technologies, be innovative and creative, take initiative and be autonomous, and work as part of a team of technical experts.

Candidate Profile
Requirements:
You have graduated from an engineering or equivalent level.
You are looking for a first professional experience or have a first experience in Firmware Development and wish to extend your knowledge in this field.
You have good knowledge on software programming (C/C++, Python, …).
You may have basic or advanced skills on digital signal processing.
You are open minded with a good level of listening skills and enjoy working in a diversified team.
You are autonomous, analytical, motivated and desire to propose innovative and competitive ideas for the development of new successful products.
You have graduated from an engineering or equivalent level.
You are looking for a first professional experience or have a first experience in Firmware Development and wish to extend your knowledge in this field.
You have good knowledge on software programming (C/C++, Python, …)You may have basic skills on digital signal processing.
You are open minded with a good level of listening skills and enjoy working in a diversified team.
You are autonomous, analytical, motivated and desire to propose innovative and competitive ideas for the development of new successful products."
Machine Learning Engineer Intern (Recommendation) - 2023,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2023. Internships at TikTok aim to offer students industry exposure and hands-on experience. Watch your ambitions become reality as your inspiration brings infinite opportunities at TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 08 May 2023 to 28 July 2023 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - Starting 09 January 2023 or 14 August 2023

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit in either internship period. Please state your availability clearly in your resume (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About the team
Our team works on large-scale recommendation systems for various offerings under TikTok and its affiliates, focusing on developing recommendation algorithms/models/strategies. We are committed to developing cutting-edge solutions for e-commerce recommendation systems.

Responsibilities
- Participate in building large-scale (10 million to 100 million) e-commerce recommendation algorithms and systems, including commodity recommendations, live stream recommendations, short video recommendations etc in TikTok.
- Build long and short term user interest models, analyze and extract relevant information from large amounts of various data and design algorithms to explore users' latent interests efficiently.
- Design, develop, evaluate and iterate on predictive models for candidate generation and ranking(eg. Click Through Rate and Conversion Rate prediction) , including, but not limited to building real-time data pipelines, feature engineering, model optimization and innovation.
- Design and build supporting/debugging tools as needed.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science, or a related technical major;
- Strong programming and problem-solving ability.
- Experience in applied machine learning, familiar with common machine learning and deep learning models. (K-means, LR, GBDT, FM, DNN, Transformer)
- Experience in Deep Learning Tools such as tensorflow/pytorch.

Preferred Qualifications
- Experience in recommendation system, online advertising, information retrieval, natural language processing, machine learning, large-scale data mining, or related fields.
- Publications at KDD, NeurlPS, WWW, SIGIR, WSDM, ICML, IJCAI, AAAI, RECSYS and related conferences/journals, or experience in data mining/machine learning competitions such as Kaggle/KDD-cup etc.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
"Senior Engineer, App & Web","About Klook

Klook is the go-to travel and leisure e-commerce platform for experiences and services anytime, anywhere. Founded in Hong Kong in 2014 out of passion for discovery, our purpose today is to inspire and enable more moments of JOY. Even when the COVID-19 pandemic hit, we held on to our conviction and successfully unlocked the domestic travel business. To date, we are already offering over 490,000 activities in over 1,000 destinations. With cross-border travel resuming, we have made it our mission to reshape the world of travel. Isn’t this exciting?!

It certainly is for our international community of over 1,200 employees, based in over 20 locations globally! Joymakers at heart, Klookers are not only curating joyful experiences for others, but also co-creating our world of joy in the Klookiverse. We are on a journey to foster a strong company culture that supports a high-performing and successful business, and we are guided by our core beliefs - Push boundaries, Ask for and give feedback, Take ownership, and Help each other - in everything we do. We are excited about building and realizing endless possibilities in the new era of travel. Care to be a part of this revolution?

The Insurance team is a relatively new team within Klook that manages our insurance products offered to customers across the region. Having created a joint venture (JV) with ZA Tech, we are in an exciting phase of growing the insurance business and team exponentially.


What you will do:


Responsible for the research and development of Mobile App and Web-related technologies of Klook product line. Including code-base refactoring, and code review.
Design and develop scalable, high-quality code structures, according to the needs of business and products
Research, implement, and optimize new mobile technologies
Work closely with team members on product design, research, and development; to deploy and launch new products



What you will need:


5+ years of relevant work experience
Proficiency in HTML/CSS/JavaScript/TypeScript and other Web front-end technologies
Familiar with page architecture and layout, have a deep understanding of web standards and label semantics. Proficiency in Vuejs, React.js, and other front-end frameworks
Experience in iOS or Android or Flutter development. Familiar with UI design, backend operation, data storage, XML, HTTP, TCP/IP, SOCKET, and other protocols
Understanding web standards, proficiency in using Git workflow
Able to establish coding standards, and be proficient in various refactoring strategies
Experience in large-scale Internet development or e-commerce products is preferred.
Comfortable working with people from different cultural backgrounds.
A champion of the team's key values - collaborative and open to feedback, experimentative and ready to fail, customer-focused and always asking what is best for the customer.
Proficiency in English and Mandarin due to the need to work with teams in China

Klook is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We hire talented and passionate people of all backgrounds. We believe that a joyful workplace is an inclusive workplace, one where employees from all walks of life have an equal opportunity to thrive. We’re dedicated to creating a welcoming and supportive culture where everyone belongs.

Klook does not accept unsolicited resumes from any temporary staffing agency, placement service or professional recruiter (“Agency”). Klook will not be responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions or other payments related to such unsolicited resumes.

An Agency must obtain advance written approval from Klook’s Talent Acquisition Team to submit resumes, and then only in conjunction with a valid fully-executed agreement for service and in response to a specific job opening for which the Agency has been requested to submit resumes for. Klook will not be responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions or other payments to any Agency that does not have such agreement in place or does not comply with the foregoing."
SRE Team Leader - Game,"About Bytedance
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

About Nuverse (https://www.nvsgames.com/)
Nuverse is a game development and publishing brand for players and developers around the world. With the mission to ""Inspire Creativity, Enrich Life"", we are dedicated to serving gamers worldwide, and helping gamers play and create together in amazing virtual worlds.
All we've accomplished in the last 3 years is just the beginning!
We're so excited to share the many more projects that we have in store over the years to come.

About the Team
The Game Technology team is playing a significant role in the whole life cycle of the game. We are responsible for the development, testing, operation, SRE, and quality assurance of the user and operating system, and give strong support for game developing and publishing. Providing comprehensive and systematical solutions, support the stable operation and commercialization of the game.

What you will be doing
1. Building and managing overseas SRE team, including team recruitment, new talent training, system operation/maintenance/coordination and team culture building.
2. Improve the cross-team/time zone/regional cooperation mechanism, and provide SRE solutions in line with actual business scenarios based on business orientation and player experience orientation.
3. Responsible for SRE team arrangement and project management, guiding basic SRE work to be more effective, and improving the overall SRE efficiency.
4. Develop process specifications and plans for compliant access, configuration, disaster recovery and fault handling of critical paths of overseas SRE services.
5. Responsible for continuously improving the core SRE capabilities of game SRE in efficiency, cost, quality, security, etc.

Qualifications
1. Bachelor degree or above in Computer Science or a related technical discipline and good English communication skills.
2. Familiar with game SRE related processes, understand the development trend of SRE technology in the industry, and have a good ability to build an SRE system, 5 years+ experience in Game industry.
3. Familiar with cloud computing technologies of Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud Platform and other suppliers.
4. Possesses a strong sense of responsibility, a proactive team spirit, and a strong ability to comprehensively analyze and solve problems."
Senior Full Stack Java Engineer,"Job Reference #

266902BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Do you want to design and build attractive digital products and services? Do you want to play a key role in transforming our firm into an agile organization?

At UBS, we re-imagine the way we work, the way we connect with each other – our colleagues, clients and partners – and the way we deliver value. Being agile will make us more responsive, more adaptable, and ultimately more innovative.

We’re looking for a Full Stack Java Engineer to:

design, develop, and improve the digital products and technology services we provide to our clients and employees.

apply a broad range of software engineering practices, from analyzing user needs and developing new features to automated testing and deployment.

ensure the quality, security, reliability, and compliance of our solutions by applying our digital principles and implementing both functional and non-functional requirements.

build observability into our solutions, monitor production health, help to resolve L3 incidents, and remediate the root cause of risks and issues

understand, represent, and advocate for client needs

share knowledge and expertise with colleagues, help with hiring, and contribute regularly to our engineering culture and internal communities

Your team

You'll be working in the Be a Client Stream, Client Contract & Sign Crew, supporting our newly created chapters to embed the unified model of Agile@UBS and take our platform to next Level.

Your expertise


bachelor or equivalent focusing on Computer Science, Software Engineering, etc.
ideally 6+ years of experience in a similar position focused on full stack java development within the financial sector
interested in learning new technologies and practices, reuse strategic platforms and standards, evaluate options, and make decisions with long-term sustainability in mind
strong communicator, from making presentations to technical writing
experience with Java and Spring (Container, MVC, JDBC, Boot)
experience with Cloud technologies (Azure, AKS, Functions)
knowledge of Container technologies (Docker)
data streaming architecture (Kafka) or messaging (ASB, Tibco)
relational databases (Oracle, Postgres)
client-side web technologies (JavaScript, React JS, JSON, HTML, CSS

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Computer Vision Engineer,"This role is with Polybee, a startup supported by SGInnovate.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Polybee is on a mission to enhance food security. We aim to achieve our mission by increasing productivity in agriculture. The first problem we are working on is automation of pollination. Pollination is critical to productivity; nearly a third of agricultural production depends on it. However, this process is largely left to chance.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
There are sectors, strategic to global food security, that suffer from poor pollination. This is because either it must be done manually, or natural pollinators are ineffective. Examples include seed companies, greenhouses and indoor vertical farms.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Our thesis is that autonomous pollination will be achieved at scale with drones. Moreover, taking control of the most critical step in production enables us to trace and predict yields.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Our technology has three main pillars:
• Control systems of miniature drones
• Computer vision for perception and crop analytics
• Software platform for data visualization and autonomous operations
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
DESCRIPTION
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
As a Computer Vision Engineer, you will be working on developing and deploying deep learning and image processing pipelines for high throughput phenotyping. You will be using data from a multitude of sensors (stereo-camera/NIR/thermal/climate) to derive valuable insights on plant morphology, plant health and detect stress, diseases, etc. This involves translating cutting-edge research into cost-effective, scalable industry solutions. If working on interesting real-world problems in a fast-paced multi-disciplinary team excites you, Polybee wants to hear from you!
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
You will be working on training and evaluating deep learning models (detection/segmentation) and developing image processing solutions for phenotyping so that it meets the accuracy and throughput required by industry standards. You will be expected to deploy these models into production on the web platform to analyze the data collected by our drones. You will be responsible for collection and sampling of data on edge using embedded systems on the drone. You will also be expected to work in tandem with other subteams at Polybee in developing and testing hardware and software closely related to the functioning of our micro-drones.
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Preferred Skills:
C++
Keras
Machine learning framework such as Spark, Tensorflow, Sci-kit Learn
Numpy
OpenCV
Pandas
Python
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Good-to-have Skills:
Android
Backend development
CI/CD
embedded systems
⠀⠀⠀ ⠀
Interested applicants may apply directly on STARS
https://stars.sginnovate.com/viewrole?type=tm&jobid=M-2021-POLYBEE-925"
Lead/ Senior Cloud Operation Engineer,"What The Role Is
As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.
Information Technology
IT systems form the backbone of our operations. We are looking for individuals with passion and IT expertise, to help us improve the delivery of our systems and services. The Board’s IT systems support a high daily volume of financial transactions for CPF members. In addition to keeping the lights on, the Board also keeps pace with the external environment through innovation in its IT systems.
What You Will Be Working On
You will be involved in providing operational support to assist in provisioning and managing resources on Azure Government Commercial Cloud (GCC). You will also be involved in software development lifecycle activities such as analysis, design, development, implementation and maintenance of a variety of mission-critical web applications using Microsoft and cloud technologies.
What We Are Looking For
Minimally 4 years of relevant working experience
Working knowledge in one or more of the following languages, tools and technologies:
- DevSecOps process and tools eg Azure DevOps, SonarQube
Infrastructure as Code process and tools eg Terraform
- Cloud technology eg. Azure or AWS
- Security eg. Zero Trust Security
- API technologies eg REST
- Microservices and container technologies eg. Kubernetes
- Agile software development tools and standards, eg SCRUM
- Automation and monitoring tools
- Building secure and resilient applications
Ability to learn and keep up with evolving cloud skillsets
Enjoy problem solving to reduce mundane work
What You Can Expect
A challenging and rewarding career
A variety of formal and informal training where you can hone your skills in the evolving technology landscape
Promotion opportunities through your capability and on the job performance
A friendly work environment with like-minded colleagues to co-create and collaborate together
A hybrid work model where you can work remotely up to 50% of the time
A productive yet growth-oriented workplace with flexible dress code where you are empowered to decide your appropriate outfit for the day
Comprehensive rewards package
Annual leave and pro-family leave
Medical and dental benefits
Access to recreational activities
Position is on 2-year full time contract directly under the payroll of CPF Board with potential for emplacement into permanent position"
Backend Software Engineer - TikTok Live (Revenue) - Singapore,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build up and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming at TikTok. We will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features, and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for live streamers and viewers.

TikTok Live revenue engineering team is responsible for building the cutting-edge revenue ecosystem which includes gifting and other revenue features that are innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. As an important member of the engineering team, you will build solutions that affect millions of users and live streamers.

You will:
- Plan and lead large-scale technical projects to lay the foundation for the iterative development and scale of early products
- Develop robust, efficient technology products that serve 1 billion users
- Contribute to engineering strategy, tooling, processes, and culture
- Research and apply cutting-edge domain and technical knowledge into products

Qualifications

- As a world-class engineer, you have rich working experience in scalable, highly available, distributed and mission-critical systems.
- Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
- Deep understanding of computer architecture, data structures and algorithms In depth knowledge of common databases and messaging frameworks like MySQL/Redis/Kafka
- Able to work closely with diverse stakeholders and have good communication skills
- Self-driven, positive, cooperative and willing to keep learning enthusiasm at all times

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
URGENT !! / Software Engineer / System Analyst (Java / SQL / C / .net),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Permanent job opportunity
Great remuneration and benefits
Great career progression
5 Days / MNC
Job Description
Design, develop, maintain and continuous improvements of assigned Computer Integrated Manufacturing (CIM) applications and components
Provide 24/7 Level 2 & 3 support for the proper operation of Production lines
Gather requirements, design, develop and deploy new versions of CIM applications especially Equipment Manager automation solutions
Responsible for documentation of requirements and coordination of enhancements in the assigned area
Plan, coordinate, and conduct training for assigned applications
Work with the other IT teams to achieve the common goal of better system response time and system availability
Work with other departments for productivity enhancements, error or cost reductions and other improvement projects
Requirements
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related fields
Diploma in Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent fields with minimum 2 years of working experience in Equipment Manager automation solutions would be considered
Experience in Java development, SEMI Equipment Communication Standard (SECS), Oracle SQL and/or Tibco is an added advantage
Successful candidate will have opportunity to work in our new facility and to be trained and worked overseas for a periods
How To Apply

Interested applicants please send your latest resume to ref27(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).

Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.

Trust Recruit Pte Ltd

EA License No: 19C9950

EA Personnel: Tan Yee Chean (Chester)

EA Personnel Reg No: R22110448
Desired Skills and Experience
NET, C# .NET 4.0, TIBCO, Oracle SQL, HTML, SQL, Java, C#, Manufacturing, C++"
Backend Engineer Intern (Ads Measurement) - 2023,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2023. Internships at TikTok aim to offer students industry exposure and hands-on experience. Watch your ambitions become reality as your inspiration brings infinite opportunities at TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 08 May 2023 to 28 July 2023 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - Starting 09 January 2023 or 14 August 2023

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit in either internship period. Please state your availability clearly in your resume (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About the Team
Ads Measurement's mission is to help marketers and brands realize their true business value generated by TikTok across all of their paid channels. As a Software Engineer on the Ads Measurement team, you will build scalable tech foundations, launch various products to extract real signals, and offer scientific methodologies to help advertising effectiveness. The team is working on a variety of products end-to-end, including web/app signals infra and modeling, identity, attribution, lift, brand safety, viewability, invalid traffic, etc., as well as new innovative features.

Responsibilities
- Responsible for developing various scalable ads measurement systems, including signal ingestion, signal processing pipeline, user matching service, ads attribution system, lift study infrastructure and algorithm, integrating with third-party partners, etc.
- Build service frameworks with highest performance and availability.
- Build globalized ad systems across multiple data centers intercontinental.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in - Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems, or a related technical discipline;
- Prior experience working with languages like Golang, Python, Java, C++ or C;
- Strong experience with Data Structures and Algorithms;
- Strong communication and teamwork skills.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Software Engineer II (Android),"Responsibilities

Work closely with the Product and UX Research team to develop features for the Android platform
Build high performance, well-structured native app with modern Android best-practices in mind
Ensure the performance, quality and responsiveness of the app

Requirements:

Proficiency in Kotlin, Android Jetpack, Coroutine or RxJava
Excellent problem solving, critical thinking and communication skills
Experience with offline storage, concurrency, threading and performance tuning
Knack for benchmarking and optimization
Working knowledge of the general mobile landscape, architectures(MVVM or Clean architecture), trends, and emerging technologies
Solid understanding of the full mobile development life cycle and design patterns
Bonus point if you have experience working with CI/CD, automation tools or functional programming

ZALORA Engineering

ZALORA is the leading e-commerce company providing fashion throughout South East Asia. ZALORA Engineering has teams in Singapore and Vietnam to serve millions of users in Malaysia, Singapore, Hong Kong, Taiwan, Indonesia, Philippines. This regional diversity presents a lot of interesting challenges that you and your colleagues will face. You will learn a lot by tackling these challenges.

The ZALORA Story

ZALORA is Asia’s leading online fashion, beauty and lifestyle destination, part of Global Fashion Group. As one of the region’s pioneer large-scale ecommerce platforms, ZALORA has established a strong presence throughout the region, particularly in Singapore, Indonesia, Malaysia, Brunei, the Philippines, Hong Kong, and in Taiwan, enjoying over 50 million visits per month.

ZALORA is not obligated to accept resumes from any third parties on behalf of potential candidates for any position (advertised or otherwise) by any means, unless ZALORA has executed a written agreement with such third party and has expressly requested such third party for candidate referrals. Third parties who provide unsolicited resumes of candidate(s) shall waive and forfeit all rights to claim for any placement fees or referral fees in the event that such candidate is eventually engaged or employed by ZALORA or Global Fashion Group."
Application Engineer,"Why:

Applied Materials is at the foundation of all emerging innovation, designing the equipment and plant automation that bring all new technology in semi-conductor manufacturing to the world. This role is to join the software division of Applied Materials, APG Pharma, in their mission to bring the software technology division of Applied to the Pharma industry. We operate in a start-up mode inside of a very stable company. This job opportunity is unique and exciting because our software products offer a complete white-space opportunity to bring unique and differential value to pharma industry. Our mission is to increase the productivity of the industry while dramatically reducing the cost of manufacturing. Come join us as we bring this unique and compelling opportunity to pharma.

General:

APG Pharma, a division of Applied Materials, is looking for a Senior Application Specialist. The Senior Application Specialist provides mechanistic and multivariate modeling expertise as well as experience with informatics systems commonly found in the Pharma and Biopharma Industries. In this role, you will support the Applications team to innovate and improve processes through effective analytics using a systems-based approach. You will be required to work closely with APG’s Sales and Engineering teams as well as with external process engineers and manufacturing scientists. You must have excellent process knowledge and experience and be able to convey a technical message to a business audience. You will be expected to support both pre and post sales engagements performing all ranges of tasks from supporting a technical sales strategy for a new client, communicating the value of our software towards industry challenge, software installs, process model design, workflow design, data manipulation, and problem solving. Technical teaching and consulting is also part of the job.

Responsibilities and Goals:

Evaluate process and equipment data to determine the ideal modeling approach for improved performance and increased equipment availability (candidate must be able to define good and bad data quality).
Perform FMEA’s with process engineers to determine possible modes of failure and how they could be detected early through modeling the correct data tags and transformations.
Build mechanistic, multivariate (PCA, PLS, etc) and/or hybrid models for use in GMP manufacturing.
Support Engineering in the configuration of equipment process types and instances using Applied’s Smartfactory Rx as well as extract data from various data sources (PI, LIMS, ERP etc.) and import it for historical modeling.
Define strategies for effective use of models and employ best known practices for model management.
Strong technical writing skills to support questionnaires, reports and provide training as needed.

Qualifications:

We are looking for a person who can work on his/her own, communicates well with the APG team, and who is passionate about supporting our industrial clients.

We require a combination of hands on experience in the pharma/biopharma industry with modeling and data systems expertise. The successful candidate must have:

At least 3 years of experience in the pharma/biopharma industry or 5 years as a process engineer working with chemical or similar processes with a demonstrated ability to learn new fields such as pharma/biopharma manufacturing. A working knowledge of systems, software packages and languages – preferably for technical products such as:

Databases (PI System, Oracle, SQL, or similar)

Data communication, interfacing (OPC DA/HDA/UA, relational database calls, etc.)

Data visualization (knowledge of various common platforms is preferred: TIBCO Spotfire, PI System visualization tools, custom UI development skills)

MES (Syncade or Werum), ELN, LIMS, SCADA, PLC, DCS, BES, PI Historian, AspenTech IP21, GE Proficy, etc.

A working knowledge of programming languages such as Python, matlab and R. A proven ability to interact with clients and explain technical details in laymen’s terms. Experience with factory interfaces including OPC, ODBC, OSI PI, and other database historians. C++ programming knowledge is a plus.

Education:

A Bachelor or Master’s degree in a relevant science or engineering discipline with 3 or more years of industry experience. (note: that a PhD in a relevant area could be considered equivalent to 3 years industry experience)

Logistics:

The job posting is for in Singapore with the candidate based in the Singapore regional office. Travel up to 50% within the APAC and some travel worldwide.

Keywords:

PLS, PCA, Mechanistic, Modeling, Pharma, Python, Matlab, R, Engineering, Reliability, DCS, PLC, PI, OPC

Qualifications

Education:

Bachelor's Degree

Skills

Certifications:

Languages:

Years of Experience:

2 - 4 Years

Work Experience:

Additional Information

Travel:

Relocation Eligible:

No

Applied Materials is committed to diversity in its workforce including Equal Employment Opportunity for Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans and Individuals with Disabilities."
Java Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Work with enterprise class JEE application software and development tools. The developed software will be deployed in a highly available and scalable environment.
Knowledge and hands on working experience in Java, JSP/Servlet, Java Bean, JDBC, SQL, HTML, XML, CSS, JavaScript.
Experience in Struts/ Spring /Hibernate, JMS and MQ
Experience in development of medium or large scale JEE projects using WebSphere/Weblogic/JBoss, Oracle databases.

Desired Skills and Experience
Web Services, CSS, Oracle, XML, Struts, Spring MVC, JDBC, SQL, Spring Batch, JMS, Java, API, Databases, Hibernate ORM, J2EE, Software Development, Hibernate"
Staff SW Engineer (UI),"Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Job Description

We are looking for a talented Staff Software Engineer to join VAS in Issuer solutions team Singapore!

Staff Software Engineer (UI With JAVA)

As a Staff Software Engineer, you will help lead, design, enhance, build our solutions meant for customers in an agile, fast-paced environment. You will be working with colleagues across the company, who will help support and challenge you every day. Designing solutions, writing code, unit testing code, developing test cases, automating test cases and frequent check-ins for continuous integration is just part of your DNA. You will see your team’s code going to production in just a few weeks and used by strategic accounts worldwide. If this sounds exciting, we would love to chat and tell you more about our work culture, solutions and opportunities.

Our team, as well as our group works under the principles of a common engineering model with both development and testing expertise. You are expected to have hands-on experience and sufficient knowledge to guide the engineers and unblock them as needed on an on-going basis.

Your Responsibilities Will Include

Design and develop new systems as well as enhancements and fixing defects in existing software.
Exposure to UI Framework like D3, Angular, Node JS.
Play a key role to understand high-level product requirements and help the team translate that to low-level engineering design for new features
Help our clients achieve their business goals by understanding their requirements and delivering the best solution.
Lead and provide technical mentoring to a team of talented engineers and guide them on DEV and QA best practices
Leverage newer technologies and lead efforts to architect, design and implement / test various aspects of secure payment solutions.
Understand and enhance coding guidelines and participate in code review processes.
Review test strategy and test cases developed by test engineers to ensure optimum quality of solutions being delivered.
Periodically rotate into the role of Scrum Master to lead agile, scrum teams for a given sprint.
Excellent leadership, interpersonal skills along with a team player focus.
Develop close working relationships with members of teams within the organization.
Become knowledgeable of Visa's core technology, infrastructure, and standards.

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office two days a week, Tuesdays and Wednesdays with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% of the time based on business needs.

Basic Qualifications

Qualifications

7 or more years of relevant work experience with a Bachelor’s degree or at least 4 years of work experience with an Advanced degree (e.g. Masters, MBA, JD, MD) or 3 years of work experience with a PhD in Computer Science or other technology field

Preferred Qualifications

6 or more years of work experience with a Bachelor’s Degree or 5 or more years of relevant experience with an Advanced Degree (e.g. Masters, MBA, JD, MD) or up to 4 years of relevant experience with a PhD in Computer Science or other technology field
Typically, candidates are expected to have 6+ years of experience (preferably full stack) working in a technology company on various front-end UI technologies (must have) and Java and related backend technologies (good exposure preferred). Experience in delivering enterprise-class, mission-critical, commercial, and scalable products is a must-have.

UI Skillset (must Have)

We want our Staff Software Engineers to do much more than just write code. You would be expected to bring in expertise that include:

Solid experience in at least one technology including HTML, CSS, Javascript, AJAX.
In-depth understanding of Javascript, jquery.
Experience in web development using frameworks such as reactJS, D3, Angular, Node JS etc.
Experience working with state management architecture such as Redux, Flux is required.
Strong foundation in requirements scoping, data structures, algorithms, instrumenting and performance benchmarking, problem solving and complexity analysis.
Strong designing, analytical, programming and communication skills needed, along with aptitude for building stable solutions.
In-depth understanding of CSS preprocessors such as SASS, SCSS, LESS, bundlers such as webpack, and task runners such as grunt, gulp.
Understanding of browser debugging tools, devtools including using of chrome extensions such as react, redux, and firefox extensions such as firebug.
Ability to develop cross-browser functioning web pages, thorough understanding of Object Oriented Javascript.
Experience with Node JS would be key.
Understanding of Javascript event loop, Promises, any Async JS library and having worked with JQuery and understanding it’s pros and cons is a plus.
Experience with Unit Testing frameworks such as Jasmine, Mocha, Chai etc. and test runners such as Karma, Jest would be required.
Familiarity with web page layout and semantic HTML.
Good understanding of npm (Node package manager) and applications of it.

Other Skills (strong exposure required to at least several areas):

Good experience in technologies including JAVA, JAVA FX, REST, Postgres etc.
Experience with n-tier web application development/testing is required. Technical certification a Plus.
Exposure to tools like JMeter, SoapUI, Postman / Any REST Client is desired. LINUX skills are required.
High-level knowledge about various testing methodologies such as functional testing, integration testing, regression testing, penetration testing and performance testing is necessary.
Understanding of test automation using frameworks such as Selenium, etc. is good to have.
Demonstrable experience utilizing object-oriented patterns and design best practices.
Familiarity with common application security vulnerabilities and how to overcome them (OWASP) is a Plus.
Hands-on experience with Continuous Integration, and Test Driven Development is required.
Knowledge in micro services and hands-on experience in Kubernetes, Docker and OpenShift would be a strong plus.

Our engineers do more than just write and test code:

We count on your curiosity and creativity, to want to understand customer requirements and our processes and want to come up with creative solutions.
While you’ll have the skill to see and understand the big picture, you’re able to stay focused on the task at hand to achieve immediate goals.
You’re great at systematic and accurate research wanting to uncover the smallest detail.
You have amazing work ethics that will help us all work extremely well together.
You have the passion to understand people and always strive harder to improve our products and services!
You have excellent interpersonal skills and above all, you are a team player!

Please Note: Due to the COVID-19 pandemic and the evolving visa/travel restrictions in place, we are currently only able to extend offers to candidates with the right to work in Singapore. We are keeping the situation under close review and will adjust accordingly should the restrictive measures be lifted.

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
Software Developer (Layer 7),"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centres. Our 506,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

Accenture is an Irish-domiciled multinational professional services company that provides services in:

Technology

Strategy & Consulting

Interactive

Operations

As a Fortune Global 500 company, it has been incorporated in Dublin, Ireland since September 1, 2009.

With more than 500,000 employees worldwide—in 200 cities across 51 countries—Accenture also operates more than 100 “innovation hubs,” developing solutions for cloud, finance, and other industries.

The Pillar

Accenture Technology combines business and industry insights with innovative technology services to transform your business. Join one of the world’s largest independent providers of technology services to grow your expertise and help clients worldwide to innovate at scale and transform their businesses. Help change how the world works and lives through technology innovation.

The Group

Accenture Cloud First is a new multi-service group of 70,000 cloud professionals that brings together the full power and breadth of Accenture’s industry and technology capabilities, ecosystem partnerships, and deep commitment to learning and upskilling clients’ employees and to responsible business, with the singular focus of enabling organizations to move to the cloud with greater speed and achieve greater value for all their stakeholders at this critical time. Specifically, this new group integrates the company’s wide-ranging cloud expertise, including:

Software Development, Cloud migration, infrastructure, and application services and ecosystem partnerships; deep industry and cross-industry insights, data, and Applied Intelligence capabilities.

Responsibilities include but are not limited to:

Coordinates with the Build Team in understanding client requirements and how they translate in application features

Collaborate with the Team to set specifications for new applications

Perform troubleshooting and debugging of applications if needed

Evaluate existing applications to reprogram, update and add new features

Work with business process owners/SMEs to assess capabilities and identify high-level user requirements and Work with project managers, architects, and SMEs to define metrics and performance goals for the process.

Participate in transitioning the requirements and use cases to the designers to ensure a clear and complete understanding of the requirements.

Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team

A Good team player is a must

Critical Success Factors

Mandatory

Has a work experience with Layer 7

Has a work experience with Java / J2EE

Good to have skills:

Build Forge / Scheduling application

All our consulting professionals receive comprehensive training covering business acumen, technical and professional skills development. You’ll also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion, or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic, or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."
Backend Engineer (Research & Development) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

ByteDance will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require ByteDance's sponsorship of a visa.

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with ByteDance.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to ByteDance and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About The Backend Engineering Community

ByteDance has a strong backend engineering community where it consists of a variety of business units that you can join. Whether you enjoy working on building out and scaling platforms, designing large-scale distributed systems, or developing and implementing end-to-end load-balanced infrastructure, our recruitment team will work closely with you and the engineering team to discover the right team for you.

Our Engineering Teams

Ads Infrastructure
Ads Measurement
Applied Machine Learning
Applications Performance Management
Business Integrity
Cloud Infrastructure
Data Warehouse
Global E-Commerce
Global Payments
Infra Engineering
Machine Learning Systems
Recommendation Architecture
Search
Trust & Safety Platform
Video Infrastructure
Video-On-Demand

Responsibilities

Architect and develop efficient, highly scalable and secured services;
Optimise backend systems and services for data security, modularity, computational efficiency and scalability;
Analyse business and technical requirements carefully to solve challenging problems;
Participate in design reviews and code reviews;
Collaborate with fellow engineers, product managers, and business owners in the team to ensure timely delivery of business requirements.

Qualifications

Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline;
Strong software programming capabilities, exhibits good code design and coding style;
Familiarity with at least one of the programming languages: Go, Python, Java or C++;
Pragmatic understanding of data structure, algorithm design and analysis, networking, data security, distributed system, and highly scalable systems design.

Preferred Qualifications

Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment.

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://jobs.bytedance.com/en/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@bytedance.com"
"Backend Software Engineer, Measurement","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the Team
Ads Measurement's mission is to help marketers and brands realize their true business value generated by TikTok across all of their paid channels. As a Software Engineer on the Ads Measurement team, you will build scalable tech foundations, launch various products to extract real signals, and offer scientific methodologies to help advertising effectiveness. The team is working on a variety of products end-to-end, including web/app signals infra and modelling, identity, attribution, lift, brand safety, viewability, invalid traffic, etc., as well as new innovative features.

- Engineering the infrastructure for advertisement quality control, case analysis and machine learning model training to enforce content integrity
- Building products to enhance the trust between advertisers and TikTok, improve advertiser experience and enforce actor integrity
- Design and build data-driven applications to help both local and global partners to unlock monetization opportunities
- Work closely with operations and infrastructure to build and scale back-end services

Qualifications

- Bachelor's or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions
- Solid programming capabilities, exhibits good code design and coding style
- Familiarity with at least one of the programming languages: Go, Python or Java
- Pragmatic understanding of data structure, algorithm design and analysis, networking, data security and distributed system
- Prior experience working with Internet Products or large scale platforms.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Junior Web Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
We are looking for a Junior Web Developer to join up our media buying and affiliate network department to work and support our internal web development projects. The ideal candidate will be responsible to fuse the art of creative design with programming, integrate UI/UX design, actualize design ideas to final delivery, and provide technical support to other entities. Candidates should be creative, independent, good in communication, and good in technical skills.

Responsibilities
Designing and creating websites based on HTML, CSS, JavaScript and PHP, write well designed, testable, efficient code by using best software development practices
Be responsible for maintaining, expanding, and scaling our site
Code optimization and modification, including integration with third-party Pixel
Collaboration with various teams, understanding each team's requirement, user requirement gathering
Familiar with building a user-flow process
Familiar with WordPress is a plus
Knowledge of basic technical SEO skills is optional but will be advantageous
Requirements
Degree in a discipline related to Programming, Web Development
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills;
Proficiency in HTML, CSS, Javascript, PHP, and MySQL
Knowledge in working with tracking pixel
Excellent verbal and written communications skills;
Self-starter and work well within a team environment;
Ability to work and thrive in a fast-paced environment, learn rapidly
Strong organizational skills to juggle multiple tasks within the constraints of timelines
Has an eye for good website aesthetics
Aggressive problem diagnosis and creative problem-solving skills
Please provide portfolio in CV

Desired Skills and Experience
Aesthetics, CSS, PHP, HTML, MySQL, JavaScript, HTML5, Web Developer, SEO, Web Development, Pixel tracking, Software Development, WordPress"
Android Software Engineer - TikTok Live,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok Live client team focus has been focusing on delivery engaging and the best live streaming experience to global users. Our team develop creative and interesting features for streamers and viewers to express themselves and interact with others instantly. We are looking for passionate mobile software engineers to join us in this fast growing industry.

Responsibilities:
1. Design, implement the new-user features of our mobile application.
2. Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a world-class mobile experience.
3. Optimize mobile applications and user experience on the Android platforms.
4. Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.

Qualifications

Qualifications
1. BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with experience in native Android development. Final year or recent graduate in Software Development and Computer Science are also welcome to apply.
2. Proficiency in Java or Kotlin.
3. Ability to understand and debug large and complex codebases.
4. Good team communication and collaboration skills.
5. Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.
6. Livestream knowledge is a plus but not mandatory.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Software Development Engineer (Frontend),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
About ASUS

AICS is part of ASUS, a multinational company known for the world’s best motherboards, PCs, monitors, graphics cards and routers. Along with an expanding range of superior gaming, content-creation and AIoT solutions, ASUS leads the industry through cutting-edge design and innovations made to create the most ubiquitous, intelligent, heartfelt and joyful smart life for everyone. With a global workforce that includes more than 5,000 R&D professionals, ASUS is driven to become the world’s most admired innovative leading technology enterprise.

About AICS

AICS focuses on providing SaaS platform to solve the real problems in the healthcare industry. We are looking for skilled and experienced frontend engineers to join our team! As a frontend engineer, you will design and build the user interface for web applications. Our culture advocates grass root innovation and continuous learning. Bring your passion, get inspired, and grow with us!

Job Responsibilities
Develop UI of AICS web based services.
Develop custom UI framework to match our needs.
Collaborate with UX designers and backend engineers to improve usability.
Routinely test for ease of use, speed, and other quality factors.
Create quality prototypes and mockups.
Ensure high quality and consistency experiences.
Stay up-to-date on emerging technologies.
Requirements
Minimum of 1 year experience in web development.
Solid modern web skills such as ES6, HTML5, CSS3, TypeScript, webpack, eslint etc.
Familiar with API integration with the back-end.
Familiar with Git and knowledge of Git flow.
Experienced in either React, Angular, or Vue 3.0.
Good understanding of data structures, algorithms, and operating systems.
Good interpersonal communications, strong sense of team spirit, and problem-solving skills.

Desired Skills and Experience
Healthcare Industry, ReactJS, CSS3, Data Structures, TypeScript, Team Spirit, HTML5, UI, VueJS, User Interface, Angular, Routers, Web Applications, C#, API, Genetics, Web Development"
"Backend Software Engineer (Wallet), TikTok - Singapore","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

With the enormous growth of live streaming in recent years, our mission is to inspire real-time interactions and help live streamers connect to people from all corners of the globe.
We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming in TikTok. You will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for all live streamers and audience alike.

Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to continuously improve TikTok Wallet and payment system to create a stable, agile and robust in-app wallet system
2. Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability, performance and reliability of the product.
3. Develop large-scale software systems that powers TikTok app.

Qualifications

1. BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major.
2. Experienced in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
3. Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
4. Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
5. Have good team communication and collaboration skills.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Java Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Analyze user and system requirements
Design flowcharts to illustrate software solutions
Write efficient code based on feature specifications
Develop user interfaces
Prioritize and execute tasks in the software development life cycle
Design database architecture
Test and debug Java applications
Validate software functionality and security
Interested candidate who wish to apply for this position, please send in your resume to info@wecruit.com.sg.

Wecruit Pte Ltd

EA License No. 20C0270
Desired Skills and Experience
Java Web Server, Oracle, Design Patterns, Java code, MySQL, Java server, Agile, JavaScript, Java script, JDBC, Maven, SQL, Core Java, SQL Server, Team Player, Java, Databases, J2EE, Software Development, Hibernate"
"Machine Learning Engineer, AML Engine Dedup","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team
Focus on CV technologies video representation and large-scale retrieval, build the duplicated/similarity relationship between billions of videos, support TikTok and its affiliates global products with services as deduplication, originality recognition, copyright detection and content moderation.

1. Build the Dedup and Copyright system, supports billions of users all over the world;
2. Based on the product requirements, develop models and systems to detect duplicated and similar materials among billions of videos;
3. Introduce new AI technologies to our online system and improve the performance;
4. Improve the reliability of the system, manage the challenges of scale and complexity;

Qualifications

1. Bachelor or higher degrees in computer science or related discipline;
2. Experienced in Machine Learning, familiar with at least one DeepLearning framework, e.g. PyTorch, Tensorflow.
3. Experienced in Multimedia or Computer Vision, e.g. Image/Video/Audio retrieval, Representation Learning, Re-Identification, Unsupervised/Self-supervised learning.

Preferred Qualifications
1. Authors of published papers in top academia conferences;
2. Winners of algorithm and machine learning competitions such as ACM and Kaggle;

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
SDLC & Runtime - Workflow Software Engineer,"Job Description

SDLC & RUNTIME

We develop and support SDLC platforms and services to our 17,000 engineers worldwide, enabling them to deliver services, products and platforms for their business. Increasingly the firm relies on technology to achieve its commercial goals and deliver value to shareholders through innovative technology solutions. To achieve these ambitions, we must be able to empower our talented engineers by providing a developer environment that is attractive, matches their expectations, keeps them engaged and productive.

We are responsible for Goldman Sachs’ mission critical production platforms including:
Private and public cloud computing platforms
Distributed scheduling
Security and critical infrastructure services
API platform
Gitlab
Container runtime
CI/CD
Our aim is to innovate and drive technology solutions that will empower our engineers to deliver value to our clients. By joining us, you will be part of a diverse global technical team focusing on solving critical business problems.

Work on a multi-year initiative to build out our strategic, highly scalable and resilient SDLC platform using cutting-edge technologies and streamlining processes for our engineers across the firm.

WORKFLOW SOFTWARE ENGINEER

These Include

Our mission is to ensure that our engineers have all the information they need to make high quality changes to production code, regardless what software stack or toolchain they use. We are responsible for the peer review web apps used across the firm, which pull together data from multiple sources to feed into the quality gating for our reviews.
Static analysis and linting results
Regression testing
Compliance checks
Automated Trading Controls (ATC)
WHAT YOU WILL DO
Work with engineers and stakeholders worldwide to understand pain points and inefficiencies in our workflow tooling and processes
Streamline and automate compliance and quality gates
Standardize differences in user experience across different front end applications
High impact: Every change to our systems is felt by thousands of engineers worldwide
WHAT WE NEED FROM YOU
Experienced in Java
Familiarity with designing and supporting front end web apps
Strong software engineering fundamentals
Experience writing software in a high-integrity software environment
Experience in producing and maintaining developer workflow tooling would be beneficial
No banking experience necessary
About Goldman Sachs

At Goldman Sachs, we commit our people, capital and ideas to help our clients, shareholders and the communities we serve to grow. Founded in 1869, we are a leading global investment banking, securities and investment management firm. Headquartered in New York, we maintain offices around the world.

We believe who you are makes you better at what you do. We're committed to fostering and advancing diversity and inclusion in our own workplace and beyond by ensuring every individual within our firm has a number of opportunities to grow professionally and personally, from our training and development opportunities and firmwide networks to benefits, wellness and personal finance offerings and mindfulness programs. Learn more about our culture, benefits, and people at GS.com/careers.

We’re committed to finding reasonable accommodations for candidates with special needs or disabilities during our recruiting process. Learn more: https://www.goldmansachs.com/careers/footer/disability-statement.html

© The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc., 2021. All rights reserved.

Goldman Sachs is an equal employment/affirmative action employer Female/Minority/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity"
Techno-Functional Java Developer,"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Technology and Operations services and Accenture Song—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 710,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

Techno-Functional Java Developer

Home Country: Singapore

Work location & Arrangement: Flexible

Responsibilities include but are not limited to:

Pickup and kick-off cards with leads to understand the task, get all the required clarification done and propose alternative solutions.

Assess and implement new changes in good quality and with test covered.

Showcase and review the new changes together with team members.

Actively work with other development and QA members to solve challenges.

Able to provide leadership, guidance, training and mentoring to other team members.

Carry out feasibility studies and impact analysis for new feature.

Pro-actively contribute innovative ideas for improvements.

Evaluate, select and formulate best solution for technical spike cards.

Support production environment and attend the escalated issues if required.

Critical Success Factors

Mandatory

Java Spring Boot (Microservices)

ReactJS

Backend Java Development

You’ll also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion, or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic, or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law.

The Organization

Accenture is an Irish-domiciled multinational professional services company that provides services in:

Technology

Strategy & Consulting

Interactive

Operations

As a Fortune Global 500 company, it has been incorporated in Dublin, Ireland since September 1, 2009.

With more than 500,000 employees worldwide—in 200 cities across 51 countries—Accenture also operates more than 100 “innovation hubs,” developing solutions for cloud, finance, and other industries.

The Pillar

Accenture Technology combines business and industry insights with innovative technology services to transform your business. Join one of the world’s largest independent providers of technology services to grow your expertise and help clients worldwide to innovate at scale and transform their businesses. Help change how the world works and lives

through technology innovation.

The Group

Accenture Cloud First is a new multi-service group of 70,000 cloud professionals that brings together the full power and breadth of Accenture’s industry and technology capabilities, ecosystem partnerships, and deep commitment to learning and upskilling clients’ employees and to responsible business, with the singular focus of enabling organizations to move to the cloud with greater speed and achieve greater value for all their stakeholders at this critical time. Specifically, this new group integrates the company’s wide-ranging cloud expertise, including:

Software Development, Cloud migration, infrastructure, and application services and ecosystem partnerships; deep industry and cross-industry insights, data and Applied Intelligence capabilities"
Junior Data Engineer,"Project Description:
To support the client's data services team in providing end to end data solutions for data analytics in creating business insights to achieve operational excellence, cost savings or to maximise profits.

Responsibilities:
- Engage stakeholders to develop functional data visualizations or dashboards which involves working closely with business subject matter experts to understand, propose and formulate solutions
- Transform, improve and integrate data based on requirements
- Works within controls to ensure the accuracy, timeliness and confidentiality of all managerial and business intelligence reports, views, dashboards, and user data
- Analyzes reporting needs and requirements, assesses current reporting in the context of strategic goals and devise plans for delivering the most appropriate reporting solutions to users
- Build and design from multiple data sets into self-service Data Visualization dashboard like Qlik/ Tableau that are intuitive and insightful that is used for storytelling and presentation.
- Support the building of contextual data marts to advance the scalability and reusability of visual analytics assets;
- Work closely with the business units to support dashboard adoption;
- Ensure documentation of processes, analytics design, measure definitions, data integration, and development;
- Ensure compliance of all analytical projects to internal and external guidelines.
- Integrate Machine Learning into user analytical reports to facilitate faster discovery of insights and root-cause analyses

Mandatory Skills Description:
React; Palantir / Alteryx
Data Visualization / Python / Sql / Tablleau / ETL

Nice to Have Skills:
Python, Data Visualization, Data Cleansing, Data Modelling, Financial Analysis

Languages:
English: C2 Proficient

Compensation:
5000 - 6000 SGD Gross Per Month"
Data Scientist,"About the team:
You will be the member of the core end-to-end data science team, from BI to AI. You will be responsible for democratising insights on our core businesses, collaborating with cross-functional teams to define, measure and understand key metrics, influence business strategy and product roadmap through data, deliver analysis reports and models, empower our products and services with data-driven and AI-driven approaches.
You will collaborate closely with the engineering team, product team and other stakeholders in defining the data collection needs, the data schema, the data analysis, the model training and the model deployment.


Responsibilities:
Work on large-scale structured and unstructured data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using analytical, statistical, machine learning or deep learning approaches
Work with stakeholders from different departments to understand their business needs and challenges, architect and design analytics solutions to meet business objectives and support business decision making
Collaborate with cross-functional stakeholders to provide strategies based on data-driven insights across product, marketing, compliance, and others
Define, understand, and test external/internal opportunities to improve our products and services
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics
Develop data models, data automation systems, performance metrics, and reporting systems, and track impact over time
Deliver Machine Learning projects from beginning to end. This includes understanding the business need, planning the project, aggregating & exploring data, building & validating models, and deploying ML models to deliver business impact
Improving upon existing machine learning methodologies by developing new sources, developing and testing enhancements, running computational experiments, and fine-tuning parameters
Communicate results and business impacts of insight initiatives to stakeholders within and outside of the company.


Requirements:
Bachelor degree in Business, Economics, Statistics, Data Science, Data Mining, or similar quantitative field
Proven successful and trackable experience in an analytical role or data scientist role involving extraction, analysis, and/or modeling
Solid experiences in SQL, familiar with SQL functions such as window functions and aggregate functions.
Solid experiences in Python, familiar with data analysis libraries such as pandas, numpy, matplotlib, scikit-learn, etc.
Experience in using analytical concepts and statistical techniques: hypothesis development, designing tests/experiments, analysing data, drawing conclusions, and developing actionable recommendations for business units
Understanding of ML algorithms such as classification, regression, clustering, neural networks, SVM, decision trees, boosting techniques, reinforcement learning, etc.
Experience in developing production-grade ML systems including exploratory analysis, feature engineering, hyperparameter tuning, model training, model selection, creating data pipelines, etc.
Experience in working with deep learning frameworks such as PyTorch for real world problems.
Knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals such as object-oriented design, algorithm design, data structures, problem solving and complexity analysis.
Self-driven, innovative, collaborative, with good communication and presentation skills, able to translate between business and technical audiences."
Web Senior Developer (SG),"Location: Singapore

The Opportunity:

We have an exciting and rewarding opportunity, working as our Web Senior Developer within the Asia Pacific region. Within the role you’ll build and unit/integration testing of Web front end.

You will have a chance to be part of new project that will build a new end-to-end Digital Native Insurance Platform to enable new distribution models. Insurance offerings on this platform will be specifically designed for high levels of automation and straight through processing across the full insurance value chain.

Key Responsibilities:

Build a deep understanding of business requirements and best ways to build web front end.
Build of Web frontend using HTML, CSS, Javascript, ReactJS, Redux & REST/JSON
Unit testing (JEST), integration testing and deployments in various environments
Trouble shooting & defect analysis
Interfacing with other teams for technical details related to integration of web with back-end services
Build & unit test of reusable UI components with ReactJS
Documentation of code
CI/CD processes (eg. configuration management, daily automated build, unit testing etc)
Occasional travel may be required

Your skills and experience :

7+ years HTML, CSS and Javascript programming experience.
Prior experience ReactJS and REST/JSON
Prior experience in Financial Services or Insurance highly regarded
Experience with JEST, JIRA, BitBucket, Bamboo, Sonarqube

Skills:

Problem solving skills
Experience with MVC and other design patters
Passion for new and emerging technologies. Ability to investigate these in depth.
Ability to understand business requirements in detail.

At Zurich we are proud of our culture. We are passionate about Diversity and Inclusion. We want you to bring your whole self to work we have a diverse mix of customers and we want our employee base to reflect that.

Our diversity and inclusion initiatives are creating an environment where everyone feels welcome regardless of protected characteristics.

With the above in mind we accept applications from everyone regardless of your background, beliefs or culture.

We are committed to continuous improvement and we offer access to a comprehensive range of training and development opportunities. Zurich is passionate about supporting employees to help others by getting involved in volunteering, charitable and community activity.

So make a difference. Be challenged. Be inspired. Be supported, Love what you do. Work for us.

You are the heart & soul of Zurich!

At Zurich, we like to think outside the box and challenge the status quo. We take an optimistic approach by focusing on the positives and constantly asking What can go right?

We highly value the experience and know-how of our employees and offer a wide range of opportunities across business areas to encourage you to apply for new opportunities within Zurich when you are ready for your next career step.

Let’s continue to grow together!

Location(s): Singapore

Remote working:

Schedule: Full Time

Recruiter name: Natalia Dzięgło

Closing date:"
Senior Full Stack Java Engineer,"Job Reference #

266901BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Do you want to design and build attractive digital products and services? Do you want to play a key role in transforming our firm into an agile organization?

At UBS, we re-imagine the way we work, the way we connect with each other – our colleagues, clients and partners – and the way we deliver value. Being agile will make us more responsive, more adaptable, and ultimately more innovative.

We’re looking for a Full Stack Java Engineer to:

design, develop, and improve the digital products and technology services we provide to our clients and employees.

apply a broad range of software engineering practices, from analyzing user needs and developing new features to automated testing and deployment.

ensure the quality, security, reliability, and compliance of our solutions by applying our digital principles and implementing both functional and non-functional requirements.

build observability into our solutions, monitor production health, help to resolve L3 incidents, and remediate the root cause of risks and issues

understand, represent, and advocate for client needs

share knowledge and expertise with colleagues, help with hiring, and contribute regularly to our engineering culture and internal communities

Your team

You'll be working in the Be a Client Stream, Client Contract & Sign Crew, supporting our newly created chapters to embed the unified model of Agile@UBS and take our platform to next Level.

Your expertise


bachelor or equivalent focusing on Computer Science, Software Engineering, etc.
ideally 6+ years of experience in a similar position focused on full stack java development within the financial sector
interested in learning new technologies and practices, reuse strategic platforms and standards, evaluate options, and make decisions with long-term sustainability in mind
strong communicator, from making presentations to technical writing
experience with Java and Spring (Container, MVC, JDBC, Boot)
experience with Cloud technologies (Azure, AKS, Functions)
knowledge of Container technologies (Docker)
data streaming architecture (Kafka) or messaging (ASB, Tibco)
relational databases (Oracle, Postgres)
client-side web technologies (JavaScript, React JS, JSON, HTML, CSS

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Full Stack Java Developer,"Hong Kong, Singapore

We have an exciting role in the MOD Technology development team in Singapore or Hong Kong. We are interested in speaking to you if you are an exceptional technologist who excels at coding, problem solving and effective delivery. This is a great opportunity to work with other gifted technologists to make a significant impact to our business. We are a global team, supporting front-to-back middle office systems, operating in a strong DevOps culture.

Macquarie’s Corporate Operations Group (COG) Equity Finance and EDT Post Trade development team support the Commodities and Global Markets (CGM) Group with daily interaction with the front office business stakeholders. You will join a dynamic team that owns globally used services and work side by side with experienced front and back office developers applying agile development methodology.

Responsibilities
Work with the global team to design and implement technical solutions for MOD Technology platform
Work with business stakeholders to translate business strategy into clear technical requirements
Continually improve CI/CD tools, processes and procedures
Provide support to the business users globally
Key Skill Requirements
Technical
5+ years of practical experience in Core and Enterprise Java (8 or above)
5+ years of practical experience in JavaScript and Web UI framework (Meteor / Angular)
Solid experience with SDLC tools (JIRA / Maven / Bamboo)
Good knowledge of Spring Framework and Spring Boot implementation
Good knowledge of SQL and NoSQL databases (PostgreSQL / Sybase / MongoDB)
Good knowledge of Distributed Caching technologies
Good knowledge of Test Driven Development
Basic knowledge of *nix scripting
Other
Excellent verbal and written communication
Experience working with Middle Office functions in a financial institution is an advantage
Experience in data processing and analysis tools (e.g. Spark, Presto) is an advantage
Experience in Cloud technologies (e.g. AWS, K8s, Docker) is an advantage
Preferred Skills
Technical
JavaScript framework (NodeJS / React / Vue)
HTML 5 / CSS / Bootstrap
SQL / NoSQL platform (PostgreSQL / Mongo / Cassandra)
CI/CD Tools (Bamboo / Jenkins)
Testing Framework (Robot / Selenium / Cucumber)
Building low latency high availability applications
Other
Experience working with Equity Derivative products
About The Corporate Operations Group

The Corporate Operations Group brings together specialist support services in Digital Transformation & Data, Technology, Operations, Human Resources, Business Services, Business Improvement & Strategy, and the Macquarie Group Foundation. We deliver service excellence to ensure Macquarie is open for business, deliver on transformational change, invest in our people and have deep relationships with our customers.

Our commitment to Diversity, Equity and Inclusion

The diversity of our people is one of our greatest strengths. An inclusive and equitable environment enables us to deliver innovative and sustainable outcomes for our people, clients, shareholders and communities. From day one, you'll be encouraged to be yourself and supported to perform at your best. If our purpose of ‘empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future’ is as inspiring to you as it is to us, please apply. With the right technology, support and resources, our people can work in a range of flexible ways.

We are committed to providing a working environment that embraces and values diversity, equity and inclusion. We encourage candidates to speak with a member of our recruitment team if you require adjustments to our recruitment process to support you, and the type of working arrangements that would help you thrive.

About Macquarie

A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.

Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 18,000+ employees and offices in 33 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.

You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.

Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, specialist advisory, capital raising and principal investment.

Find out more at www.macquarie.com/careers

Job no: COG-967056

Work type: Permanent - Full time

Location: Hong Kong, Singapore

Category: Mid-level, Technology

Group: Corporate Operations Group

Division: Technology

Recruiter: Neil Mehaffey

Opening Date: 19/9/2022"
Full Stack Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Ailytics is a leading video analytics solution provider that helps enterprises create a safe and productive workspace to minimize risk and improve productivity across all of their facility footprints.

We believe that workplace safety is non-negotiable, and productivity is uncompromisable, both of which can be easily improved by the adoption of the right technology.

Using the latest breakthroughs in AI, we empower the workplace to have 24/7 monitoring of their operations, receive real-time violation notifications and optimize their operational bottlenecks, resulting in up to 25% improvement in operational efficiency.

We are seeking to expand our team in Singapore and looking for someone with an entrepreneurial spirit to take a key position in leading the team in developing and deploying cutting-edge scalable backend solutions that help solve some of our customers’ toughest business challenges.

Responsibilities
Take ownership of the features: Analyze, design, and deploy high-quality maintainable and scalable software based on business need. As one of our founding employees, you will get the chance to take complete end-to-end ownership of projects and have creative control over the direction to take.
Develop and deploy highly scalable and available backend solutions on cloud infrastructure, using advanced DevOps and automation tools.
Collaborate very closely with, and incorporate feedback from engineering, operations and business teams to develop solutions as per the product roadmap, in collaboration with the subject matter experts, to ensure maximal efficiency of the solution.
Technical Abilities
Bachelors, Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or related fields, or equivalent experience.
Minimum 3+ years of working experience in best practice for the entire SDLC.
Evidence of exposure to architectural patterns of high-scale web applications on cloud. (e.g. well-designed APIs, high volume data pipelines, service-meshes, message queues, distributed caching, efficient algorithms).
Familiar with container-based applications and orchestration tools (Docker and Kubernetes) for coding and debugging.
Experience with writing unit & integration tests, monitoring code coverage etc.
Experience delivering a high-quality product as an individual (or open-source) contributor as part of a high-performing team in a fast-paced, continuously changing environment.
DevOps mindset for monitoring and deploying code with versioning tools and CI/CD.
Ability to drive projects and work both independently and in a team.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with “can do” attitude seeking to make a difference. Must be willing to work with an internationally distributed team.
Tech Stack
Python, ReactJS, Typescript for programming languages.
Experience working with web frameworks (Django, Flask)
Databases (PostgreSQL for RDBMS, MongoDB for NoSQL)
Docker, Kubernetes for orchestration tools.
Amazon Web Services (AWS) for cloud services, with experience working with S3, EKS, IAM etc.
Experience with message queuing (Kafka or RabbitMQ)
Git for version control.
Preferred
Background in the construction domain
Knowledge of BIM related software
Fluent in 1 other language apart from English
What we offer
Experience working in a fast-paced start-up, with a team of people who are passionate about AI and IoT, using the latest technologies.
Flexibility on work location, hours, and time off.
Employee stock options.
Play a key role in the day-to-day efficiency of our operations and overall growth of the company from day one itself!

Desired Skills and Experience
Version Control, Git, Kubernetes, PostgreSQL, Pipelines, AWS, TypeScript, SDLC, RabbitMQ, Python, Docker, Web Applications, Debugging, Databases"
Backend Software Engineer - TikTok Search,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.

At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

Our team is responsible for providing TikTok search users with first-class search experience by building a strong and robust infrastructure and platform to support product fast iteration and key feature development. In our team, you'll have the opportunity to take part in developing the key features on TikTok Search, understand how TikTok Search could be evolved to be a multi-billion-user product and first-handed experience how user request varies on this giant from time to time. We encourage a culture of self-driven, intellectual curiosity, openness and problem-solving.

Detailed responsibilities include but not limited to:
1. Product Development: Support fast iterations of TikTok Search business and further enable the product growth.
2. Performance & Stability: Build a fast and robust Search product by keeping optimizing system performance and improving service stability.
3. Search Engineering Infrastructure: Guarantee reasonable Search architecture governance to ensure that the overall system operates smoothly.
4. Search offline processing: Construct a high freshness multi-media index and provide a reliable offline data support for Search Engine.
5. Backend engineering team building, management and development.

Qualifications

Job Requirements
- BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other relevant majors with minimum 3-5 years of experience
- Excellent problem-analysis and -solving skills, have industry experience in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
- Good at coding, data structure and basic algorithm
- Good team communication and collaboration skills.

Preferred Qualifications
- Good understanding on how modern Search system is built or/and how modern Search product should be evolved.
- Industry experience in building a consumer-facing Search product.
- Experience in building a medium-size backend technical team from scratch.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer, Risk Data Mining, BRIC","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Business Risk Integrated Control (BRIC) Team Is Missioned

To protect TikTok users, including and beyond content consumers, creators, advertisers;
By securing platform health and community experience authenticity;
Through building infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to collaborate with many cross-functional teams and stakeholders.

The BRIC team works to minimise the damage of inauthentic behaviours on TikTok, covering multiple classical and novel community and business risk areas such as account integrity, engagement authenticity, anti spam, API and growth health, live streaming security and financial safety (ads or e-commerce), etc.

In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and robust, intelligent and privacy-safe, secure and product-friendly systems and solutions. Our challenges are not some regular day-to-day technical puzzles -- You'll be part of a team that's developing novel solutions to first-seen challenges of a non-stop evolvement of a phenomenal product eco-system. The work needs to be fast, transferrable, while still down to the ground to making quick and solid differences.

Responsibilities

Build rules, algorithms and machine learning models, to respond to and mitigate business risks in ByteDance products/platforms. Such risks include and are not limited to abusive accounts, fake engagements, spammy redirection, scraping, fraud, etc.
Establish reliable, efficient and modularized risk defense solutions, reduce manual workload on ramping up risk controls on/against new business, risk area, or abusive means.
Uplevel risk defense excellence on privacy/compliance, machine learning, risk perception and analysis, achieve in-depth defense portfolio.

Qualifications

Bachelor or degrees above in computer science, computer engineering, electrical engineering, statistics or other relevant majors (e.g. finance if applying for applying for financial fraud roles).
Solid engineering skills. Proficiency in at least two of: Linux, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Storm.
Familiarity with data mining, data science or machine learning. Bonus given to proficiency in modern machine learning theories and applications such as deep neural nets, transfer/multi-task learning, reinforcement learning, time series or graph unsupervised learning.
Ability to think critically, objectively, rationally. Reason and communicate in result-oriented, data-driven manner. High autonomy.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace.

At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Algorithm Engineer, Global Live","Responsibilities

TikTok Live AML platform team’s duty is to build up a robust, efficient, technologically advanced product to identify and eliminate potential risks of capital security compliance in TikTok. For example, we can develop targeted product features, make strategies after deep insight of the business data, or we could build up algorithm models with machine learning, neural network and some other artificial intelligence approach. This is fast-growing research field, which is full of challenge, and has received extensive attention.

Responsibilities：
- Design and apply machine learning algorithms and intelligent strategies to solve the capital security compliance issues which TikTok faced
- Understand the business flow and capital flow of TikTok, Identify potential risks of capital security compliance and design solutions
- Follow up the latest research progress in the fields of anti money laundering and fund security in the finance / technology industry, and apply it in the work
- Conduct offline and online experiments, analyse according data and evaluate to improve algorithms and strategies
- Work closely with colleagues in product, engineering and data to continuously improve the level of safety compliance and escort the business

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical discipline;
- Solid experience with data structures and algorithms;
- Software development experience through hands on coding in a general programming language;
- Experience in one or more of the following areas: Machine Learning, Data Mining, Search Systems or other related areas;
- Fast business understanding and collaborative in teamwork.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer - Commerce Engineering, Apple Media Products","Summary

Imagine what you could do here. At Apple, new ideas have a way of becoming extraordinary products, services, and customer experiences very quickly. Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish. Would you like the stimulation and challenges of building a world-class, extraordinary scalable commerce platform? Then this is the opportunity for you at Apple! We strive to provide a flawless purchase and subscription experience for our for millions of customers and developers. The Apple Media Products Commerce Engineering team manages purchases from all iOS products, including Apps, Music, and Subscriptions. This scale is truly unprecedented and requires tremendous thinking to develop new initiatives and maintain existing systems. We are looking for a self-starting, energetic individual who is not afraid to question assumptions or charge head-first into gray areas. Excellent written and oral interpersonal skills are a must to collaborate in our cross-functional environments. The ideal candidate should have several years experience developing large-scale web-based applications using object-oriented languages. Excellent understanding of relational databases and data-modeling techniques are needed, and Cassandra or other NoSQL knowledge are a plus. We are primarily a Java shop.


Key Qualifications

Java programming experience

Object-oriented programming

Hands-on software engineering experience, particularly with Java and Service Oriented Architectures

Excellent interpersonal skills

Curiosity

Willing to take ownership and set direction, especially in gray areas

The attitude that technical debt as an opportunity for better engineering

Strong sense of responsibility

Knowledge of databases both SQL and NoSQL and entity relationship modeling

Experience programming for eventual consistency

Experience working in a large code base

Experience/knowledge working on highly scalable applications and RESTful web services

Familiarity with scalability and performance issues

Excellent judgment and integrity with the ability to make timely and sound decisions


Description

We account for each purchase across many different reporting and financial systems. If you like the stimulation and challenges of building systems and features exposed to hundreds of millions of transacting users, and you want to make a difference, you will find Apple Media Products Engineering to be a fast-paced, rewarding environment where the best engineers and scientists collaborate to deliver fantastic products and features to our customers. This position is for a Software Engineer within the Apple Media Products Commerce team. The Apple Media Products Commerce Engineering team supports all the commerce functionality of the App Store, iTunes Music Store, Apple Music, and many others. You will work on adding new integrations, scaling current data flows, and re-imagining existing processes to accommodate developing features and architectures. We offer a diverse set of products, often with dissimilar taxation, accounting and reporting requirements. These requirements are often country specific and can change quickly as legislative bodies update local laws. All of this operates on an immense scale, both in volume and business complexity. We are seeking a Java engineer with experience implementing large scale systems. Working independently, you will drive a project from inception to production deployment with a strong focus on performance to get the most out of your systems' designs and implementations, no matter what the scale. You will care about measuring, profiling, tuning but you will also be able to think creatively and question assumptions. You should be an outstanding teammate and have excellent communication and presentation skills.


Education & Experience

A BS/MS/PhD in Computer Engineering/Computer Science is required.


Role Number: 200406945"
"C++ Developer, Data Platform","Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team
TikTok and affiliates are developing the next-generation high-performance analytical database, with a mission to enable efficient and real-time data-driven decision-making on PB-level data sets. The initial product was forked from Clickhouse, after which large re-architecture had been taken place. The product now not only improves the efficiency of Clickhouse but also fits into the elastic cloud-native infrastructure with better scalability and resource utilization. With years of polishment in the internal EB-level scenarios, we are now ready to serve our business partners via various cloud vendors.

- Participate in the design and implementation of distributed databases or cloud-native systems
- Keep track, explore and delivery of the state-of-the-art data techniques in the real system, including but not limited to modern hardware, smart optimizer, data lake, and more.

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, related technical discipline
- At least 1 years of related experience in distributed system and algorithm on database kernel
- Familiar with at least one programming language among C, C++, or Rust
- Experienced with data structure, algorithm, concurrent programming, I/O, operating system is essential
- Experience with at least one database. e.g., Clickhouse, Spark, Presto, Doris, Postgresql, Mysql

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Android Software Engineer, TikTok Live","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

TikTok Live client team focus has been focusing on delivery engaging and the best live streaming experience to global users. Our team develop creative and interesting features for streamers and viewers to express themselves and interact with others instantly. We are looking for passionate mobile software engineers to join us in this fast growing industry.

Responsibilities:
1. Design, implement the new-user features of our mobile application.
2. Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a world-class mobile experience.
3. Optimize mobile applications and user experience on the Android platforms.
4. Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.

Qualifications

1. BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with experience in native Android development.
2. Proficiency in Java or Kotlin.
3. Ability to understand and debug large and complex codebases.
4. Good team communication and collaboration skills.
5. Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.
6. Livestream knowledge is a plus but not mandatory."
Backend Software Engineer - TikTok Live (Data Platform),"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About us:
TikTok is a true phenomenal app in the world. Our mission is to help live hosts connect users and inspire user interaction in real-time around the world. We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build up and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming at TikTok. We will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features, and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for live hosts and users.

TikTok Live Data Platform team is a fast-growing team in TikTok engineering family. We are building solid data capabilities and enhancing the robust data ecosystem for TikTok Live, and aiming to maximize data value to benefit our hosts & users and power TikTok.

You will:
- Plan and lead large-scale technical projects to lay the foundation for the iterative development and scale of early products
- Develop robust, efficient technology products that serve 1 billion users
- Contribute to engineering strategy, tooling, processes, and culture
- Research and apply cutting-edge domain and technical knowledge into products

Qualifications

- As a world-class engineer, you have rich working experience in scalable, highly available, distributed and mission-critical systems.
- Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
- Able to work closely with diverse stakeholders and have good communication skills
- Self-driven, positive, cooperative and willing to keep learning enthusiasm at all times
- Experience in the payment or financial domain is a plus

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Android Engineer - Intelligent Video Creation,"Responsibilities

About TikTok:
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About Video Creation Team:
Our team's mission is to empower TikTok users to turn creativity into reality via videos. We build the core video creation product to support tens of millions of TikTok creators every day. All the viral props and effects you find on TikTok are developed by us, via close collaboration with TikTok AR effects and multimedia teams. Our goal is to build the world's best video creation software. On this team, you will be working with our XFN partners to define a world-class video creation experience, designing the architecture of TikTok video creation tools and pipelines, and shipping cutting-edge features to take TikTok to the next level.

- Collaborate with product/design and other engineering teams to define a world-class video creation experience.
- Design and implement user-facing features of TikTok video creation software using the latest technology.
- Build reusable software components with robust code and clear documentation, and deliver high quality work.
- Analyze and optimize Android applications for quality, efficiency, and performance.

Qualifications

1. BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with 5+ years of working experience in native Android development.
2. Proficiency in Java/Kotlin with plenty of experience in native Android development. Familiar with mainstream frameworks like Android architecture Components, Retrofit etc...
3. Deep understanding of computer architecture, data structures, algorithms and design patterns.
4. Experience building maintainable and testable codebases, including API design and unit testing techniques.
5. Good problem-solving, analytical thinking capabilities and exceptional attention to detail.
6. Experience in audio & video multimedia client development is preferred.
7. Good team communication and collaboration skills.
8. Willing to take up challenges and grow in a fast-paced, dynamic environment. Experience of working in a cross-regional team is a plus.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Java Developer,"Job Description

Posting Title: Application Developer (Java)

Job Summary

We are looking for experienced and enthusiastic Java developers who can collaborate well with both internal and external stakeholders to design, develop and maintain software solutions to join us as part of the team.

As a successful Java Developer, you should demonstrate good knowledge of industry best practices and proficiency with passion in Java technologies; as well as delivering fully functional software that meet the schedule and requirements.

Roles And Responsibilities
Support continuous improvement throughout the development life cycle of enterprise level software solutions. This includes enhancing / maintaining of software applications
Perform system integration testing and troubleshooting of software application issues
Conducts unit testing using unit test frameworks
Create and maintain documentation for software design specifications
Perform solution estimates for business requirements
Troubleshoot application issues escalated from production
Mentor junior developers in terms of coding standards and software design
Perform code reviews
Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Diploma/Degree in Computing/Information Technology or related field
Possess good analytical, problem-solving skills
Should have at least 5 years of development experience in Java
Experience in Spring/Spring Boot framework
Experience in relational databases such as Oracle and MySQL
Experience in implementing web services such as SOAP and RESTful web services
Experience in frontend frameworks such as Angular, Struts, jQuery and Bootstrap
Experience in batch processing implementations
Have implemented some form of custom frameworks such as security and validations
Able to adapt to a fast-paced work environment
Ability to learn new technologies quickly
Good verbal and written communication skills
Good understanding of modern software development methodologies
Good understanding of software testing methodologies, scripting and tools
Experience in one or more full SDLC for enterprise projects
Ability to work effectively independently as well as in a team
Good To Have
Experience in Agile development environments
Experience in DevOps toolchains
Experience in container platforms such as Docker and Kubernetes
Experience in messaging platforms such as Kafka and IBM MQ"
Java Developer,"Posting Title: We are looking for experienced and enthusiastic Java developers who can collaborate well with both internal and external stakeholders to design, develop and maintain software solutions to join us as part of the team.

As a successful Java Developer, you should demonstrate good knowledge of industry best practices and proficiency with passion in Java technologies; as well as delivering fully functional software that meet the schedule and requirements.

Support continuous improvement throughout the development life cycle of enterprise level software solutions. This includes enhancing / maintaining of software applications
Perform system integration testing and troubleshooting of software application issues
Conducts unit testing using unit test frameworks
Create and maintain documentation for software design specifications
Perform solution estimates for business requirements
Troubleshoot application issues escalated from production
Mentor junior developers in terms of coding standards and software design
Perform code reviews
Candidate must possess at least a Diploma/Degree in Computing/Information Technology or related field
Possess good analytical, problem-solving skills
Should have at least 5 years of development experience in Java
Experience in Spring/Spring Boot framework
Experience in relational databases such as Oracle and MySQL
Experience in implementing web services such as SOAP and RESTful web services
Experience in frontend frameworks such as Angular, Struts, jQuery and Bootstrap
Experience in batch processing implementations
Have implemented some form of custom frameworks such as security and validations
Able to adapt to a fast-paced work environment
Ability to learn new technologies quickly
Good verbal and written communication skills
Good understanding of modern software development methodologies
Good understanding of software testing methodologies, scripting and tools
Experience in one or more full SDLC for enterprise projects
Ability to work effectively independently as well as in a team
Experience in Agile development environments
Experience in DevOps toolchains
Experience in container platforms such as Docker and Kubernetes
Experience in messaging platforms such as Kafka and IBM MQ"
Analyst Programmer (Back-End Developer),"Job Description

We are seeking a junior Analyst Programmer (Back-End Developer) to join a governmental project.

Job Responsibilities:

Responsible for fixing prioritised Incident Reports (IR) assigned by Team Lead
Analyse and ensure assigned are valid defects
Discuss IR fixes with team members from different teams to assess impact of any changes
Coordinate any cross-team effort required for any integration defects
Ensure delivery in timeframe given
Escalate any issues to Team Lead
Support Group and Team Lead in achieving their IRIN application support objectives
Provide production support to modules or processes to ensure day to day activities have minimum down time
Additional tasks assigned by management

Job Requirements:

Familiar with Batch & online application design concepts, and should have experience in handing large volume of data
Minimum 2 years’ experience in maintaining a system with the below relevant skill sets;
Core Processing (CP): (a) Microsoft .NET version 4.5 and above (b) C# and VB.net programming (c) BizTalk (d) TIBCO (e) Message Broker (f) IBM DB2 Mainframe (g) Microsoft SQL Server (h) FairIsaac Blaze Advisor (i) Dollar Universe (j) Java Programming (k) Adobe (l) Ascential Datastage (m) COGNOS
Taxpayer Relationship Management (TRM): (a) Siebel (b) TIBCO (c) BizTalk (d) Microsoft SQL Server (e) IBM DB2 Mainframe
External Services (XS): (a) Microsoft .NET (b) C# programming (c) ASP and ASP.net programming (d) TIBCO (e) BizTalk (f) IBM DB2 Mainframe (g) Microsoft SQL Server (h) Java Programming (i) I-Sprint UAM
Workflow and Imaging (WI): (a) FileNet (b) IBM DB2 Mainframe (c) Microsoft SQL Server (d) C# and VB.net programming (e) EFlow (f) Centera
Enterprise Reporting (ER): (a) Cognos (b) Ascential DataStage (c) IBM DB2 Mainframe (d) Microsoft SQL Server (e) Crystal Report
Employee and Knowledge Portal (iNex): (a) Sharepoint (b) Microsoft SQL Server (c) C# and VB.net programming
Integrated Stamp Duty System (ISDS): (a) Microsoft .NET version 3.5 and above (b) C# programming (c) Microsoft SQL Server (d) Crystal Report (e) Ascential Datastage (f) Dollar Universe

What We Offer You

Come for the distinctive experiences you have helping forward-thinking corporations, non-profits, and governments push the boundaries of digital innovation. Stay for the limitless learning opportunities that encourage you to master Microsoft and pursue big ideas. Enjoy ambitious growth for yourself as part of Avanade’s people-first culture with benefits like employee share purchasing, flexible work arrangements, a commitment to diversity and inclusion, and competitive pay.

About Avanade

Avanade is the leading provider of innovative digital, cloud and advisory services, industry solutions and design-led experiences across the Microsoft ecosystem. Every day, our 59,000 professionals in 26 countries make a genuine human impact for our clients, their employees and their customers.

We have been recognized as Microsoft’s Global SI Partner of the Year more than any other company. With the most Microsoft certifications (60,000+) and 18 (out of 18) Gold-level Microsoft competencies, we are uniquely positioned to help businesses grow and solve their toughest challenges.

We are a people first company, committed to providing an inclusive workplace where employees feel comfortable being their authentic selves. As a responsible business, we are building a sustainable world and helping young people from underrepresented communities fulfil their potential.

Majority owned by Accenture, Avanade was founded in 2000 by Accenture LLP and Microsoft Corporation. Learn more at www.avanade.com ."
"Software Engineer (Data Mining), Global E-Commerce","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About The Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated.

With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-commerce here at TikTok.

Responsibilities:
- Responsible for development of data-empowered capabilities for e-commerce platform, enable different e-commerce verticals to extract and apply key insights from oceans of data to meet their business needs
- Data mining for e-commerce, building tagging system based on massive data, analysing user, traffic, e-commerce and other data, combining with business to improve GMV
- Data analysis, mining, model specific productization; understanding of e-commerce business, able to work with PM to continuously optimize data products based on data-driven
- Develop data mining pipelines to extract data assets (eg. entity labels) from aggregated data and enable the extraction of actionable insights from large volumes of domain data
- Design and development of various strategies, algorithms and machine learning techniques to improve the accuracy and coverage of extracted data assets
- Analyze e-commerce data-related business problems and abstract them into data-related requirements that are then implemented to help resolve key business problems

Qualifications

- B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions
- Background in data structures and algorithms, familiar with one or more: machine learning, natural language processing, data mining
- Familiar with one of the Python/Java/Go/C++ programming languages
- Familiar with common data processing technologies (Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Storm, Flink), with demonstrable coding skills
- Familiar with common data mining techniques and machine learning algorithms (GBDT, Xgboost, FM, DFM, etc.), and familiar with their principles and scope of application
- Proficiency in data mining, machine learning tools and common frameworks (TensorFlow, Pytorch)
- Continuous learning, keeping up with the latest research directions and results in the field of machine learning, for the exploration of big data applications in various vertical areas
- In-depth research experience in the following areas is preferred
1. Analysis and mining of user behaviour data and construction of user portraits.
2. Data mining experience in vertical industries (e-commerce, finance, games, travel, real estate, etc.).
3. Development and optimization of advertising and recommendation algorithms.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Machine Learning Engineer Intern (AI Lab) - 2022,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to the following internship cycle below: -
1. Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the above internship period.
Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About the NLP team
Our NLP team focuses on solving language barriers and promoting information flowing all over the world. We invite researchers and engineers in machine learning and natural language processing at all levels. We aim at pushing the limits of machine intelligence.

Responsibilities
- Develop NLP and ML technologies in products;
- Participate in and support the incubation of new NLP and ML technologies;
- Participate in research on NLP and ML technologies.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science, Electrical and Electronics Engineering, or Statistics with specialization in machine learning, data mining, natural language processing, or other related disciplines;
- Familiar with programming languages such as C/C++ and Python, and good programming skills;

Preferred Qualifications
- Experience in building machine learning and/or application systems;
- Solid machine learning background and familiarity with standard machine learning techniques;
- Scientific thinking and research ability;
- Solid software development skills.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@tiktok.com."
Software Engineer,"Marketnode is an SGX / Temasek Holdings joint venture which focuses on the digital asset infrastructure for traditional capital markets products.

ESG & sustainable finance: building an ESG Hub for Asia bond markets
Fixed Income: a platform allowing corporations to raise funds seamlessly
CORE: Our flagship blockchain-based issuance and clearing platform
As a result of continued business growth across our pillars, we are looking for Software Engineers to join us to build Asia’s premier ESG & digital assets venue. Marketnode is partnering with SETL to deliver a robust DLT solution for Institutional Financial Markets globally, from our HQ in Singapore.

Profile wise, we are looking for motivated, self-starters with an agile mindset who enjoy working with multiple stakeholders to build successful new products.

If you are passionate about and interested in the nexus between fintech and capital markets, we would like to talk to you

This job is based in Singapore.

This role is a hybrid of
Hands-on development work (70%)
[Lead Only] Training, mentoring and providing subject matter expertise to colleagues and business partners who will be collaborating with Marketnode (10%)
Production support (Level-2 and Level-3) (20-30%)
Cross-training to work with Hyperledger Fabric. Working on Hyperledger Fabric will involve external training, internal training and hands-on work to master this exciting and complicated technology.
We are an agile firm. We empower teams to deliver on a regular cadence
We write clean code
We write test cases as part of the development process
We document what we do
We are an API centric firm and that must influence all of our technology choices
We are a greenfield operation, with no technical debt. We do not accrue technical debt
We collaborate and are all team players
We share information, experience and expertise
We are respectful of our colleagues, clients and partners, and recognise their differences and similarities
We deliver business value on a holistic basis
We display ‘bias to action’ with the ability and agility to execute
Experienced Java developer candidates (1 to 3 years), and
Candidates without Java developer financial services experience such asAcademics Developers switching from another industry Recent graduates 
Technologist at a vendor looking to move to an end-user firm
Academic looking for a move into an end-user firm
Developer from outside of Financial Services looking to move into financial services
Recent graduate with a Computer Science degree
Recent post-graduate in Computer Science
Hands-on Technologist with a more impressive GitHub than LinkedIn
Hands-on developer looking to move from a traditional development role to a DLT based role
Go, Java, Javascript, Linux, AWS, Github, Docker, DLT – Hyperledger Fabric, Ethereum, Solidity
Agile and Product development mindset
Versatile and flexible with a desire to work in a fast-paced environment
Team-focused mindset with strong interpersonal and communication skills
Excitement in Fintech
Attention to detail
Strong work ethic and accountability"
R&D Embedded Software Engineer,"How Will You Make an Impact?

At Thermo Fisher Scientific, we have an incredible mission: to enable our customers make the world healthier, cleaner and safer. Our responsibility in supporting this vision is to consistently strive to work together and enable our customers more effectively.

We have the 4i Values – Integrity, Intensity, Innovation and Involvement that define the way we work together and with our customers. As we operate within the 4i framework, there are three areas that we believe could really lead to a breakthrough in the way we work together: Accountability. Innovation. Risk tolerance.

When you join us at Thermo Fisher Scientific, you’ll be part of an inquisitive, driven team that shares your passion for exploration and discovery. With revenues of $40 billion and the largest investment in R&D in the industry, we give our people the resources and opportunities to make significant contributions to the world.

What will you do?

Communicate with a distributed team of engineers for innovative product design
Derive product level requirements into system/sub system level functional requirements
Design, develop and maintain embedded software for life science instruments
Perform design and code reviews to ensure software quality
Participate in test results review, root cause analysis and propose solutions
Practice Software Configuration Management according to the project-specific software Development plan
Apply new technologies and software features to enhance performance and improve quality
Maintain and align with ISO 13485 procedures and SOPs in the course of application development
Ensure that systems and procedures are in compliance with ISO 9001, ISO 14001, ISO 13845, ISO 14971, QSR21CFR and OHSAS 18001 requirements

How will you get here?

Education:

Degree/Master in Computer Science/Computer Engineering/Electrical Engineering

Experience:

C/C++ programming (2 years)
Python (2 years)
Embedded software development tools (2 years)
Linux based software development experience (2 years)
Source Code Version Control (2 years)
Embedded Linux programming (2 years)
Microprocessor architecture (Intel, ARM Cortex-A processors) (2 years)
Continuous Integration and Agile Programming (2 years)

Preferred Qualifications:

Software Development Process experience preferred
Embedded device development experience preferred
In-depth knowledge of Linux internals
GIT and SVN version control experience preferred.

At Thermo Fisher Scientific, each one of our 75,000 extraordinary minds has a unique story to tell. Join us and contribute to our singular mission—enabling our customers to make the world healthier, cleaner and safer.

Apply today! http://jobs.thermofisher.com

Our Mission is to enable our customers to make the world healthier, cleaner and safer. Watch as our colleagues explain 5 reasons to work with us. A one team of 100,000+ colleagues, we share a common set of values - Integrity, Intensity, Innovation and Involvement - working together to accelerate research, solve complex scientific challenges, drive technological innovation and support patients in need. #StartYourStory at Thermo Fisher Scientific, where diverse experiences, backgrounds and perspectives are valued.

Apply today! http://jobs.thermofisher.com

Thermo Fisher Scientific is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status."
Software Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Participate in coding, implementation, testing and support of custom banking solutions, which include features enhancements, new functionalities, and back-end systems integration.
Assist in the preparation / updates of technical specifications.
Adherence to application developments guidelines & standards.
Interested candidate who wish to apply for this position, please send in your resume to info@wecruit.com.sg.

Wecruit Pte ltd

EA License No. 20C0270
Desired Skills and Experience
CSS, Software Engineering, MySQL, Agile, Systems Integration, JavaScript, SQL, Python, Banking, Java, C#, API, Databases, Linux, Software Development, C++"
"iOS Software Engineer, TikTok Consumption Experience","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.

At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok's Consumption Experience team is responsible for providing the best among the industry experience for users to consume video content. This includes low-latency and fluent video playback, efficient encoding and decoding, high quality videos and more.

You will be responsible for the video playback performance and reliability on iOS devices. This is an exciting opportunity for those excited and skilled in collecting and leveraging data at a global scale (i.e. many regions, networks, devices, and people) to identify areas of improvement in our product. We are looking for motivated and passionate individuals interested in complex engineering challenges around one of the most important aspects of TikTok.

As an iOS Engineer for the Consumption Experience team, you will:
• Optimize and improve video playback performance and reliability on iOS.
• Debug and diagnose quality of end-to-end video experience. Work with cross-functional teams to land optimization solutions.
• Define the video optimization roadmap for both low-end and high-end network and devices.
• Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and scalable architecture.

Qualifications

• BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors/experience.
• Experience in native iOS development.
• Proficiency in Objective-C and/or Swift.
• Strong understanding of software development principles, capabilities, and limitations of the iOS platform.
• Ability to understand and debug large and complex code bases.
• Good team communication and collaboration skills.

Preferred Qualifications:
• Deep understanding of iOS memory management, runtime and AVFoundation.
• Experience with performance and reliability on mobile platforms, video player-related is a plus.
• Strong data analysis skills, able to identify product opportunities from technical metrics analysis.
• Experience with video codec standards like H.264/AVC, H.265/HEVC, VP8/VP9.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer - Search Language Processing, Apple Media Products","Summary

Engineer in Singapore. Innovate at Apple.


Our engineers have created some tough acts to follow, and they continue to lead us to innovative breakthroughs. Because they’re driven not by what would be easy, but by what would be amazing.


Team

We’re a diverse collective of thinkers and doers, continually reimagining what’s possible to help us all find what we love in new ways. The AMP Search team powers search for iTunes, App Store, Apple Music, Apple TV, Podcasts, Books and more on iOS, macOS, tvOS and watchOS.


As a member of the Apple Media Products Search team you will be working on various components of the Search platform - search ranking, search query interpretation, language models, index data modelling and pipelines.


Responsibilities will include design, development and maintenance of core search components that serve customers worldwide. You will also be responsible for bringing the latest in search and discovery ideas to production at a large scale. If you want to craft new ways for customers to discover content in a rapidly growing catalog on the Apple ecosystem of devices and platforms, this is the place to be.


The Apple Media Products Search Team is looking for extraordinary engineers to help build next-generation search features for Apple's ground breaking devices and platforms. We are a key part of the Apple ecosystem, supporting all of users. We operate globally in languages around the world. We strive to provide the best search experience for our customers.


Key Qualifications

5+ years of relevant industry experience

Experience with Search, Natural Language Processing, or Machine Learning experience

Experience building big data pipelines with Hadoop, Java, Scala, and Spark

Passion. Our customers love what we do at Apple and we want the same from our engineers

Preferred Skills:

Deep understanding of the search and information retrieval fundamentals including indexing, query understanding, retrieval and ranking

Experience building search solutions with Lucene / Solr / Elasticsearch or related search technologies

Familiarity with A/B experimentation and data/metric-driven product development


Description

YOU WILL

- Have a major impact on the way people search & discover Apple Media content on Apple devices worldwide.

- Be part of a team with strong expertise in software engineering, information retrieval, language processing, data mining, machine learning, scalable systems, and parallel processing (Hadoop, Scala, Spark). Be responsible for improving search recall and precision.

- Use big data technology to evaluate and prioritize content discovery features.

- Conduct AB Tests to ensure we objectively measure improvements.

- Ensure successful deployment of features, code, data, and models in production.

- Work in collaboration with other world-class engineers, researchers, and statisticians to ensure the features and models are functioning at or above expected performance levels.

- Work on Natural Language Processing (NLP), Tokenization, Stemming, Lemmatization, and Synonym mining Improve Search Recall, Text Indexing and Query Rewrites Design & Implement solutions for automated unit and integration tests that enable continuous integration and delivery.

-Support search:

- On all devices (macOS, iOS, tvOS, watchOS, Siri/HomePod)

- Across media products (App Store, iTunes, Music, Video, Books, Podcasts)

- Globally in languages from Arabic to Russian and everything in between


Education & Experience

BS in Computer Science or equivalent industry experience.


Role Number: 200365923"
Security Engineer,"Position Overview

As a part of the Security Operations department, the incumbent will review and conduct technical security risk checks. SecOps is also aligned to SOC for incident management handling, reporting and investigation. Candidate will have to work on technical risk management. Handle day-to-day incident reporting and support investigation to healthcare IT platform

Role & Responsibilities

Work closely with internal and external stakeholders to manage the technical risk, security operation and SOC.
Act as IT security expert for department in the areas of cyber security assessments, PAM, Database, WAF, Firewall and EPP/EDR.
Perform risk assessment and identify mitigation controls for the risk area identified.
Enhance and build cyber threat detection user cases and assist in analysing and reducing false positive.
Identify infection/compromise in the company utilizing threat intelligence and indicators of compromise (IOCs) from different threat Intel sources and regulators
Ensure all compliance and security control functions are performed timely and orderly.
Drive continuous improvement of procedures and processes related to cybersecurity process and operations monitoring.
Track, monitor and valid security-related and risk issues, provide an action plan to rectify the issues and prevent recurrence.
Generate security reports and metrics as required.
Provide timely and periodic update to managements on its security matters.
Stay current on the latest Cyber threats, Attacks and vulnerabilities etc

Requirements

Good diploma or degree in Computer Science, Digital Forensic or Engineering preferred

Professional security related qualification (e.g. CEH, ECIH/GCIH, ITIL) will be favourable although not mandatory technical skills

At least 3 - 6 years’ experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems

Ability to write and communicate in English is an added advantage

Added advantage to have knowledge in security technology like firewall, IPS, WAF, endpoint

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
System Reliability Engineer - Game,"About Bytedance
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

About Nuverse (https://www.nvsgames.com/)
Nuverse is a game development and publishing brand for players and developers around the world. With the mission to ""Inspire Creativity, Enrich Life"", we are dedicated to serving gamers worldwide, and helping gamers play and create together in amazing virtual worlds.
All we've accomplished in the last 3 years is just the beginning!
We're so excited to share the many more projects that we have in store over the years to come.

About the Team
The Game Technology team is playing a significant role in the whole life cycle of the game. We are responsible for the development, testing, operation, SRE, and quality assurance of the user and operating system, and give strong support for game developing and publishing. Providing comprehensive and systematical solutions, support the stable operation and commercialization of the game.

What you will be doing
1. Responsible for the design and implementation of the deployment architecture of the game's overseas game business, and ensuring the stable operation of online services.
2. Daily maintenance of game servers, opening and closing servers, online environment changes, data backup and monitoring and alarm processing, etc.
3. Identify and solve problems related to key service operations, assist in the analysis and optimisation of service performance bottlenecks, and be responsible for rapid response and handling of faults in the online environment.
4. Cooperate with domestic teams to continuously improve the design and experience of game operation and maintenance tools, such as publishing changes, monitoring, alarms, logs, traceability, network optimization, etc.
5. Continue to maintain the key SLA indicators of the game, and do a good job in the operation and maintenance support of the game in terms of efficiency, cost, quality and security.

Qualifications
1. Bachelor's or higher degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or related field.
2. Has cloud computing technology experience from Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud Platform and other suppliers, more than two years of experience in game industry operation and maintenance
3. Practical experience in at least one programming language: Bash, Go, Python.
4. Understand K8S containerized service management, cloud network optimization, ELK, Kafka and other technologies in one or more directions."
Associate DevOps Engineer,"610543BR

Introduction

IBM Application Consultants (DevOps) )work directly with our clients on key initiatives. You will have the opportunity to build an in-depth understanding of their business issues and implement organizational strategies that drive adoption of change. We are looking for experts who can build credibility and trust with our clients and provide knowledge that addresses individual and unique business needs.

Your Role and Responsibilities

Work along with the Project teams to onboard new squads in the DevOps environment.
Guiding the continuous integration, continuous deployment and continuous testing.
Work closely with the development team and operation team to create DevOps strategy and toolset that suits the individual squads.
Setup, deploy and maintain scalable, high availability systems
Perform and automate deployment and security hardening of systems
Automate and build up scalable systems/environment using latest technologies (e.g. Kubernetes)
Automate security hardening in testing, deployment and production setup based on industrial best practices
Setup and maintain CI/CD, automated testing, development and delivery environments
Writing scripts/programs for service monitoring and health check of systems
Day-to-day monitoring, backup, deployment and maintenance of systems

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

Experience with cloud orchestration, configuration management and auto-scaling techniques
Thorough knowledge of networking, routers, switches, and WiFi setup.
Good knowledge of storage technologies, such as NAS, SAN, SDS
Experience with automation tools such as Salt/Chef/Puppet/Ansible
Experience with load balancing setup for TCP/IP, HTTP, DNS, routings.
Knowledge of IT security standards, for instance from CIS or IM8.
Experience on building and developing CI/CD pipeline and workflow (Gitlab CI/CD preferred)
Good hands-on experience on using AWS Cloud Formation scripts for configuration management and application deployment
Overall knowledge on one or more of the following programming language (Java, Spring Boot, Node JS, Angular JS, React Native)
Knowledge on continuous integration, test automation, version control, and software configuration management.

SG_hotjobs

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

Please refer to the JD

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

Please refer to the JD

About Business Unit

IBM Services is a team of business, strategy and technology consultants that design, build, and run foundational systems and services that is the backbone of the world's economy. IBM Services partners with the world's leading companies in over 170 countries to build smarter businesses by reimagining and reinventing through technology, with its outcome-focused methodologies, industry-leading portfolio and world class research and operations expertise leading to results-driven innovation and enduring excellence.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Senior Software Engineer (Java),"What you’re going to do
As a Senior Software Engineer at Adnovum, you will work with highly skilled and experienced engineers who have their work measured against the highest standards.
The projects you work on will not only solve the customers’ problems but deliver the added value that defines all Adnovum' s software solutions. The main task of a senior software engineer is to design and develop new solution features according to the requirements and along a defined road-map in a timely manner.
In your daily work, you will:
Analyse functional requirements to translate into application design using established design methodologies and guidelines.
Develop the software conforming to design, program guidelines and programming best practices.
Develop unit test package, execute test and document test results to ensure the quality of the program
Investigate all reported problems/errors and implement fixes for the Issues/problems so that the system can operate correctly and efficiently.
Assist in the integration testing, system testing, user acceptance testing and implementation activities to fix the reported problem/bugs of the system to ensure the smooth execution of programs in the respective environments
Prepare and maintain up-to-date system documentation
Collaborate with other Adnovum employees in cross-functional teams to achieve goals
Mentor Junior team members
You will have the chance to be involved with multiple stages of a project, thus enjoying exposure to various aspects of software engineering and foster your career growth. You will also get the great opportunities to learn on the job and expand horizons into the field of consulting in the area system and application security.

What we’re looking for
To master this job, you should have/be:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Minimum 5 years of experience in developing enterprise application using following technologies:
Java/Java EE
Spring: Spring framework, Spring Boot, Spring Security, Spring Batch, Spring Integration
Microservices development
API development
Docker, Kubernetes, RedHat Openshift
JS front-end frameworks: Angular or React.JS
Public Cloud: Azure
Experience in agile software development (e.g. TDD, state-of-the-art CI/CD tools and DevOps automation)
Knowledge of HTML5, CSS3, Bootstrap
Knowledge of Relational Databases (MySQL, SQL Server)
Excellent English skills, both spoken and written
Experience on writing technical documents and providing effort estimations
Customer facing experience with effective listening and interaction skills
Experience in mentoring junior project team members
Proactive mindset that is creative and solution oriented
Strong team player with effective communication skills

Sharp minds, good vibes
We are the sharp-minded IT experts who tackle the trickiest software and security challenges. With more than 630 employees in our locations in Zurich (HQ), Bern, Lausanne, Budapest, Lisbon, Singapore, and Ho Chi Minh City, we make the digital business of our clients work.
As a great team, we empower each other to share, grow and succeed. The unique Adnovum spirit across locations stands for helping each other at any time, having an open door and contributing to an appreciating and trustful atmosphere. We always enjoy having a laugh, a coffee or a drink together!
Apart from our unique «one Adnovum» spirit, we offer a solution-oriented engineering culture with flat hierarchies, which gives you the opportunity to contribute with your opinions and ideas. We embrace flexible working, like the possibility to work part-time and a hybrid work model. Your continuous education and development are key to us. Therefore, we actively encourage and support individual training opportunities."
SDLC & Runtime - Software Engineer - JSI,"Job Description

SDLC & RUNTIME

The SDLC and Runtime (SDLCR) team builds and manages the firm’s mission critical platforms for job scheduling, compute-as-a-service, file transfer, and the firmwide software development lifecycle (e.g., software distribution, automated testing, CI/CD). These platforms empower the firm’s expansive set of global developers to deliver services, products, and platforms for internal and external customers.

In this role, you will work on multi-year initiatives to build out our strategic, highly scalable, and resilient SDLC platform, improving productivity and developer experience for our engineers across the firm.

JAVA CICD DEVELOPER

You will be part of Java-Slang Integration (JSI), a global team of Java/polyglot developers that design, develop and deploy the runtime of a proprietary build pipeline. This pipeline is used for the build, test and deployment at scale of some of the firms most business critical applications. The platform and the surrounding tool chain that form the JSI ecosystem allow the production of binaries that interop our proprietary front office language, SLANG, with the JVM ecosystem. At the same time, the underlying distribution mechanisms enable the simultaneous release of changes on a global scale.

Containing tens of millions of code and with hundreds of releases to production a day, JSI is leveraged by hundreds of software engineers daily to build products with a focus on Global Markets and Consumer and Investment Management Divisions. Your work will allow our engineers to develop products with reduced time to market, higher reliability and have material impact on our engineer productivity.

How You Will Fulfill Your Potential
Be part of the core team to drive strategic uplift of core SDLC platforms to increase throughput, latency, scalability and resiliency
Build strong relationships with other high caliber engineers and enjoy collaboration and open to adopting new ideas
Skills And Experience We Are Looking For
At least 5 years of working experience of which at least 3 hands-on Java development experience
Strong problem solving / analytical skills
Excellent communication, influencing, relationship building skills and comfortable managing multiple stakeholders, driving consensus and influencing outcomes
Passionate about the software development process and facilitating high frequency / high quality change across a vibrant and diverse user community
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in commercial / open source build systems (Maven / Ant / Gradle / Bazel) and knowledge in distributed and centralized software change management systems
Experience in architecting horizontally scalable systems with knowledge of elastic compute and distributed systems patterns
Experience of Devops, SRE, infrastructure (storage / networks / etc.)
About Goldman Sachs

At Goldman Sachs, we commit our people, capital and ideas to help our clients, shareholders and the communities we serve to grow. Founded in 1869, we are a leading global investment banking, securities and investment management firm. Headquartered in New York, we maintain offices around the world.

We believe who you are makes you better at what you do. We're committed to fostering and advancing diversity and inclusion in our own workplace and beyond by ensuring every individual within our firm has a number of opportunities to grow professionally and personally, from our training and development opportunities and firmwide networks to benefits, wellness and personal finance offerings and mindfulness programs. Learn more about our culture, benefits, and people at GS.com/careers.

We’re committed to finding reasonable accommodations for candidates with special needs or disabilities during our recruiting process. Learn more: https://www.goldmansachs.com/careers/footer/disability-statement.html

© The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc., 2021. All rights reserved.

Goldman Sachs is an equal employment/affirmative action employer Female/Minority/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity"
Senior Backend Engineer - Lightspeed,"Lightspeed Studios are one of the world’s most innovative and successful game developers. We are expanding across China, the United States, Singapore, Canada, Japan, South Korea, and New Zealand.
Founded in 2008, LightSpeed Studios has created over 50 games across multiple platforms and genres for more than 4 billion registered users. It is the co-developer of worldwide hits
PUBG MOBILE and Apex Legends Mobile.

-Our Vision: To Create the LIGHTSPEED Universe, the ecosystem that connects players and developers around the world.
-Our Mission: To explore the future of gaming with true passion for games.
-Our Slogan: the future of gaming with true passion for games.

Lightspeed Studios are looking for a passionate, proactive Senior Backend Engineer. You will work with the top game developers to create unforgettable worlds for players.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Responsible for blockchain browser, cross-chain and digital wallet product planning and developing;
Responsible for blockchain‘s innovative usage exploration and architecture design.

REQUIREMENTS
At least a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or a related field;
At least 3 years of backend engineer experience;
Experience with C++/Go/Rust/other languages in relation to blockchain;
Experience with large-scale project development, proficiency in communication, multi-threading, high concurrency processing, memory management and the design and development of distributed business systems;
Proficiency in a distributed cache, message-oriented middleware, RPC framework, load balancing and security defence;
Proficiency in MySql/LevelDB/MongoDB, skillful in data warehouse modelling and data table design;
Good teamwork, strong problem analysing and solving skills.

Nice to have
Superior knowledge of blockchains/smart contract, experience in developing digital wallet/ blockchain explorer/cross-chain/other blockchain-powered applications, or some related open source projects;
Financial payment or e-commerce project experience;
Passion about Web3 and willing to learn;
Knowledge of DeFi、GameFi and NFT."
Software Engineer,"The ISV Engineering and Architecture team within MCIGET (Microsoft Cloud for Industry and Global Expansion Team) builds platforms & services that enable our industry partners to transform, innovate and delight their customers. We work with strategic ISVs in the Retail & Consumer Goods, Manufacturing, Financial Services, Energy & Healthcare industries and beyond; to not only help them be successful on the Microsoft Cloud but also develop industry specific products that enable and accelerate their customers digital transformation.

Responsibilities

This Industry ISV Software Engineer role includes the following core responsibilities:
Development of first party products to enable and accelerate the onboarding of industry ISV solutions to the Microsoft Cloud through writing innovative, simple, and elegant code and tests.
Deeply partnering with strategic ISVs and their customers, to build differentiated industry products and services on the Microsoft Cloud.
Contributing to the incubation, development, preview, and production implementation of Industry solutions to meet the needs of our strategic industry customers and partner ecosystem.
Identifying best practices and coding patterns and providing deep expertise on the coding and validation strategy.
Defining and/or re-using quality metrics, best practices, and coding patterns to ensure testable code.
Collaboration with other Microsoft Cloud for Industry engineering teams to identify requirements and suggest and develop features to create unique and differentiated experiences for our industry customers & partners.
Translating learnings from engagements to scenario-led engineering feedback to further enhance the Microsoft Cloud for Industry ISVs and their customers.
Developing repeatable patterns, including creation and publishing of content and code across multiple internal and external platforms.
Technical leadership driving the architecture and design of solutions of significant scale and complexity.
Qualifications

Qualifications

Required/Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related technical field AND 2+ years technical engineering experience with coding in languages including, but not limited to, C, C++, C#, Java, JavaScript, or Python
OR equivalent experience.
Additional Or Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related technical field AND 4+ years technical engineering experience with coding in languages including, but not limited to, C, C++, C#, Java, JavaScript, or Python
OR Master's Degree in Computer Science or related technical field AND 2+ years technical engineering experience with coding in languages including, but not limited to, C, C++, C#, Java, JavaScript, or Python
OR equivalent experience.
Insatiable curiosity!
High quality bar and desire to make a difference
Ability and motivation to learn
Growth mindset, comfortable giving and receiving feedback
Results focused
Data driven and detail-oriented approach to problem solving
Positive & collaborative team player
Clear written and verbal communication skills, ability to adapt to your audience
However, Some Examples Of Relevant Skills That We Value Include

Due to the technical breadth of this role, we do not have specific required technical qualifications. It is more important to us that you enjoy, and are capable of, learning new depth skills based on demand.
Azure, AWS or GCP experience
Kubernetes
Linux administration
Scripting such as Bash or PowerShell
Any development experience such as .Net, Java, Go, JavaScript or Python
Database design or administration
Data analysis or engineering
Infrastructure automation such as ARM or Terraform
Experience with Microsoft Dynamics, Teams or Power Platform
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application or the recruiting process, please send a request via the Accommodation request form.

Benefits/perks listed below may vary depending on the nature of your employment with Microsoft and the country where you work."
Salesforce Architect,"About Capgemini
A global leader in consulting, technology services and digital transformation, Capgemini is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50-year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. It is a multicultural company of over 200,000 team members in more than 40 countries. The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.

Responsibilities:
Offers best practice advice and recommendations to clients often extending beyond Salesforce to topics around overall systems architecture and CRM strategy
Supporting pre-sales activities: Understanding industry challenges, building and/or extending industry solution assets and demonstrating these to prospective customers.
Leads and facilitates project discovery to define clients’ business requirement, producing a report of findings with recommended steps and a roadmap for solutions
Leads technical requirements gathering and/or design workshops for complex projects with recommended steps and a roadmap for solutions
Works with colleagues and customers to create prototypes and proofs of concept as a means of eliciting and defining requirements
Leads and facilitate data integration, migration and deployment strategies and recommend a sustainable solution
Groom and refine product backlog, in liaison with stakeholders on the project and Salesforce SMEs
Own the design of Salesforce and other affiliated solutions for Sales, Service, and platform solutions,
Act as a release manager, approving configuration and coded items to be deployed between environments. Where appropriate, this could include deploying changes
Provide guidance on user story refinement, and ensure success and acceptance criteria are defined for each story,
Documentation on recommended solution, describe and illustrate designs with appropriate justifications
Ensure documentation of the steps for testing to ensure quality testing
Performing code reviews of the development team to ensure best practice and agreed standards are followed
Supervise the configuration, quality assurance, testing, fixes and deployment of Salesforce
Guiding the development team in using the latest Salesforce technology which may include Lightning, Apex, Platform Shield, Files Connect, Lightning Connect, Heroku, Platform Events and Salesforce DX.
Collaborative project and workstream planning
Manages and mentors junior team members


Requirements:
At least 5 years’ experience in leading the delivery of medium and large scale Salesforce implementation
Deep technical knowledge in two or more Salesforce clouds (e.g., Sales, Service, Community/Experience, Marketing, Analytics, Commerce, Integration, IoT)
Pre-sales experience in understanding business challenges, building/extending and presenting industry-specific solutions, and responding to RFTs and proposals. Comfortable presenting technology solutions, particularly as part of proposals and key project milestones.
Excellent communications skills to liaise with all levels of stakeholders regarding practice and vendor capabilities - as well as managing stakeholder expectations
Demonstrated understanding of underlying client business problems and the ability to develop Salesforce technology-enabled solutions that addresses their needs.
Experience in leading the end-to-end design of Salesforce platform solutions with an understanding of how Salesforce fits into the overall architectural landscape.
Proven experience in successfully delivering Salesforce solutions using an agile methodology - and in managing development team, onshore and offshore
Proven experience in governing solutions as per agreed design and coding standards and guidelines
Ability to problem solve, coupled with a tenacious nature spurred on further by something not working as it should.
Proven experience of Apex, Triggers, Classes and Lightning Web Components, API Web Services and Salesforce declarative programming techniques.
DevOps (Salesforce DX) experience preferred, including use of DevOps tools such as git.
Salesforce Certification(s) in Platform Developer II; Sales; Service; or Community Cloud. Good to have: System Architect, Application Architect. Ideally you will be on the architect certification path.
Be able to proactively work in a fast-paced environment, as a team.
Experience working in an IT services/consulting firm is highly preferred


Let's talk about what's in it for you!

Passionate people are Capgemini's Ace of Spades - join us to discover a career that will challenge, support and inspire you. Working at Capgemini you'll find the rewards are more than just financial. You will work alongside some very smart and inspiring people on exciting projects and you will also enjoy incredible benefits. We offer flexible work practices and 40 hours of self-development every year with a huge selection of learning opportunities to choose from.

As ""Architects of Positive Futures"", Capgemini actively supports the community in 3 ways:

Diversity and Inclusion - we believe diversity of thought fuels excellence and innovation, which is why we positively encourage applications from suitably qualified candidates regardless of their gender identity, ethnicity, sexual orientation, religion, ability, intersex status or age. To support our commitment to diversity and inclusion, we celebrate special events and days of significance that are important to our employees such as Diwali, Bastille Day, Pride, IDAHOBIT, IWD and International day of people with Disabilities. Our Employee Resource Groups Women@Capgemini and OutFront support the grassroots passion of employees to drive our diversity agenda and effect change.

Digital inclusion - at Capgemini we are using our skills to drive social impact initiatives focusing on helping society address the impact of the digital and automation revolution. We also provide employees with opportunities to give back to the community through charity projects and volunteer days.

Environmental Sustainability - Capgemini joined the CDP's (Carbon Disclosure Project) prestigious ""A list"" for its commitment to the Net-Zero economy. We are focusing on helping our clients transform towards more sustainable business models and committing to reduce our own carbon emissions (GHG) by 20% per employee by 2020.

Recognised by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies for the last 8 years in a row, ethics and values are at the heart of Capgemini's corporate culture and business. Embedded in our DNA, our seven values - Honesty, Boldness, Trust, Team Spirit, Freedom, Fun and Modesty - have remained the same since company inception in 1967. To see how we bring these values to life, click here to listen to some of our employee’s stories.

Come join us, bring your whole self to work, create new possibilities for you, your customers and your community and help us to be Architects of Positive Futures."
Software Engineer (C#/ .NET/$7500 + AWS + VB),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
About SLB

We are SLB, the leading provider of technology and services to the energy industry. Throughout much of the oil and gas lifecycle in over 120 countries; we design, develop and deliver technology and services that transforms how work is done. We define the boundaries of the industry by unleashing our talented people’s energy. We are looking for innovators to join our diverse community of colleagues and develop new solutions and push the limits of what is possible. If you share our passion for discovery and want to find out what you could really do, then here is the place to do it.

Software Engineer (C#/ .NET/ WPF)

Location: Benoi

Company Transport Provided (Boon Lay)

Salary Up to $7500 depending on experience

AWS + VB

Responsibilities
Design and develop C# code for acquisition and control software applications on Windows 10.
Test software modules or components following prescribed methods.
Troubleshooting and root cause analysis.
Collaboration with other development teams.
Learn Well Service domain knowledge and provide support to field operation
Draft user manual
Requirements
Bachelor’s and/or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or Electrical Engineering.
Experienced with C#, .NET, Windows Presentation Foundation (WPF)
Experience with source control (Git and/or VS TFS)
Experience with Siemens/NI PLC.
Knowledge of networking and communication protocols
Knowledge of acquisition, control and automation
If you possess relevant skillsets, do apply with an updated CV in word format.

Apple Lim Pey Chyi – Apple.lim@manpower.com.sg

Personnel Reg No: R2090579

EA Licence No: 02C3423

SLB is an equal employment opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are CONSIDERED without regard to RACE, color, RELIGION, sex, sexual orientation, GENDER identity, national origin, AGE, disability, or other characteristics protected by law.
Desired Skills and Experience
Troubleshooting, Windows 10, .NET, Software Engineering, Root Cause Analysis, JavaScript, SQL, Networking, Python, Windows, Java, C#, Electrical Engineering, Energy Industry, Software Development, C++"
Product Specialist SE,"Product Specialist Engineer (CISG)

What You'll Do

Your mission is to help our customers navigate the Digitalisation journey, addressing customers’ business needs and challenges through the adoption of Cisco’s product and solution offerings.

As a Systems Engineer, you will partner with our Account Teams in a presales technical role, showcasing Cisco products and solutions. You will conduct technical presentations, provide architecture design guidance, set up Proof-of-Concept demonstrations, and explain how product features and solutions benefit our customers and meet their needs.

In this role, you will across segments, and have responsibilities for selected accounts and opportunities in an assigned geography. As a trusted advisor to the customer, you possess the business acumen to translate technical features and functionalities of a Cisco CISG solution to map to customer’s business outcomes.

You will predominantly work with customers in the Public Sector segment. You will work with a wide variety of technologies and will therefore need strong collaborative and consultative skills and capacities to effectively showcase Cisco products and solutions, demonstrate technical solutions and capabilities, conduct Proof-of-Concept (PoC) tests. You will need business acumen to translate technical features and functionalities of a Cisco solution to map to customer’s business outcomes and benefits.

To sharpen your technical skills, you will be assigned as a specialist member to one of the System Engineering Virtual Teams. You are expected to participate actively in the Virtual Team events and activities and collaborate with the broader members of Cisco’s Systems Engineering team.

Who You'll Work With

The Systems Engineering team comprises many talented, hardworking, and customer-centric engineers and architects who love to provide customers with an amazing experience with Cisco’s product and solution offerings. We play different roles in the areas of account presales management, technology deep dive, partner advocacy and engineering leadership.

We place emphasis on individual development and relevancy in the marketplace, and we are strong advocates of Cisco’s own certification programs. We are constantly on the look-out for new skill sets to add to our team’s capability.

Who You Are

You have a start-up mentality to deliver solutions that drive business success for Cisco. Excellent written and oral communication skills are necessary to collaborate effectively with Cisco team members, partners, and customers.

In addition to technical aptitude and competency, you must possess the ability to learn quickly and stay current on networking trends.

Required Knowledge And Experience
4 to 6 years of Presales experience in the areas of Data Centre Networking, Enterprise

Networking, Software-Defined Networks and Cyber-Security
Hands-on working knowledge of Routers, Switches, Firewalls
Familiarity with virtualisation platforms such as vSphere ESXi, HyperV, KVM, etc.
Good knowledge of Cloud platforms, such as AWS, Azure
An active CCNP / CCIE certification is preferred
Good inter-personal skills
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills

Why Cisco

At Cisco. we celebrate the creativity and diversity that fuels our innovation. We are dreamers and we are doers. We bring our different talents to work and forge a strong team to make a difference.

We connect everything: people, processes, data, and things. We innovate everywhere, taking bold risks to shape the technologies that give us smart cities, smart connected offices, mobile banking, etc. We are not afraid to change the way the world works, lives, plays and learns.

We are the “Bridge to Possible"
ServiceNow Specialist/Consultant,"We are: Accenture’s ServiceNow Business Group, and one of only 5 Global Strategic Partners with ServiceNow. We help our diverse clients tackle their toughest challenges while unleashing their fullest potential…and then some. What makes our approach so unique? Operating across Asia Pacific we bring together commercial innovation and leading-edge technologies to deliver an integrated, mobile and interactive experience that far exceeds expectations. How? Our passion meets purpose! Through our diverse culture and inclusive thinking, we embrace our employees' ideas taking them from concept to practical solutions. Not to mention, we sleep well at night knowing our work directly impacts and improves the way the world works. We keep our tech smarts sharp by providing abundant training and certification opportunities. Are you ready to learn and grow in a career, while making a difference? You are: The ServiceNow Specialist, with deep understanding of the NOW platform, will develop the application including configuration, report development and data migration, where applicable. You will perform custom development, 3rd party integrations, carry out unit-testing and defect resolution. You will be responsible for completing technical reviews of junior developer’s development work, provide feedback, and re-work task. You will carry out migration of the changes to production environment, assist with technical design and documentation, and collaborate with internal stakeholders and team members to build solutions in ServiceNow that support business requirements. The work:

Develop the application including configuration, report development and data migration, where applicable.

Perform custom development (as required) and 3rd party integrations.

Carry out unit-testing and defect resolution.

Carry out migration of the changes to production.

Assist with technical design and documentation.

Collaborate with internal stakeholders and team members to build solutions in ServiceNow that support business requirements.

Qualifications Here's what you need: Basic Qualifications:

2+ years of applying Javascript coding / development skills in ServiceNow environments

2+ years of experience designing, building and configuring applications to meet business process and application requirements

Advanced in JavaScript development in ServiceNow components

ServiceNow certification required (ideally you will have at least Admin & Application Developer)

Advanced in ServiceNow development experience, including experience with the Service Catalog module and creating custom applications with CreateNow

Advanced in experience creating request forms, developing integration with external systems, implementing security (including Access Control Lists), and enhancing the user interface to provide a custom look and feel

Expertise in one or more of the following ServiceNow applications: o ITSM o ITOM o CSM Bonus points if you have:

Working knowledge of Linux operating system

Experience with Web Services Integration (SOAP, REST, and JSON)

Experience with System/Process Automation (Orchestration)

Experience with the System Development Life Cycle (SDLC) processes including client requirement analysis and system design

DevOps experience

Experience with governance/service management/operations

Experience managing remote teams

An ITIL certification"
System Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
We are a leading IT software solution company focus on assisting businesses in elevating productivity by streamlining internal HR processes through the use of our HRiQ Human Capital Management Software. We are a fast-growing company that recognises people as our biggest asset and we continually search and invest in talent to fit into our team culture.

This is an exciting position with opportunities to deepen and to extend your skills and experience in various IT industry products and technologies. As a member of the Infrastructure Support Team you will be working with Consultants in the Application Implementation and Application Support Teams. You will assist your reporting Manager to identify and apply state of art technologies and business ideas into the Infrastructure Support operations. You will be working with technology specialists from vendors in the day to day system support operations to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues. You will also work with other stakeholders in the team to drive implementation and operation of agreed technologies in action.

Responsibilities
Manage and monitor all installed systems and infrastructure
Install, configure, test and maintain Azure Virtual Machines, Application Software and System Management tools
Proactively ensure the highest levels of systems and infrastructure availability
Maintain security, backup, and redundancy strategies
Provide desktop / server / network support
Liaise with vendors and other IT personnel for problem resolution
Support end user computing needs of the company (e.g. Microsoft Office 365, SharePoint)
Requirements
Diploma or Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related subject
Experience in Networking knowledge (OSI network layers, TCP/IP) is an advantage
Proven working experience in installing, configuring and troubleshooting Microsoft Windows, Windows Server and Microsoft SQL Server based environments.
Knowledge of administration and performance tuning of application stacks in Windows Operating System, Infrastructure and Database Server Environments
Knowledge of any virtualization (e.g., Hyper-V, VMware, Virtual Box)
Experience in setup & administration of End-Point Security
Experience in Network Firewall Policy
Experience in Microsoft administration (e.g. Active Directory, Office365, Sharepoint etc.)
Dedicated Guidance and Training will be provided for those with relevant experience to be familiar with the tools used in our environment

Opportunity in Cloud exposure in Microsoft Azure & AWS

Most importantly, ability and passion to learn new technologies when the opportunity arises.
Desired Skills and Experience
Microsoft Azure, Troubleshooting, Web Application Firewall, Azure, Active Directory, VMware, Administration, Windows Server, SQL, SharePoint, WSUS, Networking, Windows, Performance Tuning, Information Security Management, Virtualization"
"Software Engineer (Risk Control & Compliance), Global Payments","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

The Global Payments team is building a platform to provide cross-border payment solutions for ByteDance's products and services, that are growing rapidly worldwide. We serve multiple overseas businesses within ByteDance, such as Advertising, Live Broadcasting, E-commerce, Games, etc.

The Risk Control and Compliance team in Global Payments is mainly responsible for overseas transaction anti-fraud, chargebacks, credit evaluation, merchant risk rating, anti-money laundering and other business scenarios. In addition, the team ensures the platform adheres to the requirements of International Credit Card Organization, local financial supervision, and customs.

Responsibilities

Design and develop the payment platform for various internal businesses and engineers such as building the dispute center and automating data pipelines.
Integrate with third-party APIs to enhance system capabilities.
Analyse business and technical requirements carefully to solve challenging problems in building the platform.
Work with fellow engineers, product managers and business owners in the team to ensure product requirements and timelines are feasible.

Qualifications

Bachelor's or Master Degree in Computer Science or a related field;
Hands-on experience with any programming languages/framework (Go/ Python/ Java/ PHP/ C++);
Basic understanding of complex algorithms and data structures, as well as a passion for intellectual challenges;
Good communication & collaboration skills to work with cross-functional teams in a dynamic, fast-paced environment;
Familiarity with any database technology (MySQL, Redis, Elasticsearch) is a plus

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer, Risk Data Mining, BRIC","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Business Risk Integrated Control (BRIC) team is missioned:
- To protect TikTok users, including and beyond content consumers, creators, advertisers;
- By securing platform health and community experience authenticity;
- Through building infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to collaborate with many cross-functional teams and stakeholders.

The BRIC team works to minimise the damage of inauthentic behaviours on TikTok, covering multiple classical and novel community and business risk areas such as account integrity, engagement authenticity, anti spam, API and growth health, live streaming security and financial safety (ads or e-commerce), etc.

In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and robust, intelligent and privacy-safe, secure and product-friendly systems and solutions. Our challenges are not some regular day-to-day technical puzzles -- You'll be part of a team that's developing novel solutions to first-seen challenges of a non-stop evolvement of a phenomenal product eco-system. The work needs to be fast, transferrable, while still down to the ground to making quick and solid differences.

Responsibilities
- Build rules, algorithms and machine learning models, to respond to and mitigate business risks in ByteDance products/platforms. Such risks include and are not limited to abusive accounts, fake engagements, spammy redirection, scraping, fraud, etc.
- Establish reliable, efficient and modularized risk defense solutions, reduce manual workload on ramping up risk controls on/against new business, risk area, or abusive means.
- Uplevel risk defense excellence on privacy/compliance, machine learning, risk perception and analysis, achieve in-depth defense portfolio.

Qualifications

- Bachelor or degrees above in computer science, computer engineering, electrical engineering, statistics or other relevant majors (e.g. finance if applying for applying for financial fraud roles).
- Solid engineering skills. Proficiency in at least two of: Linux, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Storm.
- Familiarity with data mining, data science or machine learning. Bonus given to proficiency in modern machine learning theories and applications such as deep neural nets, transfer/multi-task learning, reinforcement learning, time series or graph unsupervised learning.
- Ability to think critically, objectively, rationally. Reason and communicate in result-oriented, data-driven manner. High autonomy.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer (SRE), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.

Site Reliability Engineering (SRE) combines software and systems engineering to build and run large-scale, massively distributed, and fault-tolerant systems. Infrastructure SRE ensures that TikTok and its affiliates' infrastructure services reliability and uptime appropriate to the needs of users and fast iterations of improvement. Our software development pays great attention to optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and eliminating work through automation.

In the SRE team, you’ll have the opportunity to manage the complex challenges of scale, while using expertise in coding, algorithms, complexity analysis, and large-scale system design. We embrace a culture of diversity, intellectual curiosity, openness, and problem-solving. We encourage close collaboration while promoting self-direction.


Responsibilities
- Ensure the reliable and efficient operation of our core infrastructure, paying attention to system capacity, stability and cost;
- Build automated operation solutions for large-scale systems; cooperate with system development teams to ensure system reliability throughout the life cycle from system design to launch;
- Design and implement software platforms and monitor frameworks for efficient, automated, and intelligent service-oriented architecture (SOA) governance;
- Participate in the design and implementation of an automation platform that can ensure rapid iteration of online large-scale clusters;
- Based on business usage scenarios, optimise and provide best governance practices and service (including but not limited to key link performance bottleneck analysis, business problem location and obstacle removal, promotion of system high availability architecture transformation and upgrading, etc.).

Qualifications

- Bachelor's / Master's Degree in Computer Science or related major, working experience in related fields is preferred;
- Solid basic knowledge of computer software, understanding of Linux operating system, storage, network IO and other related principles;
- Familiar with one or more programming languages, such as Python, Go, Java, Shell, Ansible, etc.;
- Ability to solve problems systematically, good communication skills and sense of ownership;
- Algorithmic thinking, good data structure and system design ability is preferred;
- Storage direction, relevant system experience is preferred: KV, Table, Graph, Redis, MySQL, MongoDB, MQ , etc.;
- Computing & big data direction, relevant system experience is preferred: Kubernetes, Docker/Containers, AIops, Spark, Flink, Function as a service, RPC Framework, Service Mesh, etc."
"Backend Software Engineer, Business Integrity","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

About The Team

TikTok Business Integrity team is at the core to power monetization drive for our business on a global scale. The team is made of talented software engineers and product managers from all over the world. We build the foundation to safeguard our advisement platform and use the most advanced technologies to bring most values to our business partners as well as users. In Singapore, we focus on two pillars of business integrity: data foundation and advertiser experience.

Responsibilities

Engineering the infrastructure for advertisement quality control, case analysis and machine learning model training to enforce content integrity
Building products to enhance the trust between advertisers and TikTok, improve advertiser experience and enforce actor integrity
Design and build data-driven applications to help both local and global partners to unlock monetization opportunities
Work closely with operations and infrastructure to build and scale back-end services

Qualifications

B.Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions
Solid programming capabilities, exhibits good code design and coding style.
Familiarity with at least one of the programming languages: Go, Python, Java, C or C++
Pragmatic understanding of data structure, algorithm design and analysis, networking, data security and distributed system

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace.

At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Firmware Engineer (Embedded Systems/ Firmware Design/ MNC / UP to 4.5K) CSY),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Descriptions
Design, develop and perform system/software verification & validation on embedded system
Maintain and improve the performance of existing software
Develop system on gateways and embedded controllers system communicating over wire and wireless channels
Conduct design review, bug fix and update/create design documentation
Work with other teams to implement and test on various devices for interconnectivity.
Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology, Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Electrical/Electronic) or equivalent.
At least 3 year(s) of working experience in firmware development
Extensive experience in Embedded Programming using C/C++ in Embedded Linux and MCU
Good experience with various communication interface (peripherals) and protocols (especially SPI, I2C, UART, MODBUS TCP/IP and RS232/RS485)
Experience in wireless communication system/protocols eg. Bluetooth, Zigbee, Wi-Fi, Lora will be an advantage
Ability to work independently and multi-task effectively
Flexible and willing to accept a change in priorities as necessary
Good interpersonal communication and documentation/presentation skills
How To Apply

Interested applicants, kindly send your resume in MS WORD format to ref30#trustrecruit.com.sg or please click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.

We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Important Note

Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).

Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.

Trust Recruit Pte Ltd

EA License No: 19C9950

EA Personnel: Chan Sin Yee (Joey)

EA Personnel Reg No: R22110985
Desired Skills and Experience
RTOS, Embedded Linux, Embedded Software, Hardware, Ability To Work Independently, Job Descriptions, Wireless, Bluetooth, Research and Development, MS Word, Firmware, ZigBee, Debugging, Electrical Engineering, C++"
Algorithm Engineer Intern (Platform Governance) - 2023,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2023. Internships at TikTok aim to offer students industry exposure and hands-on experience. Watch your ambitions become reality as your inspiration brings infinite opportunities at TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 08 May 2023 to 28 July 2023 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - Starting 09 January 2023 or 14 August 2023

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit in either internship period. Please state your availability clearly in your resume (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About the Team
Platform Governance team will use the most advanced AI technology to combat various risks/violations in our e-commerce platform, maintain platform security, build a good e-commerce ecosystem, and empower business teams to improve work efficiency.

We pursue the ultimate risk detection capability. The fairness and sustainability of the e-commerce ecosystem, high-quality content and merchandise are areas where we are constantly striving for improvement.

Responsibilities
- Responsible for the identification algorithm of risk/violation/low quality problems of products, shopping cart short video,livestream in overseas e-commerce scenes
- Responsible for mining and identifying risk/violation/low quality merchants and live streaming creators in overseas e-commerce scenarios
- Responsible for mining and identifying algorithms for underground industry/fraud in overseas e-commerce scenarios
- Responsible for the optimization of ultra-large-scale commodity deduping/clustering algorithm in overseas e-commerce scenarios
- Optimize NLP, visual, multimodal, search, graph and other fundamental algorithms to support business governance

Qualifications

- Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline
- Solid code skills, with linux environment development capabilities, proficient in Python, Go or C++
- Solid data structure/algorithm foundation, proficient in machine learning/deep learning theoretical knowledge, and rich practical experience
- Familiar with natural language processing, computer vision, multimodality, graph algorithm, search algorithm, text/data mining in 1-2 areas
- Excellent analytical and problem solving skills with a passion for challenging issues
- Good teamwork spirit and strong communication skills
- Experience in platform governance/risk control/content safety, overseas Internet/e-commerce business experience is preferred
- Fluent English in listening, speaking, reading and writing is preferred
- Overseas study/work/life experience is preferred

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
"Backend Software Engineer, Application Security","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

The security team at ByteDance is missioned to build infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to support cross-functional teams to protect our users, products and infrastructures. In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and secure-by-design systems and solutions. Our challenges are not your regular day-to-day technical problems; you'll be part of a team that's developing new solutions to new challenges of a kind not previously addressed by big tech. It's working fast, at scale, and we're making a difference.

Responsibilities

Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve large-scale distributed software
Manage individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables

Qualifications

BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other relevant majors with work experience
Excellent programming, debugging, and optimization skills in general purpose programming languages
Ability to think critically and to formulate solutions to problems in a clear, concise and timely manner
Experience working with two or more from the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, mobile application development, distributed and parallel systems, developing large software systems, and/or security software development"
Software Engineer,"Who We're Looking For

We are looking for an experience software engineer with back-end Python data engineering experience in designing and delivering technology solutions within AWS. You are someone that is passionate about what we do and works well both independently and as part of a team. You will strive to build good relationships with all stakeholders and drive improvements across every aspect of solution delivery. This include finding appropriate solution, design, technical development and implementation, stakeholder engagement, and roll-out

About Schroders

We’re a global investment manager managing over £700 billion of clients’ assets. We help institutions, intermediaries and individuals around the world invest money to meet their goals, fulfil their ambitions, and prepare for the future.

We have around 5500 people on six continents. And we’ve been around for over 200 years but keep adapting as society and technology changes. What doesn’t change is our commitment to helping our clients, and society, prosper. We take immense pride in our culture and our reputation of being an employer of choice. It’s important to us that our people feel valued, included, and supported in their professional and personal growth. By promoting flexible working, championing inclusion, and making health and wellbeing a priority, we have created the conditions for our people to thrive.

The base

The role will be based in our APAC regional hub in Singapore, with a mix of working from home as well as working from our central business district office in CapitaGreen.

The team

Investment Technology is one of the most sought-after capabilities in Schroders Global Technology Team for hardcore engineering talents.

The APAC investment technology team develops and supports applications used by regional/global front office business users (Fund Manager/ Product Managers / Risk Managers / Fund Performance Managers and Compliance Managers). The team supports business users in 10 countries, 7 in APAC (Singapore, Hong Kong, Japan, Korea, China, Taiwan, Indonesia and Australia) and Luxembourg, UK, US. Investment Technology provides tooling, applications, and platforms to support the investment desks at Schroders. We’re moving our technology estate to the cloud and in the process, we’re re-architecting our technology stack. Our new platform is a fully serverless, event-driven architecture with the front ends built in React, and Python for all backend services.

Investment Technology aims to build a great engineering culture. Contributing to this culture will involve following good software craftmanship, TDD and writing clean code. Our systems must be well architected, tested, and easy to change. To achieve this goal, we implement mentoring and coaching through regular code reviews and pair programming. Team partners with Global teams in London in developing and maintaining APAC requirements in global platforms. The team also provides L3 Support to all Front office applications during APAC hours.

What You'll Do
Support the Investment Technology roadmap through the application of appropriate technologies
Use your own initiative to suggest and implement innovative solutions across Investment Technology
Working with truly modern technologies to deliver innovative software which delivers the desired business outcome
Build solutions with a cloud-first approach
Apply Computer Science fundamentals to solve problems from start to finish
Maintain an understanding of industry trends and how new technologies can be leveraged to meet business goals
Engage actively in Agile planning including story refinement, demos, and retrospectives
Continually look for ways to improve your own skills and experience
The Knowledge, Experience, And Qualifications You Need
Minimum 3 years of python software engineering experience in an enterprise enviroment
Experience working on AWS platform (eg. Lambda, Fargate, EventBridge, API Gateway, AppSync, SNS, SQS, S3 or DynamoDB)
Experience working on financial applications or systems
Experience working on SQL or NoSQL database platforms
Experience on Python library knowledge including packages such as pandas, numpy or numba
Experience working on data structures and common data transformation methodologies
Experience with structuring and writing unit tests
The Knowledge, Experience And Qualifications That Will Help
Event-Driven Architectures
Microservices
Domain Driven Design
Service-oriented Architecture
Building APIs with GraphQL
Familiarity with Agile delivery methodologies
What You'll Be Like
Enjoys communicating with business and technical users at all levels of the organisation
Enjoys solving complex technical and theoretical problems
A critical thinker who’s able to look at things from different angles
Able to work under pressure, on several priorities at once, and with tight deadlines
Great at working with other people, sharing, and communicating decisions
We're Looking For The Best, Whoever They Are

Schroders is an equal opportunities employer. You're welcome here whatever your socio-economic background, race, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, religious belief, age or disability.

SIN01889"
Senior Java Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Diploma or Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication) or equivalent.
Expertise in Spring Boot is advantageous.
Minimum 3 years of working experience in Java or OOP programming languages development.
Good to have experience in optimizing performance sensitive based applications/systems
Good to have experience in designing and developing microservices
Good to have experience in developing in AWS platform
Advantageous to possess Oracle Certified Professional in Java certification or higher.
Job Description
Be a senior member of the product development team
Design and optimize existing security product's algorithm
Design and develop SaaS product on Cloud Platforms, such as AWS
Research & develop new innovative security products.
Guide junior member of the product development team
Learn how to work independently and in a team.

Desired Skills and Experience
Microsoft Azure, Cloud Applications, Web Services, Cloud Security, Cloud Computing, JavaScript, Amazon Web Services, Maven, SQL, SaaS, Angular, OOP, Product Development, Java, API, Databases, Software Development, Hibernate"
Software Developer,"The Software Developer will be part of our service delivery team to serve a diverse group of clients from various industries and countries in the region. He/she will be exposed to work involving diverse technologies.
Hands-on development of existing and new business applications and prototypes
Work closely with the project lead to propose technical solutions
Ensure that solutions are delivered on time and meet required standards
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science
At least 3 years of working experience in design and development of .Net framework
Ability to understand and implement algorithms
Possess analytical and problem solving skills
Ability to work under pressure of tight delivery deadlines
Possess the following technical background
ASP, .Net framework with C#, VB, HTML5, CSS3, Microsoft Ajax framework, JavaScript, jQuery, AngularJS, and MSSQL
Object oriented programming
ASP.NET MVC Framework, Web Forms, Web Services and WCF
Domain expertise in Microsoft Dynamics CRM will be an advantage
#TeSA #CLT"
#WEWANTYOU - Software Development & Integration,"Position Overview

If you have an eye for detail and are keen to develop quality software applications, look no further! Join us in our Software Development & Integration roles and put your skills to translating user requirements into technical designs.

Opportunities Available

.Net Software Engineers (Junior levels to Managers)
Test Engineers (Junior to Senior Engineers)
Systems Analyst (Junior to Senior Analysts)
Project Managers (Assistant / Managers)
Business Analysts (Assistant to Lead Analysts)

Requirements

Object oriented programming, Web applications & technologies (IIS), C#, SQL/MS SQL
Test methodologies & strategic planning, Certified ISTQB - preferred
Knowledge in SDLC - PMP / CITPM certified - Good to have
Experienced in feasibility / functional / Technical designs
Excellent communications and interpersonal skills

Be a part of the Special Task Force and start contributing & Make a Difference for our Nation’s Healthcare Ecosystem!

#WERISEFORHEALTH #WEWANTYOU

Apply Now

Click Enter to update the description of Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Android Software Engineer - TikTok Live,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok Live client team focus has been focusing on delivery engaging and the best live streaming experience to global users. Our team develop creative and interesting features for streamers and viewers to express themselves and interact with others instantly. We are looking for passionate mobile software engineers to join us in this fast growing industry.

Responsibilities:
1. Design, implement the new-user features of our mobile application.
2. Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a world-class mobile experience.
3. Optimize mobile applications and user experience on the Android platforms.
4. Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.

Qualifications

Qualifications
1. BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with experience in native Android development. Final year or recent graduate in Software Development and Computer Science are also welcome to apply.
2. Proficiency in Java or Kotlin.
3. Ability to understand and debug large and complex codebases.
4. Good team communication and collaboration skills.
5. Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.
6. Livestream knowledge is a plus but not mandatory.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Associate Engineer, Android","Rakuten Group, Inc. is the largest e-commerce company in Japan, and third largest e-commerce marketplace company worldwide, with over 1.5 billion registered users worldwide. The Rakuten brand is recognized worldwide for its leadership and innovation, and provides a variety of consumer and business-focused services including e-commerce, e-reading, travel, banking, securities, credit card, e-money, portal and media, online marketing and professional sports. The company is expanding globally and currently has operations throughout Asia, Western Europe, and the Americas.

Rakuten Viki is a premier global entertainment streaming site where millions of people discover and consume primetime shows and movies subtitled in more than 200 languages, by our community of fans. With billions of videos viewed and more than 1 billion words translated, Viki brings global entertainment to fans everywhere!

As an Associate Engineer, Mobile at Viki, you will be working on improving our apps. We are currently looking for a passionate and collaborative engineer who’s willing to explore new technologies and excel at existing ones. As part of the team, you will get the chance to work with an amazing team of Mobile Engineers whose work is featured in various tech blogs and news sites. Our apps are regularly featured in multiple countries around the world as well. In addition, you get the chance to learn about media streaming across multiple platforms (TV, Mobile Apps, Chromecast, and so forth).

Key Requirements:

Good understanding of software engineering principles and tools (such as SOLID principles git, CI/CD integration)
Experience building a Android native app (either at work or from personal projects)
Experience with Kotlin, Android UI development (XML layouts, Jetpack compose)
Ability to find innovative ways to increase application efficiency and connectivity, with an emphasis on improving the core user experience
Collaborate closely with product and design teams to create innovative user interfaces and features, optimized for mobile platforms
An interest to explore, investigate and prototype leading-edge concepts
Fresh graduates are welcome to apply

Bonus Qualifications:

Video streaming experience
Product design experience with focus on user analytics
Experience testing frameworks
Prior experience working with in-app subscription

Rakuten is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, color, ethnicity, ancestry, national origin, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, marital status or any legally protected status. Women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and protected veterans are encouraged."
Trading System Engineer (DeFi),"What We Do
Time Research is a quantitative trading firm that utilizes a diversified portfolio of systematic and quantitative strategies across financial markets to achieve high quality, uncorrelated returns. We were founded by a team of traditional and crypto trading veterans with an average daily trading volume of over $1B USD, and pride ourselves in maintaining a low profile to focus on what we do best.

We have deep expertise in trading, technology and operations, and attribute our success to rigorous scientific research. As a technology and research-driven firm, we design and build our own cutting-edge systems: from high performance trading, large scale data analysis to compute farms.

Role Overview
Write high quality, well-tested code to support trading requirements, such as swap, liquidity provision in multiple dexs on multiple blockchains
Optimize transaction speed (hearing market, sending transaction) to meet trading latency requirements.

Requirements
Passionate about the crypto industry and eagerly following the fast-evolving landscape
Experienced in system architecture design and improve the trading system (not limited to defi trading)
Familiar with mainstream defi protocols, such as aave/uniswap/synthetics
Familiar with blockchain technology (smart contract, p2p network, etc)
Familiar with one of the following programming languages: rust, c++, golang
A collaborative team player

Why Join Us
Competitive remuneration package and benefits
Fast paced and result-oriented environment with a flat hierarchy
Excellent exposure to the crypto ecosystem and the latest market insight
Collaborative teams in an energetic and fun working environment
Flexible and casual, but hard working and meritocratic culture where accomplishments are rewarded
Great career development opportunities and international mobility

Disclaimer
Time Research does not accept unsolicited resumes from professional staffing or search firms. All resumes, or other information identifying potential candidates, shared with any employee of Time Research without a standing signed supplier agreement will be deemed free to contact without restrictions, and no placement fee of any kind will be paid in the event the candidate is hired by Time Research."
Cloud Migration Engineer (DWH / Reporting / GIS),"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Technology and Operations services and Accenture Song—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 721,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

Top 3 Must have skills / Primary skills

ETL data processing, e.g. Informatica, SSIS, etc.

Dashboard / reporting, e.g. Cognos, SSRS, Qlik, etc.

Database (SQL) and GIS (ArcGIS, FME)

Good to have skills (Optional)

Cloud Technologies (AWS Glue, AWS QuickSight etc)

Strong analytical skills and problem-solving skills

Aptitude to learn new technologies

Excellent communication skills.

Detailed Job Description

Participate in migration from On Prem to AWS, as well as operational support.

Creating, enhancing and maintaining Framework Manager models to support business requirements

To design and develop reports using Cognos or other reporting tools

Manages daily and monthly processing and maintenance of Data Warehouse and ETL workflow jobs

To provide production support for the existing Cognos reports and dashboards

To resolve production tickets raised by users within SLA.

All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.

Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.

Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.

Diploma and above

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."
"Frontend Software Engineer, TikTok e-Commerce","Responsibilities

The e-Commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-Commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-Commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-Commerce here at TikTok.

You will:
- Architect and develop efficient and highly reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications for e-Commerce products.
- Code optimisation to improve scalability, reliability, security and performance of web applications.
- Collaborate with product design, product management and software engineering teams to deliver best in class user experience.

Qualifications

- B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
- Experience in frontend engineering experience, with demonstrable experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp. Qualified fresh graduates would also be considered.
- Familiar with key concepts like functional and asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility, data security and accessibility.
- Good understanding of multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process.

Ideal Candidate
1. Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
2. Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
3. Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment."
"Data Engineer, Global Payments","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

The Data Intelligence team leads the efforts of discovering data-driven business values for Global Payments, by collecting, visualising and mining generated data from the pipeline of whole Global Payments system. The outcomes include optimising the key business metrics, improving Global Payments products and user experiences, risk management through data intelligence, predicting the trends from historical data, etc.

Responsibilities

Improve payment performance and drive business growth of ByteDance's core businesses, such as e-commerce, TikTok, and games;
Develop data warehouse and data query services
Develop data-related product requirements, and be able to independently understand requirement, design schemes, and implement.

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree or above in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics or other related majors;
Familiarity with at least one programming language such as Python, Java, Scala, Go, etc.;
A strong engineering background and interest in data;
Prior experience with writing and debugging data pipelines using a distributed data framework (Hadoop/ Spark/ Flink /Storm etc.);
Proficient in databases, strong SQL/ETL development ability;

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Senior / Software Engineer (iOS),"Description

EPAM Singapore is looking for an Senior / Software Engineer (iOS).

What You’ll Do

Develop fully functional and high-quality mobile applications with clean and efficient coding
Implement unit and UI tests for identifying malfunctions and maintaining good test coverage
Design and develop solutions to meet business specifications
Coordinate with cross-functional teams on planning and execution
Follow standardized code guidelines, review code regularly, and deliver robust code
Support QA team in developing test plans, execution, and continuous releases
Participate in Scrum or related Agile processes

What You Have

Bachelor/Master’s Degree in Computer Science or relevant courses
At least 5 years of hands-on experience in developing iOS applications with Swift programming language
Solid Swift 5 experience and strong software development fundamentals
Advanced understanding of the Cocoa Touch frameworks and Cocoa Design patterns
Proficient in concepts of multi-threading, memory leaks, data binding, auto-layout, XCODE IDE
Experience with code versioning tools e.g., Github, Gitlab, etc
Good to have Objective-C language knowledge

WHY EPAM

By choosing EPAM, you're getting a job at one of the most loved workplaces according to Newsweek 2021 & 2022
Employee ideas are the main driver of our business. We have a very supportive environment where your voice matters
You will be challenged while working side-by-side with the best talent globally. We work with top-notch technologies, constantly seeking new industry trends and best practices
We offer a transparent career path and an individual roadmap to engineer your future & accelerate your journey
At EPAM, you can find vast opportunities for self-development: online courses and libraries, mentoring programs, partial grants of certification, and experience exchange with colleagues around the world. You will learn, contribute, and grow with us

Life at EPAM

EPAM is a leading global provider of digital platform engineering and development services. EPAM has been expanding in Singapore since 2013 and delivering the best solutions to our customers
As a recognized leader, EPAM Singapore achieved Great Place to Work Certification in 2021 and is committed to providing our team with inspiring careers. You will have the opportunity to work with fellow talented technologists and accelerate your career by participating in our numerous upskilling, training, and certification programs. That is why EPAM Singapore was awarded Silver in the SkillsFuture Employers Awards 2022 for our efforts in championing employees' skills development and building a lifelong learning culture at the workplace. You can also look forward to developing holistically with the multiracial festivals and various wellness and cultural activities organized by our passionate colleagues here

How We Hire
Not sure if you meet all the requirements? No problem. Let’s talk anyway and find out more! It takes 1 min of application to start the journey with us. Apply now!
Apply and tell us about yourself
Go through some standard interviews:
General interview with a recruiter
Technical interview with our technology experts
Manager interview or Offer interview with a hiring manager

Get ready to join the team"
Principal Data Engineer,"Key Responsibilities:

• Participate in the design, development, and testing of an open architecture, open source based, and cloud native data analytics platform product
• Explore and evaluate modern data management and MLOps components for continuous improvement of data analytics platform product
• Contribute to the design and integration of data management & data governance capabilities for the product
• Establish best practices and guidelines to be followed by engineers working on data pipelines
• Assist in the setup and maintenance of big data, machine learning and Kubernetes clusters
• Work with Data Scientists, Data Analysts, and other internal stakeholders to assist with datarelated technical issues and support their data pipeline infrastructure and data preparation needs Job

Requirements:
• Bachelor or Master’s degree computer science, software engineering, information systems or related field.
• The candidate should have at least 8 years of technical experience in Information Technology with at least 4 years, preferably 6 years in Big Data, Data Warehousing or Business Intelligence technology with knowledge of analytics and AI technologies
• Broad knowledge of various aspects of Big Data with good understanding and hands-on experience in Hadoop based technologies such as HDFS, Hive, Spark, Kafka etc.
• Deep understanding of relational, NoSQL, NewSQL database technologies such as PostgreSQL, Oracle DB, CitusDB, SingleStore, Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4J etc.
• Good knowledge in programming languages such as Java, Python or Scala on Linux/Windows platforms.
• Experience in Kubernetes and Kubeflow is a plus point
• Experience in Big Data visualization and reporting software.
• Experience in designing ETL/BI solutions.
• Experience in DevOps and DataOps
• Familiar with Linux/UNIX system administration
• Experience in operational support in delivering Big Data solutions.
• Effective oral and written communication with strong analytical, problem solving, multitasking and project management skills are essential on the job."
AI Engineer,"Job Responsibilities:
Develop image/video processing algorithms for single/multipe camera related applications, such as mobile, autonomous and Vehicle-Road Synergy. Work on solving problem end to end from problem definanition, dataset incremental iteration, corner case iteration, model iteration.

Qualifications:
1. MS in computer science, electrical engineering, or equivalent practical experience.
2. 3+ year experience on computer vision/machine learning development.
3. Familiar with at least one of the deep learning frameworks like PyTorch / Tensorflow.
4. Proven experience on developing deep learning models with face processing, image/video semantic segmentation, 2d/3d object detection, depth estimation from single/multiple camera, scene understanding/classificaiton etc.
5. Understanding in computer vision concepts, e.g., 3D vision, camera coordination and sensor/camera calibration.
6. Experience in C/C++ and in a rapid prototyping environment.
7. Familar with the model pruning/distillation, etc.
8. Demonstrate great teamwork, outstanding communication skills, and willingness to learn.
9. Experience in CNN model training on large-scale dataset."
NodeJS Developer,"About DXC Technology: We are a Fortune 500 global IT services leader. Our more than 130,000 people in 70-plus countries are entrusted by our customers to deliver what matters most. We use the power of technology to deliver mission critical IT services across the Enterprise Technology Stack to drive business impact. DXC is an employer of choice with strong values, and fosters a culture of inclusion, belonging and corporate citizenship. We are DXC.


Scope of work:
Report to the Authority’s Project Manager in-charge of this project
Adhere to quality controls defined in the Quality Management System (QMS) where applicable
Carry out application enhancement and activities or other ICT explorations assigned by the Project Manager
Work with other project teams
Ensure that quality service is provided in a timely and effective manner; and
Preparation of documentation and updates.


Roles and responsibilities include:
Involved in the following phases of the project: requirements gathering, system design, development, unit testing, system testing, user acceptance testing, training, data migration, simulation exercises, and subsequent enhancements;
Carry out investigation and correction of defects in the system as reported by the Authority including temporary corrections and bypass of the defects until such time as standard corrections and/or updates of the system are available;
Render advice on the performance tuning for the system Recover lost data, restore and repair damaged data, and correct erroneous data to the extent possible
Restore the system to an operable state where System Downtime is attributable to system defect or error
Ensure that the application is designed and implemented with proper validations. Conduct periodic checks to ensure any known vulnerabilities are handled correctly in the application before deployment or major changes are made
Ensure ICT Security controls implemented for the applications are functioning effectively and protecting the applications as intended, by making sure all security findings surfaced during security review such as Penetration Testing, Vulnerability Scan and Source Code Review are addressed or resolved timely
Assist at all times in resolving matters associated with a security or data breach
Prepare relevant documentation for the project; and work with the Project Team Members closely and complete the tasks assigned according to the datelines given.

Requirements:
Singaporean Citizen
Degree in Computer Science or Engineering or Diploma in Computer Studies or equivalent
2 or more years of working experience as a programmer
Good understanding of the systems development life cycle
Good knowledge of object-oriented technology and application development
Able to work independently and also a good team player
Strong oral and written communications skills
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to interact with government representatives
Work experience with or within the public sector is an added advantage


Technical skills required for this role:
NodeJS (v14 and above) – Javascript runtime to build/run web applications
NPM (v6 and above) – Package manager to download libraries/packages
MongoDB (v4 and above) – Document DB
Google Chrome (v92 and above) – Default browser to run a web application
Git (v4 and above) / GitLab – CICD software for development
Visual Studio Code – IDE for development
Selenium – Automated e2e testing
Web Client: ReactJS (Typescript), Map software – ArcGIS JS
Web Server: FeathersJS (Typescript)
DB – MongoDB
Server infrastructure (Good to have): AWS Cloud Services – basic application deployment knowledge on AWS.


*The successful candidate will be subjected to security clearance."
"Junior Java Developer (AGILE Project, up to $4800, Central)","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Junior Java Developer needed. Basic Salary up to $4800 (Subject to experience). 5 Days per week, Central Area. Please send your resume to Hendrich@htzresources.com

Responsibilities
Be part of an Agile team to carry out full-stack development to deliver and maintain large-scale enterprise web application systems.
Work with customers in user story elaboration and effort estimation.
Implement microservices with container-related technologies (e.g. Docker, Kubernetes).
Develop automated unit tests.
Requirements
1-2 years of Java development experience
MUST HAVE experience with agile projects.
Strong proficiency in Java programming language, Spring Framework.
Proficiency in one or more frontend frameworks (HTML5 / Angular / React).
Experience developing on cloud platforms.

Desired Skills and Experience
Kubernetes, Agile, JavaScript, HTML5, Communication Skills, Angular, Docker, Team Player, Java, Software Development"
Security Engineer,"Position Overview

As a part of the Security Operations department, the incumbent will review and conduct technical security risk checks. SecOps is also aligned to SOC for incident management handling, reporting and investigation. Candidate will have to work on technical risk management. Handle day-to-day incident reporting and support investigation to healthcare IT platform

Role & Responsibilities

Work closely with internal and external stakeholders to manage the technical risk, security operation and SOC.
Act as IT security expert for department in the areas of cyber security assessments, PAM, Database, WAF, Firewall and EPP/EDR.
Perform risk assessment and identify mitigation controls for the risk area identified.
Enhance and build cyber threat detection user cases and assist in analysing and reducing false positive.
Identify infection/compromise in the company utilizing threat intelligence and indicators of compromise (IOCs) from different threat Intel sources and regulators
Ensure all compliance and security control functions are performed timely and orderly.
Drive continuous improvement of procedures and processes related to cybersecurity process and operations monitoring.
Track, monitor and valid security-related and risk issues, provide an action plan to rectify the issues and prevent recurrence.
Generate security reports and metrics as required.
Provide timely and periodic update to managements on its security matters.
Stay current on the latest Cyber threats, Attacks and vulnerabilities etc

Requirements

Good diploma or degree in Computer Science, Digital Forensic or Engineering preferred

Professional security related qualification (e.g. CEH, ECIH/GCIH, ITIL) will be favourable although not mandatory technical skills

At least 3 - 6 years’ experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems

Ability to write and communicate in English is an added advantage

Added advantage to have knowledge in security technology like firewall, IPS, WAF, endpoint

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Software Engineer - Experience Innovation Group,"We are looking for software engineer with 2+ years of experience to join our software Proof of Concept (PoC) team. As part of the Experience Innovation Group (EIG) in the CTO office, the Software PoC team needs people that can imagine new products, solutions and technologies – then quickly build them into tangible prototypes that can be tested.

At EIG, we are a diverse group of people who have worked in design, consulting, engineering, data science and more, all working together to create amazing solutions that have real impact at scale for customers. We are a multi-functional, agile team with all the skills and capabilities to interact with customers, research and gather insights, explore future technologies, and develop them into products.

Our new Singapore innovation center is a key part of Dell’s vision – come join us and you’ll get to use your skills to explore, research and build ground-breaking products and experiences where your ideas will make a tangible impact on our customers. If you’d like to join a group that’s focused on exploring augmented reality, human-centered design and the future of computing then you are the right place.

What You’ll Achieve

You will have the opportunity to work with a diverse group of talents from different backgrounds, learn and explore new technologies and bring cool ideas into Dell's future products.

You will:
Design and develop Proof of Concepts software on various platforms to demonstrate the user experience and feasibility
Collaborate with product owner and design team to understand the problem statements and translates high level requirements into technical deliveries
Participate and contribute to creative ideation sessions, explore new technologies and software stacks to support the new user experience of the future

Essential Requirements
Bachelor's degree in IT, Computer Science, or related fields with at least 2 years of hands-on experience in developing mobile applications, either using native mobile stacks or cross-platform application frameworks, such as Flutter.
Strong in data structure and coding with at least one of the following programming languages: C++, C#, Java, Kotlin, Swift and Dart.
Willingness to explore software development outside of mobile application domain and have great appreciation in technologies.
Comfortable with ambiguity and frequent changes to project scope in innovation environment.
Good communication and problem-solving skills.

Desirable Requirements
Any software experience outside of mobile domain, for instance, in web, Windows, frontend, backend and cloud services such as AWS, Azure and GCP
Experience in Agile software development methodologies
Experience in working in a highly collaborative environment with a heavy emphasis on teamwork

Here’s our story; now tell us yours

Dell Technologies helps organizations and individuals build a brighter digital tomorrow. Our company is made up of more than 150,000 people, located in over 180 locations around the world. We’re proud to be a diverse and inclusive team and have an endless passion for our mission to drive human progress.

What’s most important to us is that you are respected, feel like you can be yourself and have the opportunity to do the best work of your life -- while still having a life. We offer excellent benefits, bonus programs, flexible work arrangements, a variety of career development opportunities, employee resource groups, and much more.

We started with computers, but we didn’t stop there. We are helping customers move into the future with multi-cloud, AI and machine learning through the most innovative technology and services portfolio for the data era. Join us and become a part of what’s next in technology, starting today.

You can also learn more about us by reading our latest Diversity and Inclusion Report and our plan to make the world a better place by 2030 here.

Dell is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Dell are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV Status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Dell will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Dell encourages applicants of all ages. Read the full Equal Employment Opportunity Policy here.

Job Id: R212644"
Software Engineer (Fresh Grad),"Rakuten is a global Internet and e-commerce company with over 1.3 billion registered users worldwide. Our e-commerce platform is the largest of its kind in Japan and among the world's largest by sales. Rakuten has many subsidiaries as well, including well-known brands like Rakuten VIKI, ShopStyle, Curbside, Rakuten TV, Kobo (e-Reading) and Viber (messaging).

As a Software Engineer, you will be working with a talented team to enhance our world-class advertisement management system at Rakuten’s Core Platform Section. You will work in close collaboration with the product management team, UX designers and your scrum team to design and deliver new and innovative customer solutions. The ideal candidate should have a good understanding of UI, cross-browser compatibility, general web functions and standards. Hands-on experience with web applications and programming languages such as, but not limited to, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, JQuery and API's is also required.

Responsibilities:

Develop and deliver software platforms used across multiple products and organizational units.
Hands on experience with Web Applications and programming languages such as HTML, CSS, JavaScript, JQuery and API's.
A sound understanding of RESTful services, together with the ability to design and implement such services with good scalability and quality
Utilize TDD practices to ensure delivery of high-quality code with low rates of production defects.
Bring to bear your experience leveraging best in class tools and technologies (CI/CD, cloud computing, web service development) to refine and improve software development practices for your team.
Engage in innovative problem-solving activities, requiring conceptual thinking creating 'out of the box' solutions with prototypes and pilots.
Instrument services and solutions to ensure deployed software is scalable and reliable.

Skills and Experiences:

Any related degree in Computer Science or related field.
Strong CS fundamentals in object-oriented design, problem solving, and complexity analysis.
Experience with distributed systems, caching and persistence solutions would be a plus.
Ability to troubleshoot and identify the root cause of issues under the pressure of time.
Ability to effectively articulate technical challenges and solutions.
Excellent interpersonal communication skills, with strong command of verbal and written English.
Demonstrated skill and passion for operational excellence.
Customer–focused mind-set, taking pride in creating an informative data-driven journey.

Experience in the following tech programs:

HTML5, CSS3, JS, AngularJS, ReactJS
Core Java 8, Spring 4.0 and above
MYSQL/Any relational DB experience.
Mongo DB/any NO SQL experience
Jenkins
Maven
Docker/Spark streaming
Junit

Rakuten is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications regardless of sex, marital status, ethnic origin, sexual orientation, religious belief or age."
Embedded C++ Developers/Engineers (Multiple levels - Fresher to Staff Engineer),"Advanced/Senior/Staff Engineer, Software Engineering
Responsibilities:
Software design and development for advanced semiconductor equipment.
Software requirement analysis, design specifications, implementation and unit testing.
Diagnose and analyze software defect, formulate effective resolution.
New platform, infrastructure and architecture development and continuous improvement. Collaborate closely with cross engineering functions and multi geographical sites team to achieve system level performance meeting product requirement specification.

Requirements:

Master/Bachelor in Software/Computer/Electrical Engineering or Computer Science.
Min 3 years (for Advanced)/ 5 years (for Senior)/ 8 years (for Staff) of experiences in large-scale software development projects.
Proficient in C/C++ programming languages.
Good knowledge in Real Time Control and Object Oriented Software Design Methodologies.
Strong analytical and problem solving skill.
Positive attitude, effective communication, excellent team player and leadership quality."
Frontend Software Engineer - TikTok e-Commerce,"Responsibilities

The e-Commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-Commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-Commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-Commerce here at TikTok.

You will:
- Architect and develop efficient and highly reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications for e-Commerce products.
- Code optimisation to improve scalability, reliability, security and performance of web applications.
- Collaborate with product design, product management and software engineering teams to deliver best in class user experience.
- Experience in designing, analyzing, and troubleshooting large-scale distributed systems.

Qualifications

- B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
- Experience in frontend engineering experience, with demonstrable experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp.
- Familiar with key concepts like functional and asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility, data security and accessibility.
- Good understanding of multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process.

Ideal Candidate
1. Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
2. Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
3. Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment."
"Backend Software Engineer, Infrastructure Engineering","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Our Infrastructure Engineering team supports the company's fast growth by building and operating hyperscale datacenters, managing the life cycle of server fleet, allocate cloud resources and create various cloud solutions, and provide infrastructure services including widely distributed Content Distribution Networks (CDNs).

The platform team build and leverage various platforms to manage and interact with our infrastructures and services. To support the fast growth and improve operation efficiency, these platforms need to be feature rich, easy to use, scalable, agile and compliant to with policies and procedures.

Responsibilities

Build platforms, systems and services for internal and external teams to interact with the large scale production systems.
Build tools and platforms to improve engineering productivity.
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve software.
Bring new ideas and technologies into our platform, innovate and iterate.

Qualifications

BS degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to: Java, Python, or Go.
Experience working with two or more of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, networking systems, developing large software systems."
C++ Software Engineer (SG),"C++ Software Engineer: We are looking for a low-level engineer who can work on our core trading engine. The ideal profile would be someone who has been exposed to any of C/C++/Rust and has some experience in the finance industry. Ideally you have 2-5 years of experience.

Must Have
Languages: C++/Rust
Experience with multithreaded systems
Networking / communication framework (protobuf, GRPC, etc) knowledge
Autonomy and ability to take charge of projects
Positive attitude!
Nice To Have
Prior trading experience
Knowledge in the financial or crypto world
Python/JS knowledge"
"Software Engineer (Global Network), Global Payments","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

The Global Payments team is building a platform to provide cross-border payment solutions for all our international product lines, such as TikTok, Helo, Games, Education, etc.

The Global Network team in Global Payments ensures a stable, professional and efficient overseas payment solution, helping businesses to unblock payment channels and effectively assisting overseas business and product expansion. This includes tasks such as building general service capabilities, payment instruction orchestration engine, etc.

Responsibilities

Develop high-quality software design and architecture;
Identify, prioritise and execute tasks in the software development life cycle;
Develop tools and applications by producing clean, efficient code;
Automate tasks through appropriate tools and scripting;
Collaborate with internal teams and external vendors to fix and improve our products;
Document development phases and monitor systems;

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, related technical discipline, or equivalent practical experience;
Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages, such as Java/Go/C++/C#/Python;
Excellent proficiency in backend server development and expertise in relational database;
Strong analytical thinking and exceptional attention to details.

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"SDLC & Runtime - Software Engineer, Slang SDLC","Job Description

SDLC & RUNTIME

We develop and support SDLC platforms and services to our 17,000 engineers worldwide, enabling them to deliver software for their business. Increasingly the firm relies on technology to achieve its commercial goals and deliver value to shareholders through innovative technology solutions. To achieve these ambitions, we must be able to empower our talented engineers by providing a developer environment that is attractive, matches their expectations, keeps them engaged and productive.

We are responsible for Goldman Sachs’ mission critical production platforms. Our aim is to innovate and drive technology solutions that will empower our engineers to deliver value to our clients. By joining us, you will be part of a diverse global technical team focusing on solving critical business problems.

What Slang Sdlc Is

Securities Database, known as SecDb, is the backbone of Goldman Sachs’ risk analytics platform for securities. The development of this proprietary software system marked a significant milestone in Goldman Sachs’ technological history. SecDb continues to be a strategic, critical platform for the Firm that we will continue to invest in for the foreseeable future. Slang stands for Securities Language - it is the language of SecDb. It is used by thousands of GS engineers worldwide, with 1500 production releases per day on average. It's our hyper-converged SDLC that supports this rapid development cycle, which our front office businesses rely on.

What You Will Do
Maintain and improve the Slang SDLC workflow and tooling on the SecDb platform
Focus on user experience and customer satisfaction
Interact directly with the business and other tech teams to build innovative solutions to support the GS business
Develop quickly on SecDb: changes to production systems can be made and deployed within minutes, while maintaining high quality standards
High impact: Play a critical part in delivering value to our thousands of Slang developers worldwide
What We Need From You
A technical degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, or a related field
Solid understanding and algorithms and data structures
Deep knowledge of object-oriented computer programming, preferably in large scale financial or technical organization
Strong software development and design experience, including a clear understanding of data structures, algorithms, software design and core programming concepts
Experience in working with large and complex software systems, distributed computing, and databases
Ability to work cross-functionally as well as the ability to work as a hands-on individual contributor
Motivation to learn about trading workflow and financial markets
Slang experience is not required but highly advantageous
About Goldman Sachs

At Goldman Sachs, we commit our people, capital and ideas to help our clients, shareholders and the communities we serve to grow. Founded in 1869, we are a leading global investment banking, securities and investment management firm. Headquartered in New York, we maintain offices around the world.

We believe who you are makes you better at what you do. We're committed to fostering and advancing diversity and inclusion in our own workplace and beyond by ensuring every individual within our firm has a number of opportunities to grow professionally and personally, from our training and development opportunities and firmwide networks to benefits, wellness and personal finance offerings and mindfulness programs. Learn more about our culture, benefits, and people at GS.com/careers.

We’re committed to finding reasonable accommodations for candidates with special needs or disabilities during our recruiting process. Learn more: https://www.goldmansachs.com/careers/footer/disability-statement.html

© The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc., 2021. All rights reserved.

Goldman Sachs is an equal employment/affirmative action employer Female/Minority/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity"
Senior Full Stack Developer,"About the Company
US MNC focusing on providing IOT cloud solution in both web and mobile applications.

About the Job
This person will work independently and as a part of a team to develop user interface web applications built for a variety of platforms (desktop, computers, mobile andcloud). This position includes design and architecture of software features, working with designers and product managers to understand the features, and implementation of both the client-side (front-end) and server-side (back-end).

You will implements features within our application in cooperation with other team members.
Maintains up-to-date knowledge of current tools and techniques.
Contributes to the overall quality of the organization in the development of all applications.Ensures high performance on a variety of platforms.
Creates self-contained, reusable and testable modules and components.
Skills & Experiences Required
You will need min degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related discipline with 3 years of proven experience in building and shipping professional software.

Deep understanding of the complexities in writing web applications.
Front-End experience with Web-Components, Angular, React web-framework.
Back-end experience primarily with NodeJS web service frameworks and RESTful resource implementation.
Experience in Golang and Python knowledge is a PLUS.
Experience with relational databases (SQLite, PostgreSQL).
Experience with revision control systems.
Proficiency with both adaptive and responsive designs.
To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may send your CV to steve at steve.ling(@)randstad.com.sg
(EA: 94C3609/ R1332781)
Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
"Backend Software Engineer (Direct Messaging), TikTok","Responsibilities

TikTok is one of the fastest growing apps in the world, and we are building up an engineering team for core TikTok product in Singapore, to ensure TikTok continues a healthy growth, deliver the best product experience to all of our users, build the most attractive features to help users on enjoying their time on TikTok, earn trust on privacy protection, and more.

Responsibilities:
1. We are building next generation IM system to support core social scenarios.
2. Develop large-scale software systems that powers TikTok app.
3. Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability, performance and reliability of the Messaging product.
4. Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to deliver high-quality work in rapid product development.

Qualifications

Qualifications
1. BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major.
2. Experienced in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
3. Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
4. Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
5. Have good team communication and collaboration skills.
6. Highly advantageous to have experience on building large-scale instant messaging systems (like Facebook Messages, Instagram, Snapchat or WeChat), or in-app chats."
"Software Engineer, Application Security","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

The security team at ByteDance is missioned to build infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to support cross-functional teams to protect our users, products and infrastructures. In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and secure-by-design systems and solutions. Our challenges are not your regular day-to-day technical problems; you'll be part of a team that's developing new solutions to new challenges of a kind not previously addressed by big tech. It's working fast, at scale, and we're making a difference.

Responsibilities

Design and develop cloud-native security services and infrastructure such as Identity, Access Management, and Key Management System as a foundation for production infrastructure security.
Design and build large-scale detection and classification systems such as email spam classification systems, or risk-based authentication systems.
Design and develop security and cryptographic systems using advanced protection technology such as Intel SGX or AMD SEV.
Design and develop systems or frameworks (e.g., static code analysis) to achieve security-by-default and defense-in-depth in certain areas.
Identify areas of security weakness and find ways to minimize security risks. Conduct penetration testing and build automation to find security vulnerabilities.

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or other relevant majors.
Strong experience as a developer with one or more general-purpose programming languages such as Go, Rust, Python, C/C++, or Java.
Experienced in the design and implementation of security solutions, systems, and mechanisms, including, but not limited to, data security, application security, cryptography, systems security, and network security.
Creative problem-solving skills and excellent troubleshooting and debugging skills.
Strong written/verbal communication and excellent teamwork skills; flexible and be a self-starter."
Senior/Lead Software Engineer,"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

About Us - Collaboratory, Singapore Tourism Board (STB)

The Singapore Tourism Board (STB) aims to transform how visitors travel and experience Singapore through solutions that ease frictions in a user’s journey. We work on such solutions through collaborations with other government agencies and tourism businesses across Singapore.

The Collaboratory is an in-house development team that seeks to design and develop innovative and engaging solutions for our visitors to Singapore through an agile approach, adopting the best practices and tools to ensure a good user experience while meeting the actual user needs.

As the Technical Lead, you will be leading a small team of engineers to design, develop and deploy solutions across STB’s digital channels. You will also have opportunities to explore areas beyond software development, such as devops, cloud infrastructure, and software QA.

What you will be working on: 

Lead an agile development team to deliver high-quality software applications according to requirements. This may include web application/API backends, web application frontends and mobile applications. Adopt software engineering practices such as Scrum, code reviews and test-driven development.

What we are looking for: 

Translate business requirements into technical / architectural specifications
Collaborate with in-house development teams or vendor development staff to resolve technical challenges
Continuous integration/continuous deployment
Cloud/PaaS platforms, such as AWS, and docker/container technology
Modern web application technologies such as Node.js, Vue.JS and Ruby on Rails.
Experience with government projects and related compliance requirements
Experience working with multiple teams, especially in large cross-functional projects
A minimum of 5 years’ relevant working experience is preferred, with at least 1 year in a lead role
Mindset to challenge status quo and constantly seeking continuous improvement
Ability to present effectively and explain complex, technical concepts in simple, easy to understand terms
High attention to detail

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
"Software Engineer / Java Developer ( MNC , Semiconductor , JAVA ) - URGENT HIRING!!!","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Responsibilities
Design, develop, maintain and continuous improvements of assigned Computer Integrated Manufacturing (CIM) applications and components
Provide 24/7 Level 2 & 3 support for the proper operation of Production lines
Gather requirements, design, develop and deploy new versions of CIM applications especially Equipment Manager automation solutions
Responsible for documentation of requirements and coordination of enhancements in the assigned area
Plan, coordinate, and conduct training for assigned applications
Work with the other IT teams to achieve the common goal of better system response time and system availability
Work with other departments for productivity enhancements, error or cost reductions and other improvement projects
Requirements
Diploma in Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent fields with minimum 2 years of working experience in Equipment Manager automation solutions would be considered
Experience in Java development, SEMI Equipment Communication Standard (SECS), Oracle SQL and/or Tibco is an added advantage
How To Apply

Interested applicants, please click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.

We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).

Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.

Trust Recruit Pte Ltd

EA License No: 19C9950

EA Personnel: Tan Jia Cheng

EA Personnel Reg No: R22110254
Desired Skills and Experience
MVC, Git, Architectural Patterns, TIBCO, Oracle SQL, Customer Engagement, JDBC, Maven, SQL, Continuous Integration, Java, API, Manufacturing, Web Development, Databases, Agile Development"
Machine Learning Engineer - Recommendation - Singapore,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Our TikTok team is responsible for developing state-of-the-art machine learning models and strategies to improve user consumption experience, inspire creativity, build a fair and flourishing ecosystem.

1. Build industry leading recommendation system; develop highly scalable classifiers and tools leveraging machine learning;
2. Understand product objectives and machine learning techniques; improve model and recommendation strategy;
3. Understand user behavior and apply ML algorithms to optimize content consumption and production experience;
4. Understand content security strategy and apply ML algorithms to improve content audit process;
5. Work with cross functional teams to grow ByteDance product in important regional markets.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor's degree in computer science or a related technical discipline, with at least 2 years of related work experience;
2. Solid experience with data structures or algorithms;
3. Software development experience through hands on coding in a general purpose programming language;
4. Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, data mining or other related areas;
5. Strong communication and teamwork skills;
6. Passion about technologies and solving challenging problems.

Preferred Qualification
Minimum 3 years relevant work experience from a large-scale internet business


TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Senior Site Reliability Engineer,"Position Summary
The Digital Technology department in Group IT are responsible for building all of Singtel’s consumer and enterprise facing, channel applications & APIs, from mobile applications to eCommerce websites. These applications are primarily built using a microservices architecture on the AWS public cloud. The majority of our applications are deployed as Spring Boot microservices on Kubernetes (AWS EKS).
 The Digital Technology Site Reliability Engineering (SRE) team act as an enabler for our application squads, empowering these “Build-Run” teams to take more responsibility for their production systems, by ensuring that they have the right tools, skills and hands-on experience to succeed in production. 
 The SRE team consists of Software Engineers who are tasked with building the next generation operations automation & observability platform for our hybrid multi-cloud applications. This platform focuses on the deploy, operate and monitor phases of the DevOps lifecycle. The platform is primarily an extension and customisation of Kubernetes as our standard runtime platform, so prior experience as a software engineer working on or preferably extending Kubernetes is essential. 
 The SRE team also mentor and guide application squads on operational best practices for cloud native applications, such as configuration & secret management, observability engineering, data operations, security, etc. as well as partnering with these team to evolve a culture of SRE practices including fundamentals such as SLIs, SLOs and error budgets. The team will also be involved in production & non-production incidents, including post-mortems & advising and in some cases delivering permanent corrective actions.
 Key Responsibilities
Building & supporting the next generation Cloud Application Runtime Platform for Digital Technologies
Mentoring development squads on Kubernetes, cloud engineering, cloud native best practices including configuration & observability
Building self-service operations, delivery pipelines, primarily GitOps based with kubernetes controllers
Cloud native application monitoring, log aggregation and distributed tracing platforms and tooling
Supporting production incidents and solution of permanent corrective actions
 Requirements
Mandatory Experience
BSc in Computer Science or related discipline
Min. 8 years of work experience in Java software development, including 3+ years of Spring Boot microservice development. You will be required to sit a Java programming test.
Experience building and deploying cloud native applications on Kubernetes (EKS, AKS, OCP)
Solid understanding of Linux, networking & distributed systems
Observability tools, ELK, Prometheus, AWS CloudWatch, Grafana, Jaeger,OpenTelemetry, etc.
Desirable Experience
Building and deploying cloud native applications on the public cloud, ideally on AWS.
Working in a start-up or another environment with a wide scope of responsibilities
Working on a platform engineering team
Production support of systems, for example, on a L3 support rota, etc
Professional certifications in Java, Linux, Networks, AWS or Kubernetes a bonus
Beneficial if you have experience in some of the following:
Experience working on an SRE team / being part of an SRE maturity journey
Argo stack; ArgoCD for GitOps, Events, Workflows, Rollouts, etc
Go, Python or Groovy development
Experience analysing Java heap / thread dumps
Data Engineering & Analysis, ETL pipelines, etc.
Cloud Engineering on Hybrid multi-clouds using Terraform, Crossplane, AWS ACK & CDK
Network Mgmt. tools such as, Apigee, Kong, Envoy, NGINX, Istio
Configuration Mgmt. tools such as Ansible, Puppet or Chef
Application Performance Monitoring tools, such as Dynatrace, AppDynamics, Elastic APM
JBoss, Tomcat, Redis, PostgreSQL, MongoDB


We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated."
Java Developer,"Are you a Developer looking to progress your career in Java?

Join a team of Java experts in building solutions using industry-leading design, technology, and modern practices for software development!

As a Java Developer, your main tasks will be designing & building applications. However, as you will likely work on a variety of projects your responsibilities may also include:

Working with and supporting Technical Leaders in project execution and timely delivery.
Be involved in component design, development, and maintenance and take responsibility for personal technical quality standards within the project team.
Assist in defining structured practices, especially in source code management, building, and deployment.
Designing and implementing data storage solutions.
Optimizing performance in applications for maximum speed and scalability.
Getting feedback from users and clients and building solutions for them.
Assisting with the analysis of requirements.
Collaborating with other teams.

Qualifications:

At least 1 to 3 years of experience delivering Java applications
Good background in the Java technologies
Experience in Spring Boot
Good understanding of versioning control tools - Git.
Testing experience and familiarity with testing tools at all levels, unit, integration, and end-to-end testing.
Experience with automation, CI/CD will be an advantage.
Experience in delivering in an agile environment will be an advantage
Excellent communication and collaboration skills.
Proficient in English

You may also directly apply to our job portal - https://jobs.cxcglobal.com/job/33397/java-developer"
Platform Engineer,"Position Overview

The Platform Engineer envisions, designs, implements, tests, and rolls out platforms to host applications, systems, programs and database protocols in support of end users’ needs. He/She contributes to the definition of requirement and design specifications. He defines innovative approaches to platform development and integration of security aspects. He develops prototypes, creates software tools for test and automation, and evaluates latest best practices. He conducts quality assurance of platforms. He develops Application Programming Interfaces (APIs) to allow flexible and scalable interactions across applications, systems, programs and databases. He designs creative solutions for complex problems.

He applies structured thinking to develop solutions and is creative and innovative in designing new and improved platforms and approaches. He is a strong team player, who communicates effectively with others and guides junior members in the team.

Identify Requirements

Role & Responsibilities

Determine requirement and design specifications
Plan full platform development lifecycle from idea conception through release and maintenance
Recommend approaches that balance security, stability, and performance needs
Provide technical guidance on proposed solutions and alternatives

Design platforms /platform features

Prototype new platform solutions and/or new features for existing platforms
Perform platform capacity planning and demand forecasting
Perform code reviews
Implement best practices of service-oriented architecture
Participate in the quality assurance process
Implement data protection strategies, including user authorisation and access management

Implement platforms /platform features

Implement platforms / platform features
Test platforms to ensure best possible user experiences
Review resilience/disaster testing results
Define security best practices for the platform
Integrate third party software
Configure platform performance monitoring tools

Optimise platforms

Identify potential areas for platform improvement
Make architecture changes to platform to scale for growth
Optimise backend features and code logic to meet requirements for new products and initiatives
Implement best practices and frameworks in platform development
Automate common tasks to improve systems and processes
Establish automated test frameworks

Maintain Platforms

Prepare platform maintenance plans including timelines and resources needed
Set up disaster recovery solutions
Resolve platform failure incidents
Conduct root cause analysis
Develop technical and operational standards, procedures, technical documentation and metrics
Help establish best platform engineering practices

Requirements

Basic Qualifications:

A Bachelor's degree in any engineering discipline
Experience in a large scale environment
Hands-on experience with Windows, Linux operating systems
Demonstrable experience in using development languages such as Python, Perl, Java, Go, Ruby, Shell or other languages, to build automation tools
Hands on experience and knowledge in application/webservers like IIS, Tomcat, Apache, NGINX etc
Should be able to provide performance tuning recommendations for .Net, Java applications
Should have experience in data visualization tools like Dynatrace, Prometheus, Grafana, ELK etc

Good To Have Qualifications

Knowledge of open source tools will be added advantage
Experience with Agile development methodologies and DevOps environment
Practical knowledge of system architectures and networking
Experience in using Maven, Sonarque, Git, Nexus is an added advantage

Apply Now

Click Enter to update the description of Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
"Algorithm Engineer, TikTok e-Commerce","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team
Our team is responsible for developing large scale product knowledge graphs to improve online shopping experience. We are currently looking for talented software engineers that have a deep understanding of Natural Language Processing (NLP), Computer Vision (CV), Deep Learning (DL) and Machine Learning(ML).

Responsibilities
You will be developing state-of-the-art models to solve challenging problems that impact both the platform and millions of customers, including:
- Responsible for building and continuously optimizing algorithm solutions in product matching, price comparison etc. to improve supply operational efficiencies;
- Responsible for continuously maintaining and improving the robustness, stability and computational efficiencies of algorithm solutions in live business environment.

Qualifications

- Bachelor and above with major in computer science, computer engineering, statistics, applied mathematics, data science or other related disciplines.
- At least 1 year of experience and strong skills in at least one of the technological areas:
- Natural language generation, named entity recognition, machine translation, question answering, knowledge graph, information extraction, text mining and classification etc.
- Computer vision, facial recognition, multimodal learning, object detection & tracking, image classification etc.
- Machine learning, transfer learning, graph embedding, representative learning, large-scale optimization, recommendation, reinforcement learning, etc.
- Work experience in e-commerce or Internet industry is preferred.
- Strong coding skills in at least one of the following programming frameworks, e.g. Python, Java, C/C++, Spark etc.; Familiaer with at least one of the following deep learning frameworks, e.g., PyTorch, TensorFlow, Keras etc.
- Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Infrastructure Engineer - APAC,"The Role

We are seeking a highly qualified and talented technologist to join us as a member of our Infrastructure Engineering team in either our Hong Kong or Singapore offices. This team is responsible for the architecture, design, administration and support of our global infrastructure. You will be a self-starter with excellent communication skills, have confidence making critical decisions and work as part of a highly technical, global team.

What You’ll Do

The Infrastructure Engineer will help support and expand the infrastructure environment at Schonfeld. You will take an active role in:
Designing and implementing the Linux server solutions
Designing and implementing storage solutions
Consulting with Portfolio Managers to gather requirements
Providing level 2 systems support in a 24/7 environment
Helping with the automation of system administration tasks
Evaluating new technologies to improve performance, reliability, and scalability of systems.
Documenting processes and procedures for support staff
Participating in a weekly on-call rotation for after-hours support
What You Need

What you’ll bring
In depth Linux engineering experience, including performance tuning, stability (RedHat / Ubuntu)
Experience using configuration management tools (Ansible preferred)
Virtualization experience using VMware
Advanced scripting skills (Bash, Python)
NFS (Network File System) infrastructure experience
Experience with storage systems
Strong sense of accountability and ownership, with a track record of delivering results
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, both verbal and written
Positive mindset and ability to work effectively as part of a global team
We’d Love If You Had
Cloud architecture and administration experience, preferably in AWS.
Experience using DevOps technologies such as Docker/Kubernetes
Enjoys working with low latency systems
Experience working with GPFS
Our culture

The firm’s ethos is embedded in our people. ‘Talent is our strategy’ is our mantra and drives how we approach all initiatives at the firm. We believe our success is because of our people, so putting our talent above all else is our top priority.

Schonfeld strives to create an environment where our people can thrive. We foster a teamwork-oriented, collaborative environment where ideas at any level are encouraged and shared. The development and advancement of our talent is honed through interactions with each other, learning & educational offerings, and through opportunities to make impactful contributions. In our agile environment, engineers are expected to self-organize and collaborate on the best way to solve problems, and they are collectively responsible for the entire team's delivery. Engineering teams are small and cross-functional, and value learning and knowledge sharing.

At Schonfeld, we strive to cultivate a sense of belonging throughout all of our employees with Diversity, Equity and Inclusion at the forefront of this mission. As a firm we are committed to creating a hiring process which is not only fair, but also welcoming and supportive. On a daily basis, our employees welcome diversity across identity, thought, people and views which serves as the foundation of our culture and success. You can learn more about our DEI initiatives here - Belonging @ Schonfeld.

Who We Are

Schonfeld Strategic Advisors is a multi-manager platform that invests its capital with Internal and Partner portfolio managers, primarily on an exclusive or semi-exclusive basis, across four trading strategies; quantitative, fundamental equity, tactical trading and discretionary macro & fixed income. We have created a unique structure to provide global portfolio managers with autonomy, flexibility and support to best enable them to maximize the value of their businesses.

Over the last 30 years, Schonfeld has successfully capitalized on inefficiencies and opportunities within the markets. We have developed and invested heavily in proprietary technology, infrastructure and risk analytics and continue to capitalize on new opportunities. In 2021 we launched our newest strategy, discretionary macro & fixed income as part of the continual growth of Schonfeld’s investible universe. Our portfolio exposure has expanded across the Americas, Europe and Asia as well as multiple asset classes and products."
Principal Software Development Engineer,"Want to be a part of our team?

Plans, designs, develops and tests software systems or applications for software enhancements and new products including cloud-based or internet-related tools.

Working at NTT

Plans, designs, develops and tests software systems or applications for software enhancements and new products including cloud-based or internet-related tools.

What will make you a good fit for the role?

Standard career level descriptor for job level:
Have broad expertise, uses skills to achieve goals in creative and effective ways
Works on significant issues
Creates formal networks involving coordination among groups
Exercises independent judgment in methods, techniques and evaluation criteria to obtain results
May supervise the activities of others
Typically requires extensive related experience with a Bachelor’s or equivalent degree; or extensive experience and a Master’s or equivalent degree; or a PhD or equivalent with moderate experience; or equivalent experience"
Senior Systems Engineer,"Aria Health, a ResMed company, develops solutions for treating and managing lymphedema. Aria Health is headquartered in San Diego, and the first startup business to be commercialized out of ResMed’s new business incubator in 2019. Our first product, Aria Free, is a revolutionary pneumatic compression system developed to create a better therapy experience. Aria Free, our flagship product, was developed in association with ResMed. For thirty years, ResMed has been a leader in health technology, transforming care for people with sleep apnea, COPD, and other chronic diseases. The company continues to lead digital health making an impact with cloud-connected medical devices and out-of-hospital software solutions that deliver quality outcomes and quality of life for healthcare providers and those they serve.

To learn more visit ariahealth.com

Aria Health is a new business within the ResMed Strategy and Ventures group that is working to transform the management of lymphedema and empower each and every patient to live their healthiest life.

As a Senior Systems Engineer, you will develop engineering requirements and guide architectural design to ensure that products meet customer and business expectations for safety, regulatory, quality, performance, functionality, reliability and efficacy.

Reporting into the Senior Manager, Product Development and located in the Singapore Campus, the Senior Systems Engineer will work closely with the Product Owner and cross functions to develop system requirements for Aria Health PD

Responsibilities And Accountabilities

Work with Product Owner and engineering disciplines to translate user requirements and usage scenarios into system and design specifications to ensure product achieves performance, functionality and reliability
Define the architectural interfaces and ensure system components integrate successfully
Develop and maintain PD system documentation (ensuring full traceability of requirements) adhering to Inova Lab’s QMS
Complete and maintain the Risk Management file
Resolve technical issues with the engineering disciplines and review issues with the XFT where required.
Conduct project design review with the XFT at each design checkpoint.
Work with Verification & Validation department to define the plan to demonstrate that product meets technical specifications, user requirements and usage scenario.
Support human factors engineering, including developing usability FMEAs, protocols and reports
Ensure that systems engineering processes are adhered to and recommend updates to processes where appropriate
Work within Inova Labs’ quality system and stay abreast of evolving regulations/quality standards

Position-Specific Skills And Challenges

Experience in risk management and understanding medical device development activities across a broad set of functions including quality and regulatory
Extensive knowledge of hierarchical systems design and decomposition
Ability to communicate complex ideas effectively, both verbally and in writing
Exceptional analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment
Ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization
Logical and methodical approach in system

Qualifications And Experience

Minimum five years’ experience working in a system engineering capacity
Experience in new product development environment
Medical devices industry experience preferred.

Joining us is more than saying “yes” to making the world a healthier place. It’s discovering a career that’s challenging, supportive and inspiring. Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones. We focus on creating a diverse and inclusive culture, encouraging individual expression in the workplace and thrive on the innovative ideas this generates. If this sounds like the workplace for you, apply now!"
Infrastructure Engineer (Data Systems) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

ByteDance will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require ByteDance's sponsorship of a visa.

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with ByteDance.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all ByteDance and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About The Team

The Data Center Infrastructure Engineering team supports the company's fast growth by building and operating hyperscale datacenters. The team manages the end to end lifecycle of server fleet, providing cloud solutions and various infrastructure services ensuring that they are scalable and are reliable.

Responsibilities

Design and build infrastructure services, systems, and platforms;
Develop tools, automation, and monitors to operate infrastructure efficiently;
Work in a fast-paced environment and be responsible end-to-end to the production environment by responding to performance and reliability issues and participating rotational on calls;
Help improve the whole lifecycle of infrastructure services from inception and design throughout development, to deployment, user support and refinement.

Qualifications

Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline;
Experience in one or more programming languages such as Java, C++, Go, or scripting experience in Shell and Python.

Preferred Qualifications

Experience or knowledge in: Unix/Linux systems from kernel to shell and beyond;
Experience or knowledge in: Infrastructure solutions, AWS, Google, Azures, and other cloud services;
Experience or knowledge in: Networking systems (TCP/IP, BGP, DNS, etc.);
Experience or knowledge in: Traffic systems such as load balancers, NAT, and proxies, etc.;
Experience or knowledge in: Big data solutions such as Elasticsearch, Spark and Hadoop, which handle Terabytes of data;
Experience or knowledge in: Building platform, automation, and tools to manage server fleet, their life cycles and systems running on top;
Self-driven and capable of coping with ambiguity and move projects from concept to delivery;
Strong in analytical skills and the ability to solve real world problems in a fast-moving environment;
Experience or knowledge in: Developing and operating one or more following systems - OpenStack, Kubernetes, Nginx, ipvs, ELK stack, Hadoop, etc.

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://jobs.bytedance.com/en/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareer@bytedance.com."
Software Engineer,"Company Overview

KLA is a global leader in diversified electronics for the semiconductor manufacturing ecosystem. Virtually every electronic device in the world is produced using our technologies. No laptop, smartphone, wearable device, voice-controlled gadget, flexible screen, VR device or smart car would have made it into your hands without us. KLA invents systems and solutions for the manufacturing of wafers and reticles, integrated circuits, packaging, printed circuit boards and flat panel displays. The innovative ideas and devices that are advancing humanity all begin with inspiration, research and development. KLA focuses more than average on innovation and we invest 15% of sales back into R&D. Our expert teams of physicists, engineers, data scientists and problem-solvers work together with the world’s leading technology providers to accelerate the delivery of tomorrow’s electronic devices. Life here is exciting and our teams thrive on tackling really hard problems. There is never a dull moment with us.

Group/Division

The ICOS Vision Systems division focuses on the backend of the line semiconductor industry providing fully automated tools to inspect and sort, finished integrated circuit packages. For more than 15 years, ICOS has been a market leader with tray-to-tray and tray-to-tape inspection and sorting tools found in the production facilities of all major chipmakers in the world. Our market-leading technology and superior customer service requires strong talent in optics, machine control, algorithms and applications within our engineering teams. The ICOS division headquarters are in Leuven, Belgium with additional engineering and manufacturing operations in Hong Kong and Shenzhen, China.

Job Description

Company Overview

Calling the adventurers ready to join a company that's pushing the limits of nanotechnology to keep the digital revolution rolling. At KLA, we're making technology advancements that are bigger—and tinier—than the world has ever seen.

Who are we? We research, develop, and manufacture the world's most advanced inspection and measurement equipment for the semiconductor and nanoelectronics industries. We enable the digital age by pushing the boundaries of technology, creating tools capable of finding defects smaller than a wavelength of visible light. We create smarter processes so that technology leaders can manufacture high-performance chips—the kind in that phone in your pocket, the tablet on your desk and nearly every electronic device you own—faster and better. We're passionate about creating solutions that drive progress and help people do what wouldn't be possible without us. The future is calling. Will you answer?

Group/Division

The ICOS Vision Systems division focuses on the backend of the line semiconductor industry providing fully automated tools to inspect and sort, finished integrated circuit packages. For more than 20 years, ICOS has been a market leader with tray-to-tray and tray-to-tape inspection and sorting tools found in the production facilities of all major chipmakers in the world. Our market-leading technology and superior customer service requires strong talent in optics, machine control, algorithms, and applications within our engineering teams. The ICOS division headquarters are in Leuven, Belgium with additional engineering and manufacturing operations in Hong Kong, Shenzhen China, and Singapore.

Responsibilities

As an experienced software developer in our component inspection development team,

You will be part of an international Scrum team that uses agile standard methodologies to build stable and maintainable software.
You will work with the latest techniques in C++ and C# development and understand the importance of crafting unit tests and integration tests while working in software stacks close to machine control.
You will have the opportunity to occasionally travel to customers and discover new places and cultures along the way.
From on the edge software development, designing advanced machines, defining, and implementing image processing algorithms or crafting new ways to do optical inspections, we do it all, and we need your talent to keep going one step beyond!

Qualifications

Minimum a Bachelors degree in engineering with at least 5 years of experience or similar through experience.
Experience with modern C++ software development.
Knowledge of object-oriented design, design patterns, and UML.
An affinity to automation.
Knowledge of C#, WPF, Python, GIT and Scrum are a plus.
Strong communication, analytical, and problem-solving skills.
Proficient in English.

Minimum Qualifications

Doctorate (Academic) or work experience of 0 years , Master's Level Degree or work experience of 2 years , Bachelor's Level Degree or work experience of 5 years

We offer a competitive, family friendly total rewards package. We design our programs to reflect our commitment to an inclusive environment, while ensuring we provide benefits that meet the diverse needs of our employees.

KLA is proud to be an equal opportunity employer"
"Algorithm Engineer, AML Engine Dedup","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team:
Focus on CV technologies video representation and large-scale retrieval, build the duplicated/similarity relationship between billions of videos, support TikTok and its affiliates global products with services as deduplication, originality recognition, copyright detection and content moderation

- Build the Dedup and Copyright system, supports billions of users all over the world;
- Based on the product requirements, develop models and systems to detect duplicated and similar materials among billions of videos;
- Introduce new AI technologies to our online system and improve the performance;
- Improve the reliability of the system, manage the challenges of scale and complexity;

Qualifications

- Bachelor or higher degrees in computer science or related discipline;
- Min 1 year of experience in Machine Learning, familiar with at least one DeepLearning framework, e.g. PyTorch, Tensorflow.
- Experienced in Multimedia or Computer Vision, e.g. Image/Video/Audio retrieval, Representation Learning, Re-Identification, Unsupervised/Self-supervised learning.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Backend Engineer, Intelligent Video Creation","Responsibilities

About TikTok:
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok global offices include Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo. Now we are building up an engineering team for the core TikTok video production in Singapore.

About Video Creation Team:
Our team's mission is to empower TikTok users to turn creativity into reality via videos. We build the core video creation product to support tens of millions of TikTok creators every day. All the viral props and effects you find on TikTok are developed by us, via close collaboration with TikTok AR effects and multimedia teams. Our goal is to build the world's best video creation software. On this team, you will be working with our XFN partners to define a world-class video creation experience, designing the architecture of TikTok video creation tools and pipelines, and shipping cutting-edge features to take TikTok to the next level.

1.Collaborate with AR Effect team, Computer Vision team and Digital Video & Audio team to define a world-class video creation experience.
2.Learn and understand how Bytedance product works and help build end-to-end solutions.
3.Design and implement large-scale backend systems that empower Bytedance video creation products.
4.Build world-class products, which combine usability, accessibility, elegance, performance, and maintainability. 5.Adopt automated and manual test strategies to ensure product quality.

Qualifications

1. Proficient in at least one coding language, including but not limited to Go, Java, Nodejs, C++.
2. Strong understanding of software development principles, capabilities and limitations of frontend and server backend.
3. Ability to understand and debug large and complex code bases.
4. Good communication and collaboration skills.
5. Experience building and maintaining server/back-end architecture for mobile or PC platforms.
6. Experience with backend components, including: Mysql, Kafka, RocketMQ, Redis etc.."
DevOps & Web Development Engineer,"About Us

The Dyson software team are responsible for all aspects of the product development lifecycle. Our teams support Research & NPI with bringing their new ideas to like as well as the delivery of all the Embedded software inside the products, the Dyson Link Mobile Apps (iOS, Android & WeChat) as well as the Cloud systems which support our analytics, machine learning and data science teams.

Dyson is growing into new product categories and we are looking to build out a new team to support our ambitions. This team will look at building products based using the Android platform. Over time the team will grow in the UK, and Singapore. We all come from a variety of educational backgrounds and experience levels; not all of us are computer science graduates. We believe that teams composed of people from diverse backgrounds are more successful and innovative.

Our teams have the autonomy to manage their own work using Scrum or Kanban frameworks, each honing their ways of working through regular retrospectives and knowledge sharing. We all share a commitment to creating high-quality code, and engineers choose to follow practices such as pair programming, mobbing, and test-driven development. We also regularly share our knowledge and interests peer-to-peer through ‘community meetings’, which have led to the adoption of new technologies and improved cross-team collaboration.

We often need to interact with people from different parts of the business, such as mobile app development, cloud development as well as product management. We plan in 5-sprint ‘increments’, based on the best bits of the Scaled Agile Framework. This gives us more visibility of upcoming work while remaining responsive and allows us to collaborate effectively with other teams within our 15,000-person organisation. Our programs also work with some exciting external partners in USA & Asia.

Mutual trust and respect between team members is important to build a supportive environment where people can do their best work.

About The Role

We have a great opportunity for a DevOps & Web Development Engineer within the Wearables Software Team based in SEA.

Key Responsibilities

You’ll be enabling the Continuous Delivery Pipeline for an exciting new category of Android based products
You’ll develop scripts for automation as well as configure applications & tools to meet business needs.
Evolve in house and open source tools to add new functionaltiy
You will participate in planning, definition, and high-level design of the solution and exploration of solution alternatives.
Collaborate with colleagues from other disciplines, including test engineers, product owners, Scrum Masters, UX/UI designers and software engineers from both internal & external teams.
Clarification and refinement of user stories and non-functional requirements with the wider Team
About You

An experienced DevOps developer with Experience in Azure, AWS or GCP
Hands on experience with Jenkins, Docker, Kubernetes, Python, Bash
Developer experience working with GIT, NodeJS, Python &/or Linux
Comfortable working with and customising open-source projects to meet business needs
It’s essential you’re a self-starter and able to drive early concepts through to production
Willingness to explore new tools and techniques to solve problems
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and confident presenting your work and representing the team at all levels.
You’ll be able to build consensus with stakeholders to ensure we deliver what our customers and the wider business needs.

Behaviours

Clear focus and drive for quality & perfection – you’ll be able to find and maintain focus and priority in a rapidly evolving environment.
Curious, inventive and creative - be prepared to solve tough problems and look beyond convention.
Effective communicator - concise and timely communication, managing facts and emotion
Global collaborator - open minded to ideas from other perspectives
Resilient - prepared to be challenged and thrive in change

We Would Love It If You Also Had

Hands on experience with Google Cloud Platform and its associated services
A passion for Android, Apps, Data, IoT & software which makes people’s lives better
Knowledge of Embedded Linux and Realtime operating systems especial build system
Web Development skills in JavaScript, HTML, CSS, Flask, SQL, Mongodb etc
Dashboarding tools like Grafana, PowerBI or Tableau
Knowledge of Sonarqube, Artifactory, BlackDuck
Security tools and techniques (Certificate Management, code signing)
An appreciation of using Agile techniques in large teams (Less, SAFe etc.)

Dyson is an equal opportunity employer. We know that great minds don’t think alike, and it takes all kinds of minds to make our technology so unique. We welcome applications from all backgrounds and employment decisions are made without regard to race, colour, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other any other dimension of diversity."
Security Engineer 3 (Bug Bounty),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.

Job Description Summary:

PayPal’s Bug Bounty team is growing, and looking for engineers that thrive working on diverse security vulnerabilities each week. In this role, you will triage, reproduce, and track issues reported to the Bug Bounty Program through effective communication with engineering teams, various PayPal business units, and additional stakeholders. You will also collaborate with the team to identify and drive improvements and growth within the program. Engineers in this role should understand how to quantify risk and be capable of discussing the impact of a security finding to a wide variety of audiences.

Job Description:

Key Responsibilities:

Triage vulnerability reports from the Bug Bounty Program
Objectively assess risk to the company and our customers
Reproduce and document additional details for partner teams to mitigate and remediate issues based on priority
Partner and collaborate with research community as necessary to manage reports, the program, or other needs
Communicate and collaborate with internal stakeholders to drive the vulnerability lifecycle within SLAs
Consult with security teammates to provide security guidance to engineering teams where needed
Learn the tools and techniques being used in order to build PoC’s, understand trends, and aid in decisions that improve the overall program


Requirements:

Effective communications skills, both written and verbal
Foundational understanding of common types of vulnerabilities with the ability to analyze, reproduce, and determine impact
2+ years of security testing experience, including web and mobile applications
Experience in one or more of software development, security penetration testing, vulnerability management, or application security
Demonstrated ability and desire to learn and develop new security concepts, techniques and tactics
Ability to work independently with minimal supervision
Experience as a security researcher on Bug Bounty programs a plus


Our Benefits:

At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.

We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:

To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

PayPal has remained at the forefront of the digital payment revolution for more than 20 years. By leveraging technology to make financial services and commerce more convenient, affordable, and secure, the PayPal platform is empowering more than 400 million consumers and merchants in more than 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy. For more information, visit paypal.com.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.

As part of PayPal’s commitment to employees’ health and safety, we have established in-office Covid-19 protocols and requirements, based on expert guidance. Depending on location, this might include a Covid-19 vaccination requirement for any employee whose role requires them to work onsite. Employees may request reasonable accommodation based on a medical condition or religious belief that prevents them from being vaccinated.

REQ ID R0097911"
NLP Engineer - AI Lab,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

About The Team

Our NLP team focuses on solving language barriers and promoting information flowing all over the world. We invite researchers and engineers in machine learning and natural language processing at all levels. We aim at pushing the limits of machine intelligence.

Responsibilities

Responsible for development of NLP technologies in our products
Participate in and support the incubation of new NLP technologies
Participate in research on NLP technologies

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields
Rich experiences and strong skills in development of technologies in some of the following areas,
Natural language understanding
Natural language generation
Knowledge and reasoning
Recommendation and search
Reinforcement learning
Deep learning and representation learning
Machine Translation
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Strong computer science and coding skills (e.g. Python/Java/Go/C/C++);
Work and collaborate well with team members;
Senior candidates have the ability to organize and lead teams and projects.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace.

At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Machine Learning Engineer, E-Commerce Risk Control","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The E-Commerce Risk Control (ECRC) Team Is Missioned

To protect Tiktok E-Commerce users, including and beyond buyer, seller, creator;
By securing the integrity of our ecommerce ecosystem and providing a safe shopping experience on the platform;
Through building infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as collaborating with many cross-functional teams and stakeholders.

The ECRC team works to minimize the damage of inauthentic behaviors on Tiktok E-Commerce platforms (e.g. TikTok Shop, Jumanji, Fanno), covering multiple classical and novel community and business risk areas such as account integrity, incentive abuse, malicious activities, brushing, click-farm, information leakage etc.

In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and robust, intelligent and privacy-safe, secure and product-friendly systems and solutions. Our challenges are not some regular day-to-day technical puzzles -- You'll be part of a team that's developing novel solutions to first-seen challenges of a non-stop evolvement of a phenomenal product eco-system. The work needs to be fast, transferrable, while still down to the ground to making quick and solid differences.

Responsibilities

Build rules, algorithms and machine learning models, to respond to and mitigate business risks in Tiktok products/platforms. Such risks include and are not limited to account integrity, scapler,deal-hunter, malicious activities, brushing, click-farm, information leakage etc.
Analyze business and security data, uncover evolving attack motion, identify weaknesses and opportunities in risk defense solutions, explore new space from the discoveries.
Define risk control measurements. Quantify, generalize and monitor risk related business and operational metrics. Align risk teams and their stakeholders on risk control numeric goals, promote impact-oriented, data-driven data science practices for risks.

Qualifications

Bachelor or degrees above in computer science, statistics, math, internet security or other relevant STEM majors (e.g. finance if applying for financial fraud roles).
Solid data science skills. Proficiency in statistical analytical tools, such as SQL, R and Python.
Familiarity with machine learning or social/content online platform analytics. Bonus given to proficiency in modern machine learning applications.
Ability to think critically, objectively, rationally. Reason and communicate in result-oriented, data-driven manner. High autonomy."
"Algorithm Engineer (Graph), TikTok e-Commerce","Responsibilities

- Responsible for the technology selection and architecture design of graph learning application scenarios, and develop cutting-edge graph learning algorithms such as graph calculation, graph neural networks, and multimodal representation;
- Mining massive data of content-based e-commerce livestream, commodities, merchants, creators and other entities, modeling large-scale networks, and supporting business scenarios such as content understanding/multimodal representation/community mining to solve problems;
- Participate in the construction of a large-scale ByteGraph and graph learning platform to support the basic capabilities of billion-node and billion-edge graph learning;
- Explore the cutting-edge technology of research map learning direction and land it in real business scenes.

Qualifications

- Familiar with one or more deep learning/graph neural networks frameworks such as TensorFlow, Pytorch, DGL, PyG, etc.
- Familiar with cutting-edge algorithms in large-scale graph learning related fields, including but not limited to graph neural networks, graph feature learning, graph classification, graph anomaly detection, community discovery, label propagation, self-supervised/semi-supervised learning, etc., with a certain depth and breadth;
- Familiar with the application of graph algorithm in data mining, search recommendation, content understanding, governance risk control is preferred;
- Proficient in using big data tools Hive, Spark, Hadoop, familiar with graph calculation or ByteGraph such as GraphX, Neo4j is preferred;
- Top conferences in data mining, machine learning (KDD, ICML, NIPS, VLDB, etc.) and other fields have articles published preferred."
Machine Learning Engineer,"Getting onboard Razer will place you on a global mission to revolutionize the way the world games. Razer is a place to do great work, offering you the opportunity to make an impact globally while working across a global team located across 5 continents. Razer is also a great place to work, providing you the unique, gamer-centric #LifeAtRazer experience that will put you in an accelerated growth, both personally and professionally.

Job Responsibilities

Razer's analytics & insights team is growing and we are looking for a machine learning engineer with 1 to 2 years of experience in designing and developing machine learning systems to join us.

Build, test data and model pipelines for machine learning applications and analytics purpose.
Perform extract, transform, load operations from multiple data sources.
Design, build, test, validate, and deploy machine learning systems based on requirements to productionize models for product development, marketing campaigns and business strategies.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze data quality and model performance.
Build data platform tools for stakeholders and team members for data visualization, catalog, and observability

Pre-Requisites

A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams.
Experience in programming languages such as Python, SQL.
Knowledge of machine learning data structures and modeling, software architecture, libraries and frameworks to create data science products that accomplishes outlined goals.
Experience using orchestration tools like Airflow or Prefect, distributed computing framework like Spark or Dask.
Demonstrated experience in applying DevSecOps, DataOps and MLOps.
Developed and deployed applications running on cloud systems such as AWS, Azure or Google Cloud Platform using Infrastructure as code tools such as Terraform, containerization tools like Dockers.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: PowerBI, Tableau.
Experience on working with Enterprise level data platform and product would be a plus
Has a Bachelor or Masters degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics or another quantitative field.

Are you game?"
C++/Java/Java Springboot Developers,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
For us at ST Engineering Mission Software and Services, we mainly deal with Defence, Homeland Security , and Public projects.

Looking for 2-3 years experience in Java or Java springboot experience. Senior java developer profile per below description.

Depending on projects. Eg include

Responsibilities
Develop, maintain, and enhance software application systems with complex functional requirements and high performance and availability requirements
Perform system analysis and design and define technical solutions for software change requests and enhancements
Perform software integration test and support system integration test and performance test
Perform troubleshooting and production support
Maintain and update software documentation
Requirements
Diploma/Degree in Computer Science / Information Technology / Software Engineering
Knowledge in Java, J2EE, Spring, Hibernate, JVM, WebLogic, Oracle DB, SQL Server
Experience of developing software application using in-memory data grid such as Oracle Coherence or similar products
Proficient in OOAD and UML
Familiar in software unit test
Familiar in various software development tools
Familiar in Docker and Kubernetes
Experience of full SDLC

Desired Skills and Experience
UML, Kubernetes, Oracle, Homeland Security, Software Engineering, System Integration, Software Documentation, SDLC, Weblogic, SQL, SQL Server, Docker, Java, J2EE, Software Development, C++, Hibernate"
Software Developer JO-230103-301357,"Our Client

Job Description

Our client is a leading global quantitative trading company based in Chicago, Austin & Amsterdam. The business develops and implements quantitative trading strategies in exchange-traded financial products, trading exclusively for its own account. The company trades in a variety of asset classes, markets, and geographies.

As a software developer, you will design, engineer, and implement the Firm's trading software in the C++ programming language. You will work in close collaboration with the research, systems, and operations teams to architect, implement and analyze new automated electronic trading algorithms. You will play a key role in designing and constructing the Firm's software infrastructure to support new and existing lines of business. In addition, you will expand the Firm's proprietary research platform to improve performance and support new exchanges, products, and functionality.

The Responsibilities

Developing and maintaining a large-scale 24-hour automated trading system
Solving technical problems and implementing solutions
Leverage existing infrastructure, extending functionality when necessary
Build a deep understanding of exchange behavior to integrate into the existing trading system
Design, implement and maintain distributed storage system with various performance and reliability requirements
Address performance limitations within own business software, open-source libraries and application
Investigate new technologies to improve stability, scalability, and performance
Implement new trading strategies in collaboration with research and operations teams
Investigate signal issues for trading system
Reconcile differences between trading strategies performance in simulation versus production
Optimize the performance of the live trading system and existing code using lock-free data structures, compiler intrinsic, etc.

The Requirements

Bachelor's degree required in Computer Science/ Information Technology or equivalent
Experience with C++/Java
At least 3 years of experience in the trading industry
Well-versed in the fundamentals of software engineering
Committed to designing and implementing fully automated, scalable, and maintainable solutions with extensive testing
Strong problem solving and communication skills
Experience using Linux operating system
Experience in software analysis for bug fixing and development

What's On Offer

Competitive salary and benefit package
Working for one of the globally acknowledged company within the industry. A truly established and global leader in the industry
Available avenues to contributes positively for the organization to grow and being recognized for it

Disclaimer: The Company complies with the Tripartite Guidelines on Fair Employment Practices (TGFEP), including the prevailing guidelines on recruitment. All qualified applicants will be considered for the position regardless of their age, race, religion, nationality, marital status, or family responsibilities. A more detailed discussion of the TGFEP is available on the Tripartite Alliance for Fair and Progressive Employment Practices (TAFEP) website at https://www.tal.sg/tafep"
Machine Learning Engineer - E-Commerce Risk Control,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The E-Commerce Risk Control (ECRC) Team Is Missioned

To protect Tiktok E-Commerce users, including and beyond buyer, seller, creator;
By securing the integrity of our ecommerce ecosystem and providing a safe shopping experience on the platform;
Through building infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as collaborating with many cross-functional teams and stakeholders.

The ECRC team works to minimize the damage of inauthentic behaviors on Tiktok E-Commerce platforms (e.g. TikTok Shop, Jumanji, Fanno), covering multiple classical and novel community and business risk areas such as account integrity, incentive abuse, malicious activities, brushing, click-farm, information leakage etc.

In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and robust, intelligent and privacy-safe, secure and product-friendly systems and solutions. Our challenges are not some regular day-to-day technical puzzles -- You'll be part of a team that's developing novel solutions to first-seen challenges of a non-stop evolvement of a phenomenal product eco-system. The work needs to be fast, transferrable, while still down to the ground to making quick and solid differences.

Responsibilities

Build rules, algorithms and machine learning models, to respond to and mitigate business risks in Tiktok products/platforms. Such risks include and are not limited to account integrity, scapler,deal-hunter, malicious activities, brushing, click-farm, information leakage etc.
Analyze business and security data, uncover evolving attack motion, identify weaknesses and opportunities in risk defense solutions, explore new space from the discoveries.
Define risk control measurements. Quantify, generalize and monitor risk related business and operational metrics. Align risk teams and their stakeholders on risk control numeric goals, promote impact-oriented, data-driven data science practices for risks.

Qualifications

Bachelor or degrees above in computer science, statistics, math, internet security or other relevant STEM majors (e.g. finance if applying for financial fraud roles).
At least 5 years with solid data science skills. Proficiency in statistical analytical tools, such as SQL, R and Python.
Familiarity with machine learning or social/content online platform analytics. Bonus given to proficiency in modern machine learning applications.
Ability to think critically, objectively, rationally. Reason and communicate in result-oriented, data-driven manner. High autonomy."
Python Programmer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Mandatory Skill(s)
At least 2 years of experience as a Unix shell or Python developer
Strong design and programming skills in Unix shell, Python and related server side technologies
Good experience in developing high quality software code in accordance to development guidelines and coding standards
Should have experience in reviewing and analysing the effectiveness of existing systems and develop strategies to improve them
Desirable Skill(s)
Strong experience in Unix shell, Python and SQL
Experience in infra related task automation
Knowledge on SQL queries and DB concepts
To apply please click the Apply button or send us your updated profile to recruit@percept-solutions.com

EA Licence No.:18S9405 / EA Reg. No.:R1330864

Percept Solutions is undergoing a growth phase and are on the lookout for talent. Applicants are encouraged to follow Percept Solutions on LinkedIn @ https://www.linkedin.com/company/percept-solutions/ to stay up to date on our upcoming roles and events.
Desired Skills and Experience
Mentoring, MVC, Python scripting, Analytical Skills, Unix shell, SQL, Compliance, Python, Python Programming, Stackless Python"
Direct Custody Tech - Senior Java Software Developer - Associate,"As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You'll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment-one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.

DCC Technology team is part of broader Custody technologies under Securities Services BU. We offer technology solutions for direct market connectivity to our clients for settlements and asset servicing. The technology stack is a good mix of in house and vendor platforms using open source technologies which gives a diverse exposure in terms of solution design and delivery management.

This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:

Required Skills/Experience

Bachelor Degree in Computer Science/ Information systems/ Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 8 years of Software development hands on experience
Advance knowledge of core Java code writing using the latest open source frameworks - i.e. Spring framework, Hibernate framework, MVC Framework
Understanding of technology architecture and ability to understand the complex system flows
Java/J2EE, JMS based messaging, Multi-threaded programming, JavaScript, JSP, AJAX, CSS.
Debugging skills - Java, web app and SQL debugging
Good knowledge of Oracle Database and SQL writing
Apache, Tomcat, Maven
Web Services
SQL performance tuning, web application performance analysis and tuning, analyzing performance metrics
Hands on experience on shell scripts
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Ability to conduct business analysis and comprehend functional requirements

Preferred Skills/Experience

Prior domain experience in settlements and asset servicing functions
Ability to articulate and present to business audience
Agile development experience

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Senior Fullstack Developer (Climate Tech),"We are currently seeking a Senior Fullstack Software Engineer specializing in .Net Framework and Angular to join our JLL Technologies Revenue team to work on climate tech.

JLL announced our aim to achieve net zero carbon emissions by 2040 across all areas of its operations, including the client sites we manage, globally. https://www.jll.com.sg/en/newsroom/jll-commits-to-net-zero-target-for-2040. As one of the various strategies to achieve this, our team is currently growing and you will get a chance to work on a climate tech system that helps our clients (as well as ourselves), to bring our operational carbon footprint and greenhouse gases down. Join us today, and together we will make this a reality.

About JLL Technologies –

JLL Technologies is a specialized group within JLL. We deliver unparalleled digital advisory, implementation, and services solutions to organizations globally. We provide best-in-class technologies to bring digital ambitions to life aligning technology, people and processes. Our goal is to leverage technology to increase the value and liquidity of the world's buildings, while enhancing the productivity and the happiness of those that occupy them.

What This Job Involves

As a Fullstack Engineer at JLL Technologies, your responsibilities are to:

Take part in system development including analysis, coding, and testing in an agile product engineering team.
Work with the product management team to design new products or enhancements.
To develop business requirements into cost-effective and elegant technical solutions.
Perform peer design and code reviews with other software engineers.
Help to evaluate requirements and solutions from a technical perspective and implement custom built solutions in JLL environment.
Perform estimates of user stories that are to be implemented to help with product engineering planning.
Mentor less experienced engineers on proper standards/techniques to improve their development practices and efficiency.
Write scripts to perform unit testing, system integration testing and assist with user acceptance testing support.
Perform non-production and production deployment processes as scheduled.
Provide on-going support to the application.

Technical Skills & Competencies

Mandatory:

Worked on Angular projects
Worked on .Net Framework C# projects
Able to write unit tests in test frameworks
Proficient in HTML, CSS
Experience working with Authentication standards such as OpenID Connect
ASP.Net, Entity Framework
Relational Databases (SQL Server)
Consuming and writing RESTful APIs
Familiar working in agile projects
Source code control in git
Using CI/CD pipelines for build and deploy

Preferable:

If you also know other technologies like .Net Core/.Net 5.0/Java/React
SQL performance tuning experience
Azure Data Factory
API Management Platform (Azure APIM)
Experience working on large datasets
Experience optimizing complicated SQL queries
Architecting Applications in Microsoft Azure
API Design concepts and Development of RESTful web services
Experience using CI/CD tools
Experience with Tools and Best Practices for Secure Application Development

Sound like the job you’re looking for? Before you apply it’s also worth knowing what we’re looking for:

Education And Experience

A Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution is required.
5-8 years of experience in developing full stack applications is required.
Reliable, self-motivated, and self-disciplined individual.
Exceptional debugging skills and some experience with performance tuning.
Effective written and verbal communication skills.
Excellent technical, analytical and organizational skills.
Good range of hands-on technical experience

What You Can Expect From Us

We succeed together—across the desk and around the globe and believe the best inspire the best, so we invest in supporting each other, learning together and celebrating our success.

Our Total Rewards program reflects our commitment to helping you achieve your career ambitions, recognizing your contributions, investing in your well-being and providing competitive benefits and pay.

Apply today!

Apply quoting reference [JOB NUMBER] at jll.com/careers."
URGENT!!! Firmware Engineer (C++ / Peripherals / Embedded),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Highlights
MNC, Manufacturing Industry
Great career progression
Great remuneration and benefits
Friendly environment, work life balance
Job Descriptions
Design, develop and perform system/software verification & validation on embedded systems
Maintain and improve the performance of existing software
Develop system on gateways and embedded controllers system communicating over wire and wireless channels
Conduct design review, bug fix and update/create design documentation
Work with other teams to implement and test on various devices for interconnectivity.
Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology, Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Electrical/Electronic) or equivalent.
At least 3 year(s) of working experience in firmware development
Extensive experience in Embedded Programming using C/C++ in Embedded Linux and MCU
Good experience with various communication interface (peripherals) and protocols (especially SPI, I2C, UART, MODBUS TCP/IP and RS232/RS485)
Experience in wireless communication system/protocols eg. Bluetooth, Zigbee, Wi-Fi, Lora will be an advantage
Ability to work independently and multi-task effectively
Flexible and willing to accept a change in priorities as necessary
Good interpersonal communication and documentation/presentation skills
How To Apply

Interested applicants, please send your latest resume to ref19(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).

Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.

Trust Recruit Pte Ltd

EA License No: 19C9950

EA Personnel: Lim Dick Sern (Dick Sern)

EA Personnel Reg No: R22106832
Desired Skills and Experience
Embedded Linux, Hardware, Ability To Work Independently, Job Descriptions, peripheral systems, peripheral equipment, C Language, Wireless, Bluetooth, Embedded Systems, computer peripheral, Troubleshooting computer peripherals, Firmware, Operating Systems, ZigBee, Software Design, Manufacturing, Linux, Electronics, Software Development"
"Android Software Engineer, Global Live Multi End (Solutions)","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok Live team focus has been focusing on delivery engaging and the best live streaming experience to global users. Our team develops creative and interesting features for streamers and viewers to express themselves and interact with others instantly. We are looking for passionate mobile software engineers to join us in this fast growing industry.

Responsibilities:
1. Design, implement the new-user features of our mobile application.
2. Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a world-class mobile experience.
3. Optimize mobile applications and user experience on Android platforms.
4. Work closely with product managers and data analysts to drive product evolution

Qualifications

1. BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors.
2. 0-5 years of experience in Android development.
3. Proficiency in Java/Kotlin with plenty experience in native Android development. Familiar with mainstream frameworks like Android architecture Components, RxJava, Retrofit etc...
4. Deep understanding of computer architecture, data structures, algorithms and design patterns.
5. Be able to understand and debug large and complex codebase. Have a good understanding of modular architecture
6. Good team communication and collaboration skills.
7. Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.
8. Live-streaming related knowledge / team tech lead experience is a plus but not mandatory.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Database Developer,"ABOUT RYSENSE LTD
RySense is a homegrown research organisation dedicated to understanding what Singaporeans think, feel and do. Harnessing our passion for research excellence, we take pride in delivering quality data and in-depth insights that empower decision-making and shape a better Singapore. Our commitment to robust methodologies, timely information, and incisive recommendations distinguishes us as a centre of expertise for social trends and public opinion.
We welcome people with passion for building a better future for all through meaningful work, diverse ideas, and collaborative spirit. We believe in investing in the development of our people, so that we can grow together and achieve more in this place we call home.
Visit RySense’s corporate website (www.RySense.sg) to discover more about us – and to find out how you can be part of this exciting journey!


JOB SUMMARY
We are collecting lots of data – structured and unstructured – and we are looking for an experienced Database Developer to analyse the data needs of the company and be the master architect behind the development, management and maintenance of our critical data assets.
In this role, you will design, implement, and maintain the databases and data applications, ensuring that it meets operational requirements. In addition, you will assist to put in place policies and processes for effective data management and governance. As the custodian of our database application systems, you will be responsible for ensuring its security, reliability, and accuracy.


KEY RESPONSIBILITIES

Projects
Develop new functionalities on existing LAMP stack applications.
Participate in the technical implementation of the project discussion, codes review and architecture optimisation.
Migration of legacy database applications to LAMP stack.


BAU
Maintain existing codebase include migration and troubleshooting of bugs.
Responsible for both front-end and back-end web development.
Perform data mining and analysis, Extract Transform & Load (ETL) operations, execute data queries, generate reports, and create dashboards.
Design and develop reports or dashboards using with Business Intelligent tool.


Database Management
Test and evaluate the system regularly to ensure the highest level of data security, privacy, and integrity.
Design backup and recovery process to ensure availability of database services.
Database capacity planning, performance monitoring and tuning.
Perform installation, patching, upgrading, troubleshooting for the database and database infrastructure.
Database administration and operations including troubleshooting database-related issues e.g. fix queries or store procedures.
Maintain database dictionaries, SOPs and other relevant documentation
Any other ad-hoc duties as assigned.

REQUIREMENTS
Possess a Degree / Diploma in Computer Science or equivalent.
Possess minimum 5 years’ experience developing database driven applications with HTML/5, CSS/3, Bootstrap/4, JQuery, PHP (Laravel framework), Apache/NGINX
Solid understanding of UI/UX best practices
Knowledge of Data Mining, Extract Transform & Load (ETL), Data Lake, Data Warehouse and Business Intelligence (BI) solutions
Knowledge of operational and analytical, visualization, relational and multi-dimensional database architectures
Ability to write complex SQL queries including T-SQL, stored procedures, and database design.
Proficient in MS Access & VBA, MS SQL, and MySQL
Experience in ReactJS, Python is an advantage
Good analytical and problem-solving skill
Good communication and presentation skill
Meticulous with an eye for detail
Methodical and able to meet deadlines
Team player but also able to work independently
Understanding of Research operations will be an added advantage


If you would like to join us to make a meaningful impact, please email your resume to us at Careers@RySense.sg.

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Software Architect,"Want to be a part of our team?

Plans, designs, develops and tests software systems or applications for software enhancements and new products including cloud-based or internet-related tools. Most companies should be able to match to a specific software development engineer position. Use this position if company does not breakout software development positions such as Software Engineer (Applications) (5141-5146) or Software Engineer (Systems) (5161-5166). Survey Tip: If company does not identify software development engineers by functional designation described above, report to this Software Development Engineer (5101-5106) generic family. Software Development Engineers using common development methodologies including Waterfall and Agile should be matched to our software development engineering roles. Employees focused on ensuring products (including websites) and hosted networks are designed and developed to be cyber-safe and compliant are typically matched to one of our software development engineering roles.

Working at NTT

The Software Architect is responsible for creating architectural approaches for software design and implementation to guide the development team with the oversight of senior architects, to provide design and code reviews and to work with developers to aid in their designs and development efforts. Provides a framework for the development of a software or system that will result in high quality IT solutions. This position will work collaboratively with the Senior Software Architect to develop standards and processes.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Collaborate with other professionals to determine functional and non-functional requirements for new software or applications.
Use tools and methodologies to create representations for functions and user interface of desired product.
Develop high-level product specifications with attention to system integration and feasibility.
Define all aspects of development from appropriate technology and workflow to coding standards
Communicate successfully all concepts and guidelines to development team.
Oversee progress of development teams to ensure consistency with initial design and adherence to process and procedures.
Provide technical guidance and coaching to developers, analysts and testers.
Ensure software meets all requirements of quality, security, modifiability, extensibility etc.
Recommend final product for launch.
Performs all other duties as assigned.

Core Competencies:
Strong technical background and excellent IT skills as well as experience in developing standards and designing solutions.
Ability to prioritize and manage work to critical project timelines in a fast-paced environment. Ability to develop new approaches to complex design problems.
Must be organized, have an eye for detail, and be able to put ideas into a tangible form.
Mastery of user interaction design skills.
Strong oral and written communication skills with the ability to articulate complex ideas in easy to understand business terms.
Excellent inner personal skills and the ability to work/communicate with senior executives.
Ability to troubleshoot production issues through analyzing debug logs, transaction logs, SQL queries and other tools.

What will make you a good fit for the role?

Experience in .NET framework, Mobile application development (preferably xamarin), Code quality, Azure and AWS application development experience with microservice and containerized approach"
Senior/ Infrastructure Engineer (Identity & Access),"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

Government Infrastructure Group (GIG)

The Government Infrastructure Group (GIG) is responsible for digital infrastructure that supports the Whole-of-Government (WOG). We are the infrastructure architects and engineers who architect, design and deliver an agile, secure and sustainable infrastructure which enables a digital government for Singapore.

How we work

Aside from formulating the infrastructure strategy and roadmap at WOG level, we also develop prototypes using new technologies and establish standards and best practices to guide the design and implementation of information systems that support the enterprise infrastructure.

We examine factors such as people, culture, policies and processes to provide a secure, predictive and always-on platform, enabling public officers to work anywhere and anytime.

By leveraging on innovative Cloud and Saas technologies, we architect, design, build and deliver Cloud and Datacentre hosting environments and common services which support government agencies in accelerating and developing modern applications and services.

Transforming ICT infrastructure through modernisation and automation is also our key focus. Using latest technology and best practices, we deliver secure and utility-based services to WOG, so that government agencies can function efficiently and seamlessly.

We are also passionate about building and uplifting ICT engineering know-how for the WOG in critical infrastructure domains, which we advance through experimentation, prototype development, consultancy and training.

You will be part of the secured infrastructure team in GIG, providing premium infrastructure services across WOG as part of truly end to end design, build and operate model for critical use cases.

What you will be working on:

Responsible for the overall technical design of a system/project pertaining to the infrastructure elements, integration, connectivity and hosting.
Ensure the design gels and aligns to Application architecture, Enterprise architecture and Security architecture.
Lead as subject matter expert in the technologies for identity and access management, specifically on Microsoft Active Directory Services, Microsoft Exchange, CyberArk and Microsoft Infrastructure technologies.
Knowledge of up-to-date of innovations, services and offerings from commercial providers so as to recommend modernised solutions, designs and processes to projects.
High level knowledge of Agile development.
Experience in determining and recommending automation in term of infrastructure operation or development processes.
DevOps and infrastructure-as-code knowledge is desired so as to support and be able to apply to project management and implementation.
Work with all other Architects/Developers to balance and rationalise the technical design to ensure the building of a robust, scalable and efficient ICT system.
Work closely with the Solutions Architect to produce a technical specification for infrastructure, systems integration and hosting requirements.
Provide inputs to the project schedule and timeline relating to all phases of projects relating to the hosting infrastructure setup, integration, UAT and commissioning.
Ensure infrastructure specifications and designs are complete and comprehensive in meeting functional requirements and business needs
Provide technical architectural support to the Project and ensure project architecture is aligned with whole-of-Government architecture, policies and framework.
Review and enhance the government-wide identity services to support users and future business needs
Continuously finds means and ways to improve operations, streamline work processes and work cooperatively and jointly with various teams to provide quality service
Review and adoption of relevant industry best practices for Government IT infrastructure, specifically for the infrastructure for identity and access management
Ensure that project implementation and operations are aligned to Government technology standards and policies

What we are looking for:

Minimum 5 years of relevant IT infrastructure technical knowledge and experience in the deploying, administering and management of complex or large IT infrastructure systems and services
Experience in Enterprise Identity Directory System (AD Directory Services, ADFS, DHCP, DNS, Forest Trust, AD Rights Management Service, etc)
Knowledge of scripting (e.g. Powershell, Python, C#) for infrastructure automation.
Excellent written and verbal communication and ability to influence and communicate effectively with non-technical audience and senior management
Keep abreast of ICT technologies, skill-sets and industry practices
Team player with strong analytical thinking and problem-solving skills.
Knowledge of ITIL processes and procedures.
Ability to justify new initiatives and recommend new initiatives to stakeholder(s)
Conceptualise the concept of operation for the new initiatives
Familiar with tendering process, defining requirements in tender specification
Requires minimal supervision from supervisor
Always keeping up to date of the latest product roadmap and best practices
Good written and verbal communication, with the ability to present and communicate effectively with non-technical audience.
Provide inputs to optimise and automate workflows and processes
Dynamic and with good analytical/conceptual thinking and problem-solving skills.
ITIL V3 Foundation certified
MCSE, minimally in MCSA Microsoft Certified Azure Administrator Associate
Microsoft Certified Azure Solutions Architect Expert

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
Software Engineers (Perm),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Responsibilities
Participate in designing solutions that meet functional requirements
Implement end-to-end specifications for solution components
Generate relevant documents and reports
Perform testing and implementation of solutions
Participate in UX activities such as creating wireframes/storyboards, conducting user research/interviews and developing user stories, storyboards
Contribute to the SDLC in the areas of coding tools, languages, and software designs
Job Requirements
Min diploma/degree in Computer Science or any IT related field
Familiarity in any of the programming languages: Java, Javascript, Python, C++, C# etc
Proficient in Web Technologies like HTML, CSS
Excellent working attitude and a strong team player
(EA Reg No: 20C0312)

Only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Please email a copy of your detailed resume to qianyu@talentsis.com.sg for immediate processing.
Desired Skills and Experience
ReactJS, CSS, PHP, NodeJS, HTML, User Stories, Software Engineering, Agile, JavaScript, SDLC, Web Technologies, SQL, Python, Java, C#, UX, Software Development, C++"
"Security Engineer (Offensive Security), Penetration Lab","About ByteDance

Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

About The Security Penetration Lab Team At ByteDance

The team is missioned to build infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to support cross-functional teams to protect our users, products and infrastructures. In this team, you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and secure-by-design systems and solutions. Our challenges are not your regular day-to-day technical problems; you'll be part of a team that's developing new solutions to new challenges of a kind not previously addressed by big tech. It's working fast, at scale, and we're making a difference.

Responsibilities

Continuously conduct penetration testing to identify security vulnerabilities in the staging/production environment.
To identify risks and actively take ownership to resolve any potential project issues.
Conduct technical security review for any new products and feature requirements.
Provide safety engineering support to product teams to help identify potential security flaws in early stages of SDLC.
Collaborate closely with other parts of the security team and product teams to design defense-in-depth controls that limit attackers' ability and improve our security postures.

Qualifications

Background in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or other STEM disciplines.
Strong knowledge in some of these various disciplines: web application security, mobile app security, cloud security and thick client security.
Provide safety engineering support to product teams to help identify potential security flaws in early stages of SDLC.
Collaborate closely with other parts of the security team and business teams to design defense-in-depth controls that limit attackers' ability and improve our security postures.
Solid experience in writing and reviewing code in at least one of the following programming languages: JavaScript (Node JS), Go, Python, Java, C++, Rust.

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
LIMS System Engineer,"Company Overview And Values

Why work at Entegris?

Lead. Inspire. Innovate. Define Your Future.

Not everyone who works for a global company shares the same background, experiences and perspectives. We leverage the differences of our employees to bring new ideas to the table. Every employee throughout the company is encouraged to share input on projects and initiatives. Our decision making process is truly a collaborative effort as we realize there are leaders at every level of the organization. We put our values at the core of how we operate as an organization — not just when it’s convenient, but in a lasting and meaningful way. We want the time and energy you spend here to have a positive impact on your life inside and outside of the office.

Entegris is a values-driven culture and our employees rally around our core PACE values:

People

Accountability

Creativity

Excellence

Our team is looking for a specialist for the global development and implementation of Labware Laboratory Information Management System (LIMS). The objective is to support the design, configuring, customization, and implementation of the system for select locations within the SCEM business focused in Asia (South Korea, Taiwan, Japan). The person will create and maintain procedures and ensure that the LIMS meets all business and operational requirements.

Key Responsibilities
Support LIMS global implementation and administration for the SCEM business
Design, configure, customize, and implement the LIMS
Collaborate with global labs to ensure LIMS meets all business and operational requirements
Establish Standard Operating Procedures, User Guides, and other relevant documentation for the LIMS for Asia
Manage effective data exchange between LIMS and all lab instruments and other associated systems customizing code and parsing scripts code to accommodate data exchange
Support laboratory operations to include, but not limited to, systems analysis, process & procedure creation, customized reports, modifications, barcode/printer management, and upkeep of systems administration tasks. Managing user requests, maintaining a validated state, processing access requests, and working with the business to troubleshoot issues
Provide LIMS training to staffs and customers.
Coordinate with the BU and IT on initiatives and continuous improvement projects
Upon completion of LIMS global implementation, transition to:
Executing continuous process improvements for the SCEM Business (i.e. LIMS improvements, lab efficiency, etc)
Local support and maintenance of LIMS
Requisite Criteria & Skills
BS or MS in computer science, analytical chemistry, science or engineering related field with equivalent work experience
Preferably 1-2 years Labware LIMS experience
Preferably 1 years working experience (BS)/1 years working experience (MS) in a laboratory environment
Knowledge of LIMS configuration/administration and SQL Scripting Language, including:
LIMS module and environment implementation and development
Configuration and development of visual workflows or functions
Instrument and Standard and Reagent configuration
Experience in writing subroutines and automation scripts in LIMS Basic and/or Java
Knowledge and experience of Client-Server Architecture
Basic SQL database knowledge (tables, fields) and SQL Queries, preferably in a cloud database environment (Microsoft Azure)
User account management
Proficient in troubleshooting, error resolution and debugging
Working knowledge of chemistry laboratory operations and experience with change control management
Strong communication and organizing skills, be able to work on multiple tasks/projects in parallel
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment to meet client and internal demands under tight timelines is a must
Multilingual – English, Korean

Our total rewards package goes above and beyond just a paycheck. Whether you’re looking to build your career, improve your health, or protect your wealth, we offer generous benefits to help you achieve your goals and also to take time away from work to recharge!

At Entegris we are committed to providing equal opportunity to all employees and applicants. Our policy is to recruit, hire, train, and reward employees for their individual abilities, achievements and experience without regard to race, color, religion, sexual orientation, age, national origin, disability, marital or military status."
Snr Systems Engineer,"Position Overview

The Snr Systems Engineer manages the systems administration function and leads the organisation's system projects and environments. He/She focuses on setting goals and priorities and on mentoring and coordination as well as providing technical leadership. He plans and oversees systems upgrades and migrations and ensures systems are up-to-date with the latest patches and are coherent across the organisation. He directs the development and maintenance of technical documentation.

He possesses strong leadership and communication abilities, and is able to set realistic goals and implement appropriate plans to guide the team toward achieving those goals. He is able to address multi-faceted issues effectively and in a collaborative manner including across departments. Set system administration processes

Role & Responsibilities

Set system administration processes

Establish goals and priorities, design, planning, day-to-day operation, maintenance, and advanced troubleshooting of systems
Align system administration with overall strategic IT service direction and business needs
Assist with the development of business case justifications and cost/benefit analyses for spending and initiatives
Anticipate internal and/or external business challenges and/or regulatory issues
Develop policies, procedures, and controls to ensure system security

Develop New Systems

Partner with stakeholders to recommend innovative and automated approaches for system administration 
Define systems requirements for new technology implementations
Prepare for system expansion by studying plans and requirements
Oversee the design, maintenance and implementation of the systems 
Prioritise tasks to ensure projects are implemented in accordance with project plans and budgets

Optimise Systems Performance

Recommend process, product or service improvements, resource optimisation and cost savings
Oversee hardware and software upgrades
Recommend new technologies, methodologies, systems or opportunities for cost savings, security and service quality improvement

Manage Teams

Oversee team management including budgets, forecasting, work allocations and staffing
Develop staff through ongoing coaching, mentoring and career discussions
Define common goals, direction and accountability among staff
Drive effective performance management practices within department in accordance with company policies and procedures

Requirements

Candidates must have at least 6 years of hands-on experience in Linux with ability to work with the project team in implementation projects as well as perform system administration activities for Linux systems. Knowledge in SAP will be advantageous but not required.

At least 6 - 8 years’ experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems

Diploma/Degree in Information Technology or related

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
"Senior Executive Officer, Digital Operations (Web Developer)","We are looking for a passionate and professional Senior Executive Officer to join our Digital Operations team.

Based in Singapore and reporting into the Senior Manager, the Senior Executive Officer will work on team projects and individual projects. The right candidate will have day-to-day responsibility of drive the operations and usage relevance of digital content.

However, we also recognize that each individual has a unique blend of skills. Whether your strength is in digital content or web development, we want to talk to you.

What You'll Do
You will help execute new campaigns for online and mobile channels as well as emerging platforms
You will work with stakeholders to understand and translate business requirements into technical approach
You will translate UI/UX wireframes to actual, functional website
You will develop interactive microsites and landing pages including integration of 3rd party widgets and content for optimal user experience
You will ensure application built is optimized for cross browsers and devices compatibility
You will manage testing with stakeholders
You will implement SEO, campaign tracking and provide reports to stakeholders e.g. Data Studio campaign reports
You will support new initiatives for online and mobile channels as well as emerging platforms
You will create UI/UX mockups based on requirements which are functional and can be translated to visual elements (frontend screens) with usability in mind
You will prepare comprehensive test scripts for the new modules to be tested and conduct user acceptance test for new modules on various platforms to ensure cross-browser and device compatibility and review results
You will report defects and ensure timely resolution
You will help execute communications display online and maintain the company’s remote betting website and other digital platforms to ensure an effective structure, navigation and design
You will create and maintain relevant technical standards for frontend HTML screens
You will oversee the tracking and scheduling of communications display to ensure accurate content display across platforms
You will perform regular wellness checks, regression tests, UAT for bug fixes, postdeployment verifications, bet cancellations, maintenance message scheduling, etc. according to business procedures and necessary documentations
You will implement and deliver business intelligence from web analytics
You will need to be 24/7 on-call/stand-by duty on rotating shifts with team members but only when activated will be required to return to office for urgent updates to the company’s remote betting website

Who You Are
You should have a Degree in Digital Media, Information Technology or Computer Science/Engineering or related
You need at least 3 years’ experience in frontend web development and responsive-based frameworks
You should have excellent knowledge of cross browser, mobile apps troubleshooting, debugging practices and techniques
You should have experience in content management system such as Drupal, working with modules, widgets, etc.
You should have experience in UI and UX principles and methodologies preferred
You should have experience in website analytics tools (e.g. Google Analytics) preferred
You should have experience in Agile methodologies an advantage
You should be proficient in frontend web development tools and technologies (e.g. HTML, Sass, Bootstrap, Javascript, etc.)
You should be proficient in Adobe Creative Suite (including Photoshop, Illustrator) for UI/UX and prototype design
You should be proficient in Google Analytics and Tag manager
You should be proficient in web and hybrid/native apps (iOS/Android) testing cross browsers/platforms/devices
You should have competency in Jira and Confluence
You should have strong problem solving and analytical skills and the ability to manage workloads, keep to schedule, an eye for details, good organizational skills and team player

Benefits
Competitive salaries
Flexi Benefits
Staggered working hours
Medical Insurance
Corporate Mobile Plans

Singapore Pools welcomes you not for how you look, where you come from, or differences you may have. We want you here for who you are. Diversity at the company helps us see a greater picture represented by different voices, helping us in contributing back to the society. So, feel free to express who you are, and be proud of your heritage and personal experience as you begin your journey with us!

Singapore Pools was established by the Government on 23 May 1968 to provide safe and trusted betting to counter illegal gambling. As a not-for-profit organisation, all of Singapore Pools' surplus is channeled to Tote Board to fund a wide range of causes in social service, community development, sports, the arts, education and health. Currently, Singapore Pools contributes about $2 billion annually to the Government in the form of taxes and duties, and for the funding of good causes."
Senior Software Development Engineer,"We are seeking a results-driven Senior Software Development Engineer to join our high-performing Engineering team at Ground Labs. As a Senior Software Development Engineer, you will join a motivated and multi-talented team of engineers to build powerful products and solve awesome real world problems. This position will be based in our Singapore headquarters and will report into our Engineering Manager.

We are looking for a “hands on” individual who can quickly roll up their sleeves and make things happen. We work on different products & technologies, and the ideal candidate is someone who is a self-starter and is willing and able to learn things on the job fast and well.

At Ground Labs we are a people company - we are proud of what we do and have fun doing it! If you have what it takes to be a contributing member of the team then come be a part of our continued success story and help shape our future.

You will be responsible for:
Researching new technologies and prototyping solutions
Preparing or improving software design and architecture
Managing software availability, latency, scalability and efficiency
Developing new product functionality and fixing software bugs
Working with Customer Support and customers to troubleshoot and address issues
Mentoring other engineers and reviewing their code
Participating in all phases of software development (specification, design, development, documentation, unit testing)

To be successful in this role, you will need to have:
A degree or equivalent in Computer Science or related field
7 years of relevant industry experience
Hands-on experience in modern C++ development
Excellent English written/oral communication skills
Experience in developing scalable, multi-threaded, low latency components with minimum memory footprint
Good understanding of: software security; Windows and Linux or Unix systems; databases; computer networks; cloud storage and computing
Ability to work efficiently with the existing code base
Ability to take a problem and solve it with minimal supervision

About us
Ground Labs enables organizations to discover and remediate all of their data across multiple types and locations — on servers, on desktops and in the cloud. Ground Labs serves as the most comprehensive and trusted solution in the enterprise to confidently mitigate risk and find sensitive data. Ground Labs’ core focus is to develop technology to meet the increasing challenges of data management and regulatory compliance. This is shown with our flagship products of Enterprise Recon and Card Recon, along with our continued development of future solutions to address the complexities, challenges and intricacies of data discovery. Since the company’s inception, we have remained faithful to our commitment and core focus of discovering data, no matter where it resides.

Our business has grown and so has our headcount globally. We continue to thrive on teamwork, collaboration at all levels, getting staff involved in decision-making processes and information sharing. Our products and people remain the core of what we do. You will also be given the opportunity to further your learning and skillset through training programme(s) sponsored by us. If you feel that our values match yours and that you are up for a challenge in a fast moving tech company, apply now!"
"Backend Software Engineer, Global Live (Fundamental Business)","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build up and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming at TikTok. We will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features, and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for live streamers and viewers.

About TikTok Live - Fundamental Business Team
TikTok Live - Fundamental Business engineering team is the mission critical team which is responsible for laying and enhancing the solid foundation for Live business and its affiliated iteration & development. It's also the very key team which takes responsibility for the stability and high performance of our Live service that joys billions of users around the globe. We currently ship and build large-scale livestreaming core services which includes broadcast, watch LIVE, feed distribution and eco-system governance.

You can provide comprehensive technical solutions for live broadcast business scenes, optimize various business indicators and create good user experience. Every line of your code affects hundreds of millions of users. Every feature you build will be used by hundreds of millions of people.

You will:
- Play a critical role in planning and leading large-scale technical projects to lay the foundation for the iterative development and scale of early products
- Participate in developing robust, efficient technology products that serve 1 billion users
- Be a key member in improving architecture to ensure high stability and performance
- Be Involved in researching and applying cutting-edge domain and technical knowledge into products which could benefit world wide TikTok users.

Qualifications

- BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major.
- Plenty experience in high scalable, highly available, distributed and mission-critical systems.
- Large scale client-facing industry project development experience.
- Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
- Deep understanding of computer architecture, data structures and algorithms in depth knowledge of common databases and messaging frameworks like MySQL/Redis/Kafka
- Able to work closely with diverse stakeholders and have good communication skills
- Self-driven, positive, cooperative and willing to keep learning enthusiasm at all times

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Senior DevOps Engineer - Fintech,"ABOUT THE COMPANY
My client is looking to hire a highly motivated and versatile Senior Devops Engineer who has strong business acumen and prior team management experience. The company is a financial services firm that focuses on providing a comprehensive, self-directed investment platform for investors and offering guidance on making informed investment decisions. As they continue to expand their services in the APAC region, with Singapore serving as the regional headquarters, they are looking for someone who can help improve the speed and quality of application releases while also addressing compliance, security, risk, and governance strategies.

ABOUT THE ROLE
Key Responsibilities:
Assist in leading the DevOps team
Oversee and troubleshoot production systems and make recommendations to resolve the issue.
Create, debug, and optimize the automation script; and automate the daily routine tasks.
Conduct evaluation on new technologies and create POC to showcase the solutions.
Analyze and deploy the new business requirements as and when there are updates.
Build Docker image(s) and facilitate container deployments using Kubernetes or similar tools.
Handle and take over any other ad-hoc matters as assigned.
Skills and Qualifications Required:
Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, or relevant qualification(s)
At least 6-8 years of hands-on experience as a DevOps Engineer with strong knowledge of process automation and DevOps’ best practices
Experienced in architecture implementation and in container technologies like Docker
Hands-on experience in implementation of new technology and process improvement
Capability to work in a fast-paced, agile, and uncertain environment where multiple tasks must be accomplished simultaneously
Highly organized and detail oriented
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Fluent Chinese language skills (both oral and written) and the ability to collaborate with the technology team in China are essential for this role

WHAT WE CAN OFFER
A dynamic and open work environment that encourages ongoing learning and development
Culture of accountability and trust where employees are empowered to take ownership of their tasks and see them through to completion
An attractive and competitive compensation package

If you are interested to find out more, please apply or email your updated CV to xtang@captarpartners.com for a confidential discussion.

R22109214/22S1166"
Java Developer (Low Latency),"About OKX:
OKX is a world-leading digital asset trading platform, providing advanced financial services to traders globally by using blockchain technology.
OKX provides hundreds of token & futures trading pairs to help traders to optimize their strategy. We are also one of the top digital asset trading platforms by trading volume, serving millions of users in over 100 countries. OKX derivatives remains a top-notch venue globally and has a daily volume of approximately $10 billion and is widely recognized as the golden standard in the industry. We believe the blockchain technology will eliminate barriers to transactions, increase the efficiency of transactions across society, and eventually have a significant impact on the global economy. We strive to make innovative achievements that change the world and never stop to improve on our customer experience.

About the Team:
Trading services team provides core order and position management system for the exchange. It is the backbone of our industry-leading trading product used by millions of users.

Responsibilities:
Design and implement innovative solutions for our full range of trading products including spot, future, perpetual swap and options.
Build out industry-leading risk management platform.
Build out automated trading strategies.
Performance optimization for overall trading architecture aiming for low latency, high availability and scalability.
Requirements:
Solid STEM (Science/Technology/Engineering/Mathematics) education background.
Strong logical thinking and problem-solving skills.
Fluent with high performance Java and async programming patterns.
Familiar with distributed systems and micro service architecture.
Experience in practicing automated testing and continuous integration.
Willing to learn all aspects of trading products in financial and crypto markets, including spot, future, swap, options, and structured products."
**SGPR/Citizen: Citrix/VMware Engineer | Windows | Global Top Tier Hedge Fund,"My client, a leading global hedge fund seeking a Citrix/VMware Engineer to join their End User Engineering team.

The team will be focused on:

- Engineering and supporting the firm’s Desktop Workspace across physical, virtual and cloud platforms, including Windows OS, hardware integration, configuration management, application delivery, Citrix XenDesktop / XenApp, Netscaler Remote Access, RSA MFA and Windows IoT Dell WMS Thin client technologies.
Responsibilities:

Engineering Windows builds, integrating Windows desktop operating systems and core applications
Employ automation and rigorous QA methodologies to ensure the delivery of a consistent and reliable Workspace service including maintaining the Windows servicing model.
Analyze performance data to provide resources utilization information in support of operational process.
Analyzes, plans test, documents and implements regular, advanced or special maintenance activities of systems hardware and software to meet service level agreements with users groups.
Strong skills troubleshooting and resolve support issues pertaining to Citrix XenApp and XenDesktop.
Participate in the firm’s change, incident, and problem management processes.
Create and maintain knowledge base, run books configuration and support documentation.
Provide third line technical support, system administration and engineering for our global Windows desktop and Citrix environment with components such as XenDesktop. XenApp, Storefront, RSA and NetScaler.
Packaging and on boarding of new applications in the Windows desktop and Citrix XenApp environment.

Requirements:

Degree in Computer Science or related field.
Substantial experience with Windows desktop and Citrix technologies covering administration, maintenance and deployments in an enterprise-engineering role.
Excellent scripting and / or programming experience e.g. PowerShell, .NET, C#, C++
Show understanding of and be proficient using github, jira, confluence
Thorough knowledge of VMware ESX, VC.
Thorough knowledge of Citrix XenApp and XenDesktop technologies.
Thorough knowledge and experience of software packaging tools (e.g. InstallShield, App-V, Wise).
Thorough understanding and experience of common native Windows infrastructure components and configuration management I.e. Active Directory / GPO.
Experience supporting multi-factor technologies (e.g. RSA, Okta).
Experience integrating the latest Windows features and deployment strategies.
Experience with third party management tools in large-scale environments including Symantec Altiris, Citrix XenApp / XenDesktop, InTune and Dell WMS.
Quick learner, detail oriented; demonstrate thoroughness and strong ownership of work.
Strong troubleshooting mind-set (i.e. parsing event log, Sysinternals tools, dump analysis).
Excellent team-working, collaboration and inter-personal skills.

If you would like to apply for this opening or discuss any other positions within banking and finance technology in Asia, please send an email to Mimi Chu at mimi.chu@bahpartners.com or +852 2544 4475. For more roles, please visit our website: http://bahpartners.com/live-roles"
Data Engineer,"Data Engineer - Pharmaceutical Client

Data Scientist role would be responsible for designing, building, maintaining, and troubleshooting data pipelines. The incumbent will work with data scientists and analysts to understand the business requirements and design data pipelines that meet those needs. They also work with IT and infrastructure teams to ensure that the data pipelines are scalable, reliable, and secure.

Job Requirements

Developing and maintaining ETL (extract, transform, load) processes using Python
Building data pipelines to ingest and process large datasets from various sources, such as databases, APIs, and flat files
Designing and implementing data storage solutions, such as data warehouses, data lakes, and NoSQL databases
Implementing data security and governance measures, such as data masking and access controls
Working with data scientists and analysts to understand their needs and optimize data pipelines for analytics and machine learning
Testing and debugging data pipelines to ensure data integrity and quality
Collaborating with IT and infrastructure teams to deploy and operate data pipelines in production environments
Continuously improving and optimizing data pipelines to meet changing business needs.
Working knowledge of SNOWFLAKE, IQVIA SaaS solution is preferable but not mandatory

Responsibilities

Design and implement data pipelines to ingest, process, and store large datasets
Develop and maintain ETL processes using programming languages such as Python, Java, or Scala
Design and implement data storage solutions, such as data warehouses, data lakes, and NoSQL databases
Implement data security and governance measures, such as data masking and access controls
Collaborate with data scientists and analysts to understand their needs and optimize data pipelines for analytics and machine learning
Secure stat transfer from the original sources to the clients environment and platform
Work with IT and infrastructure teams to deploy and operate data pipelines in production environments
Continuously improve and optimize data pipelines to meet changing business needs
Troubleshoot and debug data pipelines to ensure data integrity and quality
Stay up-to-date with the latest technologies and best practices in data engineering.

Interested candidates please send your CV to deepan@barringtonjames.com
EA Reg No : R1114179
EA Lic No :11C5813"
Senior Software Engineer (Frontend) - Data Technologies Infrastructure - Singapore,"Bloomberg is foremost a data company. Data is at the heart of everything we do; we collect it, cleanse it, enrich it, validate it, and make it available to our clients. This data is vast, varied, and critical not only to our success, but to that of our diverse, global client base, and we continually challenge ourselves to do this better and faster.

What's the role?

Bloomberg's Data Technologies (DT) department is responsible for building tools and infrastructure to get this data into the company from the outside world. The DT Infrastructure team lays the foundations for this work by providing compute platforms for other teams to build upon.

Our responsibilities fall into two core areas:
Building and maintaining BAIT, a low code in-house platform that allows our counterparts in the Data and Engineering departments to extract, transform, and load the data to the downstream databases
Building and maintaining Asia specific data processing applications in collaboration with the wider DT Engineering community
Our low code platform is used by many of our Data Analysts as well as Software Engineers across the firm.

We are looking for passionate frontend engineers to provide even better experience for our users.

We'll trust you to:
Develop frontend for our low code platform using react and typescript
Work with the team to design the low code abstraction that gives our users power to solve their additional use cases such as new table transformation operations and new source file types
Build intuitive user interfaces so that our platform can cater not only to the technologist but to wider analyst colleagues
Interact with our users directly and address questions, and if any enhancements are needed, realize them in a coherent manner that serve our wider user groups in both Data and Engineering departments
Own the entire development lifecycle, from planning to deployment
You'll need to have:
Minimum 2+ years of professional work experience as a software engineer
Demonstrated experience in frontend development with javascript/typescript
Demonstrated experience working with React
Fluency in both written and spoken English
Demonstrated continuous career growth within an organisation
Demonstrated exposure to all phases of the software development life cycle
Demonstrated experience successfully managing multiple projects to meet required deliverables, including communicating progress and outcomes to relevant stakeholders
We'd love to see:
Experience with various file formats frequently used in data disclosures and how to interface with them programmatically (CSV, JSON, XML, XBRL, SDMX, FWF, DBF, excel, docx, odf, turtle etc)
Familiarity with frontend development with React and its ecosystem
Demonstrated experience with UX design
Familiarity with schema specifications (jsonschema, json type definition, avro, xsd)
If this sounds like you:

Apply if you think we're a good match. We'll get in touch to let you know what the next steps are, but in the meantime feel free to have a look at this:

http://www.bloomberg.com/engineering

techatbloomberg.com

Bloomberg is an equal opportunity employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of age, ancestry, color, gender identity or expression, genetic predisposition or carrier status, marital status, national or ethnic origin, race, religion or belief, sex, sexual orientation, sexual and other reproductive health decisions, parental or caring status, physical or mental disability, pregnancy or maternity/parental leave, protected veteran status, status as a victim of domestic violence, or any other classification protected by applicable law.

Bloomberg is a disability inclusive employer. Please let us know if you require any reasonable adjustments to be made for the recruitment process. If you would prefer to discuss this confidentially, please email apac_recruit@bloomberg.net."
"Software Engineer, Privacy","About Us

Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a care

About The Team

Our Enterprise Security team protects users on our platform by promoting privacy by design; we design architectures that treats user data respectfully, with transparency, and in line with reasonable practices. Data privacy engineering is a new technological territory that hasn't been well defined in our industry; by joining the team, you will have chance to refine the data privacy framework, use advanced privacy technology, and make a big impact across all our platforms and our community.

Responsibilities

Design, build, and maintain systems that enhance privacy across TikTok.
Work with engineering and product teams to ensure what we build is compliant with privacy laws and regulations from a technical perspective.
Respond to privacy incidents, if they occur, including collecting information on scope and root cause as well as managing remediation.

Qualifications

BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major
Experienced in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
Proficiency in at least one of following languages: Java, Go, C++, Python.
Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
Good team communication and collaboration skills.
5+ years of industry experience developing and implementing privacy features and solutions.
Comfortable with communicating across disciplines (e.g. engineering, legal, policy).

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
UI/UX Senior Principal / Principal Front End Developer (SG-Edge),"Dell Technologies is seeking entrepreneurial and innovative Front End Software Engineers to drive the vision and execution of a new Enterprise Edge Initiative. If you are passionate about how Edge Computing is revolutionizing the future infrastructure and enabling the next wave of ultra-low latency Internet applications, this is the role for you.

As a Senior Principal / Principal Engineer in our new Edge innovation group (EdgeBU), you
Lead design and code reviews with a major focus on extensibility, reusability, and scalability.
Will develop and own UX design and influence the UI architecture and implementation
Lead and guide the team in design, code and implement new algorithms to solve complex problems
Work collaboratively with cross-functional distributed teams in engineering, QA and product management in all phases – ensuring delivery of quality solutions

Take the first step towards your dream career, Every Dell Technologies team member brings something unique to the table. Here’s what we are looking for in this role

Essential Requirements:
Requires 15+ years of Software development experience with a Bachelor’s/Master's degree.
In-depth knowledge and experience with Javascript, Typescript, HTML, CSS and Preprocessors – LESS, SASS
Very good hands on experience with modern Javascript frameworks – Angular (preferred), React
In-depth knowledge and experience with MicroFrontEnd, Module Federation, SPA
Very good experience in UI Architecture and UX Design and design tools such as Figma, Sketch.
Hands on experience with build tools, package managers, module bundlers – NPM, Webpack
Hands on with linting tools – ESLint and Testing tools – Jasmine, Cypress, Karma
Experience with OAuth, REST, gRPC, HTTP and networking stack
Experience with Internationalization, cross-browser compatibility, caching, performance optimization, sematic HTML, Accessibility, Responsive Design

Desirable Requirements:
Experience with microservices and Distributed Architecture
Web Components

Here’s our story; now tell us yours

Dell Technologies helps organizations and individuals build a brighter digital tomorrow. Our company is made up of more than 150,000 people, located in over 180 locations around the world. We’re proud to be a diverse and inclusive team and have an endless passion for our mission to drive human progress.

What’s most important to us is that you are respected, feel like you can be yourself and have the opportunity to do the best work of your life -- while still having a life. We offer excellent benefits, bonus programs, flexible work arrangements, a variety of career development opportunities, employee resource groups, and much more.

We started with computers, but we didn’t stop there. We are helping customers move into the future with multi-cloud, AI and machine learning through the most innovative technology and services portfolio for the data era. Join us and become a part of what’s next in technology, starting today.

You can also learn more about us by reading our latest Diversity and Inclusion Report and our plan to make the world a better place by 2030 here.

Application closing date: 31 January 2023

Dell is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Dell are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV Status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Dell will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Dell encourages applicants of all ages. Read the full Equal Employment Opportunity Policy here.

#EdgeBU

Job Id: R203250"
"Software Engineer, Ads Infrastructure","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

TikTok is one of the fastest growing apps in the world, and wer're looking for Software Engineers to join our Ads Infra team. The Ads Infra team uses state-of-the-art ads delivery architectures and cutting-edge machine learning algorithms to optimize every impression on TikTok platform for both our users and advertisers.

What You'll Do

Build delivery services for TikTok Ads, including ads targeting, indexing, recall, click and convert prediction, bidding, auction, mixed ranking of ads and organic results, etc.
Build deep learning solutions for TikTok ads ranking, including building training examples, realtime online training, deep models inference, model based retrieval, etc.
Build service frameworks with highest performance and availability.
Build globalized ads system across multiple data centers intercontinental.

Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields.
Experience programming in at least one of the following programming languages: C, C++, Java or Golang.
Effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive.

Preferred Qualifications

Experienced in at least one area of the following areas: Ads delivery, personalized recommendations, search engine, machine learning, distributed storage system, big data frameworks."
Software Applications Development Engineer,"NTT is a leading global IT solutions and services organisation that brings together people, data and things to create a better and more sustainable future.

In today’s ‘iNTTerconnected’ world, connections matter more now than ever. By bringing together talented people, world-class technology partners and emerging innovators, we help our clients solve some of the world’s most significant technological, business and societal challenges.

With people at the heart of our success, NTT is committed to attracting and growing the best talent and providing an environment where everyone feels they can belong and their contribution matters.

Want to be a part of our team?

The primary responsibility of the Software Applications Development Engineer is to develop new applications and improve upon existing ones that will our client and business needs.

""Analyzes, designs, programs, debugs, and modifies software enhancements and/or new products used in local, networked, cloud-based or Internet-related computer programs. Code may be used in commercial or end-user applications, such as materials management, financial management, HRIS, mobile apps or desktop applications products. Using current programming language and technologies, writes code, completes programming, and performs testing and debugging of applications. Completes documentation and procedures for installation and maintenance. May interact with users to define system requirements and/or necessary modifications.""

Working at NTT

Key Roles And Responsibilities

Develop applications that effectively accomplish client objectives and user needs.
Design and write code for applications and maintain applications databases.
Analyze and edit existing software applications to improve and optimise functionality, fix problems and enable its use on new hardware platforms.
Remodel and adapt applications as needed to optimize performance.
Identify specific customer and client needs and preferences related to application.
Test applications extensively to ensure they are error and bug free.
Install applications and act as technical advisor.
Communicate with relevant internal technical stakeholders to obtain information on project limitations, performance requirements and interfaces.
Consult with clients in the design phase to determine client needs.
Produce software documentation following company software process and templates.
Participates in software product review meetings and team meetings.

Knowledge, Skills And Attributes

Broad understanding of computer science, with specific knowledge of computer programming, application design, and user-focused features
Creative problem solvers
Good interpersonal, communication and organisational skills
Good team players and maintain integrity and display good attention to detail
Ability to understand and analyze complex systems
Proficient in writing software using the Java Programming Language and standard object library
Sound knowledge of software development process
Familiarity with agile development such as Scrum
Knowledge of software integrated development environments
Extensive knowledge in various programming languages (Java, Perl, Python, C++ etc.)
Demonstrated analytical, organizational, and project management skills, using relevant information to make timely and critical decisions that affect cross-functional teams
Ability to handle client and customer issues tactfully and professionally

Academic Qualifications And Certifications

Bachelor's degree in computer science or software engineering
Relevant certifications

Required Experience

Software Applications Engineering, Software Development experience, or related work experience
Experience with Programming Language such as C, C++, Java, Python, etc.
Experienced with Linux or Unix and Windows operating systems
Experience working with SQL
Project management experience and/or experience working in an Agile environment

What will make you a good fit for the role?

Join our growing global team and accelerate your career with us. Apply today.

A Career At NTT Means

Being part of a global pioneer – where you gain exposure to our Fortune 500 clients and world-leading global technology partners and work with a network of over 40,000 smart and diverse colleagues across 57 countries, delivering services in over 200 countries.
Being at the forefront of cutting-edge technology – backed with a 150-year heritage of using technology for good. With 40% of the world’s internet traffic running on our network and where Emoji were first invented, you can be proud of the group’s many new ‘firsts’.
Making a difference – by doing meaningful work that helps to shape the future for our clients, and across industries and communities around the world.
Being your best self – in a progressive ‘Connected Working’ environment that promotes flexibility, connection and wellbeing. Where diversity and different perspectives are embraced to ensure equal opportunities for all.
Having ongoing opportunities to own and develop your career – with a personal and professional development plan and access to the broadest learning offerings in the industry."
PHP Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description & Requirements

Responsibilities
Write quality and easily readable code and implement functional tests in CodeIgnite and Laravel environment
Identify optimisation areas by analyzing data, process and code, as well as solving issues, profile
Understand business requirements to define and communicate flows and technical specifications
Collaborate closely with Front-end developers to develop integrated microservices applications.
Participate in continuous improvement, knowledge sharing and training to remain current on best practices, programming methodologies assisting peers.
Document technical specifications for future reference and maintenance
Take lead on projects, as needed.
Requirements
At least 3 - 5 years experience with PHP/Lavarel and NodeJs, or equivalent
Knowledge of modern development principles and best practices (Object Oriented Programming, Design Patterns, SOLID Principles, unit testing, continuous integration and deployment)
Proficient understanding in HTML/HTML5, CSS/CSS3, Javascript, ReactJS.
Experience in designing database schemas, and working with Redis/Cassandra
Bonus experience with microservices architecture
Bonus experience developing SaaS platforms.

Desired Skills and Experience
CSS, PHP, Design Patterns, HTML, Unit Testing, MySQL, JavaScript, HTML5, Laravel, SaaS, Continuous Integration, Debugging, API, jQuery, Business Requirements"
Backend Software Engineer - Video Infrastructure,"Responsibilities

Video Infrastructure is a world-leading video platform that provides multi-media storage, delivery, transcoding, and streaming services. We are building the next generation video processing platform and the largest live streaming network, which provides excellent experiences for billions of users around the world. Popular video products of TikTok and its affiliates are all empowered by our cutting-edge cloud technologies. Working in this team, you will have the opportunity to tackle challenges of large-scale networks all over the world, while leveraging your expertise in coding, algorithms, complexity analysis, and large-scale system design.

Responsibilities
1. Implement and integrate next generation computing platform for multimedia processing, including severless / faas, heterogeneous computing, video intelligence.
2. Design, build and maintain a global scale, multi-regional video infrastructure system.
3. Design, implement and operate our critical and scalable services, including video delivery services, upload services, and core persistence layer.
4. Build live streaming platforms, systems, and infrastructure with knowledge in network and distributed systems.
5. Participate in design reviews and code reviews for the video infrastructure team.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical background involving software/system engineering, or equivalent working experience.
2. Good programming experience with at least one of the following languages: C, C++, Java, Python, or Go.
3. Expertise in designing, analyzing, and troubleshooting large-scale distributed systems.
4. Experience with network software, e.g. TCP/IP, IP Tables, NAT, Deep Packet Inspection, IPV4, IPV6, routing protocols, etc.
5. Experience with CDN, Multimedia, Live Streaming, and WebRTC.
6. Familiar with Unix/Linux operating systems."
Machine Learning Engineer Intern (E-commerce Risk Control) - 2023,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2023. Internships at TikTok aim to offer students industry exposure and hands-on experience. Watch your ambitions become reality as your inspiration brings infinite opportunities at TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 08 May 2023 to 28 July 2023 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - Starting 09 January 2023 or 14 August 2023

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit in either internship period. Please state your availability clearly in your resume (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About the Team
The E-Commerce Risk Control (ECRC) team's mission is :
- To protect TikTok e-commerce users, including and beyond buyer, seller, creator;
- To make Tiktok e-commerce the safest and most trusted place worldwide to transact online by securing the integrity of the e-commerce ecosystem and providing a safe shopping experience on the platform;
- Through building software systems, risk models and operational processes, as well as collaborating with many cross-functional teams and stakeholders.

The ECRC team works to prevent and detect any risk attempts in Tiktok e-commerce platforms (e.g. TikTok Shop, Fanno) and to mitigate the negative impact on our customers and Selling Partners (Sps), covering multiple classical and novel business risk areas such as account integrity, incentive abuse, malicious activities, brushing, click-farm, information leakage etc.

We achieve our mission by a) developing state-of-art Machine Learning (ML) solutions to prevent customers, SPs, and Tiktok from being impacted by bad actors’ actions and practices to gain unfair business advantages; b) empowering Tiktok teams, both internal to GNE and external, to reduce risk attempts by utilizing our mechanisms.

Responsibilities
- Respond to and mitigate business risks in our E-Commerce including and not limited to Incentive abuse, brushing order, malicious behaviours, payment fraud, ATO etc.;
- Establish reliable, efficient and modularized risk defence solutions, reduce the manual workload on ramping up risk controls on/against new business scenario, risk area, or abusive means;
- Uplevel risk defence excellence on privacy/compliance, machine learning, risk perception and analysis, achieve in-depth defence portfolio.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or other STEM disciplines (e.g. finance if applying for payment fraud positions);
- Solid data mining or machine learning background;
- Proficiency in at least two - Linux, Hadoop, Hive, Spark or Storm;
- Ability to think critically, objectively, rationally. Reason and communicate in a result-oriented, data-driven manner, with high autonomy;
- Deep understanding of modern machine learning theory and applications, especially around popular neural nets (e.g. natural language processing, graph embedding), and/or relevant unsupervised/semisupervised/transfer learning. Hands-on industrial model development skills and strong data science sense/habit.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Senior Backend Engineer (Golang/ NodeJS) - Tech industry,"Permanent role |Global well-established organisation in the ecommerce tech industry

About Our Client

We are partnering with a global well-established ecommerce organisation, based in US. They are one of the largest global entertainment streaming platform across the world.

Job Description

Involve in developing a platform subsystem end-to-end architecturally
Able to write high-quality production code in Go and Ruby and Javascript
Able to work with product stakeholders to help design roadmaps, prioritize between features and bug fixes
Mentor junior engineers by providing technical guidance and constructive feedback
The Successful Applicant

At least 5 years of software development experience, mainly in the back-end
Experience with designing and developing large scale distributed systems and microservices
Strong experience with back-end development technology stacks such as Go/Golang, Node.js, Ruby, Javascript, Python, PostgreSQL (Mysql), RabbitMQ, Redis, AWS and GCP
What's on Offer

Permanent role
Global well-established organisation in the ecommerce tech industry
Attractive remuneration and benefits package
Contact: Cheryl Ang

Quote job ref: JN-122022-5859022"
Java Developer (Full Stack) (Junior),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
The Java Developer will be part of our development team that has strong experience in agile development and in-depth knowledge of digital solutions. You will work in a highly productive and collaborative team where your ideas will be listened to and put into action. This exciting opportunity would suit a Java Developer who is looking to move upwards and onwards and is eager to work closely with senior management on interesting and super cool ideas. You will be collaborating with the Product, Design and Business teams to develop and maintain digital solutions for our prestigious clients in public sector and large commercial enterprises.

Responsibilities
Join project teams to work on full life-cycle web/mobile application projects from requirement gathering to solutioning, development, releasing and post-launch maintenance
Work with agile cross functional, cross countries teams to design, develop, maintain web/app application base on specifications and ensure successful releases
Support Project Manager/Scrum Master to provide consultation and direction to stakeholders for managing and delivering their expectations
Be a self-starter, proactively recognise and solve issues as they arise
Be motivated in continuous learning and improvement to enhance your skills in an ever changing environment
Qualifications And Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or other relevant qualifications
We are hiring all levels of experiences with full-stack exposure (1-6 years). Salary will commemorate with experience
Proficient in Java development with excellent knowledge of Spring Boot framework
Solid understanding of object-oriented programming and fundamental design principles behind a scalable application on the clouds
Extensive experience and knowledge of Relational Database, SQL-query programming, microservice, ORM (JPA2, Hibernate) and various architectural and design patterns (MVC, concurrency pattern, singleton pattern, etc.)
Comprehensive experience and knowledge of modern development tools and technologies: Redis, Docker, Kubernetes, Infrastructure-as-code
Profound insights of JVM, memory optimisation, memory leak troubleshooting
Hands-on experience on server setup and maintenance, DevOps, and experience working with Cloud Infrastructure (AWS/Azure) will be an advantage
Hands-on experience with Java platforms (Adobe Experience Manager, IBM Mobile First Platform, Jahia, etc.) will be an advantage
Following certifications will be highly considered: Azure Developer (Associate), Azure Solutions Architect (Expert), Azure DevOps Engineer (Expert), AWS Developer (Associate), AWS Solutions Architect (Professional), AWS DevOps Engineer (Professional)
English-speaking with good communication and teamwork skills
Ability to work within a fast-paced agile development environment
Candidates with extensive experience, excellent communications skills and good certifications will be considered for Team Lead/Technical Architect role
Required Technology Stack
Front-ent: React JS, Angular, HTML/CSS
Middleware: Jetty, Tomcat, Nginx, JBoss, Oracle Weblogic
Database: PostgreSQL, MySQL, Azure Database for PostgreSQL, Azure Database for MySQL, Amazon RDS (PostgreSQL/MySQL), Amazon Aurora (PostgreSQL/MySQL), Oracle
OS: Red Hat Enterprise Linux, Amazon Linux
IDE/CLI: Eclipse, IntelliJ, Ant, Maven, Gradle, Npm
CI/CD: Bitbucket/Gitlab, Bamboo/Jenkins, SonarQube (code quality inspection), Robot Framework (test automation)
Cloud Infrastructure: AWS, Azure
Infrastructure as Code: Terraform
Platform: Adobe Experience Manager, Jahia, IBM MFP
NOTICE

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.

By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read and agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining, and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration.

Consequences of Not Providing Personal Data for Transaction/Service/Application

Please be noted that should you not consent and provide us with the relevant personal data to fulfil the “Purposes” of collection, use and disclosure of your personal data by Decision Science Agency Pte Ltd, it may hinder our ability to continue to interact with you. We may not be able to make a decision on your recruitment and employment or comply with the law and therefore, we may not be able to make an offer of employment.

You may refer to and access our website https://www.decision-science.com/#privacy-policy for more information.
Desired Skills and Experience
RDS, Kubernetes, Oracle, PostgreSQL, Design Patterns, Architect, Architectural, MySQL, Amazon Aurora, Tomcat, Maven, Angular, Docker, Java, Hibernate, Agile Development"
Software Engineer (Data Mining) - Global E-Commerce,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About The Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated.

With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-commerce here at TikTok.

Responsibilities:
- Responsible for development of data-empowered capabilities for e-commerce platform, enable different e-commerce verticals to extract and apply key insights from oceans of data to meet their business needs
- Data mining for e-commerce, building tagging system based on massive data, analysing user, traffic, e-commerce and other data, combining with business to improve GMV
- Data analysis, mining, model specific productization; understanding of e-commerce business, able to work with PM to continuously optimize data products based on data-driven
- Develop data mining pipelines to extract data assets (eg. entity labels) from aggregated data and enable the extraction of actionable insights from large volumes of domain data
- Design and development of various strategies, algorithms and machine learning techniques to improve the accuracy and coverage of extracted data assets
- Analyze e-commerce data-related business problems and abstract them into data-related requirements that are then implemented to help resolve key business problems

Qualifications

- B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions
- 5 years experience in data structures and algorithms, familiar with one or more: machine learning, natural language processing, data mining
- Familiar with one of the Python/Java/Go/C++ programming languages
- Familiar with common data processing technologies (Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Storm, Flink), with demonstrable coding skills
- Familiar with common data mining techniques and machine learning algorithms (GBDT, Xgboost, FM, DFM, etc.), and familiar with their principles and scope of application
- Proficiency in data mining, machine learning tools and common frameworks (TensorFlow, Pytorch)
- Continuous learning, keeping up with the latest research directions and results in the field of machine learning, for the exploration of big data applications in various vertical areas
- In-depth research experience in the following areas is preferred
1. Analysis and mining of user behaviour data and construction of user portraits.
2. Data mining experience in vertical industries (e-commerce, finance, games, travel, real estate, etc.).
3. Development and optimization of advertising and recommendation algorithms.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Engineer (Comms Engineering), Systems Management","The Defence Science and Technology Agency (DSTA) brings you to the forefront of cybersecurity, digital transformation and engineering. From working on software development and systems integration to unmanned technologies and artificial intelligence, you can have an impact on Singapore’s defence.

Achieve your fullest potential with opportunities to build your technical expertise and hone your competencies in diverse domains. You can also expect an immersive learning experience, where you will work with bright minds and collaborate with global industry experts.

DSTA is recognised as one of the top 10 employers in the Engineering & IT sector, where our engineers and IT professionals work alongside procurement specialists to deliver state-of-the-art capabilities for Singapore’s peace and security.

Internship opportunities and a meaningful career await you.

Learn more about DSTA at https://www.dsta.gov.sg . You may also email us at hrjobs@dsta.gov.s g if you have any enquiries pertaining to careers.

Opportunity

We are looking for someone to join the System Management Programme Centre where you would be part of the team to deliver high availability and assurance of Communication Systems to the SAF.

Define and design criterion for system maintainability and sustainability
Apply engineering knowledge to analyse and develop solutions to enhance communications systems
Implement engineering solutions together with robust validation for communications systems

Requirements

Tertiary qualification in Electrical and Electronic Engineering, preferably with knowledge in communications, such as Radio Frequency (RF), digital communications or a related discipline
Good written, verbal and interpersonal skills
Strong analytical skills, resourceful, meticulous and a team player"
Senior Web Scraping and Crawler Engineer,"As a senior Web scraping & crawler engineer, you will be working closely with co-founding team to define priorities and develop information sourcing roadmaps. You will also be in-charge of design and implement the architecture of a large-scale crawling system.

Client Details

Our client, a growing web 3 company that seeks to revolutionize crypto research and investing with AI. The team comprises of some of the top expertise in hedge fund, machine learning, and blockchain experience.

Description

As a Senior Web Scraping/Crawler Engineer, you are responsible for:

Architecture design and research and development of distributed crawler and data acquisition system
Design and development of distributed crawler module service architecture and data storage architecture
Lead the effort to design and implement the architecture of a large-scale crawling system (100+ crawlers)
Design, implement, and maintain various components of data acquisition infrastructure (building new crawlers, maintaining existing crawlers, data cleaners & loaders)
Profile

A successful candidate should possess min. 3 years in designing crawler, data wrangling, building and maintaining 100+ spiders, avoiding bot prevention techniques. He/she shall possess at least Bachelor's degree in quantitative field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research or other related field).

Job Offer

Competitive salary & equity compensation
Annual trip in some coolest places across the world
To apply online please click the 'Apply' button below. For a confidential discussion about this role please contact Wilson Tay on +65 6416 9838"
Infrastructure Engineer,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centres. Our 506,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Top 3 Must have skills / Primary skills

Experience in Linux administration including Active Directory, NTP, syslog integration.
Experience in setting up central syslog, backup solution, virtual platform using VMware.
Able to setup server its storage and partition
Able to install middleware such as Hadoop ecosystem like Sentry, Ranger.

Good to have skills

Familiar with Cisco switches and Firewall

Job Responsibilities:

Able to setup physical Linux server and virtual platform using VMware.
Able to setup backup, central sys log, integrate 2FA and work on security component such as NIDS.
Able to monitor and tune the performance of the platform.
Able to communicate effectively with the team member and end users and take ownerships of delivering the requirements.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."
"Fullstack Software Engineer (Traffic Infrastructure), Infrastructure Engineering","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Our Traffic Infrastructure Engineering team build and operate hyper-scale datacenters, manage the life cycle of server fleet, allocate cloud/edge resources and create various cloud/edge solutions, and provide infrastructure services including widely distributed Content Distribution Networks (CDNs).

The team build and leverage various platforms to manage and interact with our infrastructures and services. To support the fast growth and improve operation efficiency, these platforms need to be feature rich, easy to use, scalable, agile and compliant to with policies and procedures.

Responsibilities

Build platforms, systems and services for internal and external teams to interact with the large scale production systems.
Build tools and platforms to improve engineering productivity.
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve software.
Bring new ideas and technologies into our platform, innovate and iterate.

Qualifications

BS degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.
Experience in a frontend development role, with solid JavaScript/HTML/CSS skills.
Experience with one or more web frameworks (Vue/React/Angular).
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to: Java, C/C++, Python, or Go.
Experience working with two or more of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, networking systems, developing large software systems."
"DevOps Engineer (Global Infrastructure & SRE), Global Payments","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

The Global Payments team is building a platform to provide cross-border payment solutions for ByteDance's products and services, that are growing rapidly worldwide. We serve multiple overseas businesses within ByteDance, such as Advertising, Live Broadcasting, E-commerce, Games, etc.

Responsibilities

Design, develop, and test qualified services that integrate with external channels;
Develop tools to enhance system monitoring and alarm;
Documents and demonstrates solutions by developing documentation, data, code comments, and clear code;
Provide information by collecting, analysing, and summarising development and service issues;
Collecting and statistic periodic data for evaluating health of the system.
Participation in occasional 24/7 on-call rotations to detect online faults, investigate root causes, and execute remedy plans;

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science-related technical discipline, or equivalent practical experience;
Software development experience in one or more general-purpose programming languages, such as Java/Go/C++/C#/Python;
Excellent proficiency in backend server development and expertise in relational database;
Strong analytical thinking and excellent troubleshooting.

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
SCCM / MECM Engineer,"Ad-hoc baseline application packaging.
Generating the Weekly Report.
Logging JIRA ticket.
Logging Change Management request.
SCCM L1 application packaging.
Generating reports for all the application and coordinating with ServiceDesk.
Pre-pilot UAT testing.
3rd party application packaging. E.g. Google Chrome, Adobe Reader, Microsoft Edge and Mozila Firefox.
Lenovo Patch downloading drivers for the Lenovo models used by clients.
Monitoring compliance report for windows and office update.
Generating application detail report e.g. Java, MS office, etc.
Build OS report and monitoring deployment status.
Communicating with clients for vulnerability tracking with Jira request.
Closing SR request for staff notebook software. Coordinating meeting with users and helping software to install. Closing SR’s by prior.
Coordinating with users to get exe. or msi. files to do package and appropriate deployment groups details for software distribution ticket.
Monthly report submission."
Senior BSP Development Engineer (Digital Assets/ Blockchain),"About Bitdeer:
Bitdeer Group is the world’s leading digital asset mining ecological service provider. It was founded by Jihan Wu, a renowned pioneer in the crypto industry, along with Sequoia Capital, IDG, and other well-known investment institutions in the field of blockchain. Bitdeer Group was established in 2020 with the headquarter in Singapore and has branches across the globe such as the United States, Europe, and other countries and regions. Adhering to a professional, authentic, and reliable corporate culture, Bitdeer Group is committed to becoming the world's most reliable digital asset mining service provider, which can provide customers with full mining eco-services including computing power sharing and mining farm management.
What you will be responsible for:
Responsible for the development and maintenance of the Linux kernel and drivers, including:
1. Develop bootloader and firmware for new hardware platforms;
2. Design, develop and test device drivers for new hardware, and write documentation;
3. Write, debug and test device drivers and various protocol stacks (for example, USB, SATA, network, Wi-Fi, Streaming);
4. Analyze and solve problems found during system integration;
5. Optimize the Linux kernel and drivers;
How you will stand out:
1.Bachelor degree and above. Computer related specialization.
2.More than 2 years of LINUX driver experience, familiar with embedded software debugging real-time operating system; rich experience in ASM/C/C++ development; familiar with ARM architecture, ARM assembly, emulator/JTAG debugger;
3.Familiar with LINUX architecture is preferred;
4.Have good professional quality and teamwork spirit, strong learning and communication skills.

What you will expect:
Fast-growing digital assets service provider company with a supreme network of investors, pioneers and enthusiast with ample knowledge and experience in the new industry;
Ability to contribute directly and make an impact to the future of digital asset industry;
The chance to build up new things/processes/systems from scratch;
Personal accountability, fast growth and learning opportunities;
An inspiring working environment with dynamic workspaces, flexible work time, flat structures, great team and a start-up spirit;
Attractive salary package and welfare benefits;
The change to grow your knowledge and career with internal and external training and mentoring resources."
Technical Services Engineer ( Systems ),"Responsibilities:


Carry out technical services function for Fleet Technical Management customers to ensure smooth operations of customers’ fleet and high Dispatch Reliability.
Provide technical services support to Operational Divisions to achieve quality work and fast turnaround time.
Evaluate aircraft health and reviewing various technical bulletins and publications from OEM for performance and reliability improvement.
Liaise with other divisions and aircraft / components manufacturers & vendors for various fleet technical issues.
Attend and review aircraft delays and recurring defects for rectification and preventive actions.
Raise Modification Bulletins, Engineering Notes, Maintenance Memos, and Drawings for Systems related issues.
Perform aircraft weighing activities on customer fleet.
Ensure all designs generated are sound and are in compliance with the Singapore Air Navigation Order, Singapore Airworthiness Requirements (SAR) Part 21 and Airworthiness Notices.
Other duties as assigned by Manager Technical Services or Vice President Technical Services & Planning.



Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree in Aerospace or Mechanical Engineering.
Good team player
Strong problem-solving skills
Meticulous and motivated
Stakeholder management skills
Be prepared to work extended hours to support operational issues


Please note that only short-listed candidates will be notified.

At SIA Engineering, we are committed to ensuring your personal information is protected and never misused. Personal data collected will be used or disclosed only for the purposes of your job application and potential employment with SIA Engineering, such as for assessing and evaluating your suitability for employment in any current or prospective position within the organization and verifying your identity and accuracy of the personal details and other information provided.

By submitting your application for this position, you consent to:
a) the collection, use and disclosure of your personal data by SIA Engineering for the purposes of your application and potential employment with SIA Engineering, including disclosing such personal data to any of SIA Engineering’s subsidiaries, affiliates or related corporations (if necessary for the processing of your job application); and
b) SIA Engineering’s retention of your personal data for 1 year for consideration of future job opportunities (where applicable)"
Data Engineer,"Role Description ( Newly Created Role)
A Data Engineer (DE) will be part of a small IT team, mainly tasked with designing solutions that include data, data intelligence, data aggregation and reporting. The role involves understanding the disparate data sources in the organization that are on-premise/cloud bespoke/COTS systems, analyze the data schema and design the data elements that needs to be continuously extracted into a central repository for data analysis. The role works closely with internal teams (graphic designers, UX Leads, business analysts, operations, business users) in the organization during the development life-cycle of an application. FSDs would need to ensure the applications are built with quality code, collaborate well with design elements, integrate with on-premise / cloud systems, bespoke / COTS applications, able to scale well with load, and perform efficiently.



Responsibilities
Developing roadmap and architecture to manage data assets throughout the data lifecycle of the organization
Managing and designing infrastructure for extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide range of data sources
Liaise with the Data Scientists, Architects, software developers, and business analysts/users to understand how data needs to be converted, loaded, processed and presented
Experience in designing data driven decisions backed through BI tools and Data
Write technical design documentation



Required competencies
Technical Expertise
4+ years of experience as a data engineer/analyst or similar role.
Experience in data ingestion, cleaning and processing tools.
Design, develop and deploy programs, source codes, batch scripts, complex SQL stored procures, functions and triggers.
Highly proficient in MS SQL Server, MS SQL Reporting Service (SSRS) and SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS).
Experience in end-to-end design, coding, testing, review and implementation using Power BI or similar service offerings.
Develop spreadsheets, diagrams and process map to document needs.
Familiarity with graphic design, data visualization and user experience .
Experience with Python, JavaScript will be plus.
Experience with database technology, RDBMS and No-SQL.
Experience in performance optimization and tuning.
Contribute effectively in a fast-paced, deadline-driven, and collaborative programming environment.
Stays up to date with current trends, best practices and new technologies.
Knowledge & practices of SDLC process and agile methodologies.


Mindset & Behaviours
Able to see the big picture, the vision and understands the business requirements and a strong passion for technology.
Orientation to Detail, Communication, Teamwork, Time Management, Personal Responsibility, Future Orientation, Growth Mindset, Resilience
A curious, creative problem solver that always want to learn
Open-minded, and enjoy collaboration with both designers and other developers"
"Software Engineer (Project) - (C#, .Net, Java,SDLC, Cyber Security ) DO","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Responsibilities
Consultant will learn and understand the needs of the client and be the go-to person for the assigned SAST product - Checkmarx
Leads the SAST project with various Development teams of the client
Instils the right security mindset and culture across the Development team of the client
Reviews the security vulnerabilities found on the project along with the relevant development team of the client
Assists with vulnerability remediation, clarify questions, review work performed
Understands applications from a technical architecture and business goals perspective to apply Security best practices
Works on multiple tasks and support one or more project teams simultaneously
Requirements
Proficient with programming language e.g., C#, .NET, Java, etc.
Preferably possess Threat Modelling Knowledge and understand DevOps Integration
How To Apply

Interested applicants, please click on “Apply Now”. We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).

Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.

Trust Recruit Pte Ltd

EA License No: 19C9950

EA Personnel: Ong Darlene Day Ibasco

EA Personnel Reg No: R22105561
Desired Skills and Experience
Leadership, Remediation, .NET, SDLC, MS Word, Technical Architecture, Java, C#, Full SDLC, Project Delivery"
Junior/Mid-level Software Engineer - Data Engineering,"The Trade Desk is a global technology company with a mission to create a better, more open internet for everyone through principled, intelligent advertising. Handling over 1 trillion queries per day, our platform operates at an unprecedented scale. We have also built something even stronger and more valuable: an award-winning culture based on trust, ownership, empathy, and collaboration. We value the unique experiences and perspectives that each person brings to The Trade Desk, and we are committed to fostering inclusive spaces where everyone can bring their authentic selves to work every day.

Do you have a passion for solving hard problems at scale? Are you eager to join a dynamic, globally-connected team where your contributions will make a meaningful difference in building a better media ecosystem? Come and see why Fortune magazine consistently ranks The Trade Desk among the best small-medium-sized workplaces globally.

About the Role:

Our Data Engineering Software Engineers are end-to-end owners. You will participate actively in all aspects of designing, building, and delivering data products for our clients.
You will work with petabyte-scale data challenges, large-scale distributed systems coordinating thousands of servers in cloud and physical data centers around the world, machine learning, and advanced visualizations – to name a few.
You will work with data processing pipelines, ML pipelines, data processing automation, data governance, data visualization, data quality, data privacy, data warehousing.
Our Software Engineers work with a variety of platforms and technologies, such as Docker, Kubernetes, Gitlab, Bamboo, AWS, Azure, Scala, Spark, SQL Server, and Vertica.

Who We Are Looking For:

You understand engineering and computer science fundamentals. At our scale, many off-the-shelf techniques and existing technologies (open source and enterprise) simply don't work. You are able to work from first principles to evaluate solutions and adapt them to a unique environment.
You are passionate about data engineering. You'll work at petabyte-scale with SQL, ETL, data modeling, and technologies similar to Spark, Scala, C#, Java, etc..
You are a creative thinker, not bound by ""the way things have always been done"". What you know is less important than how well you learn and innovate. We don't need engineers who know all the answers; we need engineers who can invent the answers no one has thought of yet, to the questions yet to be asked.

What We Care About:

What and how you can contribute is what’s important to us. Our consideration is not limited by the kind of education you have or the specific technologies you have experience with. Variety of technical challenge is one of the best things about working at The Trade Desk as an engineer, but we do not expect you to know every technology we use when you start. What we care about is that you can learn quickly and solve complex problems using the best tools for the job.

Our culture runs much deeper than just having fun together (though, we do that well too...) – the people we want on our team are trust-builders, generous givers, scrappy problem solvers, and gritty pursuers of excellence.

Does this sound like you? If so, we welcome your application and the chance to meet you.

Our Compensation and Benefits (for Colorado and New York residents only)

$96,500 -$176,900

In accordance with Colorado and New York law, the range provided is The Trade Desk’s reasonable estimate of the base compensation for this role. The actual amount may be higher or lower, based on non-discriminatory factors such as experience, knowledge, skills, abilities and location.

All employees may be eligible for other forms of compensation such as stock-based compensation, which are awarded to employees based on company and individual performance. TTD also offers other compensation depending on the role such as sales-based incentives and commissions.

The Trade Desk also offers a competitive benefits package. Click here to learn more.

The Trade Desk does not accept unsolicited resumes from search firm recruiters. Fees will not be paid in the event a candidate submitted by a recruiter without an agreement in place is hired; such resumes will be deemed the sole property of The Trade Desk. The Trade Desk is an equal opportunity employer. All aspects of employment will be based on merit, competence, performance, and business needs. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, marital status, age, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, pregnancy, genetic information, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other status protected under federal, state, or local law.

REQ-3317"
Principal Software Development Engineer,"We are seeking a results-driven Principal Software Development Engineer to join our high-performing Engineering team at Ground Labs. As a Principal Software Development Engineer, you will join a motivated and multi-talented team of engineers to build powerful products and solve awesome real world problems. This position will be based in our Singapore headquarters and will report into our Engineering Manager.

We are looking for a “hands on” individual who can quickly roll up their sleeves and make things happen. We work on different products & technologies, and the ideal candidate is someone who is a self-starter and is willing and able to learn things on the job fast and well.
At Ground Labs we are a people company - we are proud of what we do and have fun doing it! If you have what it takes to be a contributing member of the team then come be a part of our continued success story and help shape our future.

You will be responsible for:
Researching new technologies and prototype solutions
Preparing long term plans for the software development
Shaping and overseeing the engineering vision of the company products and services
Working with Product Team on software high level design and architecture
Developing critical product functionality and fixing critical software bugs
Working with Customer Support and customers to troubleshoot and address issues
Participating in all phases of software development
Mentoring other engineers

To be successful in this role, you will need to have:
A degree or equivalent in Computer Science or related field, a Master/PHD degree would be an added advantage
12 years of relevant industry experience
Strong experience with modern C++ development
Exposure to modern technologies in IT industry
Proven track record of designing and developing scalable, multi-threaded, low latency systems
Strong foundation of: Software Security; Operating Systems; Databases; Computer Networks; Cloud Storage and Computing
Ability to direct and lead other engineers and reviewing their code
Ability to take ownership of the large components of the products
Excellent English written/oral communication skills

About us
Ground Labs enables organizations to discover and remediate all of their data across multiple types and locations — on servers, on desktops and in the cloud. Ground Labs serves as the most comprehensive and trusted solution in the enterprise to confidently mitigate risk and find sensitive data. Ground Labs’ core focus is to develop technology to meet the increasing challenges of data management and regulatory compliance. This is shown with our flagship products of Enterprise Recon and Card Recon, along with our continued development of future solutions to address the complexities, challenges and intricacies of data discovery. Since the company’s inception, we have remained faithful to our commitment and core focus of discovering data, no matter where it resides.

Our business has grown and so has our headcount globally. We continue to thrive on teamwork, collaboration at all levels, getting staff involved in decision-making processes and information sharing. Our products and people remain the core of what we do. You will also be given the opportunity to further your learning and skillset through training programme(s) sponsored by us. If you feel that our values match yours and that you are up for a challenge in a fast moving tech company, apply now!"
Data Engineer,"About the Firm:

Founded in 2006, Sun Venture is a long-term investor with a methodical and disciplined investment approach. At Sun Venture, we invest globally and across different asset classes such as public equities, fixed income, private markets funds, real estate, private equity and alternatives.

www.sunventure.com

Main Responsibilities:
Work with business units and team members to address process flows and productivity through application design and automation
Develop intuitive and maintainable software components that address end-user needs
Maintain, update, or enhance software applications regularly to meet new requirements
Review, analyse, and test applications on cloud platforms
Troubleshoot coding issues promptly to minimise business impact, particularly in operational workloads and transactional reporting environments
Continuously improve/enhance software development processes or life-cycle
Provide training and guidance to other team members in the use of software applications

Job Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree from a recognised university in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or equivalent.
1 to 3 years’ experience in developing software applications.
JavaScript exposure is required, especially as it pertains to NoSQL database and RESTful API consumption on the backend
Development experience in a major front-end library is highly advantageous, such as with React.js or React-adjacent like Next.js or Remix.
Experienced in full-stack development frameworks, including database schema for NoSQL and SQL (ORM) OLTP-oriented workloads
Any experience in Linux OS is advantageous, especially with Debian-based distros and working in a CLI-first environment
Knowledge of modern cloud-based tools is advantageous such as but not limited to GitHub, Azure, and Containerization (Docker, Compose, PaaS, FaaS, etc.)
Broad understanding of security principles in modern web applications"
Software Engineer (Internship),"Internship Opportunity with the possibility of conversion to FTE

Looking for students graduating in 2024 - Fall Semester

Ant Group's global payment business is to build payment solutions for global merchants and global users. Among them, payment standards are an extremely important part. In the process of business development and scale, standardization can clearly clarify the interaction of all parties, improve the efficiency of intercommunication, and achieve business intercommunication in the best way
Our internship program aims to provide potential talents with the platform to unleash their potential and achieve long-term growth with us.

The Role
· Design solutions involving integration with multiple systems and services
· Develop high volume, high performance, low latency, and reliable mission-critical applications
· Write maintainable, robust, and testable code
· Perform code and test case review
· Implement processes, solutions, or tools to improve software delivery and quality
· Able to adopt the latest software development trends and industry best practices

Requirements
· Excellent social, communication, presentation and leadership skills
· Excellent knowledge of Java and one other programming language
· Able to work in a fast-paced and results-driven environment"
DevOps Engineer,"Biofourmis is a rapidly growing, global digital health company filled with committed, passionate professionals who care about augmenting personalized care and empowering people with complex chronic conditions to live better and healthier lives. We are pioneering an entirely new category of medicine by developing clinically validated, software-based therapeutics to provide improved outcomes for patients, smarter engagement & tracking tools for clinicians, and cost-effective solutions for payers. We are collectively devoted to a single-minded idea: powering personally predictive care.

Our dynamic growth has been marked by doubled headcount in the last 12 months via both expansion & acquisition, yielding a global footprint with offices in Boston, Singapore, Bangalore, and Zurich. We are backed by prominent international venture capital investment & have cultivated relationships with worldwide healthcare stakeholders over the last 5 years. Our talented team features numerous PhD’s in Data Science and Biostatistics, over 80 patents, prolific scientific publications, world-class systems, developers & engineers, and leaders in the clinical operations space.

Summary

Biofourmis’ technology is applicable to a multitude of different therapeutics areas. We are building out a dramatically expanded of solutions to address heart failure, oncology, and infectious diseases. The DevOps engineer will contribute in enhancing the existing automated cloud-based infrastructure and design and implement the next generation IaC platform. As a member of the DevOps team, this individual will be instrumental in increasing deployment velocity into the production environment and monitoring various systems continuously for health and uptime. The ideal candidate for this role will have a passion for automation of infrastructure using infrastructure-as-code and SRE principles.

Responsibilities:

Support and help manage the whole AWS infrastructure for all production sites for world class uptime and resiliency metrics.
Help Build, scale, and secure application cloud infrastructure using tools like Terraform, Kubernetes, and Docker.
Build and maintain robust CI/CD pipelines with codeDeploy and Bitbucket pipelines
Advocate and implement industry best practices for configuration management and build/deployment automation
Work closely with developers to provide insight into operational, security, and performance considerations
Work closely with developers during the deployment and testing phases to provide insight into operational, security, and performance considerations
Participate in an on-call rotation to triage and analyze abnormalities in system operation leveraging instrumentation like ELK
Perseverance to debug complex problems across the whole stack
Create tooling that works across cloud providers like AWS, Azure
Help optimize and define engineering processes.

Experience / Training:

4+ years of experience in DevOps/Systems Administration with 2+ years of experience with cloud-based provisioning, monitoring, and troubleshooting (preferably AWS or Azure) applications.
Practitioner experience with containerization (docker & Kubernetes), cloud technologies, tools (Jenkins, CodeDeploy) and practices (CI/CD patterns, automated provisioning & release, GitOps, IaC)
Work experience in medical devices / biotech company.
Cloud & DevOps Certifications e.g., AWS Architect, Developer or Ops

Education:

Advanced Degree in Computer Science or relevant engineering discipline. An equivalent of the same in working experience is also accepted for the position.

Skills:

Solution design to deployment, indepth experience with various leading technologies/services like Kafka, Pyspark, Fission, Kubernetes, IoT hub, Redis, timescaleDB, mongodb, AKS, EKS, S3, AWS glue, Athena.
Hands on experience Deploying and managing Highly Available, Scalable and resilient AWS/AZURE cloud application.
Expertise in Infrastructure automation tools like Terraform, Ansible or CloudFormation
Strong knowledge in at least one scripting language, preferably Python/Golang
Strong experience of monitoring solution like Prometheus, Grafana, ELK
Outstanding interpersonal skills, the ability to innovate, inspire, and collaborate with cross group/functional teams with a high degree of independence and success
Excellent written and verbal communication skills targeting a broad range of audiences from engineers to senior leadership."
"Software Engineer, Data AML Engine","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Responsibilities
- Build an effective toolchain to improve development performance;
- Introduce new AI technologies to our online system, support billions of users all over the world;
- Improve the reliability of the system, manage the challenges of scale and complexity;
- Squeeze extreme performance from hardware and handle huge amount of requests

Qualifications

To be successful in this role, you have
- Bachelor's degree or above in Computer Science, Engineering or related fields.
- Strong programming and coding experience with at least one modern language such as C/C++, Golang, Python
- Experience contributing to the large scale distributed systems, multi-tenant systems (architecture, reliability and scaling)
- Strong analytical abilities and problem solving
- Good communication, self-motivation, engineering practice, documentation, etc.

Preferred
- Familiar with large-scale distributed systems like Spark and Elasticsearch;
- Familiar with the web technologies, such as Django / Flask / React.JS etc."
Lead Machine Learning Engineer,"An exciting Lead Machine Learning Engineer job opportunity has become available at a leading technology software company with a strong presence in APAC.

About the Lead Machine Learning Engineer Role:
This company is a leading technology software company with a strong presence across APAC. They are looking to hire a Lead Machine Learning Engineer.

Key Responsibilities:

Designing and building machine learning and deep-learning solutions
Deploying data solutions and pipelines to increase the efficiency of ML workflows
Exploring and working on new platforms, technologies, and algorithms
Maintaining automated pipelines and monitoring ML tools
Working with data scientists and domain experts to design the ML workflow and deployment
To succeed in this Lead Machine Learning Engineer role, you will need to have around six years of experience.

Key Requirements:

Bachelor's degree in computer science or equivalent
Experience in big data frameworks like Hive, Spark, and Hadoop
Hands-on experience in Python, Pyspark, and Scala
Experience in various ML libraries and packages
Experience in scripting and automated testing
Exposure to microservices and architecture
Proven skills in setting up data and ML pipelines in production
This is an excellent opportunity to be part of a company with a strong footprint within the region.

If you are driven, determined, and want to take the next step in your career, this is the role for you. Excellent career progression opportunities await the right person in this exciting Lead Machine Learning Engineer role.

Apply today or contact me at +65 6228 5350 to discuss this new opportunity. Alternatively, send your resume to sachet.sethi@robertwalters.com.sg.


Do note that we will only be in touch if your application is shortlisted.


Robert Walters (Singapore) Pte Ltd


ROC No.: 199706961E | EA Licence No.: 03C5451


EA Registration No.: R1439850 Sachet Sethi"
Senior Software Applications Development Engineer,"Want to be a part of our team?

Plans, designs, develops, and tests software systems or applications for software enhancements and new products including cloud-based or internet-related tools.

Working at NTT

The Software Development Engineer is accountable for designing, developing, and testing software systems, modules, or applications for software enhancements and new products including cloud-based or internet-related tools. Incumbents within this job are responsible for detailed design for certain modules/sub-systems, doing prototype for multi-vendor infrastructure, and showcasing it internally or externally to clients. Design and develop functionality in a micro-services environment working with APIs, telemetry data, and running ML/AI algorithms on it, working with both structured and unstructured data.

Key Roles and Responsibilities:
Design and develop solutions and functionality that drives the growth of business
Write and test code
Execute automated testing
Participate in software deployment
Deliver software components while working in collaboration with the product team
Integrate and build solutions through automation and coding, using 3rd party software
Craft, build, and debug large scale distributed systems
Write, update and maintain the technical program, end-user documentation, and operational procedures
Refactoring code
Review code was written by other developers

Knowledge, Skills, and Attributes:
Strong understanding of cloud architecture and services in multiple public clouds like AWS, GCP, Microsoft Azure, and Microsoft Office 365
Fluent in programming languages such as C/C++, Java, Python, Node.js, etc.
Foundation in data structures, algorithms, and software design with strong analytical and debugging skills
Good understanding of micro services-based software architecture and experience with API product development
Expertise with SQL and no-SQL data stores including Elasticsearch, MongoDB, Cassandra
Experience with container run time (Docker, LXC/LXD)
Familiar with agile practices and believes in test-driven development
Ability to mentor junior engineers
Possess a can-do attitude and one that takes initiative
Good interpersonal skills
Ability to work multi-functionally and work well as a team
Ability to work well in a diverse team with different backgrounds and experience levels
Ability to thrive in a dynamic, fast-paced environment
Experience with CI/CD concepts and tools

Academic Qualifications and Certifications:
ME/MTech in Computer Science or equivalent with related demonstrable experience or BE/BTech in Computer Science or equivalent with related demonstrable experience as a software engineer working on large scale systems

Required Experience:
Experience working with geo-distributed teams through innovation, bootstrapping, pilot, and production phases with multiple stakeholders to the highest levels of quality and performance
Experience in working with large data sets and ability to apply proper ML/AI algorithms
Two or more years developing micro-services and RESTful APIs

What will make you a good fit for the role?"
DevOps Engineer,"Company Overview

Our client is a European MNC specializing in surveying and geographical measurement (geomatics). Due to its business expansion needs, our client is looking to recruit a DevOps Engineer. This is a permanent hiring, in-house position.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Together with your team colleagues, you develop and support a globally distributed software landscape with which complex high-tech instruments are produced and serviced:
JOB REQUIREMENTS: Working Location: Singapore
Desktop front-ends
Dockerized microservices
Kubernetes clusters
SQL databases
You analyse problems with production and service managers
You find advanced software solutions in an industrial environment in cooperation with the IT department and embedded developers
You will develop these solutions on a C# and .NET (core) basis in a Scrum team
You are responsible for the further development and support of the monitoring and operation of the running system in cooperation with the IT department
You provide 2nd level support for this software landscape
You further develop the build, continuous integration and deployment chain with the Continuous Integration /Continuous Deployment team
Master's degree in computer science or a similar discipline
Solid knowledge of C#/.NET (core)
Docker and Kubernetes experience
Enjoys developing and operating a complex software landscape and infrastructure
Passionate for automation and innovative industrial topics, such as Smart Factory or IoT
Practical experience with conception, development, automated testing and deployment of creative object-oriented software solutions
Interest in Continuous Integration /Continuous Deployment infrastructures and automated software deployment
Open communication with other disciplines and teams
Self -initiative and analytical as well as a reliable way of working
Proficient in English to liaise with European colleagues.
Willing and able to travel for work
Possess work experience with colleagues of different cultures outside of Asia
ancher, Terraform and Prometheus knowledge is an advantage
Practical knowledge in the use of network technologies, such as firewalls, router settings and DMZ is a plus

Apply online or feel free to contact me directly (via email:sarah.chin@jac-recruitment.com) for more information about this opportunity. Due to the high volume of applicants, we regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. Thank you for your understanding.

Sarah Chin (R 1655546)

JAC Recruitment Pte Ltd (EA Lic No: 90C3026)

#countrysingapore"
Enterprise Architect,"At Singtel, we believe in the strength of a vibrant, diverse and inclusive workforce where backgrounds, perspectives and life experiences of our people help us innovate and create strong connections with our customers. We strive to ensure all our people practices are non-discriminatory and provide a fair, performance-based work culture that is diverse, inclusive and collaborative.

Join us and experience what it’s like to be with an Employer of Choice*. Together, let’s create a brighter digital future for all. *Awarded at the HR Fest Awards 2020.

Drive development of reference architecture, technology standards, architecture principles and patterns for Singtel Group IT 
Ensure and guide projects solution alignment to Singtel’s enterprise reference Architecture, strategy, standards & polices
As ARB secretariat set guideline and process for ARB submission, templates, session, approval and exemption
Manage technical debt in the organization and ensure technical debts are monitored and governed
Review all major RFP responses from EA perspective, engage with Singtel vendors to ensure seamless integration of vendors product with Singtel ecosystem
Champion Solution Delivery methodology for technical and architecture deliverables - define the process for engaging ARB, Infosec, Data Protection office and other compliance teams
Maintain enterprise architecture repository (EAR) & City maps, perform application portfolio analysis and risk assessment from security, EOL/EOS, technical debt, cost perspective
Define and generate various technology and architecture reports to help CIO office taking right decision on investment in technology and IT
Ensure Alignment of IT architecture across various business units and regional Operators, reduce duplication and maximize reuse across the group
Provides technical/solution expertise and advice to senior/executive management on domain application landscape and current and emerging systems trends, practices, opportunities and risks within area of expertise
Builds and develops effective relationships with senior/executive management and enterprise/domain architects globally, in order to influence optimal business outcomes and with other departments to achieve set goals.
Maintains external alignments with customers, relevant subject matter experts (SMEs) or external bodies as required. Represents company in external bodies & forums
Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Engineering or its equivalent
Passion for architecture and ability to pick up and learn new technological advances very quickly
Exhibits leadership in guiding team members, adapts to changes in technology and business domains, has good knowledge of latest trends in the market and is well respected within the team
Solid understanding of Public Cloud (pref. AWS) architecture. Cloud certification is a plus
Ability to effectively communicate vision and roadmap to all stakeholders. Exceptional communication skills with diverse audiences (including non-technical audiences)"
Software and Applications Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Unison Consulting Pte Ltd is looking for Software and Applications Developer for their Software Product Development and implementaion team in Singapore.
Understanding the business model and customer requirements.
To do the analysis on requirement and provide the time lines accordingly then we will schedule work plan.
Working daily basis activates following indent tickets, data quality issues,
Attending the daily, Issues discussion & scrum call meetings and getting project required changes, issues and time lines information.
Discuss with Business analyst, Project manager and other parties (Source systems) to clarify on requirement if any issues or noted gaps on project.
Working on performance tuning, Debug & trouble shooting the jobs for production support then find out the RCA to fix permanently.
Skills: Java or Hadoop (Spark) experience,
Banking Experience an added advantage,
Spark Programming / SQL Hadoop Framework /Angular JS/ Node JS/REACT
Kafka
Map Reduce
Excellent Communication Skills

Desired Skills and Experience
Excellent Communication Skills, Scrum, Critical Thinking, Hadoop, Application Development, HTML5, Data Quality, SQL, Banking, Performance Tuning, Angular, Consulting, Business Analyst, Product Development, Java"
Software Engineer,"The Role

We are seeking highly qualified and talented technologists to join us as senior members of our Front Office Development teams.

The Teams
The Quantitative Trading Platform (QTP) team is focused on building a state-of-the-art next generation latency sensitive trading platform.
The Real Time Market Data (RTMD) team is dedicated to building and delivering the best real-time market data solutions to our Portfolio Managers.
The Central Liquidity Book and Algos (CLB) team is focused on developing and supporting the buildout of a crossing platform front the engine to the algo wheel.
What You’ll Do

Senior C++ Software Engineers take on a wide range of responsibilities and challenges. They will participate in the buildout of best-in-class platforms across market data, trading and crossing engines. You will participate in an Agile working model, continuously improving and expanding platform capabilities based on rapidly changing business requirements as well as providing Level 3 support. Senior C++ Software Engineers also aid in the onboarding and integration of portfolio managers to the platform. The ideal candidate will enjoy solving problems and optimizing code for the continuous improvement of performance, functionality and stability of a system.

What You Need

What you’ll bring
Expert C++ development experience
Expertise in building and developing electronic trading systems, market data systems or crossing engines
Experience with Linux servers
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal
Strong ownership experience and a track record of delivering results
A degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field
We’d Love If You Had
Experience with low latency systems
Experience with equity trading
Experience with relational databases
Experience with Python
Experience and knowledge of:
Cloud services such as AWS
DevOps methodologies such as CI/CD and build automation
Our culture

The firm’s ethos is embedded in our people. ‘Talent is our strategy’ is our mantra and drives how we approach all initiatives at the firm. We believe our success is because of our people, so putting our talent above all else is our top priority.

Schonfeld strives to create an environment where our people can thrive. We foster a teamwork-oriented, collaborative environment where ideas at any level are encouraged and shared. The development and advancement of our talent is honed through interactions with each other, learning & educational offerings, and through opportunities to make impactful contributions. In our agile environment, engineers are expected to self-organize and collaborate on the best way to solve problems, and they are collectively responsible for the entire team's delivery. Engineering teams are small and cross-functional, and value learning and knowledge sharing.

At Schonfeld, we strive to cultivate a sense of belonging throughout all of our employees with Diversity, Equity and Inclusion at the forefront of this mission. As a firm we are committed to creating a hiring process which is not only fair, but also welcoming and supportive. On a daily basis, our employees welcome diversity across identity, thought, people and views which serves as the foundation of our culture and success. You can learn more about our DEI initiatives here - Belonging @ Schonfeld .

Who We Are

Schonfeld Strategic Advisors is a multi-manager platform that invests its capital with Internal and Partner portfolio managers, primarily on an exclusive or semi-exclusive basis, across four trading strategies; quantitative, fundamental equity, tactical trading and discretionary macro & fixed income. We have created a unique structure to provide global portfolio managers with autonomy, flexibility and support to best enable them to maximize the value of their businesses.

Over the last 30 years, Schonfeld has successfully capitalized on inefficiencies and opportunities within the equity markets. We have developed and invested heavily in proprietary technology, infrastructure and risk analytics and continue to capitalize on new opportunities. In 2021 we launched our newest strategy, discretionary macro & fixed income as part of the continual growth of Schonfeld’s investible universe.. Our portfolio exposure has expanded across the Americas, Europe and Asia as well as multiple asset classes and products.

LI-LC1"
C++ Developer - Data Platform,"Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team
TikTok and affiliates are developing the next-generation high-performance analytical database, with a mission to enable efficient and real-time data-driven decision-making on PB-level data sets. The initial product was forked from Clickhouse, after which large re-architecture had been taken place. The product now not only improves the efficiency of Clickhouse but also fits into the elastic cloud-native infrastructure with better scalability and resource utilization. With years of polishment in the internal EB-level scenarios, we are now ready to serve our business partners via various cloud vendors.

- Participate in the design and implementation of distributed databases or cloud-native systems
- Keep track, explore and delivery of the state-of-the-art data techniques in the real system, including but not limited to modern hardware, smart optimizer, data lake, and more.

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, related technical discipline
- At least 3 years of related experience in distributed system and algorithm on database kernel
- Familiar with at least one programming language among C, C++, or Rust
- Experienced with data structure, algorithm, concurrent programming, I/O, operating system is essential
- Experience with at least one database. e.g., Clickhouse, Spark, Presto, Doris, Postgresql, Mysql

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer (iOS), TikTok Mobile Infrastructure - Singapore","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok Mobile Architecture & Infrastructure Team is dedicated to productivity and quality of TikTok APP's engineering projects, empowering hundreds of TikTok mobile developers in areas including infrastructure, app architecture, engineering tool chains, and app foundations.

You will join a team consisting of creative, passionate developers who always strive to stay at the forefront of technologies. We constantly push the limits of what our technology is capable of, strive to be leaders in innovation, and deeply value the diversity of team's background. We share our learning through regular weekly meetings, tech talks, and internal tech journals.

If you are interested in joining a world-class team and ready for taking up challenges of huge complexity and scale, we look forward to hearing from you soon!

Responsibilities:
- Build mobile infrastructure and tools to enhance engineering efficiency
- Analyze and optimize UI and infrastructure application code for better performance
- Develop and maintain reusable app components
- Collaborate with product engineering teams to deliver technical solutions and best practices
- Optimize the project structure and workflow to improve engineering productivity, efficiency, and quality
- Drive architecture innovations to support world-class mobile app development

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications:
- Bachelor's degree or equivalent practical experience
- Strong understanding of software development principles, capabilities, and limitations of the iOS platform
- Experience in Objective-C and/or Swift, with a solid understanding of application design philosophies (MVC, MVVM, VIPER, etc.) clean API design, etc
- Working knowledge of remote APIs, concurrency, layouts, transitions, animations, client side persistence, and architectural patterns on mobile apps
Preferred Qualifications:
- Knowledge of professional software engineering practices & best practices for the full software development life cycle, including coding standards, code reviews, source control management, build processes, testing, and operations
- Experience working in a mobile architecture/infrastructure team with deep understanding of the tech-stack in these projects
- Experience in sub-engineering areas such as performance optimization, tool-chain, automated testing, design pattern, etc.
- Strong communication skills; enjoy working as a team while being comfortable with delivering large business outcomes independently

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Algorithm Strategy Engineer - Global LIVE,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

The strategy team's mission is to use model-driven and data-driven ways to promote core indicators on LIVE revenue and user engagement, which includes:
1. build prediction/uplift NN model to improve LIVE feature intellegence;
2. mine and interfere potential crowds to gain a higher ROI operation for both LIVE streamer and watcher;
3. make detailed analysis on user data and system data to find out user experiecne optimiaztion zoom;
4. othter work like user growth strategy, cold-start strategy, etc.

Responsibilities
1. Participate in the optimization of ByteDance LIVE monetization business and serve the LIVE experience of billions of global users;
2. Adopt cutting-edge machine learning model to scientifically model massive user behavior and consumption data, build high-performance/high-reliability architecture services, and bring users the ultimate experience in LIVE consumption;
3. Deeply participate in product/business discussions, fully analyze and understand user behavior patterns, and provide optimization directions for the overall business.

Qualifications

1. Familiar with C/C++/ Python development, familiar with Linux multi-threaded /multi-process;
2. Familiar with commonly used machine learning and deep learning algorithms, including but not limited to boost machine, dnn, reinforcement learning, etc.;
3. Solid maths foundation, including probability statistics, numerical optimization, etc., sensitive to data, good at discovering, analyzing and solving problems from data;
4. Familiar with at least one of Flink, Spark, Hive etc., with big data parallel processing experience;
5. Experience in large-scale recommend system, advertising system, search engine is preferred;
6. Experience in game value strategy, e-commerce value strategy, and user psychology research is preferred;
7. Strong English ability is preferred.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Senior/Engineer (CVE), Enterprise SSD Validation","Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.

Join an inclusive team passionate about one thing: using their expertise in the relentless pursuit of innovation for customers and partners. The solutions we build help make everything from virtual reality experiences to breakthroughs in neural networks possible. We do it all while committing to integrity, sustainability, and giving back to our communities. Because doing so can fuel the very innovation we are pursuing.

JR36952 Senior/Engineer (CVE), Enterprise SSD Validation

As a Senior CVE Validation Engineer at Micron, you will be part of a forward-thinking team of engineers that participate in the development of state of the art storage solution. You will solve complex problems, be responsible for enabling Micron’s products with flawless and issue free release to

customers

Responsibilities

Develop and execute validation test plan on SSD devices on enterprise servers
Analyze and writes test standards and procedures.
Maintain documentation of test results to assist in debugging and modification of software.
Analyze test results to ensure existing functionality, recommends and implement test coverage improvement actions
Perform Failure analysis and work with other function groups to resolve SSD system issues
Provide system analysis support for customer or yield related issues.
Improve customer integration experience

Requirements

Bachelor degree in Electrical/Computer Engineering
Experience working with PC/Notebooks and enterprise servers (PC Setup, PC troubleshooting)
Working experience in either SSD or HDD industry would be an advantage
Experience with NVMe storage interface protocols and Windows/Linux Operating Systems
Programming knowledge in Python and C++
Knowledge of storage device drivers and PCIE chipset register configurations would be beneficial
Experience using PCIe/NVMe bus analyzers and Analog/MixedSignal scopes would be beneficial

About Micron Technology, Inc.

We are an industry leader in innovative memory and storage solutions transforming how the world uses information to enrich life for all. With a relentless focus on our customers, technology leadership, and manufacturing and operational excellence, Micron delivers a rich portfolio of high-performance DRAM, NAND, and NOR memory and storage products through our Micron® and Crucial® brands. Every day, the innovations that our people create fuel the data economy, enabling advances in artificial intelligence and 5G applications that unleash opportunities — from the data center to the intelligent edge and across the client and mobile user experience.

To learn more, please visit micron.com/careers

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status.

To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact hrsupport_sg@micron.com

Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.

Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron."
Dev Ops Engineer,"Sprinklr is a leading enterprise software company for all customer-facing functions. With advanced AI, Sprinklr's unified customer experience management (Unified-CXM) platform helps companies deliver human experiences to every customer, every time, across any modern channel. Headquartered in New York City with employees around the world, Sprinklr works with more than 1,000 of the world’s most valuable enterprises — global brands like Microsoft, P&G, Samsung and more than 50% of the Fortune 100.

Learn more about our culture and how we make our employees happier through The Sprinklr Way.

Job Description

As the world moves even more online due to the coronavirus pandemic, customers are connected and empowered like never before. Customers want an immediate, personalized and consistent experience, no matter which channel they choose to engage with a brand. Sprinklr helps brands meet the demands of today’s customers by providing them with the insights they need to make every interaction matter. Sprinklr is a Customer Experience Management (CXM) platform for modern enterprises with 2000+ employees helping the world’s most valuable enterprises make their customers happier. Learn more about our culture and how we make our employees happier through The Sprinklr Way.

What You’ll Do

Looking for enthusiastic and experienced professionals who can ensure that below tasks are executed at a very large scale.

Write scripts and automation using Perl/Python/Groovy/Java/Bash
Infrastructure automation using Ansible, and IAC tools.
Configuration and management of data sources like MySQL, Mongo, Elasticsearch, Redis, Cassandra, Hadoop, etc.
Developing a deeper understanding of TechOps processes.
Build independent web-based tools, microservices, and solutions in order to effectively scale the infrastructure
Work on a cloud-based infrastructure spanning Amazon Web Services, Microsoft Azure, and Google cloud.
Build and release management across multiple environments.
Build monitoring solutions to monitor and scale hundreds of services across multiple environments.
Focus on Product reliability and security aspects.

Who You Are & What Makes You Qualified?

The ideal candidate should be having 3 to 5 years of work experience and possess the following skills -

Strong hands-on experience deploying the SaaS products across major cloud providers. - AWS, Azure, & GCP(way more things beyond compute)
3+ years’ experience in one or more programming languages - Python/Java/Go/Bash.
Decent skills in configuration management/IAC tools. - Ansible and Terraform.
Good Database management skills. - MongoDB, Elasticsearch, MySQL, ScyllaDB, Redis, Kafka etc..
Strong understanding and hands-on experience of the cloud-native landscape. - Orchestration using k8s, observability, SecOps, etc.
Strong system skills - *nix systems administration background.
Experience with source code management, building CI/CD pipelines, and GitOps is a plus.
Good understanding of SRE processes.
Good communication skills to collaborate with clients and cross-functional teams

Why you'll love Sprinklr: We’re committed to creating the kind of culture where you feel like you belong, are happier today than yesterday, and your contributions matter. At Sprinklr, our goal is to treat everyone like family and passionately, genuinely care. For full-time employees, we offer flexible paid time off and paid parental leave, medical plans, dental and vision plans, life insurance, 401(k) savings plans, employee stock options, gym and wellness discounts, Plum benefits, Lifemart discounts, and paid time off to invest in learning and career development.

We focus on our mission: We founded Sprinklr with one mission: to enable every organization on the planet to make their customers happier. Our vision is to be the world’s most loved enterprise software company, ever.

We believe in our product: Sprinklr was built from the ground up to enable a brand’s digital transformation. Its platform provides every customer-facing team with the ability to reach, engage and listen to customers around the world. At Sprinklr, we have many of the world's largest brands as our clients, and our employees have the opportunity to work closely alongside them.

We invest in our people: At Sprinklr, we believe every human has the potential to be amazing. We empower each Sprinklrite in the journey toward achieving their personal and professional best. For wellbeing, this includes daily meditation breaks, virtual fitness, and access to Headspace. We have continuous learning opportunities available with LinkedIn Learning and more.

EEO - Our philosophy: Our goal is to ensure every employee feels like they belong and are operating in a judgement-free zone regardless of gender, race, ethnicity, age, and lifestyle preference, among others. We value and celebrate diversity and fervently believe every employee matters and should be respected and heard. We believe we are stronger when we belong because collectively, we’re more innovative, creative, and successful.

Sprinklr is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. See also Sprinklr’s EEO Policy and EEO is the Law. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by filling out this form, and we will reach out to you. If you have additional questions, please contact accommodations@sprinklr.com."
Senior .NET Developer,"Are you a strong hands-on developer as well as a mentor? You're a dynamic thinker; you like to move fast and deliver application value early. You want to be part of a growth company that has big things on the horizon? Then this position could be ideal for you.

What you will do:
Lead a team of cross-functional developers through the full project lifecycle, defining requirements and architectural design, implementation, release planning, and deployment
Responsible in leading end-to-end production support that includes managing incidents, service level, problems, and releases.
Supports and develops software engineers by providing advice, coaching and educational opportunities.
Deliver high quality code, aligned with client's guidelines and standards.
Collaborate with a cross-functional team to understand requirements, communicate designs, and implement specifications
Communicate complex technical solutions to the client as needed
Create documentation around processes including deployments, solution audits, data and content migrations, and systems integrations

What you offer:
Minimum of 5 years of experience as Senior/Lead Software Developer in software development (.Net)
Candidates with less than 5 years relevant experience can be considered for the Mid-level role
Strong in .Net technologies and programing that includes C# .Net, ASP.NET Web Forms, .Net Core, MVC, Entity Framework, SQL Server, Oracle, jQuery, Bootstrap, TFS, Log4Net
Experience with databases and SQL development
Experience in Angular, Angular framework, Angular Flex Layout, Angular Material is a plus
Experience in architectural solution design
Technically strong in developing interfaces for integrating external systems with REST API, Windows Service, Web Services, LDAP, SFTP
A desire to make a difference through responsibility and ownership and a passion for helping others

Good to have:
Experience in SharePoint & Dynamics is a plus"
"Frontend Software Engineer (Real Time Communication), TikTok","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok RTC is the world's leading real-time communications service, providing instant and high-quality multimedia interactions to customers around the world. We are building next-generation audio/video processing and interaction platforms to deliver high-volume, low-latency and rich Cloud as a Service technology.

Our popular products are empowered by our cutting-edge RTC technology. Working in this team, you will have the opportunity to meet the challenges of advanced audio/video algorithm design and global large-scale real-time communications interaction, while improving your skills in encoding, algorithms, data by working with many outstanding real-time communications professionals. Expertise in analytics and large-scale system design.

We will also focus on understanding our users, identifying opportunity areas, prioritizing the problems we must solve, and rapidly creating innovative user experience solutions. We are looking for experienced frontend engineers to develop web/hybrid applications.

Responsibilities
- Responsible for researching and developing real-time communication SDK on Web Client with high-quality code
- Design high-quality RTC-based user solutions, including demo design documentation
- Responsible for optimising connectivity index, performance, stability, and audio & video quality to improve user experiences
- Create the ultimate user experience and support the growth and development of the TikTok RTC SDK with high-quality design and coding
- Willing to challenge and resolve difficult technical problems

Qualifications

- Bachelor Degree higher in Computer Science or related fields
- At least 1 year experience in developing frontend web applications, with proven experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp
- Experience in solving browser compatibility issues and optimizing front-end performance
- Experience in live streaming, co-host, player SDK, video conference and WebRTC, etc.is preferred
- Experience in hybrid development and/or large-scale website architecture is preferred

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Senior Software Developer,"Position Overview

You will manage and lead the development of modern healthcare application for the transformation of Singapore Healthcare IT landscape. Our mantra is to “work hard and have fun”, you will transform the healthcare digital experience to bring better health, better care and better life to everyone living in Singapore through HealthTech

Opportunities Available

.Net Software Engineer - (Junior level to Managers)
Test Engineer (Junior level to Senior Level)
Systems Analyst (Junior level to Senior Level)
Project Manager (Senior level to Managers)
Business Analyst (Junior level to Assistant Lead Level)

Key Requirements

Object Oriented Programming, .Net Web Applications, Web Technology (IIS), C#, SQL and Stored procedure
Test Methodologies, Certified ISTQB is preferred
System integration, data transmission protocols,Knowledge in HL7, XML, JSON, and Javascript
All phases of the project lifecycle, Certified in PMP, CITPM or other similar PM certification
Requirements feasibility, functional and technical design"
System Engineer (HPC),"Fujitsu is seeking a High-Performance Computational (HPC) Engineer/Scientist or Senior HPC Engineer/Scientist (depending upon experience). This position will participate in the support of our Linux based high-performance computing, storage, and networking environment used by research scientists, staff and students.


Key Responsibilities: -
Administration and operation of several HPC Linux clusters, storage, networking and associated system and application software.
Understand and work with parallel file systems, HPC cluster management software, and HPC job scheduler software.
Troubleshooting hardware, software, operating systems and networking as necessary.
Work with our software engineer to support our AI/DL applications and our desktop engineer to help with user problems as required.
Advice and guidance to researchers for HPC application development, debugging, optimization and parallelization
Operation supervisor of HPC including but not limited to end user use of HPC computer and production support related to HPC application use
HPC production operation on behalf of end users for limited case
HPC application training to researchers, post doc, university students

Job Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field
Preferably with at least 5 years’ experience with large-scale HPC systems
Good understanding of management and performance optimization techniques associated with HPC
Exposure to the following will be of added advantage:
 HPC code optimization and parallelization
 Language and Library: Fortran, Open MP, MPI, C, C++
 Linux Operating systems
 Knowledge of numerical simulation application such as climate research, weather forecasting and aeronautics simulation

Desired Personal Attributes
 Highly motivated
 Team Player
 Excellent written and oral communication skills
 Excellent presentation skills
 Good contacts and networks
 Self-starter"
"Backend Engineer / Senior Backend Engineer, Switchboard","The GitLab DevOps platform empowers 100,000+ organizations to deliver software faster and more efficiently. We are one of the world’s largest all-remote companies with 2,000+ team members and values that guide a culture where people embrace the belief that everyone can contribute.

Backend Engineers in Infrastructure , will work alongside SREs, and are experienced Ruby developers who work in the product with a focus on reliability, observability, performance and scalability at the application level, as well as on resource optimization from an Infrastructure perspective and on operationally relevant features.

As part of the Switchboard team, Backend Engineers specialization will focus primarily on building the customer portal and the corresponding backend control plane to operate a large number of GitLab environments, through automating all workflows - from provisioning new environments to daily operating tasks. This is the main difference between other Backend Engineer roles in Infrastructure, as your day to day will be occupied by automation tasks of a large number of GitLab environments (and the environments used by GitLab), and programming tasks across many environments.

You may be a fit to this role if you:
Have strong programming skills as a backend engineer with Ruby and/or Ruby on Rails .
Strong experience with profiling and metrics analysis
Strong experience with observability tools, including metrics (Prometheus is a plus), structured logging and distributed tracing
A background in DevOps, exposure to Linux, GCP/AWS, Ansible, Terraform or similar products is desirable
Good knowledge around SQL and/or PostgreSQL
Have experience regularly interacting with customers, and a focus on resolving their requests with a sense of urgency.
Are able to leverage GitLab as your day to day go-to tool
Are able to reason about large systems - how they work and can be operated on a large scale, edge cases, failure modes, behaviors
Have experience in collaborating and communicating asynchronously
Have an urge to document all the things so you don't need to learn the same thing twice
Have an enthusiastic, go-for-it attitude. When you see something broken, you can't help but fix it
Have a strong sense for action and know how to iterate through a problem quickly
Share our values, and work in accordance with those values
Bonus Points If You
A background in working with the Kubernetes APIs
You've built high scale systems with Kafka, Zookeeper, or similar messaging queues.
You’ve built high scale APIs to orchestrate distributed systems
You have worked on complex implementations featuring multi-threading, async IO, advanced scheduling and resource management

Projects you could work on:
Build fault-tolerant, horizontally scalable solution to enable customers to operate their GitLab environments
Work on the GitLab core projects such as, GitLab Rails, GitLab Workhorse, Gitaly, etc.
Work on projects that create deployment packages of GitLab such as, GitLab Helm Chart, omnibus-gitlab, etc.
Work on the GitLab observability stack (e.g. ELK, Prometheus)
Interact with various cloud provider systems (e.g. GCP, AWS)
You share our values , and work in accordance with those values.

Compensation

To view the full job description and its compensation calculator, view our handbook . The compensation calculator can be found towards the bottom of the page.

Additional details about our process can be found on our hiring page .

The base salary range for this role’s listed level is currently $89,600 - $163,200 for Colorado residents and $89,600 - $182,400 for New York and New Jersey residents only. Grade level and salary ranges are determined through interviews and a review of education, experience, knowledge, skills, abilities of the applicant, equity with other team members, and alignment with market data. See more information on our benefits and equity. Sales roles are also eligible for incentive pay targeted at up to 100% of the offered base salary.

Country Hiring Guidelines: GitLab hires new team members in countries around the world. All of our roles are remote, however some roles may carry specific location-based eligibility requirements. Our Talent Acquisition team can help answer any questions about location after starting the recruiting process.

Privacy Policy: Please review our Recruitment Privacy Policy. Your privacy is important to us.

GitLab is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. GitLab’s policies and practices relating to recruitment, employment, career development and advancement, promotion, and retirement are based solely on merit, regardless of race, color, religion, ancestry, sex (including pregnancy, lactation, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression), national origin, age, citizenship, marital status, mental or physical disability, genetic information (including family medical history), discharge status from the military, protected veteran status (which includes disabled veterans, recently separated veterans, active duty wartime or campaign badge veterans, and Armed Forces service medal veterans), or any other basis protected by law. GitLab will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. See also GitLab’s EEO Policy and EEO is the Law . If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation , please let us know during the recruiting process ."
AWS Developer,"The Bank uses the Murex platform to manage its Global Market business across Front Office, Back Office and Market Risk. To reduce operational cost and improve productivity the bank is working on a project to use AWS Public Cloud for processing heavy computing instead of On Premises servers.
We are looking for a AWS developer to join the Murex project team and help on the setup, testing and support of the Cloud architecture.
We will have key roles in projects such as managing the scope, design and delivering requirements from front to back office with Luxoft.

Responsibilities
Understand the current application infrastructure and come up with recommendations or suggestions to change or improve it
Work collaboratively with the Murex dev team to configure the AWS architecture as per requirements
Create reusable, effective, and scalable programs in Lambda and Python
Troubleshoot and provide support during SIT and UAT phases
Help implement the solution in Production

Skills- Must have
At least 3-5 years of experience on AWS Development
Certified AWS Architect or AWS Developer
Good knowledge on Lambda, cloud Formation and overall troubleshooting
Strong technical skills such as programming knowledge, software development, and continuous integration
Strong skills on Python development
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills
Good communication (oral and written) skills in English language"
"Software Engineer, Privacy","About Us

Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a care.

About The Team

Our Enterprise Security team protects users on our platform by promoting privacy by design; we design architectures that treats user data respectfully, with transparency, and in line with reasonable practices. Data privacy engineering is a new technological territory that hasn't been well defined in our industry; by joining the team, you will have chance to refine the data privacy framework, use advanced privacy technology, and make a big impact across all our platforms and our community.

Responsibilities

Design, build, and maintain systems that enhance privacy across TikTok.
Work with engineering and product teams to ensure what we build is compliant with privacy laws and regulations from a technical perspective.
Respond to privacy incidents, if they occur, including collecting information on scope and root cause as well as managing remediation.

Qualifications

BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major
Experienced in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
Proficiency in at least one of following languages: Java, Go, C++, Python.
Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
Good team communication and collaboration skills.
Experience developing and implementing privacy features and solutions.
Comfortable with communicating across disciplines (e.g. engineering, legal, policy).

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Data Engineer, TikTok","Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the world's leading destination for short-form mobile videos. Our mission is to capture and present the world's creativity, knowledge, and moments that matter in everyday life. TikTok empowers everyone to be a creator directly from their smartphones and is committed to building a community by encouraging users to share their passion and creative expression through their videos. TikTok has offices in Beijing, Berlin, Jakarta, London, Los Angeles, Moscow, Mumbai, Sao Paulo, Seoul, Shanghai, Singapore, and Tokyo. In 2018, TikTok was one of the most downloaded apps in the world. TikTok is available worldwide for iOS and Android. Visit tiktok.com.

Team Introduction
The mission of the Data Platform Singapore Business Partnering (DPSG BP) team is to empower the TikTok Business with data. Our goal is to build a Data Warehouse that can cater to batch and streaming data, Data Products that provide useful information to build efficient data metrics & dashboards which will be used to make smarter business decisions to support business growth. If you're looking for a challenging ground to push your limits, this is the team for you!

- Translate business requirements & end to end designs into technical implementations and responsible for building batch and real-time data warehouse
- Manage data modeling design, writing, and optimizing ETL jobs
- Collaborate with the business team to building data metrics based on data warehouse
- Responsible for building and maintaining data products
- Involvement in rollouts, upgrades, implementation, and release of data system changes as required for streamlining of internal practices

Qualifications

- At least 3 years in software engineering and 2 years of relevant experience in data engineering
- Proficient in creating and maintaining complex ETL pipeline end-to-end while maintaining high reliability and security
- Familiar with data warehouse concept and have production experience in modeling design
- Familiar with at least 1 distributed computing engine (e.g. Hive, Spark, Flink)
- Familiar with at least 1 NoSQL database is a plus (e.g. HBase)
- Excellent interpersonal and communication skills with the ability to engage and managing internal and external stakeholders across all levels of seniority
- Strong collaboration skills with the ability to build rapport across teams and stakeholders"
Backend Software Engineer [Remote - Singapore],"About You

You’ll play a key role in shaping the next generation platform to drive business growth. Your work will enable us to rapidly scale and support more products for our customers. You will collaborate with different folks, including product, engineering and design teams to build a world-class user experience for our customers.

The Ideal Candidate Has These Skills And Experience

Experienced software engineer with 6+ years of industry experience with strong software engineering fundamentals
Technical leadership skills such as the ability to lead projects for the team, have strong knowledge about team’s owned systems, be able to provide mentorship to other team members, and have the ability to influence the team’s goals and roadmap.
Experience writing production Python or Go code. Strong engineers with experience writing in other similar language (Java, Ruby, etc.) are also considered
Strong at developing and maintaining heavily used APIs and developing good schema design
Experience working with production databases: PostgreSQL, DynamoDB, etc. The actual database technology doesn’t really matter, what matters is understanding the nuance around retrieving and writing data at scale
Ability to make practical trade-offs and propose technical solutions, including writing technical design documents and leading its adoption
Strong communication skills and experience collaborating in cross-functional teams.
Experience working asynchronously such as experience or have evidence of being resourceful, have the ability to unblock yourself, and work across time zones.

Role Responsibilities

Technical Delivery & Operational Excellence
Build and iterate on products offerings, APIs, platforms, frameworks and tools
Responsible for designing, developing, and maintaining team’s owned systems to support a world-class user experience for our customers
Ensure system stability and reliability of your team’s owned services
Participate in regular code and design reviews as well as team-wide on-call rotation
Write code with testability, readability, edge cases, and errors in mind
Write and reviews technical design documents
Teamwork & Collaboration
Collaborate closely with product managers, designers, and engineers
Lead projects across the team, is a go-to member of the team for knowledge, answering questions and mentorship
Take ownership of projects and is a driver who adds instant adrenaline and drives positive impact when placed on projects and teams
Participate in team roadmap discussions & proposing long term plans

About Abnormal Security

We’re the world’s fastest-growing cybersecurity company, dedicated to making the world a safer place, one inbox at a time. Through applying ML, AI, and behavioral data science to the cybersecurity space, we’re leading the charge on protecting the modern workplace from all types of attacks. We operate from a customer-obsessed mindset, dedicated to creating a best-in-class product that delivers on its promise, and our customers love us for it.

We take the same approach with our team as we do with our customers. We’re committed to designing an employee experience that provides interesting and challenging problems to work on in a supportive, low-ego environment. Our seasoned, successful leadership team is passionate about providing endless opportunities for every team member to learn and grow, and our entire company is committed to being 1% better every day. With 4.7 stars on Glassdoor and several recently announced workplace awards, our team thinks it’s going pretty well so far!

We know that it’s our team that makes us successful - and we’re just getting started! You can read more about our team here.

Our Values

Far from gathering dust in some forgotten corner, our values serve as our operating principles for every team member. We clearly define what values drive us, so our entire team works from the same foundation and understanding. From the CEO to the interns, all of us are held accountable to our VOICE Framework.

Our Benefits

Taking care of our team goes beyond the office. Our compensation and benefits philosophy is designed to put attract, motivate, and retain top talent:

Equity is an important part of our total comp strategy
When the company does well, we all do well. Equity is an important and exciting part of our total compensation strategy as a pre-IPO startup. We’re guided by the belief our team members should share in the financial success of our company and grant equity accordingly.
Unlimited PTO
All regular salaried team members enjoy unlimited PTO. We want team members to grow with us and a big part of that is making sure our team has the opportunity to rest and recharge. We also observe 10 holidays every year.
100% of healthcare premium costs covered
Taking care of our team goes beyond the office. We cover 100% of employee health care premium costs. If adding dependents, we contribute 75% of the health care premium cost, so you can be sure that you and your family are in the best possible health.
Remote-first
Operating as a remote-first company means we get to work with talented folks, no matter where they live. We prioritize a balance of deep focus time with Zoom meetings, and regular in-person events.

As a fast growing startup, we continuously review, improve, and personalize our benefits offerings based on the team’s input. Don’t see something that’s important to you? Let us know!

Our Interview Process

We value transparency at Abnormal, and our interview process is no exception. You can read more about our interview process here.

Next Steps

If this job feels like something that’s a good fit for you, please apply via the link below. We can’t wait to meet you!

INCLUSION MATTERS: Abnormal Security is committed to creating a diverse work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status."
Security Engineer (Vulnerability Management),"The AVP, Vulnerability Management will be responsible for the delivery of vulnerability management services and day-to-day operations and development of the bank security suite of products with key objectives of designing, developing, deploying, maintaining, and enhancing the Bank’s vulnerability management capabilities

Key Responsibilities:
• Manage activities associated with attack surface reduction and proactive management of potential vulnerabilities to the Bank’s technology estate
• Ensure timely communication, management and reporting of product vulnerability advisories to application and infrastructure teams including monitoring the lifecycle of product vulnerabilities in conjunction with the Threat Intelligence team
• Provide best practice guidance to application and infrastructure teams on possible mitigating controls in the absence of product fixes for vulnerabilities
• Coordinate (as and when needed) vulnerability response for critical vulnerabilities in conjunction with the Group Security Operations Centre
• Automation development on existing processes and develop contextual data sets, reports, and dashboards to provide management, risk and service insights
• Product research and define requirements for new projects, perform product evaluation and technical Proof of Concept.
• Provide support for all Audit and Regulatory requests.

Job Requirements
Education:
• Diploma/Degree in Engineering/Computer Science / IT/Cyber Security from a recognized education institution
• Professional security-related qualifications (e.g., SANS, CISSP, etc.) will be favorable although not mandatory

Technical Skills:
• Overall experience 8 – 10 years of experience
• 4 to 5 years of relevant experience in managing and deploying Vulnerability Management services and technologies
• Knowledgeable with a variety of Vulnerability Management technologies and familiar with the industry trends and best practices
• Knowledgeable with open systems (e.g., Windows, Unix, Linux), networking technologies (routers/firewalls), end user technologies (Windows, iOS, Android) in relation to Vulnerability Management
• Knowledgeable with cloud technologies (e.g., AWS, Azure, M365, GCP) in relation to Vulnerability Management
• Analytical problem solver and good at troubleshooting technical issues
• Hands-on experience in the use of Splunk, Tenable, Rapid7, Qualys, etc will be favorable

EA Licence No: 11C5502
EAP Registration No: R1876903"
DevOps Engineer,"DevOps Engineer, Education Institute



We are partnering an established Education Technology company to identify a DevOps Engineer passionate in automating processes to support infrastructure operations on AWS cloud.



Responsibilities

You automate core processes, maintain system observability and help increase scalability and provide technical feedback on improving deployment cycles to improve business agility. You will work closely with developers to curate products at a faster pace and ensure smooth implementations of CI/CD pipelines.



Requirements



You have 2+ years of IT work experience with DevOps technologies (Jenkins/ Ansible/ Terraform etc)
Demonstrated experience working with different applications and AWS Cloud services.
Good exposure to programming languages Python, Java, etc.
Good exposure to scripting languages such as Bash, Shell, Python, etc.
Have worked using monitoring tools such as ELK, Grafana, Prometheus, FluentD, etc.
You have excellent communication and presentation skills, a team player to collaborate with International partners.


To apply, please submit your resume to May Chua at mc@kerryconsulting.com, quoting the job title. We regret that only successful shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Licence Number: 16S8060 / R2090112"
"Engineer/Senior Engineer, Air Systems Programme Centre","The Defence Science and Technology Agency (DSTA) brings you to the forefront of cybersecurity, digital transformation and engineering. From working on software development and systems integration to unmanned technologies and artificial intelligence, you can have an impact on Singapore’s defence.

Achieve your fullest potential with opportunities to build your technical expertise and hone your competencies in diverse domains. You can also expect an immersive learning experience, where you will work with bright minds and collaborate with global industry experts.

DSTA is recognised as one of the top 10 employers in the Engineering & IT sector, where our engineers and IT professionals work alongside procurement specialists to deliver state-of-the-art capabilities for Singapore’s peace and security.

Learn more about DSTA at https://www.dsta.gov.sg .

Opportunity

We are looking for an individual to join us in the Air Systems Programme Centre where you will drive the transformation of aircraft and airborne capabilities for the Singapore Armed Forces as well as space technologies for Singapore Government Agencies.

The Role Will Require You To

Understand operational requirements and translate them into technical specifications;
Participate in the delivery of key project milestones, such as design reviews, testing and acceptance;
Apply your engineering knowledge as well as knowledge of latest technological developments to identify innovative technical solutions;
Prepare and review contractual documents, including tender documents, contracts, and variation agreements;
Perform market surveys and assess suitable technologies and products;
Work in a project management team to support the project manager in ensuring the projects are delivered according to contractual requirements.

Requirement

Tertiary qualification in Electrical & Electronic Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Aeronautical/Aerospace Engineering or a related discipline
Possess good interpersonal skills and leadership qualities
Highly motivated with a positive attitude
Collaborative team player
Strong Analytical and problem-solving skills
Able to communicate well with stakeholders"
Software Engineer (PAG),"Rakuten is a global Internet and e-commerce company with over 1.3 billion registered users worldwide. Our e-commerce platform is the largest of its kind in Japan and among the world's largest by sales. Rakuten has many subsidiaries as well, including well-known brands like Rakuten VIKI, ShopStyle, Curbside, Rakuten TV, Kobo (e-Reading) and Viber (messaging).

As a Software Engineer, you will be working with a talented team to enhance our world-class advertisement management system at Rakuten’s Performance Ads Group. You will work in close collaboration with the product management team, UX designers and your scrum team to design and deliver new and innovative customer solutions.

We are looking for Software Engineers who are not only passionate and capable of tackling technical challenges, but also interested in working in a fast-paced business environment.

Responsibilities:

Work collaboratively with product management, UX designer & your scrum team to design and deliver new and innovative customer solutions.
Candidate must have a good understanding of UI, cross-browser compatibility, general web functions and standards.
Developing and delivering software platforms used across multiple products and organizational units.
Hands on experience with Web Applications and programming languages such as HTML, CSS, JavaScript, JQuery and API's.
A sound understanding of RESTful services and the ability to design and implement such services with good scalability and quality
Utilize TDD practices to ensure delivery of high quality code with low rates of production defects.
Bring to bear your experience leveraging best in class tools and technologies (CI/CD, cloud computing, web service development) to refine and improve software development practices for your team.
Engage in innovative problem solving activities, requiring conceptual thinking creating 'out of the box' solutions with prototypes and pilots.
Instrument services and solutions to ensure deployed software is scalable and reliable.


Skills and Experiences:

Any Related Degree in Computer Science or related field and 3+ years commercial coding experience
Strong CS fundamentals in object-oriented design, problem solving, and complexity analysis
Experience with distributed systems, caching and persistence solutions
Ability to troubleshoot and identify the root cause of issues under time pressure
Ability to effectively articulate technical challenges and solutions
Excellent interpersonal communication with strong verbal / written English skills
Demonstrated skill and passion for operational excellence
Customer–focused mind-set, taking pride in creating an informative data-driven journey
Experience in Java 8+, Spring framework and GCP
Experience in MYSQL / Any relational DB.
Knowledge in Mongo DB / any NO SQL.
Docker, Kubernetes knowledge is a plus.
Javascript, ReactJS knowledge is a plus.


Preferred Qualifications:

Data Structure and Algorithms knowledge would be a plus
E-Commerce platform experience would be a plus
AD marketing technology
Experience building localized, Dockerizing solutions
Hadoop / Hive would be a plus
Spring Cloud (Zuul / Ribbon / Hysterix), Spring Batch


Rakuten is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications regardless of sex, marital status, ethnic origin, sexual orientation, religious belief or age."
SecDb Software Engineer / Core Strat,"Job Description

THE TEAM AND YOU

Securities Database, known as SecDB, was developed in 1993 and quickly became the backbone of Goldman Sachs’ risk analytics platform for securities. The development of this proprietary software system marked a significant milestone in Goldman Sachs’ technological history. SecDb continues to be a strategic, critical platform for the Firm that we will continue to invest in for the foreseeable future.

SecDb Architecture is responsible for the business-critical pricing and risk calculation platform, SecDb, which is used by all revenue-generating and federation divisions. The platform has its own language (Slang), IDE (Secview), database (SecDb), and core libraries, which together create a highly productive development environment which has kept the firm at the top of the industry for the past 30 years.

This role will function as a hybrid Software Engineer / Strat. Some Strats sit on trading desks, creating cutting-edge derivative pricing models, and developing empirical models to provide insight into market behavior. Others develop automated trading algorithms for the firm and its clients, taking an active part in the increasing shift to electronic trading. Between these teams, Core Strats design and develop the core platform and algorithms used by these teams. As a developer/strat on the team, you will partner with developers and strats to evolve the language and its ecosystem to meet business needs .

We are looking to grow our team with a motivated technologist who is:
A self-learner, curious, inquisitive, always striving to improve one's skill and knowledge.
Excited by the idea of continuously improving 20-year-old code on one of Goldman’s most critical platforms
Understands the importance of using common standards and protocols for integration with existing internal or external systems.
Capable to collaborate and compromise with others to achieve a common goal.
Focused on user experience and customer satisfaction.
Unwilling to compromise on code quality, test coverage, or controls.
How You Will Fulfill Your Potential
Work directly on a strategically important system at GS, used by both revenue generating and federation divisions.
Develop and maintain large scale risk infrastructures/systems using strong programming experience in at least one compiled or scripting language (e.g., C, C++, Java, Python, Scala)
Interact with platform users in strategies and business-aligned technology teams spread around the globe.
Interact directly with the business and other tech teams to build innovative solutions to support the GS business.
Achieve considerable growth potential for highly motivated developers.
Play a critical part in design and implementation in a team-oriented environment.
Acquire in-depth knowledge of financial derivatives pricing and trade modelling
Skills And Experience We Are Looking For
A Bachelor/ Master / PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, or a related field .
Solid understanding and algorithms and data structures
Extensive background in object-oriented computer programming: C++ (3+ years), Python (1+ year), Java, or equivalent language, preferably in large scale financial or technical computation
Expertise in an aspect of quantitative analysis, e.g., mathematics, physics, statistics, stochastic calculus, scientific computing, econometrics, and financial modeling.
Strong software development and design experience, including a clear understanding of data structures, algorithms, software design and core programming concepts
Experience in working with large software systems, distributed computing, and databases (SQL and NoSQL).
Ability to work cross-functionally as well as the ability to work as a hands-on individual contributor
Motivation to learn about trading workflow and financial markets
Slang experience is not required but highly advantageous
About Goldman Sachs

At Goldman Sachs, we commit our people, capital and ideas to help our clients, shareholders and the communities we serve to grow. Founded in 1869, we are a leading global investment banking, securities and investment management firm. Headquartered in New York, we maintain offices around the world.

We believe who you are makes you better at what you do. We're committed to fostering and advancing diversity and inclusion in our own workplace and beyond by ensuring every individual within our firm has a number of opportunities to grow professionally and personally, from our training and development opportunities and firmwide networks to benefits, wellness and personal finance offerings and mindfulness programs. Learn more about our culture, benefits, and people at GS.com/careers.

We’re committed to finding reasonable accommodations for candidates with special needs or disabilities during our recruiting process. Learn more: https://www.goldmansachs.com/careers/footer/disability-statement.html

© The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc., 2021. All rights reserved.

Goldman Sachs is an equal employment/affirmative action employer Female/Minority/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity"
Front Office C++ Developer - Top-tier Hedge Fund,"Our client, a top-tier high-frequency trading hedge fund, is looking for a strong C++ developer to join their Trading Strategies team. Successful candidates will work closely with traders, quantitative researchers, and technologists to deliver trading solutions throughout the SDLC using the agile model.

Requirements:
Expert level in C++ development, data structure and algorithms.
Extensive experience with Boost and STL libraries.
3-10 years of developing large-scale, distributed, mission-critical applications in a commercial environment (any industry is fine)
Experience in exploring large datasets and applying data analysis to obtain actionable insights
Ideally comfort with multiple programming languages, particularly Java and Python
Computer Science or related degree from a reputable University."
Data Engineer,"Job Description

The Data Engineer supports the design, implementation and maintenance of data flow channels and data processing systems that support the collection, storage, batch and real-time processing, and analysis of information in a scalable, repeatable and secure manner. He/She focuses on defining optimal solutions to data collection, processing and warehousing. He designs, codes and tests data systems and works on implementing those into the internal infrastructure. He focuses on collecting, parsing, managing, analysing and visualising large sets of data to turn information into insights accessible through multiple platforms.

He is passionate about numbers and works with large data sets. He has a keenness for understanding business processes and resolving challenges in order to provide solutions with the help of clean and interlinked databases and architectures.

Qualifications

Diploma/Degree in Computer science.
Minimum 4 years experience in data models and reporting packages.
Ability to analyse large datasets, data model and interpret data pattern.
Experience in develop reporting and visualization through any Business Intelligent tools.
Hands-on experience in transforming functional specifications into design specifications.
Hands-on experience in SQL, or any related RDBMS database.
Experience in Dot Net, Python, or any related OOP language.
Good to have ETL/ELT experience, specifically on Microsoft SSIS.
Good problem solving & communication skills.
Working experience with Qlik Sense is a plus."
Full-Stack Developer,"Industry: System Integrator, Global Technology
Location: Central area
Schedule: 5-day work week
Skills: Full Stack Development (eg: HTML, Java, JavaScript, jQuery, .Net, .Net Core, SQL)

We are a Company unique to the SI Industry catering to various Technology Companies and providing first-line and extended support for their IT needs including (but not limited) desktop/laptop support, network maintenance, software & systems troubleshooting, turn-key applications development and overall manpower assistance.

We are seeking for a full-fledged developer (Front and Back-end) with background in end-to-end development and support, enhancement of systems applications using various languages.

Position Responsibilities:

Will be hands-on in the development and system support, enhancement of projects handled.
Working closely with third-party vendors and project contractors for guidance and walk-through on the system.
The role will have to be flexible performing hands-on and applications support on a project-to-project basis.

Position Requirements:

Atleast a Technical Education or Diploma holder in Computer Science, Information Technology or the equivalent.
At least 1-year working knowledge in atleast 2 or more languages such as HTML, Java, JavaScript, jQuery, .Net Framework, .Net Core, Ms/MySQL database, C#, VB.net.
Comfortable working independently and engaging with end-user clients regularly.
Fresh graduates with Bachelor Degrees are welcome to apply.

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
BI ETL Developer,"Our client is looking for a senior BI ETL developer to join their team.

Area of Responsibilities:
Optimize the performance of ETL, stored procedures, and reports; identify root causes in case of failures
Work with technical and business teams to review, analyse and define requirements for new development and enhancements to existing systems.
Design and implement ETL procedures for intake of data from both internal and outside sources; ensure data is verified and quality is checked
Design and implement data marts, meta data, and data models
Design and develop Cognos data models for end-users
Create technical documentation on database content, ETL and mapping between databases
Troubleshoot data/report/database issues from end-to-end to identify root cause
Routine support of user issues and queries logged in helpdesk ticketing system as well as extended support during budget cycle
Develop ad-hoc SQL to research data questions

Qualifications:
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in Business intelligence or in a similar role
Strong working knowledge of MS SQL Server 2008/12 and Transact-SQL. SSIS, SSAS, SSRS
Experience modelling and designing relational DBs, star schemas, and cubes
Report development experience in any of the following tools (preferred in order): Cognos, Microstartegy, Business Object
Good knowledge of at least one of the functional areas: finance management, customer relationships and sales, freight forwarding or logistics operations
Able to communicate effectively with all levels of end-users
Good Command of written and spoken English
Experience with/understanding of predictive modelling (SPSS, R, Python) will be a plus
Advanced Excel skills, including pivot tables and VBA will be a plus"
Software Engineer - Risk,"About Daraz
Founded in 2015, Daraz is South Asia’s leading e-commerce platform in Pakistan, Bangladesh, Sri Lanka, Nepal and Myanmar. It empowers more than 100,000 active sellers with world-class marketplace technology to reach the fast-growing consumer class in a region of 500 million people. Through Daraz Express and Daraz Pay, it operates the most efficient and digitalised logistics and payments infrastructure in its markets. Daraz’ vision is to be a champion of South Asia serving 100 million customers and businesses by 2030.

For more information, please visit www.daraz.com

Job Description

Your role is to:
Design and develop Daraz’s intelligent risk control and decision engine system
Lead and define technical solutions and system designs, overseeing the project’s overall progress and quality
Design and implement tools that help improve system stability and efficiency
Lead, guide and coach a team of engineers, overseeing the overall progress and quality of tasks
Conduct code reviews and actively contribute to coding when required

A bit about you:
Bachelor's degree or above in Computer Science or related fields
More than 5 years or more hands-on experience in Internet industry or e-Commerce related projects
Experience in e-Commerce risk control and Anti-Fraud system architecture design and R&D is preferred
Proficient in at least one of the programming languages: Go, Python, Java
Strong knowledge in computer science fundamentals (Data Structure and Algorithms, Operating System, Computer Network etc.)
Proficient in the design, optimisation and use of MySQL database and middleware
Deep understanding of system design methodologies and best business practices as well.
Excellent communication skills, team player, fast learner and strong analytical skills
Strong written English skills; communicable verbal English skills

What we offer:
International working environment in a start-up setting and a unique opportunity to learn from the best in e-commerce (Alibaba Group) and business growth.
A platform to learn from Alibaba’s world-leading ecosystem
Rigorous training and exposure in team management, leadership, business analytics, and operations.
An opportunity to train the next generation of business leaders in the ‘tech’ industry.
Competitive salary and incentive package
Health & life insurance"
Full Stack Developer (Hybrid Work),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
CFB Bots is a technology service provider specializing in Intelligent Automation (IA). We partner with large enterprises in their Digital Transformation journey and help them and their employees thrive in the Future of Work. Our mission is to co-create the Digital Workforce of the Future, and our vision is to make work enjoyable. For more information, please visit www.cfb-bots.com.

We are looking for a Full Stack Developer to build robust and scalable software solutions. You’ll be responsible for the full software development life cycle, from conception to deployment.

As a Full Stack Developer, you should be comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries.

Responsibilities
Work with project team to ideate software solutions
Propose and develop new products or features with evolving cutting-edge technologies
Design client-side and server-side architecture
Build the front-end of applications through appealing visual design and write effective application programming interface
Test, troubleshoot, debug and upgrade software
Implement security and data protection settings
Write technical documentation
Build reusable code and libraries for future use
Requirements
Degree in Computer Science or equivalent qualification
Proven experience as a Full Stack Developer or similar role
Knowledge of multiple front-end languages and libraries (e.g. HTML/ CSS, JavaScript, XML, jQuery)
Knowledge of multiple back-end languages (e.g. C#, Java, Python) and JavaScript frameworks (e.g. Angular, React, Node.js)
Proficient with databases (e.g. MySQL, MongoDB), web servers (e.g. Apache) and UI/UX design
Desire to learn and adapt to new technologies
Ability to work independently and effectively in a team
Strong attention to detail, analytical and love solving problems
Excellent communication skills and project management skills
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment

Desired Skills and Experience
Technical Documentation, Website Development, TypeScript, MySQL, JavaScript, HTML/CSS, Software Development Life Cycle, Python, Java, C#, Work in a Fast Paced Environment, Software Development, Positive Can-do Attitude"
"Senior Software Engineer, Backend","Introduction
This role is for the Digital Technologies department of Singtel. Digital Technologies is front-runner within Singtel featuring self-organizing development teams deploying workloads both on-premise and cloud services such as AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud Platform. Our Digital Technology stack focuses on scalability and performance of business workloads. We aim to loosen the IT architecture, increase organizational agility and enable an API driven digital ecosystem.
Why work for Singtel Digital Technologies?
Customer facing API and Applications for Business, Enterprise and Consumer markets requiring constant monitoring and protection from intrusion.
Working with Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning
Work with IT Security and Performance Management teams to define, create, and implement security standards.
Strong alignment with business and KPIs centered around business
Open office space with teams co-located
All new things go to AWS and follow latest best practices in the industry
Attention to technical excellence
Culture of learning, coaching and mentoring
Career growth path as engineer: engineers may earn more than their manager
Dynamic organization where change is the only constant
Innovation is part of the yearly KPIs
An incentive scheme with generous rewards for high-performers
Key Responsibilities:
Development of High Performance Java Service API and Business Systems.
Using SpringBoot to build microsservices in Java.
Writing deployment pipelines to deploy Java microservices in Kubernetes.
Working with AWS Services to optimize your Java applications (SQS, SNS, SES, Lambda, S3, DynamoDB, RDS, and more).
Contributing to the Chapter java library and framework development.
The ideal candidate should possess:
Bachelor in Computer Science or relevant coding certifications.
More than 8 years of relevant working experiences.
Any 3 Technical / Professional Skills required:
Java 8 / Java lambda
SpringBoot
RESTFul Services
JSON API
HTTP Protocols / CORS / CSRF
Cache Control (Redis)
Microservice Architectures
Containerization
Maven
Junit
SQL Database (optional)
Understanding of Algorithmic Design.
Self-Starter / Deep understanding of Software Development Lifecycles.
Can work in small and large teams.
Other Task-Specific Knowledge required:
Ticking Systems
Documentation Systems
Testing Methodologies
We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated."
Machine Learning Engineer,"Title: Machine Learning Engineer (ML Ops Engineer)

Location: Singapore

About the Role
Climate-Tech corporate venture
Established leadership team
Diverse and tech-driven teams

Responsibilities
Design the entire workflow for machine learning – from ETL to data storage, modeling, experimentation, algorithm development, and deployment
Design and develop highly scalable machine learning models and algorithms
Optimize existing machine learning libraries
Take POC projects into scalable solutions for the business by selecting and incorporating the right tools
Take models to deployment on Cloud – Build integration, testing, and scalable deployment pipelines
Provide recommendations for machine learning architecture and frameworks
Solve complex problems with multi-layered data sets
Work cross-functionally with the Data Science and Platform teams, ensuring accurate documentation of processes

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum 5 years of professional working experience with Machine Learning algorithm development
Professional working experience with ML libraries, packages, frameworks
Ability to design and implement cloud solutions and ability to build MLOps pipelines on cloud solutions (AWS, Azure, or GCP)
Experience with MLOps Frameworks like Kubeflow, MLFlow, DataRobot, Airflow, etc., experience with Docker and Kubernetes, OpenShift
Experience with programming languages Python, R, C++, C, etc.

Application
If you are interested in this position, please apply directly on the platform with your latest CV. We will review your application and revert back promptly.

About NextWave
NextWave Partners is the Recruitment Partner of choice within the Clean Energy, Sustainable Infrastructure, ESG, Impact Investment, Climate-Tech & Technology sectors. We are committed to supporting industries battling climate change towards a net-zero future and a sustainable economy.

Keep in touch
If you would wish to keep up to date with the latest NextWave opportunities and industry updates, please follow us on LinkedIn and create your profile on our website to receive a weekly newsletter in your inbox!

Our commitment
Diversity is a core value at NextWave Partners, and we are proud to be partnering with equal opportunities employers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, colour, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual
orientation, national origin, disability, or age.


EA Registration No: R1877984
NextWave Partners Ltd. (EA License No:16S8303 - UEN: 201602833E)
Web: www.next-wavepartners.com"
Senior Algorithm Engineer - TikTok Live - Singapore,"Responsibilities

About TikTok:
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us:
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

Team intro:
TikTok Live AML platform team’s duty is to build up a robust, efficient, technologically advanced product to identify and eliminate potential risks of capital security compliance in TikTok. For example, we can develop targeted product features, make strategies after deep insight of the business data, or we could build up algorithm models with machine learning, neural network and some other artificial intelligence approach. This is fast-growing research field, which is full of challenge, and has received extensive attention.

You will:
- Design and apply machine learning algorithms and intelligent strategies to solve the capital security compliance issues which TikTok faced
- Understand the business flow and capital flow of TikTok, Identify potential risks of capital security compliance and design solutions
- Follow up the latest research progress in the fields of anti money laundering and fund security in the finance / technology industry, and apply it in the work
- Conduct offline and online experiments, analyze according data and evaluate to improve algorithms and strategies
- Work closely with colleagues in product, engineering and data to continuously improve the level of safety compliance and escort the business

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical discipline;
- Solid experience with data structures and algorithms;
- Software development experience through hands on coding in a general programming language;
- Experience in one or more of the following areas: Machine Learning, Data Mining, Search Systems or other related areas;
- Fast business understanding and collaborative in teamwork.

Preferred Qualification:
- Industry experience working with risk control, anti-spam, or anti-money laundering

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Data Engineer,"Position Overview

To support Teradata / OBIEE / TIBCO for the H2H project.

Role & Responsibilities

Provide on-going application support and be involved in various stages of the SDLC.
Conduct user requirement analysis for the development / implementation of new systems and for enhancements to existing systems.
Evaluate potential solutions and make recommendations to resolve business problems.
Involvement in the system integration testing phase prior to implementation.
Plan and coordinate end-user training for any system implementations or enhancements.
Liaise closely with business users and build good rapport.
Liaise closely with vendors in project implementation, application testing, supporting application patches and upgrades in accordance with project methodologies and policies.
Support the team in defining project requirements, tracking and documentation.
Provide 24/7 primary application maintenance standby support.
Provide guidance and coaching to junior team members.

Requirements

Degree/Master in Computer Science, Information Technology, Computer Engineering or equivalent.
Five (5) years’ experience in providing data warehouse or advanced analytics solutions.
Experience with
databases (e.g. Oracle, DB2, MS SQL, MySQL, Teradata, Greenplum)
data repository design (e.g. operational data stores, dimensional data stores, data marts)
data interrogation techniques (e.g. SQL, NoSQL).
structured and unstructured data analytics.
statistical computing programming language (e.g. R).
data quality tools and processes.
data transformation and terminology equivalence mapping.
Experience in data modelling for analytics (e.g. star schemas, snowflake schemas).
Deep understanding of analytical models and methodologies – especially in the context of health analytics for clinical use and clinical safety (e.g. data mining, predictive analytics).
Experience with data acquisition tools (e.g., ETL, real-time data capture, and change data capture).
Comfortable working independently to carry out data analysis, estimate data quality and sufficiency. Understanding and analysing huge volumes of data drawn from heterogeneous sources / repositories.
Exposure to the development, evolution and adherence to the architectures relevant to the domain.
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools (e.g. SAS, SPSS, Cognos, Microstrategy, Microsoft analysis services, Business Objects).
Advance knowledge of Excel features and techniques required for the presentation of data.
Ability to work with a wide variety of report generation software (e.g. SSRS, Crystal reports) and generate a wide variety of outputs (dashboards, scheduled reports).
The ability to work towards strict and conflicting deadlines, be able to plan and prioritise in an environment with multiple stakeholders.
Good interpersonal skills, a detail-oriented & flexible person who can work across different areas within the team.
A good understanding of Singapore Healthcare System.
Familiarity or experience with health informatics would be preferred.
An understanding of healthcare data governance, data acquisition and data management would be an advantage.
Experience in interacting with analytics stakeholders (economists, statisticians, clinicians, policy makers) on a business or domain level would be preferred.

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Storage Engineer,"Job description :
Should have experience in NetApp Clustered-ONTAP.
Setting up NetApp Clustered-ONTAP, PMAX, migration and CLI.
Setting up both NAS (NetApp) and SAN (EMC) for migration. Eg : Planning, setting up Storage, go live and plan for migration.
Proficient in SAN zoning, masking, SRDF replication
Able to effectively navigate various OS such as Linux RedHat, Windows
Knowledges of LAN/WAN networking / Firewall
Knowledges of LDAP / Active Directory / DNS
Knowledges of ITSM Change Management Request
Build and install utility/monitoring/management servers to integrate with storage devices"
Senior Engineer – Firmware Development,"Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.

Join an inclusive team passionate about one thing: using their expertise in the relentless pursuit of innovation for customers and partners. The solutions we build help make everything from virtual reality experiences to breakthroughs in neural networks possible. We do it all while committing to integrity, sustainability, and giving back to our communities. Because doing so can fuel the very innovation we are pursuing.

JR36962 Senior Engineer – Firmware Development

DEVELOP AND TEST FIRMWARE

As a Firmware Engineer at Micron Technology, Inc., you will build groundbreaking high-performance controller firmware for non-volatile memory systems. You will assist in evaluation, creation, build, bench testing, debugging, and failure analysis of firmware for new high-performance Solid-State-Drives. Your deliverables would also help improve performance, while reducing power, latency and SoC (System on Chip) complexity for the target sectors. You can expect to partner multi-disciplinary Engineers to help solve multi-functional product development issues. You will triage failures, file bug reports, and help the development teams with isolating issues.

COMMUNICATE EFFECTIVELY

Dedicatedly provide to management, multi-functional team members and the firmware team consistent, detailed, and properly summarized information regarding your activities within the firmware development organization and status of firmware development projects

DEVELOP PEOPLE

Multi-functional Teamwork: Develop and maintain collaborative, open, and constructive relationships with peers and management

Team Development: Provide technical capability that continuously improves team involvement, morale, and productivity

Personal Development: Work to continuously improve your technical capability and communication skills

Experience / Skills

In depth knowledge and experience (min 8 years) with embedded firmware development
Expertise in the use of scripting languages (eg. Python), programming tools and environments
Experience with team leadership and/or supervising junior engineers is an advantage
Experience in storage industry, storage systems, or a related technology is an advantage
Experience in Security domain is preferred for this position

Conducts analysis, designs, performs programming, debugs and modifies software. Troubleshoots code for firmware applications. Utilizes analog and digital hardware and software operating systems. Typically programs in machine language, assembly language and high level languages, (e.g., C, C++)

About Micron Technology, Inc.

We are an industry leader in innovative memory and storage solutions transforming how the world uses information to enrich life for all. With a relentless focus on our customers, technology leadership, and manufacturing and operational excellence, Micron delivers a rich portfolio of high-performance DRAM, NAND, and NOR memory and storage products through our Micron® and Crucial® brands. Every day, the innovations that our people create fuel the data economy, enabling advances in artificial intelligence and 5G applications that unleash opportunities — from the data center to the intelligent edge and across the client and mobile user experience.

To learn more, please visit micron.com/careers

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status.

To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact hrsupport_sg@micron.com

Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.

Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron."
Data Engineer,"About OKX:

OKX is a world-leading digital asset trading platform, providing advanced financial services to traders globally by using blockchain technology.
OKX provides hundreds of token & futures trading pairs to help traders to optimize their strategy. We are also one of the top digital asset trading platforms by trading volume, serving millions of users in over 100 countries. OKEx derivatives remains a top-notch venue globally and has a daily volume of approximately $10 billion and is widely recognized as the golden standard in the industry. We believe the blockchain technology will eliminate barriers to transactions, increase the efficiency of transactions across society, and eventually have a significant impact on the global economy. We strive to make innovative achievements that change the world and never stop to improve on our customer experience.

About the team:
OKX data team is responsible for the whole data scope of OKG, from techincal selection, architecture design, data ingestion, data storage, ETL, data visualization to business intelligence and data science. We are data engineers, data analysts and data scientists. The team has end-to-end ownership of most of the data at OKx throughout the whole data lifecycle including data ingestion, data ETL, data warehouse and data services. As a data engineer of the team, you will work with the team to leverage data technologies to empower evidence-based decision-making and improve the quality of the company's products and services.

Responsibilities:
Design and build resilient and efficient data pipelines for both batch and real-time streaming data
Architect and design data infrastructure on cloud using industry standard tools
Execute projects with an Agile mindset
Build software frameworks to solve data problems at scale
Collaborate with product managers, software engineers, data analysts and data scientists to build scalable and data-driven platforms and tools
Ensure data integrity and scalability through enforcement of data standards. Improve data validation and monitoring processes to proactively prevent issues and quickly identify issues. Drive resolution on the issues.
Define, understand, and test external/internal opportunities to improve our products and services.

Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or have equivalent professional experience
Solid Experience with data processing tools such as Spark, Flink
Solid Experience implementing batch and streaming data pipelines
Solid experiences in Python/Go/Scala/Java.
In-depth knowledge of both SQL and NoSQL databases, including performance tuning and troubleshooting
Familiar with DevOps tools such as Git, Docker, k8s
Experience with the cloud (e.g. AWS, Ali Cloud, GCP, Azure)
Be proficient in SQL, familiar with advanced SQL features such as window functions, aggregate functions and creating scalar functions/user-defined functions.
Proven successful and trackable experience in full end-to-end data solutions involving data ingestion, data persistence, data extraction and data analysis.
Self-driven, innovative, collaborative, with good communication and presentation skills
Fluent in English, both written and spoken.

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in FinTech, eCommerce, SaaS, AdTech, or Digital Wallet business industries.
Experience in working with teams across offices and timezones is a plus.
Experience in big data tools such as Amplitude/Tableau/QlikView, Ali Cloud DataWorks, MaxCompute, Hadoop, Hive, Spark and HBase is a big plus."
AWS Developer,"Project Description
The Bank uses the Murex platform to manage its Global Market business across Front Office, Back Office and Market Risk. To reduce operational cost and improve productivity the bank is working on a project to use AWS Public Cloud for processing heavy computing instead of On Premises servers.
We are looking for a AWS developer to join the Murex project team and help on the setup, testing and support of the Cloud architecture.
We will have key roles in projects such as managing the scope, design and delivering requirements from front to back office with Luxoft.
Responsibilities
Understand the current application infrastructure and come up with recommendations or suggestions to change or improve it
Work collaboratively with the Murex dev team to configure the AWS architecture as per requirements
Create reusable, effective, and scalable programs in Lambda and Python
Troubleshoot and provide support during SIT and UAT phases
Help implement the solution in Production
Skills
Must have
At least 3-5 years of experience on AWS Development
Certified AWS Architect or AWS Developer
Good knowledge on Lambda, cloud Formation and overall troubleshooting
Strong technical skills such as programming knowledge, software development, and continuous integration
Strong skills on Python development
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills
Good communication (oral and written) skills in English language

Compensation:
7000 - 9500 SGD Gross Per Month"
"Junior/Mid Back End Engineer, Django (Bangkok, Relocation)","Manatal is an AI-based recruitment software company based in Bangkok, Thailand. Our mission is to offer an easy-to-use software to empower small, medium and large companies in their staffing & recruitment transformation.
Our goal is simple: to provide solutions to the recruitment world's difficulties and make the entire process simple and enjoyable for recruiters, hiring managers, and candidates alike.
Globally trusted by thousands of companies in over 130 countries, Manatal's growth goes hand in hand with our client's own. We're passionate about developing solutions for the changes they encounter and filling the recruitment gap with innovative tech implementation.
Overview:
We're looking for an outstanding Python / Django Engineer to work with a backend team in the continued development of a wide range of features and services within the recruitment sphere.
As the team's Junior Backend Engineer, you will play a critical role in bridging the gap between the business and development ends of our software as a service (SaaS).
Our ideal candidate is one who is passionate about building elegant and scalable software and combines superb communication skills and analytical capabilities with a demonstrated ability to get the right things done quickly and effectively.
Responsibilities:
Plan and implement key tasks for current and upcoming features.
Design new APIs or contribute to improving existing APIsReview, merge, and deploy code submitted by other team developers.
Coordinate with the frontend team and project managers when building APIs
Be prepared to quickly and efficiently investigate, debug, and resolve unforeseen backend issues related to the server or database
Technical Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or higher in computer science or related field
Ability to communicate and comprehend high-level spoken and written concepts in English
Experience using Git within a collaborative work environment
Python:
Hands-on experience with the Python programming language
Experience with Python web frameworks such as Flask, Fast API, or Django is a plus
Experience in writing unit tests is a plus
Databases:
Familiarity with relational databases with Postgres and MySQL is a plus
Experience in working with ElasticSearch and other NoSQL databases is a plus
Experience in working with AWS services is a plus
Experience building an API is a plus
Non-technical Requirements:
Possesses a strong sense of ownership and accountability for each project undertaken
Passionate about automation and optimization in daily tasks
A strong proponent of the Don't Repeat Yourself (DRY) principle
Open-minded, confident, humble, self-managing, and a solid team player
Patient and consistent when mentoring or guiding team members
What Youll Get:
A competitive salary and many new opportunities
More responsibilities and greater recognition for the work you do
The opportunity to be a part of a lively and international development team
A pioneering mindset shaped by a challenging and innovative work environment
Get to know more about us and our product: www.manatal.com
Demo Video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xlJAk71H-_s
**Interested candidates can apply via this link:"
Junior .Net Developer,"Avensys is a reputed global IT professional services company headquartered in Singapore. Our service spectrum includes enterprise solution consulting, business intelligence, business process automation and managed services. Given our decade of success we have evolved to become one of the top trusted providers in Singapore and service a client base across banking and financial services, insurance, information technology, healthcare, retail and supply chain.

We are currently looking to hire an “Junior .NET Developer”. This is an exciting opportunity to expand your skill set, achieve job satisfaction and work-life balance. More details as below.

ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Strong experience/knowledge of the ADO.net, multithreading, windows service, web services (wcf, web API)
Proficient in SQL Programming such as T-SQL Stored Procedures, SSIS, SSRS
At least 3 year experience in building application using .Net Framework or .Net Core
At least 2 year experience in systems analysis and design
Experience in creating Web API, MVC application
Experience with version control tools (SVN, Github)
Participate fully in the complete software development lifecycle including analysis, design, coding, testing and debugging applications
Develop system according to audit requirements, rules and regulations.
Liaise with DBA team to gather feedback on database design and provide remedy
Create and document unit test and assist QA team and users to finish QAT and UAT
Participate in supporting, troubleshooting and resolve issues for existing systems
Document system design and technical specifications
Prioritize tasks so that assigned tasks can be completed within the given timeline

WHAT’S ON OFFER

You will be remunerated with an excellent base salary and entitled to attractive company benefits. Additionally, you will get the opportunity to enjoy a fun and collaborative work environment, alongside a strong career progression.

To submit your application, please apply online or email your UPDATED CV in Microsoft Word format to swathi@aven-sys.com Your interest will be treated with strict confidentiality.

CONSULTANT DETAILS

Consultant Name : Swathi
Reg No. : R1325954
Avensys Consulting Pte Ltd
EA Licence 12C5759

Privacy Statement: Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Avensys' personal information and privacy policy."
Full Stack Developer (React and Node),"As a Full Stack Developer, you will be part of a project team tasked with delivering and maintaining a large-scale project using AGILE software development methodology.

While this role covers many areas of development, the main focus is Web Services Design, Development & Administration, Information Architecture, Cloud Deployment, Database Management, API Integrations, and Processes Automation (CI/CD).

Responsibilities:
Independently drive architecture, design, and development of one or more features / applications on the platform.
Use Agile methodology to develop and iterate on features.
Create clean, testable code. Participate in code & design reviews.
Analyze and improve performance as needed.

Requirements:
Minimum 2 years or more working experience in building web applications
Strong focus on front-end technologies like React and/or Angular.
Strong understanding and application of Node.js for application development.
Experience with modern web applications in JavaScript (ES 5/6) is a must-have.
Experience in automated testing using JavaScript testing frameworks/libraries such as Karma, Mocha, Jasmine, Chai and Sinon is highly advantageous
Experience in using Docker containers, development of CI/CD pipelines, and deployment using cloud services such as AWS/PaaSes/your own private servers is a nice bonus.
Experience in tooling processes for modern web applications using Webpack and Gulp is a nice bonus.
Experience in the software development lifecycle in an Agile / Scrum methodology is a plus point.
Experience or knowledge in Ruby on Rails (Rails 4.x or Ruby 2.x) is a plus"
Software Engineer II,"The Trade Desk is a global technology company with a mission to create a better, more open internet for everyone through principled, intelligent advertising. Handling over 1 trillion queries per day, our platform operates at an unprecedented scale. We have also built something even stronger and more valuable: an award-winning culture based on trust, ownership, empathy, and collaboration. We value the unique experiences and perspectives that each person brings to The Trade Desk, and we are committed to fostering inclusive spaces where everyone can bring their authentic selves to work every day.

Do you have a passion for solving hard problems at scale? Are you eager to join a dynamic, globally-connected team where your contributions will make a meaningful difference in building a better media ecosystem? Come and see why Fortune magazine consistently ranks The Trade Desk among the best small-medium-sized workplaces globally.

What We Do

Our Software Engineers are end-to-end owners who have the opportunity to participate in many aspects of designing, building, and delivering data-focused products for our stakeholders.

At The Trade Desk, we believe in building the back-end infrastructure of our platform with a focus on quality at scale. This means whether we are building parts of our client-facing applications, internal custom solutions for our own team members, or model pipelines for bidding optimizations, we are making sure that we have infrastructure, development, and tools to do it right and efficiently.

Our system performs all day, every day serving global traffic. We build a distributed system in a highly collaborative environment, utilizing a broad range of technologies. Our back-end developers work on finding solutions to algorithmic, optimization and scale challenges in everything we do.

What you’ll do:

Some of the work that you will be doing to help us deliver on our mission is:

Design, build, deliver and own full lifecycle development software from inception to production
Demonstrate a firm grasp of the entire software development lifecycle
Drive complex changes involving multiple components
Deliver quality changes, including automated tests, metrics and monitoring
Collaborate with team members to deliver features
Guide and review changes to product features in line with product roadmaps
Implement and maintain product features
Validate changes to ensure high quality product releases
Work in a distributed system environment
Understand the business objectives behind the code
Understand system architecture fundamentals through self-directed learning
Lead others through example, mentorship, teaching, and/or participate in hiring activities

We are a global team with different backgrounds, experiences and perspectives. To complement this team, you will welcome ideas that are different from your own and be well-versed in building from common ground to value, seek out, and foster invisible and visible dimensions of diversity.

Who you are:

Our culture is much deeper than just having fun together (though, we do that well too...). We take pride in our engineers being trust-builders, generous givers, scrappy problem solvers, and gritty pursuers of excellence. You do not have to meet all the requirements below, but we believe that people who meet most of them will have a higher likelihood of succeeding in this role:

You are you comfortable working on an agile, distributed team spanning multiple time zones and continents.
You are able to communicate effectively across both technical and non-technical audiences.
You have a solid understanding of computer science and engineering fundamentals.
You have experiences working with distributed systems.
You are proficient in one or more of the following programming languages: C#, Java, C, C++, Python, SQL, or Scala.
You have some knowledge of software development code editors: Visual Studio, Visual Studio Code, Rider) and version control systems (Git, Perforce).
You have 2+ years of software development, engineering experience
You have a Bachelor’s/Master’s level degree in a computer-science or relevant engineering related field or equivalent experience. Not everyone has the same level of access to opportunities. What is most important to us is what and how you can contribute, which is why our consideration is not limited by the level of education you have.
You have additional nice-to-have experience that is not required in the following areas: database engines (Microsoft SQL Server, Postgres, AeroSpike, Vertica, Redis), building micro-services, operating systems and cloud, Kubernetes, Kafka.

Variety of technical opportunity is one of the best things about working at The Trade Desk as a software engineer which is why we do not expect you to know every technology we use when you start. What we care about is that you can learn quickly and find solutions to complex problems using the optimum tools for the job. What you know is less important than how well you learn and innovate. We don't need engineers who know all the answers; we need engineers who can invent the answers no one has thought of yet, to the questions yet to be asked.

The Trade Desk does not accept unsolicited resumes from search firm recruiters. Fees will not be paid in the event a candidate submitted by a recruiter without an agreement in place is hired; such resumes will be deemed the sole property of The Trade Desk. The Trade Desk is an equal opportunity employer. All aspects of employment will be based on merit, competence, performance, and business needs. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, marital status, age, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, pregnancy, genetic information, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other status protected under federal, state, or local law.

REQ-3907"
"Frontend Software Engineer, TikTok","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Singapore, Beijing, Shanghai, Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.

About the Team:
The TikTok Fundamental team will focus on frontend development. We will also focus on understanding our users, identifying opportunity areas, prioritizing the problems we must solve, and rapidly creating innovative user experience solutions. We are looking for experienced frontend engineers to develop web/hybrid applications.

Responsibilities:
1. Responsible for the frontend development of the TikTok fundamentals business, including but not limited product for users, middle platform and operating platform, etc.
2. Responsible for development of various client scenarios in TikTok, including but not limited to WebApp, Hybrid dynamic scenarios, etc.
3. Realize with high-quality design and code to create the ultimate user experience for TikTok.
4. Take the lead on the exploration of new and efficient front-end development models to ensure R&D efficiency and delivery quality.

Qualifications

1. B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
2. 3+ years experience in developing frontend web applications, with proven experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp.
3. Experience in solving browser compatibility issues and optimizing front-end performance.
4. Good understanding of business, technical abstraction and system module design.
5. Great to have hybrid development experience.
6. Great to have large-scale website architecture experience.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Site Reliability Engineer,"We are currently seeking a new Site Reliability Engineer to join our talented tech team. This is a highly visible position that will require daily interaction with the business users to support break/fix, ad hoc service requests and release management. While production support is the primary responsibility, duties will also include release management, DevOps, and contributing to our platform strategy to drive continuous improvements. You will work closely with our Engineering and Product Teams to deliver best-in-class support to our growing user base. This is a unique opportunity to join a stable and fast-growing business that has a demonstrated track record of career advancement and rewarding talent.

JOB DESCRIPTION:
Be responsible for the reliability and uptime appropriate to users’ needs of Cloud solutions and services
Support services before they go live through activities such as system design consulting, developing software platforms and frameworks, capacity planning and launch reviews
Write, review, and execute SQL code and tools to assist Level 2 & 3 support to diagnose and resolve incidents
Maintain and improve services once they are live by measuring and monitoring availability, latency and overall system health
Scale systems sustainably through mechanisms like automation and evolve systems by pushing for changes that improve reliability and velocity
Gauge the effectiveness and efficiency of existing systems and infrastructure; implement strategies for improving or further leveraging these systems within a geoscience workflow
Collaborate with network and security staff to ensure smooth, secure and reliable operation of application software and systems
Develop, implement and document best practice policies and procedures for new projects or initiatives
Use the service management systems, ensuring that best practices and lessons learned are made available to the wider technical community
Engage in incident response and blameless postmortems
Maintains the required level of DevOps expertise and skills for self and team through training and development as appropriate for the execution of the project
Develop, maintain, and monitor a suite of CI/CD pipelines for products
Regularly engage with the development team on code compliance, security scans and static/dynamic analyses to maintain quality compliance on all code repositories
Participate in advanced debugging activities on the cloud-based distributed system
YOUR PROFILE:
Knowledge of Azure DevOps CI/CD tools, including Pipelines and Releases
Knowledge of cloud computing platforms, such as Microsoft Azure
Knowledge of application monitoring tools (e.g. DataDog, NewRelic, AppInsights)
Bachelor's degree (or equivalent related professional experience) / Master’s degree in science or engineering with software experience or education
Minimum 3 years of relevant experience
ABOUT US:
Independent and possessing more than fifteen years’ experience in its field, Alter Domus has become a leader in corporate and management services for private equity & infrastructure and real estate funds as well as listed and unlisted companies. Our global staff of over 4,000 people also provides fund administration and financial reporting services. We mentor and develop our employees’ technical knowledge and practical skills. We also champion commitment and a customer-oriented mindset.
WHAT WE OFFER:
Alter Domus offers a competitive, comprehensive benefits package including a generous vacation policy, a diverse work environment, and strong global connections. As you collaborate with colleagues in our fast-paced environment, you will gain exposure to demanding and stimulating experiences that you will take with you as your career progresses. We provide a sophisticated work environment with prominent clients that will take your ambitions and talents to the next level and give you the resources and support you need to succeed.
For more information, please visit: www.alterdomus.com."
"Designer, Software Product","Turn ideas into reality. Globally.

At Electrolux, as a leading global appliance company, we strive every day to shape living for the better for our consumers, our people and our planet. We share ideas and collaborate so that together, we can develop solutions that deliver enjoyable and sustainable living.

Come join us as you are. We believe diverse perspectives make us stronger and more innovative. In our global community of people from 100+ countries, we listen to each other, actively contribute and grow together.

Join us in our exciting quest to build the future home.

All about the role:

We are looking for a designer - with a focus on digital product design - to join us in the “Taste” team in the Digital Product Organization. In this team we are developing connected experiences, specifically for kitchen appliances. We work in close collaboration with the other designers in the organization, to ensure a coherent digital experience across appliances and to deliver a great user experience to our customers. As a designer in this team, we are working in cross-functional agile teams of software developers, product owners and product managers. Historically the appliance industry has been all about hardware. Your role would be to help us create meaningful, data driven, connected experiences to be used by hundreds of thousands of our customers all over the world.

What you’ll do:

Design software products - from concept to implementation including high quality mobile UX designs, considering hierarchies, accessibility, layout and navigation
Add motion to user experience, that has both purpose and style to build brand expression
Bring concepts to life with lo-fi & hi-fi prototypes (and know when a simple sketch will suffice)
Work with, and evolve, the Electrolux Group design language system and pattern library
Build strong working relationships with other designers globally across the Electrolux organization
Collaborate with your design, research, product and engineering peers to solve problems for people – wherever they are in the world

Who You Are:

Are fascinated by food culture and creating connected experiences for the kitchen
Passionate about sustainability
Have an eye for details and excited about creating beautiful interfaces with great usability
Can articulate your design rational to anyone
Are experienced with localization and accessibility best practices
Embrace iterative design process and seeks feedback
Engages in constructive design critique with designers and cross-disciplinary partners
Use empathy, logic, as well as quantitative data and qualitative insights to evaluate and improve content
Enjoy the challenges of a Build-Measure-Learn environment
Are comfortable with organizational ambiguity and change
Always interacts with integrity and honesty

Required

2+ years of experience with end-to-end consumer product design of mobile apps
Experience of, or interest in, designing voice first user experiences
Expert understanding of iOS and Android design guidelines and UX principles
Excellent command of standard design applications such as Figma, Adobe Suite and Zeplin
Good spoken and written English
An online portfolio, or PDF, that shows a range of your work

Benefit highlights:

Flexibility of work hours.
Discounts on Electrolux products and services.
As part of Electrolux, we will continuously invest in you and your development. There are no barriers to where your career could take you.

Find more on:

Electrolux APAC & MEA: https://www.linkedin.com/company/electrolux/life/apacmea/

req41566"
Software Engineer in Test/Senior Software Engineer in Test,"The GitLab DevOps platform empowers 100,000+ organizations to deliver software faster and more efficiently. We are one of the world’s largest all-remote companies with 2,000+ team members and values that guide a culture where people embrace the belief that everyone can contribute.

The GitLab DevOps platform empowers 100,000+ organizations to deliver software faster and more efficiently. We are one of the world’s largest all-remote companies with 1,600+ team members and values that guide a culture where people embrace the belief that everyone can contribute.

As a Software Engineer in Test at GitLab, you will be embedded in one of our groups where you'll work in Ruby for test automation.

What You'll Do In This Role
You’ll work on test automation issues related to the Quality department, stage & group you're embedded in, and the entire GitLab product. The work you’ll do will be transparent and open to the GitLab community .
You’ll develop new tests and tools for our GitLab.com frontend, backend APIs and services, and low-level systems like geo-replication, CI/CD, and load balancing.
You’ll identify and drive the adoption of best practices in code health, testing, testability, and maintainability.
You’ll work with engineers to define and implement mechanisms to inject testing earlier into the software development process.
You’ll configure automated tests to execute reliably and efficiently in our CI/CD environments.
You’ll work 1:1 with a Product Manager, and with the wider product and development teams to understand how new features should be tested and to contribute to automated tests for these new features as part of Quad Planning .
You’ll be responsible for baking in a culture of quality and shifting test automation left in the cross-functional team you're a part of.
You'll focus on expanding our existing test automation frameworks and test coverage across a range of configurations.
You’ll work in an environment where we aim to have a 1:10 ratio of Software Engineers in Test to Engineers.
You'll lead our test automation efforts on new features.

Requirements:
You’ve got experience developing in Ruby or working on a Ruby on Rails application.
You’ve got a working knowledge of Docker.
You’ve worked with industry-standard CI tools like GitLab CI, Jenkins, Bamboo, or Circle CI for example.
You’re comfortable with Selenium-based test automation tools like Capybara or Watir.
You’ve got experience with Git and its command line.
You’re interested in growing your knowledge and skills in Test Environment Provisioning and Configuring (Terraform, Ansible, Kubernetes, GCP / AWS).
You know about clean code and the test pyramid, and champion these concepts.
Our values of collaboration, results, efficiency, diversity, inclusion, belonging, iteration, and transparency resonate with you.
You'll thrive in an environment where self-learning and self-service are encouraged and instilled as a part of our culture.

Current Openings and Additional Requirements:
Software Engineer in Test, Runner
You'll be working on our Runner SaaS category.
You should apply if:
You're interested in a role where you'll be working on UI testing, integration testing, load/stress testing, testing Runners on different environments (such as Linux, Windows, MacOS), and combatting abuse of GitLab CI.
You meet the criteria outlined in the requirements.
Software Engineer in Test/Senior Software Engineer in Test, US Public Sector Services
You’ll work on test automation issues related to the Quality department, the compliance-related group you're in, the regulated US Public Sector environment, and the entire GitLab product.
You should apply if:
You're a US-citizen based on US soil.
You bring some knowledge of the security compliance landscape or any major third-party frameworks/regulations such as FedRAMP, SOC, ISO, PCI, HITRUST, HIPAA, or GDPR.
You're interested in a role that focuses on backend automation and tooling for highly secure cloud systems.
You want to develop your skills in cloud, provisioning tools, and infrastructure technologies such as Ansible, Terraform, AWS, GCP
You meet the criteria outlined in the requirements.
Senior Software Engineer in Test, Deploy
You'll be working on a team that is responsible for minimizing downtime during the process of upgrading a self-hosted version of GitLab. The work you'll do will lead to highly reliable experiences for GitLab instance administrators and their users. Our handbook describes our primary projects in Distribution .
You should apply if:
You bring significant experience in Ruby, Ansible, Terraform, and Kubernetes.
Contributing to GET and partnering with other open source providers is exciting to you.
You're willing to work in a role where you'll be leading chaos testing, contract testing, backward compatibility testing, zero downtime testing, and performance testing efforts.
You meet the criteria outlined in the requirements.
Software Engineer in Test/Senior Software Engineer in Test, Database
You'll join as the first SET for our Database group. The Database group is the steward of all relational database technologies at GitLab. You'll be responsible for defining the testing strategy and test automation in the group that enables GitLab to be more performant, scalable, and highly available to our customers.
Your work will involve chaos testing, contract testing, backward compatibility testing, zero downtime testing, performance testing, and database validation testing.
You should apply if
You bring significant experience in Ruby & PostgreSQL.
You meet the criteria outlined in the requirements.
Software Engineer in Test, Plan
You'll be focused on the test planning and test automation of Portfolio Management and Design Management features in addition to contributing to our Quality Engineering Roadmap
You should apply if:
You meet the criteria outlined in the requirements.
Software Engineer in Test, Fulfillment
You'll be focused on the test planning and test automation of Fulfillment Platform features in addition to contributing to our Quality Engineering Roadmap .
You should apply if:
You meet the criteria outlined in the
You have experience with license and/or subscriptions management or SaaS billing systems or you're familiar with products like Zuora or Salesforce.
Our culture

The culture here at GitLab is something we’re incredibly proud of. Some of the benefits you’ll be entitled to vary by the region or country you’re in. However, all GitLab team members are fully remote and receive a ""no ask, must tell"" paid-time-off policy, where we don’t count the number of days you take off annually -- instead, we focus on your results.

You can work the hours you choose, enabled by our asynchronous approach to communication. You can also expect stock options and a competitive salary. Our compensation calculator will be shared with selected candidates before any interview.

We are committed to your career growth. We have quarterly career development check-ins and ensure time and focus is set aside for learning activities. Additionally, we offer $10k USD per year Growth and Development benefit for those who want to further their growth with professional courses, programs, or conferences.

Our Quality department members are able to develop deep relationships across the organization through working groups , team member resource groups , and "" the Quad "" (our take on the three amigos methodology). You likely will feel less siloed at GitLab than in other organizations you've been a part of.

Diversity, Inclusion, and Belonging (DIB) are fundamental to the success of GitLab. We want to infuse DIB in every way possible and in all that we do. We strive to create a transparent environment where all team members around the world feel that their voices are heard and welcomed. We also aim to be a place where people can show up as their full selves each day and contribute their best. With more than 100,000 organizations using GitLab, our goal is to have a team that is representative of our users.

Hiring Process

Our hiring process follows six stages. The 6-question assessment in this application form is the first stage. Those who successfully complete this will be invited to a screening call with a Recruiter. The details of this process are documented on our job family page .

Country Hiring Guidelines: GitLab hires new team members in countries around the world. All of our roles are remote, however some roles may carry specific location-based eligibility requirements. Our Talent Acquisition team can help answer any questions about location after starting the recruiting process.

Privacy Policy: Please review our Recruitment Privacy Policy. Your privacy is important to us.

GitLab is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. GitLab’s policies and practices relating to recruitment, employment, career development and advancement, promotion, and retirement are based solely on merit, regardless of race, color, religion, ancestry, sex (including pregnancy, lactation, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression), national origin, age, citizenship, marital status, mental or physical disability, genetic information (including family medical history), discharge status from the military, protected veteran status (which includes disabled veterans, recently separated veterans, active duty wartime or campaign badge veterans, and Armed Forces service medal veterans), or any other basis protected by law. GitLab will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. See also GitLab’s EEO Policy and EEO is the Law . If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation , please let us know during the recruiting process ."
IFRS17 Data Engineer,"Skills/Experience
At least 5 years of experience in hands-on data warehousing / data marts / ETL development, management and support.
Involvement in IFRS17 or IFRS4 reporting, projects or solutions lifecycle is highly preferred.
Strong technical hands-on knowledge in relevant Data Mart (DM) technologies such as Microsoft SSIS, SQL/Data Warehouse, ETL and/or subsystems such as SAS (IFRS17 Solution/IRM/Finance Workbench/VA) and/or similar tools are essential.
Functional knowledge of IFRS17 and insurance business domain is a key advantage. Keen interest to learn about IFRS17. 5. Some understanding of involved systems (Prophet, Sun GL, AS400 Life Systems) would be an advantage.
Comfortable working with uncertainty, highly adaptable. Knowledge of relevant business processes is beneficial.
Experienced in managing internal stakeholders, end users and vendors.
Highly driven and independent, have excellent written and communication skills
Able to manage and lead a team, good teamwork, problem-solving and analytical skills

Responsibilities
Support, manage the operations of the IT ecosystem for IFRS17 solution and foster an approach to continuous improvement.
Part of the core team to develop, manage and support our IFRS17 data infrastructure, pipeline and integration with related systems.
Work with key users on enhancements, fixes and change requests. Review the changes to application, formulating and defining scope.
Maintain the pre and post-go-live period solutions while continuously improving its performance, stability, usability and value.
Collaborate and work closely with project team and vendors to ensure processes and proper handover including documentation.
Ensure delivery and solution complies with internal policies, procedures, standards, regulatory and security requirements. Manage and lead audit related matters.
Works closely with internal teams to ensure proper interface between IFRS17 system and dependent IT systems.
Liaise with vendors on project deliverables, support matters, system and software problem/resolution/upgrades.
To involve in other data related initiatives in the company."
"Manager, Full Stack Developer","We are looking for a qualified full stack developer to participate in our digital transformation efforts in Changi Airport Group. You will be part of a multi-disciplinary application team, primarily tasked to build new web/mobile applications, and to enhance existing applications developed for our customer-facing businesses.

In this role, you will get the opportunity to interact and connect with like-minded developers, business analysts, solution architects and data engineers to build meaningful, personalised and strategic applications that will reinvent our customer journey.

You should be a keen learner and have the ability to adapt to new technologies and a wide variety of use-cases. The ability to work independently and with other external team members is a trait you possess. Comfortable with both frontend, especially with Javascript and ReactJS, and backend microservices development is essential in this role.

Responsibilities
Be part of a SCRUM team that engages product owners and solution architects to help translate business and functional to technical requirements
Develop solutions in accordance with technical requirements
Participate in code reviews and code quality assessments in accordance with CAG’s DevSecOps practices
Be involved in System Integration and User Acceptance Tests
Publish documents such as API Specifications and user guides for new and enhanced systems
Requirements
Have at least 5-7 years of software development experience both on the front and backend. Hands-on experience in solution design, testing and production support is required.
Experience in Agile software development practices and methodologies. SCRUM or Kanban is preferred
Proven competency and technical knowledge in the following areas:
React.js including component design and state management for specific use cases
JavaScript/CSS/HTML
Python or Node.js
Microservices development with Serverless functions using AWS Lambda and API Gateway
Experience in event-driven applications and decoupled applications using AWS SQS and SNS
Database technologies such as MySQL on AWS RDS and DynamoDB
Experience with AWS AppSync and GraphQL preferred
Infrastructure as Code with Terraform
Familiarity with CI/CD pipelines and related tools for unit testing, static and dynamic code scanning and build tools (Jenkins)
Experience with source code management using Github or Bitbucket
Be a good team player with strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Able to multi-task and thrive in a dynamic and fast paced environment
Motivated and driven, with a curiosity and openness to constantly look for new solutions and ways of working to tackle new challenges
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Degree in Information Technology / Information Systems / Computer Science or a related field preferred"
Android Software Engineer - TikTok (Fundamentals),"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok Mobile Architecture & Infrastructure Team is dedicated to productivity and quality of TikTok APP's engineering projects, empowering hundreds of TikTok mobile developers in areas including infrastructure, app architecture, engineering tool chains, and app foundations.

You will join a team consisting of creative, passionate developers who always strive to stay at the forefront of technologies. We constantly push the limits of what our technology is capable of, strive to be leaders in innovation, and deeply value the diversity of team's background. We share our learning through regular weekly meetings, tech talks, and internal tech journals.

Responsibilities:
- Build mobile infrastructure and tools to enhance engineering efficiency
- Analyze and optimize UI and infrastructure application code for better performance
- Develop and maintain reusable Android app components
- Collaborate with product engineering teams to deliver technical solutions and best practices
- Optimize the project structure and workflow to improve engineering productivity, efficiency, and quality
- Drive architecture innovations to support world-class mobile app development

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree or equivalent practical experience
- 3+ years of industry experience in Android development
- Experience in building and shipping complex, business critical Android app products with frequent iteration
- Deep understanding of design patterns and principles with a broad knowledge of Android techstack
- Familiar with Jetpack and/or other open source Android libraries, such as RxJava, Retrofit, Litho, etc.
- Deep understanding of Android SDK to create scalable, dynamic, and highly performant UI components
- Working knowledge of remote APIs, concurrency, layouts, transitions, animations, client side persistence, and architectural patterns on mobile apps

Nice-to-haves:
- Experience working in a complex, matrix organization involving cross-functional and/or cross-business projects
- Experience working in a mobile architecture/infrastructure team with deep understanding of the techstack in these projects
- Experience in sub-engineering areas such as performance optimization, toolchain, automated testing, design pattern, etc.
- Strong communication skills; enjoy working as a team while being comfortable with delivering large business outcomes independently

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Senior Java Software Engineer,"We are seeking for a hands-on full stack developer, who will be part of the software development team of the Group Enterprise platforms product house, contributing on the software development for Singtel Enterprise platform and application suite. Singtel is building a unique enterprise platform completely homegrown and in this position you will work with platforms product team, to:

Build the enterprise platform in a completely scalable fashion that can process millions of messages concurrently.
Contribute to designing and developing the platform in an infrastructure agnostic fashion so that the platform can work with any network backend in a plug and play fashion.
Bring in your experience in building scalable and repeatable platforms to make every component of the platform modular by design with industry grade security.
Design and implement RESTful APIs to expose platform features as microservices.
Build and deploy performant modern web applications in React, Redux, Webpack, ES6, and Flow
Architect efficient and scalable backend systems
Write unit, functional and end-to-end tests for the platform
Write high-quality code (Ruby on Rails, Go, Java etc) that communicates with upstream backend services via HTTP APIs
Identify and resolve performance and scalability issues
Participate in code reviews
In depth understanding of the whole web stack, web protocols, and web performance optimisation techniques
In-depth understanding of web frameworks (such as Rails, Django, Spring etc)
Detailed knowledge of minimum one modern JavaScript framework: React, Ember, Angular, etc
Proficient understanding of the HTTP protocol
In depth knowledge of Relational, No-SQL databases, and message queues/brokers
Understand at least one backend MVC framework - Java and Spring Boot are strongly preferred
Build micro-services and understand different patterns to approach the designs.
Worked on cloud platforms preferably PCF and used tools such as Docker.
Experience in designing and delivering APIs and security models
Excellent understanding of
Message queue systems (Kafka)
Monitoring and logging tools (ELK, Splunk)
Front-end frameworks (React, Vue JS, Bootstrap, jQuery)
Web app frameworks (Django, Drupal etc.)
Databases and storage/caching (Postgres, MongoDB, Redis)
Contribute to software development and associated new technology selection and adoption. Focus areas include developing API driven features on big data, machine learning, auto scaling micro-services, scalable data storage/retrieval.
Work on architecture and software development across platform components like customer onboarding, data management, application lifecycle etc
Participate on design of common platform functionality, and consistent, best-practice platform and application design.
Adopt industry standard coding practises to develop the platform to ensure scalability, security and stability
Participate on the move to a full SaaS deployment and management
Collaborate with Business development and partnership team to develop integration adapters for third party technology and applications.
Participate in technical partnership conversations and due diligence.

What we’re looking for...
You embrace failure for the learning it provides. You can inspire and motivate others to deliver your vision. You view obstacles as puzzles to be solved. You are driven by the desire to delight your ultimate client, the customer
Java (J2EE and J2SE 1.8 or higher) and Python, additional knowledge on Scala would be advantageous
HTML, CSS, Drupal, Bootstrap, Angular, JQuery, additional knowledge on Reactjs would be advantageos.
Cassandra, MongoDB and Elasticsearch (At least 2). SQL databases like Postgres, MySQL
Experience in source code management and build - GIT, Maven, Ant
Experience in Scrum - JIRA, Confluence
Experience in Messaging - Kafka, Any Pub/Sub library
Experience in containerization – Docker, Jenkins
Experience in Scalable deployment – Kubernetes
Experience in Learning Libraries - MLib, DL4J, H20, Tensorflow
Experience in Big data Platforms - Spark (Core and Streaming) or Hadoop
Experience in File Systems – HDFS
Experience in Integration methods - REST API’s, messaging, WSDL, SDK’s
Experience in API documents - Swagger or similar
Experience developing complex, enterprise grade, configurable, scalable software products.
A background in systems level thinking and design. Combined with the ability to translate technical strategy and architectures into concrete, minimal viable products, with the right tradeoffs and phasing.
Broad and deep knowledge of relevant technologies, including messaging, relational and NoSQL databases, data modelling, analytics, IoT, and interfaces. Exposure and experience with Artificial intelligence will be a plus.
Deep understanding of the architectural principles for cloud-based platforms that include SaaS, PaaS, multi-tenancy, infrastructure as code, and continuous availability.
Experience working in an agile environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to collaborate effectively across various cross-functional teams and groups.

We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated."
Back End Developer,"Experienced and passionate backend developer to join an exciting FinTech offering a pioneering L2 technological solution!

About the role
The successful candidate will be responsible for designing and developing a Rust microservices in a reliable and scalable architecture. You would be self-assigned issues to work on and review PRs on Github from fellow coworkers. Further you would collaborate with other development teams inside the company and you would gather information in order to come up with solutions to their problems.

Requirements:
3+ years of relevant experience with software development.
Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
Solid understanding of microservices architecture.
Be familiar with deployment using Docker.
Experience with statically-typed languages.
Experience with Event Streaming.
Experience with REST and GraphQL APIs.
Experience with Git (e.g. we do rebase and use commit —fix-up to keep the history clean and concise).
Good English communication skills (written and spoken).
Self-motivated to work in a 100% remote office environment.

Plus points if you have the following:
Experience with Rust.
Experience with Redis Streams or Kafka.
Experience with PostgreSQL.
Experience with AWS.
Knowledge of blockchain and Solidity technology.

The Benefits:
Great salary & token packages for the full-contractors
Great culture within a start-up environment and being part of a pioneering vision
Flexible work hours and fully remote location
Flexible Paid Time-Off
Hardware, home office, learning and certification, health insurance, physical and mental wellness subsidies.

Mana Search is FinTech’s all-in-one search firm. We partner with the most exciting VC & growth equity backed FinTechs. Strategic search into the CxO suite, venture building through delivering teams in Engineering, Data Analytics, Product and Commercial. If you are interested in hearing more about this role or other do get in touch via stella@manasearch.co.uk - thanks!"
"Machine Learning Engineer, e-Commerce","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Our TikTok team is responsible for developing state-of-the-art machine learning models and strategies to improve user consumption experience, inspire creativity, build a fair and flourishing ecosystem.

Responsibilities

Design and apply machine learning algorithm and recommendation strategies to improve users' experience on e-commerce content, including videos and livestreams.
Understand ecosystem of e-commerce content and use algorithm and strategy to make it thrive.
Work with product and ops team to deliver features that drives growth of e-commerce content on TikTok.
Build industry leading recommendation system; develop highly scalable classifiers and tools leveraging machine learning

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in computer science or a related technical discipline, with at least 2 years of related work experience;
Solid experience with data structures and algorithms;
Software development experience through hands on coding in a general purpose programming language;
Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, data mining or other related areas;
Strong communication and teamwork skills;
Passion about technologies and solving challenging problems.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace.

At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Cloud Platform and Infra Engineer / Senior Engineers,"The Defence Science and Technology Agency (DSTA) brings you to the forefront of cybersecurity, digital transformation and engineering. From working on software development and systems integration to unmanned technologies and artificial intelligence, you can have an impact on Singapore’s defence.

Achieve your fullest potential with opportunities to build your technical expertise and hone your competencies in diverse domains. You can also expect an immersive learning experience, where you will work with bright minds and collaborate with global industry experts.

DSTA is recognised as one of the top 10 employers in the Engineering & IT sector, where our engineers and IT professionals work alongside procurement specialists to deliver state-of-the-art capabilities for Singapore’s peace and security.

Learn more about DSTA at https://www.dsta.gov.sg.

Opportunity
The role will expose you as a technologist to build your career with opportunities related to:

Architect, implement and operate the cloud infrastructure and platform services that delivers compute, storage, network, security, monitoring, compliance management, backup and/or marketplace.
Identify and lead initiatives to continuously build and enhance the management and performance of the Cloud infrastructure and platform.
Interact with a dynamic group of developers, tenants and operators to design and build technical solutions to provide automation and self-serviceable capabilities in the areas for infrastructure deployment and operations.

Requirements
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Information Technology or related discipline
Proficiency in one or more of the related Hyper-Converged Infrastructure, Cloud Network/Security/Platform Services will be preferred (e.g. Nutanix, VMWare, HyperV, OpenStack, SAN, Object and File Storage, IAM, Configuration and Compliance Management etc.)
Familiarity with virtualization and container technologies like Nutanix, VMWare, OpenStack, Docker and Kubernetes will be advantageous
Familiarity with coding and scripting (e.g. VBS, Java, Python, Bash, PowerShell, Terraform, Ansible, Puppet, etc.) will be advantageous
Experience with Public Cloud Services (e.g. AWS, Azure, GCP, etc) will be advantageous
Strong analytical skills, resourceful, meticulous, a team player and good communicator


Candidates with deep technical competency and experience in Cloud Infrastructure or Platform implementation and operation would be considered for Senior position."
Software Engineer (Payment cards),"As a Software Engineer for the Embedded Software team, you will be part of a team that develops embedded products such as contact or contactless payment & transport cards, biometric payment cards, Bluetooth payment card & wearable secure elements for payment & royalty.



Location: OneNorth


Job Scope:

You will develop banking payment embedded products by collaborating with Technical Leaders, Project Leaders, and Project Managers.
You will develop different types of software for example implement product requirements using C or Java or assembly language, create your own unit test, define validation test plan & develop test cases using Visual Basic .NET language and integration test to be able to deliver stable and robust software.
You will have an opportunity to develop desktop application for efficiency and process improvement using Java and .NET framework.
Participate in the writing and review of technical and design specifications.
Provide level 3 support for products and customer projects.


Requirements:

Min Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or Electronics Engineering
With development experience using assembly, C language or Java or Visual Basic .NET framework.
Experience with microcontrollers, desktop application development and security is a plus


.
*Shortlisted candidates will be informed.



Interested applicants please send in your updated resume to jeffrey.koh@experis.com.sg with the subject ""Software Engineer (Payment cards)""



Jeffrey Koh Kok Ann
Registration No.: R1770345
EA License No.: 02C3423"
"Software Engineer (SDK), Live Streaming Infrastructure","Responsibilities

Popular video products of TikTok and its affiliates are all empowered by our cutting-edge cloud technologies. As software engineer (SDK) in this team, you will have the opportunity to tackle challenges of developing solutions to support the low latency and high quality end to end live streaming experience for different devices and network conditions while leveraging your expertise and experience in mobile development, video transcoding and streaming.

Responsibilities
1. Be responsible for the design and development of SDK for our live streaming products including TikTok Live
2. Participate in the design and implementation of end to end live streaming solutions
3. Explore and implement new ideas to optimize the QoS and QoE of live streaming by using data driven approach

Qualifications

1. Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical background involving software/system engineering, or equivalent working experience
2. Good programming experience with at least one of the following languages: C, C++, Java, Python, or Go
3. Familiar with audio/video transcoding and rendering, experience with OpenGL and SDK development is a plus
4. Good knowledge of networking fundamentals and protocols (eg. UDP/TCP/IP, HTTP/HTTPS, RTMP, HLS/Dash/CMAF, etc.)
5. Familiar with audio/video open source projects (eg. FFmpeg, x264, WebRTC, GStreamer, etc), experience with open source projects is a plus"
DevOps Engineer,"Who should APPLY!
You have great knowledge of IaC Stack
Be a part of the R&D Development Team!
You enjoy a dynamic and global work culture


About the Client
The company is a business where brilliant people from all over the world come together to share ideas and inspire each other. In aerospace, transportation, defence, security and space, their architects design innovative solutions that make our tomorrow's possible.
Their Digital Factory was launched in 2017 to accelerate the digital transformation of the Company and its customers. With their offices in Paris, Montreal and Singapore, they host more than 230 experts in digital technologies (Cloud, Internet of Things, big data, artificial intelligence, cybersecurity etc) and methods (design thinking, lean start-up, agile software development) to develop innovative products in close collaboration with future users.
With 15 Minimum Viable Products (MVP) already delivered within one year in domains such as air traffic management, avionics equipment repair, drone operations, airport passenger experience, maritime traffic, metros maintenance, the Digital Factory allows their customers to quickly experiment new solutions at a rapid rate to improve their operations and customers experience.

Responsibilities:
Design and construct CI/CD pipelines leveraging cloud native technologies like IaC stack but not limited to Microsoft Azure, Pivotal Cloud Foundry
Work in an Agile Squad as an active member of the squad; being “active” means that you should be able to detect gaps which can be filled by either automation or a 3rd party tool as part of the CI/CD process
Write and review the network infrastructure technical documentation
Write and review the infrastructure user guide documentation for the purpose of aiding your team in using the infrastructure effectively
Contribute best-practices & learning back to the Digital Factory in Paris, Montreal and Singapore
Assist users in troubleshooting issues they are experiencing with the cloud platform e.g. cloud-enabled distributed version control systems (DVC) is un-accessible, failing CI/CD pipelines.
Assist users of cloud-deployed MVPs to trouble shoot their systems e.g. Un-able to verify or validate identities via the Identity Access Management (IAM) modules deployed in the cloud.
Skills and Knowledge
Minimum of 5 years software experience where you spent at least 3 years working in DevOps.
Working knowledge of IaC stack e.g. Ansible, Chef, Terraform etc
Working knowledge of DVC tools like Git in a cloud native environment like GitLab
Working knowledge of one or more system-level programming languages like BASH, ZSH,
Python, Ruby, Go.
Working knowledge of operating & maintaining Linux OSes (e.g. RedHat, Ubuntu, Slackware)
Working knowledge of deploying SQL & No-SQL databases in production e.g PostgreSQL, MySQL, MongoDB, Cassandra, Hive
Ideal to have working knowledge of customer support ticketing systems e.g. Zendesk otherwise we will provide you training
Has Agile methodology and process understanding and experience
Has a continuous learning mindset and learning of new paradigms, techniques & practices in build-test-release cycles and software automation
Open, strong communicator who communicates effectively across teams, locations and cultures, in-person and virtually
Courage of convictions with a high degree of humility. Embraces constructive feedback and is resilient

HOW TO APPLY:
If you are a team player, meticulous & organized, and more importantly, believe that YOU CAN MAKE A DIFFERENCE, we would like to hear from you. Simply submit your application with your updated Resume in MS Word Format to Wong Wen Xin Cheryl (EA Personnel Reg. No.: R22106435) by clicking the ‘Apply link’.
Please indicate the below information in your resume:
Current & Expected Salary
Reason(s) for leaving
Notice Period / Availability to commence work

YOUR SUCCESS IS OUR ACHIEVEMENT!

Notice:
We regret that only short-listed candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.
By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read & agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration, and for our marketing EDMs which you may opt out by unsubscribing in the mailer. You may refer and access our website at
www.achievegroup.asia/privacy-policy/ for more information.
Cessation of Collection of full NRIC Numbers:
In compliance with the Personal Data Protection Act and commitment to protect candidates’ personal data, Achieve Group will cease to collect, process or use full NRIC numbers during our screening and job application process. Kindly ensure your resumes provided to us does not contain your full NRIC number and full home address during your job application."
Data Engineer (Data Engineering),"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

As a Data Engineer in the Data Engineering team of GovTech’s Data Science and Artificial Intelligence Division, you will be building Whole-of-Government data infrastructure to power the insights needed for evidence-based decision-making and enhancing agencies’ service-delivery. You will be architecting, designing and building next-generation data infrastructure to galvanise digitalisation in the public sector.

We are looking for enthusiastic and passionate engineers to join us in this journey to make a difference.

What you will be working on:

Design and build resilient and efficient data pipelines for both batch and real-time streaming data
Architect and design data infrastructure on cloud using industry standard Infrastructure-as-Code tools
Execute projects with an Agile mindset
Build software frameworks to solve data problems at scale
Collaborate with product managers, software engineers, data analysts and data scientists to build scalable and data-driven platforms and tools

What we are looking for:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or have equivalent professional experience
Experience with data processing tools such as Spark, Beam, Flink
Experience with the cloud (e.g. AWS, GCP, Azure)
Experience implementing batch and streaming data pipelines
Experience writing efficient SQL
In-depth knowledge of both SQL and NoSQL databases, including performance tuning and troubleshooting
Familiar with DevOps tools such as Git, Docker, Terraform
Experience in the public sector is a bonus

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
"Lead Software Engineer, Backend","We are living in dynamic times. Technology is reshaping how we live, and we want to use it to redefine how financial services are offered. Grab is the leading technology company in Southeast Asia offering everyday services to the masses. Singtel is Asia’s leading communications group connecting millions of consumers and enterprises to essential digital services. This is why we are coming together to unlock big dreams, and financial inclusion for people in our region is just one of them. We want to build a digital bank with the right foundation - using data, technology and trust to solve problems and serve customers. If you have what it takes to help build this new Digibank with us.

Get to know the Role:

As such, we are seeking talented & passionate Lead Engineers to join our team. You will have opportunities to work on multiple backend service clusters as well as participating in machine learning pipelines. It is very important that our team member take initiatives to identify problems, and have the right mindset and skill sets to solve them.

The Day-to-Day activities:
Design and write with the cutting edge GO language to improve the availability, scalability, latency, and efficiency of Digibank’s range of services
Work with engineering team to explore and create new design / architectures geared towards scale and performance
Participate in code and design reviews to maintain our high development standards
Engage in service capacity and demand planning, software performance analysis, tuning and optimization
Collaborate with product and experience teams to define and prototype feature specifications
Work closely with infrastructure team in building and scaling back-end services as well as performing root cause analysis investigations
Design, build, analyze and fix large-scale systems
Learn full stack performance tuning and optimization
Debug and modify complex, production software

The Must-Haves:
A Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Information Technology or related fields with strong Computer Science fundamentals in algorithms and data structures
5+ experience in software engineering in a distributed systems environment
Track record of designing, developing and implementing large scale highly available online services.
Strong understanding of system performance and scaling
Possess excellent communication, sharp analytical abilities with proven design skills, able to think critically of the current system in terms of growth and stability
You can be a good coder in any language (C++, C, Java, Scala, Rust, Haskell, OCaml, Erlang, Python, Ruby, PHP, Node.JS, C# etc.), but willing to work on Golang

Tech Stack:

Our core services tech stack consists of Golang with Redis, MySQL, DynamoDB, Elasticsearch data stores as well as HAProxy load balancers. They all run on the AWS cloud infrastructure with auto-scaling abilities.

Our mobile app platform coverage includes native iOS and Android, written in Swift and RxJava. Our Command Center front-end is built on Rails, HTML5, CSS and Javascript.

We use GitHub for our code repository and we adhere to the basic Continuous Delivery tenets utilising a host of tools to support our release pipeline and code quality. These include Travis CI, New Relic, PullReview, Code Climate, Papertrail, Gemnasium, JFrog and Jenkins."
Moodys Application Developer,"Project Description:
You will perform an Application Developer role for facilitating IT related Regulatory projects within the Finance domain for our banking client , overseas subsidiaries and branches.

Responsibilities:
To enhance and develop projects/Change Requests related changes and to ensure deliverables are in good quality
To participate in user requirements gathering and able to provide impact analysis and efforts estimation
To develop functionalities to cater for business requirements using Windows Scripting, SQL
To design and build the Control-M jobs for batch processing
To carry out unit testing and SIT on the developed functions
To support UAT cycle, troubleshoot the issues and provide bug fixes
To raise remedy ticket for required changes in controlled environments
To migrate deliverables objects using Aldon migration tools to UAT/Production environment
To provide proper documentation for all the deliverables

Mandatory Skills Description:
Good knowledge in Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in Moody's RAY platform
Developer experience in SQL Server, Informatica
Good knowledge of SQL database
Proficient with Batch & Power Shell scripting
Good understanding in Data Warehouse and Data Mart concept
Experience in Performance tuning of queries
Good knowledge on SSIS & SSRS - ETL transformation & Reporting purposes

Compensation:
7000 - 11000 SGD Gross Per Month"
Data Engineer / Associate Data Engineer,"You will be responsible to support the Data Science team in:
Helping to project manage, coordinate and implement DS&A's data ingestion and data processing pipelines across different platforms
Ensuring that all data systems meet our business requirements and enable scalability of business processes

Main Responsibilities:
Project manage and deliver on data related implementations ensuring that deliverables are met within agreed scope and timelines
Work closely with vendors and internal stakeholders to project manage and coordinate DS&A’s data ingestion and data processing pipelines across platforms which can include mobile apps, SaaS platforms, on-premise databases and partner systems
Help architect DS&A’s data integrations and data processing flows between external / 3rd party data sources, AWS cloud datawarehouses (e.g. Redshift) and internal on-premise database instances for workloads at scale
Help to gather and translate business requirements into relevant database schemas, data integrations and data processing flows to meet business objectives
Develop data integrations (through API, SFTP etc) between AWS S3, Redshift instances and on-premise database instances (e.g. HANA)
Assemble large, complex datasets that meet functional and non-functional business requirements
Analyse and assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources (e.g. datasets received from stakeholders) and annotation/ labelling of new training inputs.
Identify, design and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, data validation tools, optimising data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Recommend different ways to constantly improve data reliability and quality, including helping review and enhance the existing data collection procedures to include data for building analytics models relevant for industry transformation
Develop monitoring toolkits to ensure that integration is executed successfully and alerts where integrations have failed
Provide guidance to internal teams on best practices for cloud to on-premise data integrations
Develop set processes for data mining, data modelling and data production
Support the integration and deployment of developed algorithms, machine learning and analytical models into current analytics system/production
Help setup, configure, deploy and validate machine learning models and analytics scripts on Amazon Sagemaker
Help in the implementation of CI/CD and deployment of ML models in production

Job Requirements:
At least 2-3 years of Software Project Management experience successfully managing both internal stakeholders and external vendors.
Successfully delivered at least 2 medium to large scale software systems in either a Project Management role, Data Architect role or Data Integration role
Ability to understand the different business domains and to make connections between the data and the business needs.
Good and strong communication skills and able to explain the issues, design tradeoffs between performance, maintenance and business requirements.
Able to clearly articulate and justify the design decisions taken
Good attention to details with regards to data workflow, data quality, data integrity and how the data will be stored and accessed.
Strong analytics skills related to working with structured and unstructured datasets.
Experience in performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Experience in designing database schemas to support OLTP and OLAP systems
Experience with data pipeline tools (e.g. Talend, SSIS, BODS, Airflow, Kafka)
Experience in software development and developing enterprise applications with integrations to SQL / no-SQL databases
Experience with object-oriented / object function scripting languages: Python, R, Java, etc.
Intellectual curiosity to find new and unusual ways of how to solve data management issues.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.
Experience in using Qliksense will be advantageous.
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Sqoop, etc.
Experience with stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming, Kalfka etc.
Strong working knowledge of SQL
Strong project management, stakeholder management and organisational skills.
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.
At least 3 years of working experience in a related field with real-world skills and testimonials from formal employers.
Working experience with structured and unstructured datasets is essential
Certified Scrum Master / Agile Developer / AWS Cloud Architect will be advantageous

Please note that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Senior Software Engineer (Tracking & Reporting),"Rakuten is a global Internet and e-commerce company, with over 1.3 billion registered users worldwide. Our e-commerce platform is the largest of its kind in Japan and among the world's largest by sales. Rakuten has many subsidiaries, including well-known brands like Rakuten VIKI, Rakuten TV, Rakuten Kobo and Rakuten Viber.

Rakuten Asia is on the lookout for a Senior Software Engineer to join our Core Platform Section, Tracking & Reporting Group. Responsibilities will include development of our on-line marketing platform, overseeing the team’s developments and making enhancements to achieve our goals in the digital advertisement industry. The shortlisted candidate will work closely with teams in Japan and India for maintenance and development on our Advertising data platform.

You will be required to have good marketing experience across multiple marketing channels with strong technical knowledge to process big data and systems that supports our marketing activity efficiently.

Responsibilities:

Your main responsibility will be development and maintenance of our on-line marketing platform. You will also need to understand both business demands and available system assets.

Understand structured and unstructured datasets
Involved in the whole process of application development life cycle (architecture design, middleware selection, development, configuration setting, application release and production system operation)
Troubleshooting, detecting root cause and recovering any issues with your team members proactively and taking ownership of the service/system
Proposing new technologies, middle-wares, tools etc. to improve architecture of systems
Create and automate the data workflows such as extraction, transformation, load (ETL)
Identify gaps or opportunities in AD/Marketing performance, develop potential solutions to fill those gaps
Work closely with teams in Singapore, Japan and India by showcasing good stakeholder management
Enhance, educate, and guide other members to achieve high agility and good contribution to the business
Bring good knowledge / experience to the team by catching up on latest technologies/trends related to the advertisement industry

Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:


5+ years of professional experience in application development of data pipeline/processing under distributed environment including both batch and streaming application
Complete at least 2 full SDLC cycles (from idea creation to production deployment)
Strong knowledge on Linux operating system
Strong knowledge on practical usage Big Data Technology (Hadoop, HDFS, Hive, Apache Spark, Apache Flink, Kafka, etc.)
Practical knowledge of system performance tuning including OS, middleware, JVM, and application
Hands-on experience and guidance to team members
Familiar with various OSS and be able to investigate, evaluate and adopt to the system

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience in deploying, monitoring, maintenance, and troubleshooting of high availability and huge traffic system
Experience of NoSQL (Couchbase, Redis, Elastic Search, Cassandra, MongoDB)
Experience of Scala
Experience with Agile development lifecycle.
Knowledge of on-line AD or marketing business and related technologies
Familiar with statistical analysis and machine learning
Contributing to OSS

Rakuten is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications regardless of sex, marital status, ethnic origin, sexual orientation, religious belief, or age."
Senior Software Engineer,"Getting onboard Razer will place you on a global mission to revolutionize the way the world games. Razer is a place to do great work, offering you the opportunity to make an impact globally while working across a global team located across 5 continents. Razer is also a great place to work, providing you the unique, gamer-centric #LifeAtRazer experience that will put you in an accelerated growth, both personally and professionally.

Job Responsibilities

THX is looking for a Senior Software Developer to enable and assist in the implementation of interactive, next-generation, end-user focused audio processing technologies onto wearable, portable, and free-standing computing and consumer electronics platforms.

An Exceptional Candidate Will

As a Senior Software Developer with requisite experience, one possesses a broad understanding of software architecture, design patterns, best practices, and the use of abstraction to appropriately categorize and resolve common issues that arise during the development process.

Evaluate existing software assets regarding suitability for requirements, and/or their compliance with industry-standard testing and certification suites.
Prepare design documents that describe a software subsystem and its behavior, as well as any acceptance criteria relating to its implementation across development, testing, staging and production environments.
Understand event-driven development and platform-specific messaging frameworks.
Enable, develop and maintain application- or driver-level integrations within general-purpose operating systems such as (Microsoft) Windows, (Apple) macOS / iOS, and (Google) Android / ChromeOS. Familiarity with desktop Linux distributions, and/or (Google) Fuchsia, are a plus.
Develop, refine and test UX / UI integrations between user-facing applications and underlying platform driver stacks.
Work with Sales, Marketing and other technical stakeholders, both internal and external, to ensure solution compliance and robustness.
Work with external technology partners and vendors to ensure product completeness.
Provide subject-matter leadership, where applicable, while understanding the need to pool knowledge by asking questions of, and answering questions for, other team members, to ensure on-time delivery.
Other duties as assigned.

Pre-Requisites

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Proficiency in three or more of the following programming languages used by THX:
C++, Rust, Objective-C, Swift, Java, Kotlin, JavaScript, Typescript, Dart, Go, Python 3.x, C#, PowerShell
Computer vision experience + an understanding of machine learning fundamentals is required.
Prior experience with game engine development frameworks, e.g., Unity, Unreal, Wwise, FMOD, is a plus, though not required
Prior experience with UWP XAML / WinUI 3, JUCE 6/7 (audio / GUI), and/or Qt 4/5 (GUI) frameworks is a plus, though not required
Prior experience with MATLAB, GNU Octave, Jupyter Notebooks, is a plus.

Education & Experience

BA/BS degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Software Engineering, Cognitive Science or related field, or equivalent work experience.

Salary Ranges

$140,400.00 - $253,502.00

Are you game?"
Data Engineer,"Position Overview

Do you love healthtech and Singapore put together? Then you just might love IHiS.

IHiS is a multiple award-winning Healthcare IT Leader that digitises, connects, and analyses Singapore's health ecosystem. Its ultimate aim is to improve the Singapore population's health and health administrations by integrating intelligent, highly resilient, and cost effective technologies with process and people.

We’re looking for a highly-driven and motivated Solution Architects (Data Analytics) for our Data aNalytics & Ai (DNA) team in Singapore.

If you are looking for a dynamic environment and to work with projects that use data to make a difference in our public healthcare system, this is the right place for you.

Role & Responsibilities

Work on analysis of health care information obtained various source systems.
Provide input to the development, maintenance and promulgation of the blue prints, roadmaps and reference architectures for Data Analytics infrastructure and services.
Perform analysis of new requirements and develop solutions, and manage solution delivery through acquisition or change control
Revise existing design specifications and development of new specifications.
Manage the development of queries to satisfy functional requirements.
Manage the development of analytical artefacts, including dashboards, reports and graphs as required.
Provide advice on high-level Business Intelligence, Data warehouse, Data Lake or Advanced Analytics solution designs.
Evaluate technologies/services, providing regular reporting on emerging trends, value add information and potential impact to the healthcare landscape.
Proactively achieve the IT strategic, broader business and IT objectives through influencing stakeholder outcomes.
Assist in vendor management to ensure contracted vendors deliver solutions that is architecturally sustainable and scalable.

Requirements

Degree/Master in Computer Science, Information Technology, Computer Engineering or equivalent.
Minimum eight (8) years’ experience in providing data warehouse or advanced analytics solutions.
Experience with
databases (e.g. Oracle, DB2, MS SQL, MySQL, Teradata, Greenplum)
data repository design (e.g. operational data stores, dimensional data stores, data marts)
data interrogation techniques (e.g. SQL, NoSQL).
structured and unstructured data analytics.
statistical computing programming language (e.g. R, Python).
data quality tools and processes.
data transformation and terminology equivalence mapping.
Experience in data modelling for analytics (e.g. star schemas, snowflake schemas).
Deep understanding of analytical models and methodologies – especially in the context of health analytics for clinical use and clinical safety (e.g. data mining, predictive analytics).
Experience with data acquisition tools (e.g., ETL, real-time data capture, and change data capture).
Comfortable working independently to carry out data analysis, estimate data quality and sufficiency. Understanding and analysing huge volumes of data drawn from heterogeneous sources / repositories.
Exposure to the development, evolution and adherence to the architectures relevant to the domain.
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools (e.g. SAS, SPSS, Cognos, Microstrategy, Microsoft analysis services, Business Objects).
Advance knowledge of Excel features and techniques required for the presentation of data.
Ability to work with a wide variety of report generation software (e.g. SSRS, Crystal reports) and generate a wide variety of outputs (dashboards, scheduled reports).
The ability to work towards strict and conflicting deadlines, be able to plan and prioritise in an environment with multiple stakeholders.
Good interpersonal skills, a detail-oriented & flexible person who can work across different areas within the team.
A good understanding of Singapore Healthcare System.
Familiarity or experience with health informatics would be preferred.
An understanding of healthcare data governance, data acquisition and data management would be an advantage.
Experience in interacting with analytics stakeholders (economists, statisticians, clinicians, policy makers) on a business or domain level would be preferred.

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
"DevOps Engineer, xCloud","What The Role Is
The jobholder will be part of the Cloud Platform Engineering team. The team is charged with a mission to transform the way HTX delivers software by leveraging on cloud innovation to enable agile software development, zero-trust security, continuous DevSecOps and artificial intelligence.

We are looking for highly technical individuals who are passionate about tech, love to solve problems, must be able to code and have a sound engineering mind. The ideal candidate is one who dares to innovate, takes ownership, a great team player, inspires excellence, is a skilled learner and one who embraces failures.

We are looking for a DevOps Engineer to develop our cloud delivery platform, automate the deployment of workloads and automate DevSecOps pipelines.

What You Will Be Working On
Design, build and maintain enterprise cloud delivery platform on cloud-native serverless, middleware, backend, security and infrastructure technologies.
Design & develop cloud landing zones and solution accelerators based on Terraform.
Develop and integrate common services such as API management, identity, monitoring and security.
Design, build and maintain enterprise wide DevSecOps and MLOps pipelines automation.

What We Are Looking For
Skilled in Linux and Python, Javascript or any other scripting language.
Experience with developing and deploying applications as containers using Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience with full-stack agile software development practices.
Experience with developing for cloud using serverless and PaaS services on AWS or Azure.
Knowledge about web security and cloud security will be a bonus.
Preferably 1-5 years of relevant working experience.

All new appointees will be appointed on a two-year contract in the first instance.

We wish to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified within 4 weeks upon closing of the advertisement."
R&D Software Engineer (C#),"Keysight is the world's leading electronic measurement company, helping scientists and engineers address their toughest technical challenges with confidence through innovations in wireless, modular, and software solutions. Our employees leverage their insight and passion to deliver measurement solutions in wireless communications, aerospace and defense, and semiconductor markets with world-class platforms, software and consistent measurement science.

This job will be part of the Electronic Industrial Solutions Group, which provides test and measurement solutions across a broad set of electronic industrial end markets, focusing on high-growth applications in the automotive and energy industries, and measurement solutions for consumer electronics, education and manufacturing, as well as semiconductor parametric testing, nano-positioning metrology and material science. The group provides electronic design and test software, instruments, and systems used in the simulation, design, validation, manufacturing, installation and optimization of electronic equipment.

Job Description

About the Job:

We are seeking a passionate and innovative software engineer to join our team in Electrical & Industrial Solutions Group Center of Excellence (EISG COE) to launch the next generation software solution for future enterprise engagements. Being part of the software development team, you will play a leading role in in an AGILE team to engage customers to implement solutions to fulfil their requirement. You will provide guidance and work together with the team in software architecture and design, code review, unit testing. You are also required to continually improve the development process.

Responsibilities:
Lead and design Keysight’s board test and measurement software solution
Engage the customers to bring them the right solution.
Access, evaluate and identify technical work scope required to communicate the impact of technical choices to non-technical audiences, and build consensus across technical and non-technical stakeholders
Set the technology direction and research into new innovations for major components of the measurement test software products.
Work on complex problems that impact the design success of current products and addresses broad design issues of future products or technologies
Collaborate with product marketing and business leaders to create products that advance Keysight’s position as a market leader in measurement test

Job Qualifications
Bachelor/Master Computer Science/Electrical/Electronic Engineering or a software related discipline, from an accredited college or university
Minimum 5-6 years’ experience working with product development/engineering and product management
Knowledge with board testing technology, IEEE boundary scan standards and programming algorithms is a plus
Experience in design, implementation and deployment of software that support multiple platforms
Well-versed in modern techniques in object-oriented design, design patterns and measurement libraries
Must have developed applications and solutions using .NET Framework, C#, WPF.
Familiar with tools such as Microsoft Visual Studio, TFS, ClearCase, SharePoint, Git, GitLab. Jira, Confluence, Artifactory

Job Function

Shift:

Day Job

Schedule:

Full Time (F)

Travel Required:

None

Duration (Temp Positions Only):

Not Applicable

___________________________________________________________________________________

Careers Privacy Statement

***Keysight is an Equal Opportunity Employer.***

Candidates can be considered to work from the following locations:

APAC : Singapore : Singapore : Singapore

Job ID : 48630"
Senior Backend Engineer - Crypto,"⚡ Senior Backend Engineer (Crypto)
📍 Singapore/Hong Kong/Indonesia/Japan (100% remote)
💼 Permanent role
💵 Competitive Salary

Organization
My client is a Series B-funded crypto unicorn with almost USD200m in funding, making them the #1 crypto trading platform in the ASEAN region. Their 100+ employees work on a 100% remote basis and they're looking to further strengthen their engineering function.

Through hands-on utilization of the latest tech, the Senior Backend Engineer will oversee the development and advancement of a high-performing crypto exchange, its matching engine, and back-end systems. The incumbent will connect system infrastructure to dApps that serve millions of customers.

What you'll do
✅ Design API and facilitate integration between frontend, backend, and management systems
✅ Oversee design, development, and improvement of secure and scalable systems
✅ Collaborate with SRE to ensure system reliability
✅ Coordinate with engineering team to optimize system e2e

Must-haves
✅ >5yrs exp in Golang for high volume applications
✅ Exp in Wallet/Crypto/Blockchain/Web3 space
✅ Exp in highly-secured, trusted environments
✅ Tech stack: Golang, C++, Java, Rust
✅ Keen interest in Web3/Crypto/Blockchain/DeFi

🌏 The role is remote.

📧 Interested in applying? Click on 'Easy Apply' or email me at saywei.tan@storm2.com for a confidential chat.

⚡ Storm2 is a specialist FinTech recruitment firm with clients across Europe, APAC, and North America. To discuss open opportunities or career options, please visit our website at storm2.com and follow the Storm2 LinkedIn page for the latest jobs and intel."
Senior Engineer - API/WEB-EN,"As Senior Engineer – API/WEB, you will assure SITA's competitive strength and business growth through the provision of the highest quality technical Service Operations to SITA customers. Perform all Service Operations activities according to SITA standards and procedures maximizing customer satisfaction by the delivery of first class support activities.

Reporting to the Manager Service Operation you will be a part of the Service Management team To provide the highest level of Service Operation availability ensuring Systems and Products are properly configured and maintained. To assist the Service Operations team to ensure service delivery quality is maintained through direct assistance in implementing and improving working processes and procedures.

Please note that the Job title on SITA contract for this role will be Senior Specialist/Engineer Service Operations , as aligned with our internal career framework.

At SITA, we are meeting the new needs of travel ...today! Are you ready to join us?

What You Will Do

 Provide Service Operations support to internal and external customers in accordance with the terms of the customer contract and Service Level Agreements (SLAs)
 Ensure the correct functioning and maintenance of all internal and external systems and products serviced by Service Operations
 When required act as the customer SPOC and co-ordinate the scheduling of intervention with Customer's internal resolver groups and the Service Desk ensuring the highest level of customer services and communications are maintained to resolve the fault and incident within the prescribed SLA.
 Carry out incident and problem management support to the highest standards and co-ordinate the resolution with the appropriate resolver groups
 Ensure shortest restoral times possible initiating the timely escalations to specialized resolver groups inside and outside SITA according to the customer contracts SLAs and monitoring requirements
 To ensure the Service Operations team adheres to the highest working standards for all incidents and problems by providing guidance support and direct management.
 Proactively detect problems related to service and infrastructure operations and delivery services conduct diagnostics and provide service request ownership to ensure resolution of customer problems
 Use the appropriate tools and equipment to perform the installation intervention and repairs in accordance with Service Operations and Delivery guidelines and instructions where provided
 Report and escalate to the next level those problems which cannot be fixed
 Carry out preventive and proactive maintenance of equipment and monitoring of systems and services in accordance with agreed schedules and customer expectations
 Perform Change Management Configurations Design and Implementation of the supported Product & Systems
 Manage local suppliers in the provision of services for the SITA Service Operations centers and report on services provided to management.
 Conducts the analysis definition documentation and testing of application & systems enhancements
 Continuously identify and document lessons learnt known errors and operational knowledge for improved services
 When/where required be contactable for escalations and support on and on-call standby basis
 When/where required perform assigned tasks on 24 x 7 shifts basis.

Who You Are

 Diploma / Degree in Computer Science, Electronic Engineering or equivalent in-country qualification.
 Applicable vendor / technology intermediate level certification or equivalent work experience in particular MCSE, MCTS, RHCE, RHCSA, Linux/ MS-SQL Server /AIX Specialist
 ITIL Foundation Certificate with Knowledge of ITIL IT and network components and principles
 Citrix/VMware/Azure/AWS Public Cloud certifications
 Minimum 8+ years of experience in the infrastructure/system support domain. Must have dealt directly with external customers delivering to SLAs.

What We Offer

SITA’s workplace is all about diversity many different countries and cultures are represented in our workforce, and colleagues who’ve been working here for decades collaborate with those just out of college and early in their careers. SITA is a place of change and constant improvement, where we're always pushing ourselves to find better ways of doing things smarter, quicker, easier, for us and our customers and for their customers too.

And we offer all the good stuff you’d expect like holidays, bonus, flexible benefits, medical policy, pension plan and access to world class learning.

Welcome to SITA 

SITA is the world’s leading specialist in air transport communications and information technology. We don’t just connect the global aviation industry. We apply decades of experience and expertise to address almost every core business, operational, baggage, and passenger process in air transport.

We design, build, and support technology solutions all with one vision to create easy air travel every step of the way. As an organization, we cover 95% of all international air travel destinations and work with over 2,800 air transport and government customers in every corner of the globe. Are you ready to explore the opportunities?

In case of issues with uploading your CV or accessing the application system, please contact us @ careers@sita.aero

Profession

Service Operations

Work Location

Asia Pacific-Singapore-Singapore

Schedule

Full-time

Job Posting

Apr 7, 2022, 52951 PM"
Software Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Responsibilities
Software Development
Be a Scrum development team member;
Ability to collaborate with team effectively
Able to support storyboarding effort of the team
Capability to contribute in all phases of the development cycle
Develop and enhance applications;
Development activities are expected to be carried out with minor supervision
Able to deliver working software on time
Able to design and develop high quality code as per standards and guidelines
Peer-Review of code;
Can perform peer-review to ensure code quality and requirements are met
Software Support
Support SIT and UAT activities;
Able to assist smooth delivery of software to SIT and UAT environments
Provide support for production;
Capable to fix assigned bugs quickly
Able to update status and work details in Bug/Issue Tracking System
Requirements
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree/Post Graduate Diploma/Professional Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Minimum of 2 years of experience in software development
Possessing any of the certifications or equivalent would be an added advantage a) Certified JAVA Developer b) Certified Scrum Developer (CSD)
Strong analytical skills, able to solve complex problem
Good knowledge and implementation of REST APIs
Knowledge of Agile and Scrum
Experience with modern web technologies, HTML5, CSS3
Experience with Javascript and frontend frameworks e.g. Angular
Experience with JDK 1.5 and above, J2EE and Spring, Hibernate framework, Grails/Groovy
Knowing C, C++ and C# is advantageous
Experience with J2EE application servers GlassFish, Jetty or equivalent
Working with Databases – MySQL, Oracle, SQL Server or equivalent
Knowledge of Design Patterns e.g. MVC
Familiar with source control management system such as SVN, GIT or equivalent.
Familiar with usage of bug tracking system such as BugZilla, JIRA or equivalent.
Experience with mobile hybrid development as well as native e.g. Cordova/Phonegap

Desired Skills and Experience
Design Patterns, Scrum, MySQL, Agile, JavaScript, HTML5, SQL, SQL Server, Angular, Java, C#, API, Databases, J2EE, Software Development, C++, Hibernate"
Machine Learning Engineer,"We are looking for a talented and enthusiastic Machine Learning Engineer who will be responsible for application feature development. Reporting to the VP of Product, this individual will be responsible for building new features and algorithms in our media optimization platform to provide our clients with workflow and capabilities for continuous pre- and in-campaign optimization towards media and performance metrics and post-campaign reporting and insights.

This candidate will work closely with the Product, Design, Engineering and Client Success teams to create a world-class SaaS platform. This candidate will create/build elegant user workflows, efficient and scalable services, and reusable frameworks to improve client delivery efficiency. The company is looking for an extremely collaborative, humble, and detail-oriented individual who enjoys working in a dynamic environment.This is a highly technical position that requires a breadth of knowledge across multiple systems as well as a depth of knowledge on very specific technologies.

TECHNOLOGIES: Python, AWS, MongoDB, SQL Server, mySQL, Postman, and Jira. Working experience in Spark and Data Bricks is a plus.

Responsibilities
Architect and implement product features and backend procedures to value and optimize client’s marketing campaigns
Work closely with Product and Data Science to continuously ideate and apply machine learning techniques to implementation of new product features
Collaborate with Product Management and Engineering leadership to gain a deep understanding of our customer’s needs, our product vision, gain alignment on product scope ahead of implementation, and understand requirements
Implement unit and integrations tests to maintain confidence in our platform’s stability
Analyze and track application performance associated with new features and work closely with Product and Engineering leadership to prioritize resolution and/or improvements
Optimize code to improve performance and scalability and reduce infrastructure costs
Debug and trace issues across multiple application modules and services
Break down product initiative requirements, identify dependencies and create implementation plans
Create and maintain documentation of new features, frameworks and methodologies
Mentor teammates through pair programming and feedback with code and architecture reviews. Mentor senior-level engineers for leadership
Qualifications

The ideal candidate will be able to work closely with Product Management and Engineering team offshore and onshore to collaborate and deliver product features to market quickly with sound development practices and consistent quality. This person will work to understand our products in depth in order to deliver the best quality experiences for our users. This person will consistently aim for technical excellence and will influence others to do the same through positive and effective communication.

Additionally, we highlight the following personal, professional, and technological characteristics the ideal candidate will possess:
High proficiency in python
Strong understanding of machine learning techniques
3+ years of experience developing application procedures and services
2+ years of experience working in building ETL processes and data pipelines
Strong understanding of NoSQL databases, asynchronous messaging architectural patterns
Exceptional written and verbal communication skills
College degree in the area of computer science or an engineering discipline preferred
Possess the ability to take a complex set of product requirements and deliver a finished product independently or by leading and coordinating a team of engineers
Experience with consuming data and analyzing queries in an MPP data warehouse is a plus
Perks
Company sponsored health, dental and vision benefits for you and your dependents
Employee Advisory Groups / Proactive Social Groups
Pet Funds + Pet Care Savings
Referral Bonus
Progressive approach to paid parental leave
Epic personal and professional growth opportunities
About

Elsy Pte Ltd is part of VideoAmp. VideoAmp is an advertising measurement and optimization platform increasing the value of advertising by redefining how media is valued, bought and sold. Our platform automates advertising workflows, deduplicates audiences across traditional TV, streaming video, digital media and walled gardens and connects media exposures to an advertiser’s sales. By unlocking new value for the entire ecosystem, our platform allows the world’s largest advertisers, agencies and publishers to align on VideoAmp’s independent measurement as a new media currency to transact against.We are transforming a 100-year-old industry by powering a more effective three-way value exchange that results in increasing the return on media investment for advertisers, increasing revenue for publishers and providing a better viewing experience for consumers.

Come and Join Us!"
Senior Backend Engineer,"Lightspeed Studios are one of the world’s most innovative and successful game developers. With teams across China, the United States, Singapore, Canada, Japan, South Korea, and New Zealand.

Founded in 2008, LightSpeed Studios has created over 50 games across multiple platforms and genres for more than 4 billion registered users. It is the co-developer of worldwide hits
PUBG MOBILE and Apex Legends Mobile.

-Our Vision: To Create the LIGHTSPEED Universe, the ecosystem that connects players and developers around the world.
-Our Mission: To explore the future of gaming with true passion for games.
-Our Slogan: the future of gaming with true passion for games.

Responsibilities
Evaluate and design massively scalable game back-end services and develop the project architecture;
Evaluate and design periphery back-end services and develop the project architecture.


Qualifications
3+ years of experience in Linux backend development;
Skillful at C/C++, with knowledge of data structures and algorithms;
Experience in common software design patterns;
Highly proficient in TCP(UDP)IP, networking, client-server systems, and high-performance distributed systems;
Experience in Micro-services, Cloud Native Architecture, Docker, container-driven systems, and SQL/No-SQL Databases;
Strong sense of responsibility and good at communication."
DevOps Engineer (AWS focused),"We are looking for an experienced DevOps Engineer to join our team. You will work together in a team that are responsible for automated deployments, ensuring highest reliability and scalability processes for serving the needs from company.
Working Hours: Mon-Fri
Working Location: Central (Work from home arrangement)
Remuneration Package: Up to $7000 (basic) + bonus (2-3months)

Roles and Responsibilities
Collaborate with various teams that includes Development/Infra/Products to ensure successful delivery, maintenance planning and correction of build errors.
Day-to-day monitoring, backup, deployment and maintenance of systems
Develop/build/maintain continuous integration/deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and automated testing to support high quality software build in a continuous build/deploy environment (Jenkins Pipeline/Library)
Writing scripts/programs for service monitoring and health check of systems which perform automated integration flow and alerting.
Automate and build up scalable systems/environment using latest technologies (e.g. Kubernetes) with infrastructure-as-code and GitOps strategy
Automate security hardening in testing, deployment and production setup based on industrial best practices
Provide technical insights for the design and implementation of solutions.

Requirements
Experience in computing platforms such as AWS/GCP/Azure (e.g. AWS: EC2, RDS, ELB, EFS, ELK, ElasticCache, S3, VPC, IAM, CloudWatch, KMS, AMK, EKS, MSK)
Experienced with building and setting up high velocity and reliable CI/CD pipeline using
tools/platforms such as Jenkins, Gitlab, Nexus, Maven, Spinnaker
Proficiency with containers and cloud orchestration tools such as Docker, Kubernetes
Hands on Infrastructure-as-Code control using tools

If you are excited with this opportunity and enjoy making things happen, do apply now!

OR

Email your updated resume to: speytu(at)scientecpersonnel.com

By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have agreed & consented to us collecting, using, retaining & disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration. Please refer to ScienTec’s Privacy Policy https://www.scientecconsulting.com/privacy-policy for full details. If you wish to withdraw your consent, please write to us at dpo(at)scientecconsulting.com.

(Note: Any resumes of job applications sent to this mailbox will not be attended as it is solely for the purpose of personal data protection related matters.)

Elane Yap Theng Yu- R1989397
ScienTec Consulting Pte Ltd - 11C5781"
Senior/Staff/Senior Staff Software Engineer - Data Engineering,"The Trade Desk is a global technology company with a mission to create a better, more open internet for everyone through principled, intelligent advertising. Handling over 1 trillion queries per day, our platform operates at an unprecedented scale. We have also built something even stronger and more valuable: an award-winning culture based on trust, ownership, empathy, and collaboration. We value the unique experiences and perspectives that each person brings to The Trade Desk, and we are committed to fostering inclusive spaces where everyone can bring their authentic selves to work every day.

Do you have a passion for solving hard problems at scale? Are you eager to join a dynamic, globally-connected team where your contributions will make a meaningful difference in building a better media ecosystem? Come and see why Fortune magazine consistently ranks The Trade Desk among the best small-medium-sized workplaces globally.

About the Role:

Our Senior & Staff Data Engineers are end-to-end owners. You will participate actively in all aspects of designing, building, and delivering data products for our clients.
You will work with petabyte-scale data challenges, large-scale distributed systems coordinating thousands of servers in cloud and physical data centers around the world, machine learning, and advanced visualizations – to name a few.
You will work with data processing pipelines, ML pipelines, data processing automation, data governance, data visualization, data quality, data privacy, data warehousing.
Senior Engineers contribute to more than our product – they build up our team. Through a combination of mentoring, technical leadership, and/or direct management of small teams, they make others better and raise the bar for those around them.

Who We Are Looking For:

You have a sustained track record of making significant, self-directed, and end-to-end contributions to large and impactful data engineering projects. You think beyond just the task at hand to deeply understand the 'why' behind what you are doing.
You understand engineering fundamentals. At our scale, many off-the-shelf techniques and existing technologies (open source and enterprise) simply don't work. You are able to work from first principles to evaluate solutions and adapt them to a unique environment.
You have experience in data engineering. You've worked with SQL, ETL, data modeling, and technologies similar to Spark, Scala, C#, Java, etc..
You are a broadly skilled engineer, accustomed to developing web services. You have experience building always-on systems, working across a variety of technologies and service layers.
You have a product-focused mindset. You have the passion and ability to contribute to the process of discovering what will delight our clients and push forward one of the world’s largest and most influential industries toward a vision of openness, transparency, and evidence-based decision-making.
You work with confidence and without ego. Our engineers have deep knowledge and exercise a high degree of leadership in their daily work. You have strongly-held, defensible ideas, and advocate for what you believe is right. You are also adept at identifying and evaluating trade-offs, willing to be proven wrong, and quick to walk through fire to support your fellow teammates.
You value, seek out, and foster diversity. We are a global team from many diverse backgrounds, with different experiences and perspectives. To complement this team, you will welcome ideas that are different from your own and be skilled at finding and building from common ground.
You are a creative thinker, not bound by ""the way things have always been done"". What you know is less important than how well you learn and innovate. We don't need engineers who know all the answers; we need engineers who can invent the answers no one has thought of yet, to the questions yet to be asked.

What We Care About:

What and how you can contribute is what’s important to us. Our consideration is not limited by the kind of education you have or the specific technologies you have experience with. Variety of technical challenge is one of the best things about working at The Trade Desk as an engineer, but we do not expect you to know every technology we use when you start. What we care about is that you can learn quickly and solve complex problems using the best tools for the job.

Our culture runs much deeper than just having fun together (though, we do that well too...) – the people we want on our team are trust-builders, generous givers, scrappy problem solvers, and gritty pursuers of excellence.

Does this sound like you? If so, we welcome your application and the chance to meet you.

Our Compensation and Benefits (for Colorado and New York residents only)

$155,500 -$285,100

In accordance with Colorado and New York law, the range provided is The Trade Desk’s reasonable estimate of the base compensation for this role. The actual amount may be higher or lower, based on non-discriminatory factors such as experience, knowledge, skills, abilities and location.

All employees may be eligible for other forms of compensation such as stock-based compensation, which are awarded to employees based on company and individual performance. TTD also offers other compensation depending on the role such as sales-based incentives and commissions.

The Trade Desk also offers a competitive benefits package. Click here to learn more.

The Trade Desk does not accept unsolicited resumes from search firm recruiters. Fees will not be paid in the event a candidate submitted by a recruiter without an agreement in place is hired; such resumes will be deemed the sole property of The Trade Desk. The Trade Desk is an equal opportunity employer. All aspects of employment will be based on merit, competence, performance, and business needs. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, marital status, age, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, pregnancy, genetic information, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other status protected under federal, state, or local law.

REQ-3316"
"SAS Data Engineer, Data & Analytics, Technology Consulting","At EY, you’ll have the chance to build a career as unique as you are, with the global scale, support, inclusive culture and technology to become the best version of you. And we’re counting on your unique voice and perspective to help EY become even better, too. Join us and build an exceptional experience for yourself, and a better working world for all.

The opportunity

EY DnA is the data and advanced analytics capability within EY Asia-Pacific, with over 500 specialist employees working across multiple industry sectors.

We implement information-driven strategies, data platforms and advanced data analytics solution systems that help grow, optimize and protect client organizations. We go beyond strategy and provide end to end design, build and implementation of real life data environments and have some of the best architects, project managers, business analysts, data scientists, big data engineers, developers and consultants in the region.

We are looking for a Data Engineer with SAS Viya skills within the DnA team in our Singapore office. This role is offered on a flexible full time basis.

Your Key Responsibilities

Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong drive to excel professionally, and to guide and motivate others
Advanced written and verbal communication skills
Dedicated, innovative, resourceful, analytical and able to work under pressure
Foster an efficient, innovative and team-oriented work environment

Skills And Attributes For Success

Experience in ETL, Data Engineering, Scripting.
Knowledge and experience in end-to-end project delivery, either traditional SDLC or agile delivery methodologies (or hybrid approaches)
Experience in a delivery role on Business Intelligence, Data Warehousing, Big Data or analytics projects
Exceptional communication, documentation and presentation skills and stakeholder management experiences
Experience in business intelligence, data warehousing/platform, and data strategy projects

To qualify for the role you must have

At least 5 years’ experience as a SAS Engineer with experience in development and maintenance support
Experience with SAS BASE, Enterprise Guide (EG), Event Stream Processing (ESP), Visual Analytics (VA) , Viya platforms (VI and VA) and Data Integration (DI) are required
Minimum 2yr experience in SAS application maintenance and SAS Management Console (SMC)
Minimum 2yrs experience in dealing large data sets in Greenplum / Hadoop / Oracle / DB2
Dashboarding experience with tableau / power BI / SAS VA is desirable
Experience in shell /batch scripting
Application packaging and deployment experience across DEV to PROD environments
Experience in maintenance reporting and managing change / service requests.

Ideally, you’ll also have

Experience in engaging with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Consulting experience and background, including engaging directly with clients
Degree in Computer Science or IT or Business Analytics

What We Offer

EY offers a competitive remuneration package commensurate with your work experience where you’ll be rewarded for your individual and team performance. We are committed to being an inclusive employer and are happy to consider flexible working arrangements, where this may be needed, guided by our FWA Policy.

Plus, we offer:

Continuous learning: You’ll develop the mindset and skills to navigate whatever comes next.
Success as defined by you: We’ll provide the tools and flexibility, so you can make a meaningful impact, your way.
Transformative leadership: We’ll give you the insights, coaching and confidence to be the leader the world needs.
Diverse and inclusive culture: You’ll be embraced for who you are and empowered to use your voice to help others find theirs.

If you can demonstrate that you meet the criteria above, please contact us as soon as possible.

The Exceptional EY Experience. It’s Yours To Build.

Apply now."
Principal Machine Learning Engineer,"Job Purpose

At Great Eastern, we are building Data and AI capabilities to activate the full value of our data. Reporting to Head of Group Data & AI CoE, this role will play a critical part in the AI and machine learning work stream within the Centre of Excellence (CoE). The role is responsible for progressing the business growth by accelerating machine learning and AI solution adoption at scale in cost-effective manner.

The Job
Collaborate with business stakeholders and data product manager to identify, understand and define ML opportunities for leveraging to solve critical business problem
Identify next generation AI solutions and define the AI & ML technology roadmap and strategy, lead the research, development including visioning, development of MVP and presentation to gain a sustainable competitive technology advantage
Work closely with cross functional team to give the technical direction cover marketing, operation and risk area, that are typically cross function and cross domain, responsible for core ML product development
Improve the data scientist productivity by optimizing ML infrastructure and building reusable AI assets and components,
Evaluate, establish guidelines and best practices of MLOps, strengthen and advocate the MLOps process and practices across the Group Data
Work closely with data science team, technology risk management and data management team to co-develop policies and procedures that govern the responsible use of AIDA in the group also cultivate human-centric AI design thinking
Takes accountability in considering business and regulatory compliance risks and takes appropriate steps to mitigate the risks.
Maintains awareness of industry trends on regulatory compliance, emerging threats and technologies in order to understand the risk and better safeguard the company.
Highlights any potential concerns /risks and proactively shares best risk management practices.
Master’s degree above in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Economics, Actuarial Science or equivalent disciplines with extensive use of data for analysis;
Minimum 10 years of experience in the end to end machine learning solutions required;
Practical knowledge on machine learning techniques and advanced statistical techniques and concepts;
Solid and hands-on engineering and coding skills such as Python, Pyspark, Scala, SQL, and R
relation databases and Hadoop infrastructure
Proficient in integration and orchestration of AI/ML tools and library
Exposure to micro services and architecture
In-depth understanding of model life cycle management
Good written and verbal communication skills with demonstrating the ability to communicate the business benefits provided by analytics insights;
Experience in big data frameworks like Hive, Spark and Hadoop
Experience in using data visualization software such as Tableau/Qlik/PowerBI;
Experience in using AWS/GCP will be preferred;
Experience in Insurance or Financial Services is a plus;
Willing to learn and positive, can-do attitude
High level of integrity, takes accountability of work and good attitude over teamwork.
Takes initiative to improve current state of things and adaptable to embrace new changes.
About Great Eastern

Established in 1908, Great Eastern places customers at the heart of everything we do. Our legacy extends beyond our products and services to our culture, which is defined by our core values and how we work. As champions of Integrity, Initiative and Involvement, our core values act as a compass, guiding and inspiring us to embrace the behaviours associated with each value, upholding our promise to our customers - to continue doing our best for them in a sustainable manner.

We work collaboratively with our stakeholders to look for candidates who exhibit or have the potential to embrace our core values and associated behaviours, as these are the key traits that we expect from our employees as they develop their careers with us.

We embrace inclusivity, giving all employees an equal opportunity to shine and play their role in exploring possibilities to deliver innovative insurance solutions.

Since 2018, Great Eastern has been a signatory to the United Nations (UN) Principles of Sustainable Insurance. Our sustainability approach around environmental, social, and governance (ESG) considerations play a key role in every business decision we make. We are committed to being a sustainability-driven company to achieve a low-carbon economy by managing the environmental footprint of our operations and incorporating ESG considerations in our investment portfolios; improving people’s lives by actively helping customers live healthier, better and longer; and drive responsible business practices through material ESG risk management.

To all recruitment agencies: Great Eastern does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our email or our employees. We will not be responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
Lead Software Engineer (React Native + Mobile Framework)),"A Lead Software Engineer in the Mobile Engineering practice contributes to the design of mobile software and has the ability to develop mobile applications in accordance with best practice design principles. This mobile engineer develops mobile applications for Singtel such as Gomo, HiApp, and MySingtel App. This developer has a firm grasp both Mobile architectures and on service oriented architectures and API principles.
Key Responsibilities
Contribute to the Mobile Application framework architecture and design
Understand and Implement feature User Stories
Develop in Kotlin, Swift, Objective-C, React Native as needed for the application
Build Deployment modules for iOS or Android and pipelines for SIT, UAT, and Production
Practice good test driven development
Familiarity with general devops and sre practices
The ideal candidate should possess
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Min. 10 years of relevant mobile framework development experience
Technically proficient in React Native (iOS/Android), Java / Kotlin Programming Language (Android), Swift Programming Language (iOS), Android SDK (Android), Android Studio (Android), iOS Framework (iOS), XCode (iOS), Git Branching Strategy, Code Quality, Unit Testing, API
Strong hands-on coder
Experienced in JIRA, Agile Practice
Considers Software Architecture as part of development
Considers Testing as part of the development process
We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated."
Senior Computer Vision Data Scientist,"This role is with Aicadium, a startup supported by SGInnovate.

As AI adoption increases, the challenge in the next decade figuring out how to use AI now to augment human decision-making, without leading to more harm. Despite the growing awareness of Responsible AI, most business leaders do not feel confident acting on RAI actions, such as ensuring compliance with applicable regulation, protecting AI systems from cyber threats, and improving governance of AI systems and processes. As such, we are looking to develop AI assurance products and services to enable people to understand whether their AI systems are trustworthy. One application area is testing the performance of large-scale video analytics. This includes methodologies for validating AI performance, research and application of new analytical methods to advance assurance that the AI system is accurate, explainable, fair, privacy-preserving and robust. This broad area of research and applications is commonly referred to as trustworthy AI, responsible AI, or AI assurance.

We are looking for a computer vision data scientist who has experience training and deploying a variety of computer vision models to be one of our first hires for a new venture that will help companies test and audit their AI systems. We value strong technical ability. There will be room to solve challenging problems and adopt cutting edge technology into business applications.

WHO WE ARE

We are part of a mission driven venture that wants to make AI safer for the world.

We believe that algorithmic decision making has a huge potential to drive change. However, the increased complexity poses risks that need to be deliberately managed. We want to partner with a broad range of enterprises that have ambitious uses for artificial intelligence and are also serious about utilising AI in a trustworthy manner.

We are a team of first-principles, multi-disciplinary thinker-doers who believe in doing things right. We are thoughtful about technology and its potential pitfalls. We want to systematically support businesses to build safe, effective and impactful AI technology.

YOU WILL:
Develop tools to apply the latest state of the art in testing for robustness, explainability, fairness, privacy and security of AI and machine learning systems, with a strong focus on computer vision-based models.
Research and keep up to date with the latest developments in applied machine learning research.
Perform technical AI evaluations and tests on various AI models and applications that are deployed or to be deployed to end users.
Work with the product management team to develop a suite of technical and analytical AI evaluation tests that are backed by scientific research and methods.

YOU ARE ABLE TO:
Think from first principles and want to tackle the most challenging technical problems problems from a multi-disciplinary approach e.g., design, engineering and social science.
Lead by example regardless of whether you are a manager or individual contributor. You want to work with passionate and talented individuals and people want to work with you.
Communicate in an open, frank and respectful manner.
Thrive in a fast-paced environment.
Navigate uncertainty by being willing to explore, while remaining laser focused on the mission at hand.

YOU HAVE:
Extensive experience as a data scientist training computer vision models and deploying them in real-world contexts.
An interest in applied research on the limits of AI in general, and specifically in computer vision models.
Specific experience with ethical or responsible AI methods is not essential but a plus.

Preferred Skills
C++
Computer Vision
Cybersecurity
Data engineering
Machine learning framework such as Spark, Tensorflow, Sci-kit Learn
Python
Good-to-have Skills
Fullstack experience
Image processing
NLP toolkits (Spacy, Stanford NLP, UIMA, NLTK)

Interested applicants may apply via this link: https://stars.sginnovate.com/viewrole?type=tm&jobid=MKT_2023_AIC220033_1877"
Full Stack Developer,"Who we are:
Avensys is a reputed global IT professional services company headquartered in Singapore. Our service spectrum includes enterprise solution consulting, business intelligence, business process automation and managed services. Given our decade of success, we have evolved to become one of the top trusted providers in Singapore and service a client base across banking and financial services, insurance, information technology, healthcare, retail and supply chain.

We are currently looking to hire Full Stack Developer who has proven track record in IT Industry. This is an exciting opportunity to expand your skill set, achieve job satisfaction and work-life balance. More details as below.

Roles and Responsibilities:

Job Description

• Design, develop, implement, and maintain end-to-end enterprise web applications.
• Conduct software analysis, programming, testing, and code debugging, as well as assists in identifying and resolving product problems.
• Proficient in MERN stack at building microservices and REST APIs for applications.
• Perform unit and system testing of application code, as well as resolve issues to meet customer functional and non-functional requirements.


Requirements

• At least 3 years of experience in full stack development for enterprise applications.
• Hands-on in JavaScript, and proficient in at least NodeJS, ReactJS, ExpressJS frameworks.
• Be able to write clean and maintainable code, as well as comfortable in debugging/resolving complex problems.
• Able to understand integration with heterogeneous systems/applications
• Understand Agile methodology and DevSecOps, while being able to apply in full SDLC.
• Lateral thinking, passionate, innovative, and creative.
• A highly motivated self-starter who possess positive mindset, a doer mentality, proactive and good communication skills.
• Will be a plus if have experience in Java

WHAT’S ON OFFER
You will be remunerated with an excellent base salary and entitled to attractive company benefits. Additionally, you will get the opportunity to enjoy a fun and collaborative work environment, alongside a strong career progression.
To submit your application, please apply online or email your UPDATED CV in Microsoft Word format to anamika@aven-sys.com Your interest will be treated with strict confidentiality.

CONSULTANT DETAILS:
Consultant Name : Anamika Mukerji
Avensys Consulting Pte Ltd
EA Licence 12C5759
Privacy Statement: Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Avensys' privacy policy."
"Software Engineer (StackOps), Engineering Productivity","The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

About Us - Engineering Productivity (ENP)

ENP is part of the Government Digital Services (GDS) Team which aims to spearhead the digital transformation of government. Our objective is to catapult our government infrastructure into the new digital era with faster time to market, operational agility, automated deployment and scalability. ENP is an agile development and operations house that is bold, agile and collaborative. The team is responsible for designing, prototyping, building and operating different products and services. Today, ENP has 3 flagship products and several upcoming initiatives.

How we work:

Design for citizens — Listening to our users is the best starting point for building great solutions. To understand pain points faced by Singaporeans, we test and iterate relentlessly.

Go far, go together — Building a great product is a good start, but we usually set our sights higher. In order to make a lasting impact on how the government builds products, we partner closely with various agencies to improve capabilities across the government.

Engineer with care — We value products that last, so investing in maintainable systems and clean code is important to us. From inception to delivery, we accelerate the process with open source libraries, modern technologies, CI/CD and DevOps practices.

Inclusive products, inclusive teams — We build for everyone, and prioritise accessibility. Inclusive products start with inclusive teams. As such, we take pride in creating a supportive environment where every individual can flourish.

As a software engineer, you will be part of a team of engineers for STACKOPS which is an initiative to allow government agencies to create high quality and reliable government services for citizens. The initiative will develop the required processes and toolchain to enable government agencies to measure and monitor government services in an agile manner. Learn more here.

What you will be working on:

Design and deliver software applications for web platforms
Write high quality and maintainable code on open-source web platforms and frameworks.
Develop and build highly scalable systems and services with a focus on business value and usability.
Improve software quality using agile practices and testing frameworks such as code review, unit testing and integration testing

What we are looking for:

1-3+ years of experience in building large scalable web applications.
Hands on Experience developing in NodeJS, ReactJS, Jest and accompanied frameworks.
Contribute in software quality using agile practices such as code review and writing meaningful tests - unit testing, integration testing, TDD.
Knowledge of RESTful APIs, JSON, SQL.
Some Knowledge in AWS, Docker and Kubernetes is desirable.
Knowledge in Monitoring, Logging technologies (Terraform, Ansible, ELK, Grafana) is desirable but not required.
Experience in open-source contributions is a bonus.
Degree in Computer Science, Computer or Electronics Engineering, Information Technology or related disciplines.
Working experience in relational and non-relational databases.
Solid understanding of how web applications work including security, session management, and best development practices.
A solid understanding of Object-Oriented Design and Programming.
Experience in HTML, Javascript and RESTful APIs is a must
Work as a team with members of different disciplines (designers, programmers, product managers, etc.)
Passion for automation, standardization and best practices

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
"Symantec Division - Account SE and Solution Architect (Singapore, Remote)","Please Note:

If you are a first time user, please create your candidate login account before you apply for a job. (Click Sign In > Create Account)
If you already have a Candidate Account, please Sign-In before you apply.

Job Description:

Responsible for translating the client’s business requirements into specific systems, applications or process designs for very large complex technology solutions and integrating architecture. Acts as an advocate for the client as the ultimate authority on the architecture designed to address client business problems. Provides direction for design activities. Often project-based, sometimes working at customer sites. Also responsible for high-level relationship management and acts as client liaison during delivery of an outsourced solution, whether it is an IT or business process outsourced solution. Strategically focused and responsible for client satisfaction, maintaining client communication, and the overall management of the client relationship. Works to grow the client relationship by identifying new business opportunities. Works with delivery team to execute on contract terms and conditions and to ensure on-time delivery of projects that support the client’s business. - Knowledge: Having wide-ranging experience, uses professional concepts and company objectives to resolve complex issues in creative and effective ways.

Strong project management skills
Leads design and delivery of new

products/process

Functional breadth and depth, plus expert in complementary fields
Applies broad concepts and theories to achieve innovative and effective solutions to complex problems - Job Complexity / Contribution : Works on complex issues where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors. Exercises judgment in selecting methods, techniques and evaluation criteria for obtaining results. Networks with key contacts outside own area of expertise.
Will champion significant projects, programs and business initiatives using demonstrated creativity and ingenuity
Team leader
Leads major projects
Influences or impacts others'

priorities, decisions or activities

Escalation point for complex issues
Coaches and mentors other junior team members - Supervision : Incumbents provide a leadership role for the work group through knowledge in his/her area of specialization. Generally free to determine work priorities based on general direction from managers.
Determines methods and procedures on new assignments
Consults with management on long-range goals
Determines own priorities, both tactical and strategic - Experience : Bachelors and 8+ years of related experience; at this level post-graduate coursework may be desirable or

Masters degree and 6+ years of related experience or PhD and 3+ years of related experience

Broadcom is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We will consider qualified applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship, disability status, medical condition, pregnancy, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. We will also consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records consistent with local law.

If you are located outside USA, please be sure to fill out a home address as this will be used for future correspondence."
"Software Engineer (Graph Computing / Mining System), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.

The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.

Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!


Responsibilities
- Participate in the research and development of large-scale graph processing/mining systems, and be responsible for the maintenance of existing distributed graph processing system;
- Support graph computing related application scenarios, including but not limited to recommendation, search, advertising, risk control, etc.;
- Explore the future development of graph computing areas and build a new generation of distributed graph computing/mining systems.

Qualifications

- Familiar with C/C ++ development under Linux environment, familiar with multi-threading, network programming and other technologies;
- Familiar with distributed computing, high performance computing, non-volatile memory storage, and relevant development experiences;
- Strong self-learning ability, familiar with SOTA research works in the graph computing community;
- Possess good communication skills, teamwork, and a strong ability for research."
Site Reliability Engineer (SRE) or DevOps Engineer,"This software division is looking for a strong DevOps or Site-Reliability (SRE) Engineer to focus on automation and maintenance of the software developmental process and platform for advanced healthcare services.

Your new company

A leading multinational company that manufactures world leading hardware and provide healthcare solutions utilising cutting-edge technology in the field of super computers, big data analytics, deep learning, and AI.

Your new role

Work with product teams to ensure release procedures are align to compliance, quality criteria and security policies.
Build an efficient release automation to improve agility.
Build monitoring and alert mechanisms to track and measure metrics from production services, to tune performance, maintain SLA, and manage incidents.
Provide operation support to product teams, run the production environment and maintain regulatory compliance.

What you'll need to succeed

Experience in the foundation of DevOps and Site Reliability (SRE) engineering.
Working experience in administration and troubleshooting of Unix/Linux-based environments, with end-to-end implementation of CICD pipelines.
Proficient in basic networking knowledge (e.g, TCP/IP, HTTP, DNS, TLS,)
Good scripting skills (e.g. Bash, Python, YAML).
Experience in working with various stakeholders and teams to efficiently develop and execute new policies and processes.
Experience with monitoring systems and automation software.
Experience in IaC or containerisation, (e.g. Terraform, Docker, Kubernetes)

Preferred Qualifications

Experience with Cloud platforms (Azure, GCP, AWS) is advantageous.
Security product experience (firewalls, URL filtering, information security, and DDoS attack protection) is advantageous.

What you'll get in return

Competitive salary package
Opportunity for growth in leading hardware and software company
Be part of the pioneering team as expansion plans are fixed for 2023.

What you need to do now
If this job excites you, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV.
Please contact Lijie Ong at +65 81006059 or email lijie.ong@hays.com.sg for DevOps or SRE roles.

Hays Registration Number: R22108533, EA License: 07C3924, Company Registration Number: 200609504D."
"AVP, Platform Engineer, Technology Group 14894","Technology Group

The Technology Group (TG) is a key enabler to keep our business moving forward and is constantly exploring state-of-the-art information technologies to enhance GIC’s ability to be the leading global long-term investment firm. We aim to provide users with empowering and transformational capabilities, and to create an inclusive, innovative and integrated work environment.

This is an opportunity to join GIC as a Platform Engineer in a transformational project which lays foundation for Master Data Management (MDM) which includes investment entities, instruments and time series, and Investment Book of Records (IBOR).

Exposure opportunities
You will play a key role in delivering technical solution forming key project deliverables and milestones, which will shape the future of GIC applications performing trades, valuation, compliance, risk management, and reporting, while developing yourself professionally in Financial Industry in the following areas:
Business analysis skills: You will interact closely with business stakeholders to for requirement gathering, validation and prioritization, which helps you relate your technical solution design and deliverable to concrete business benefits
Technical skills: As you build a data platform, you will sharpen your skills on database and SQL, while delivering technical solutions on data modelling, event-driven messaging, data publishing and bulk data transformation (with Python)
Partnership and collaboration: You will work closely with teammates and vendor partners both within and beyond the project team to deliver an integrated technical solution which works end-to-end


Requirements

Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science or equivalent
Experienced in technologies around applications and integration
Proficient in data modelling, database design and data migration
Good team player who is keen to learn and able to work independently
Possesses strong analytical, problem solving, communication and interpersonal skills

Our PRIME Values
GIC is a values driven organization. GIC’s PRIME Values act as our compass, enabling us to fulfil our fundamental purpose and objectives. It is the foundational bedrock which governs our behaviors, our decision making, and our focus. It informs both our long-term strategy as a firm, and the way we relate to our Client, business partners and employees. PRIME stands for Prudence, Respect, Integrity, Merit and Excellence."
Data Engineer,"Position Overview

This headcount is to support MCDR Ops team as the Hadoop administrator. This is an individual contributor and will also serve as a secondary backup for maintaining Oracle/SQL Databases.

Role & Responsibilities

1.1.1 Job Role Description

The Hadoop Admin supports the administration activities on the Hadoop Infrastructure and Ecosystem, and responsible for configuring Hadoop components, handling cluster related issues, patch upgrades, monitoring health of each Hadoop components and supporting restart of services on various nodes. He/She would also be responsible for monitoring and tuning resource usage, as well as capacity planning for cluster upgrades.

1.1.2 Responsibilities

Perform all Hadoop administration activities on Hadoop clusters.
Monitor health of the components and generate performance reports and provide continuous improvements.
Solve issues related to Hadoop components by investigating and finding solutions/workaround or creating and applying patches.
Configure various Hadoop components which includes Hive, Yarn, Spark, Kafka, Encryptions, Hbase etc.
Configure and troubleshoot ETL/Data Science/Analytics application connections to Hadoop on the Hadoop end.
Plan cluster resource usage, work with users on resource scheduling (Fair /Capacity Scheduler) and conduct capacity planning for cluster expansions.
Tune and configure cluster resources in terms of VCores and default worker resource allocations etc.
Perform node administration using Ambari or similar monitoring tools like Cloudera manager and perform load balancing upon addition / removal of any nodes.
Work closely with data engineering team and operational teams to ensure cluster stability and smooth production releases.
Ensure that the Hadoop platform/components can effectively meet performance & SLA requirements.

Requirements

1.1.1 Requirements

Degree/Master’s in Computer Science, Information Technology, Computer Engineering or equivalent.
At least eight (8) years of overall IT Admin experience and three (3) years in Hadoop Admin experience in configuring/maintaining Hadoop clusters.
Experience in Configuring and setting up Hadoop clusters and provide support for Name Node recovery, load balancing in all data nodes and configuring hive metastore for better query performance.
Experience in troubleshooting various Hadoop cluster issues and optimizing the cluster for better performance.
Experience in capacity planning and performance tuning on Hadoop clusters.
Experience in configuring and managing the Hadoop monitoring tools like Ambari or Cloudera Manager.
Hands on experience on Hadoop cluster installations / deployments / upgrades.
Hands on experience on setting up various security features such as Kerberos/AD/LDAP implementation.
Experience in Linux / Unix OS Services, Administration, and Shell scripting.

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
"NLP and Knowledge Graph Engineer, Sensors & Machine Learning Lab","The Sensors & Machine Learning Lab is a new setup to support CAG business units in their innovation efforts, and accelerate operations transformation. We are seeking self-driven members to join this new team; a suitable candidate would be passionate about technology and enthusiastic about using his/her knowledge & skills in machine learning to make a difference.

You will be responsible for the end-to-end development & deployment of AI/ML pipelines, focused on natural language processing and knowledge graphs. As a subject matter expert, you will also participate in initiatives to educate and upskill fellow colleagues.

Team members in the Sensors & Machine Learning Lab will have the autonomy and support to experiment with emerging technologies and upgrade themselves professionally. There will be ample opportunities to demonstrate your expertise in solving business challenges, conduct research & development, and engage like-minded professionals.

Responsibilities
Engage business users to discover how knowledge graph and/or NLP can enable operations transformation, such as to enhance operation effectiveness, raise productivity and support decision-making.
Design, develop & deploy customised and scalable solutions as part of the end-to-end AI/ML pipeline for NLP.
Design, develop & deploy customised and scalable knowledge graph solutions or products.
Stay relevant in the latest technologies and trends in knowledge graph and NLP.
Support company-wide initiatives to inspire and upskill colleagues .
Preferred Requirements
At least 2 years of professional experience developing and deploying NLP and/or knowledge graphs solutions.
Degree in computer science, engineering, or equivalent practical experience.
Familiar with ML frameworks such as TensorFlow and PyTorch.
Proficiency in Python programming is required. Familiarity with AWS would be advantageous.
Passionate about technology and enthuse about solving challenging problems.
Excellent team-player who can collaborate well with both internal stakeholders & external partners."
Lead Linux Engineer,"Your duties:

To establish ITSM standards, processes and guidelines that are in line with industry standards and best practices
Provide technical leadership to team members
Provide technical consultancy to customers on matters related to system performance, integration and configuration.
Assist project Service Delivery Manager on managing the day-to-day Operations management.
Subject Matter Expert (SME) level of hands-on knowledge in shell, Perl, Python or PowerShell
Analyze system performance and makes recommendations for optimization.
Ensure that the production environment is highly available per the needs of the business and established Service Level Agreements.
Lead and establish Root Cause Analysis for all High Severity issues. Work with multiple teams for successful resolution of issues and incidents
Review Incident Report.
Participate in the upgrade/patching planning and execution of the Middleware software.
Provide subject matter expertise (SME) for Issues, security related threats and vulnerabilities as it pertains to middleware.
Participation in establish and test disaster recovery policies and procedures across all Middleware environments
Ensure adherence to applicable Change and Release Management processes.
Develop technical documentation and procedure on monitoring, performance.
Regular projects reporting update to SDM & any other duties as and when assigned
Lead problem determination on system errors or malfunctions and works with the application team/supplier to identify, diagnose and rectify the problem.
Performs capacity study to analyze current resource utilization and estimates future requirements.
Monitoring system to ensure high availability and optimal performance
Update documentation of work.
Supports internal and external audit exercises for the maintenance of various certifications and contractual requirements.
Keeps abreast of technological advancement, emerging standards and new software or hardware solutions that may affect decisions on systems building or enhancements
Strong communication and documentation skills
Flexible and able to adapt to a rapidly changing environment
Positive, self-motivated individual who can complete tasks independently
Must be willing to travel and executing overseas project when is required.
Must be able to work in 24 x 7 operations standby support environment


What we need from you:

Bachelor’s degree, with at least 8 years of working experience in end-to-end operations management and implementation experience which includes configuration, upgrade, and problem resolution.
Specializing in major products: Red Hat RHEL, Jboss Middleware, AWS.
Hands-on experience on RedHat & OS clustering administration, configuration, and troubleshooting
Hands-on experience on Middleware e.g., Apache, JBOSS, Websphere & MQ.
Able to manage small- & large-scale environment running on server virtualization technologies like VMWare Server/ESX.
Working experience in cloud environment (AWS, Azure) would be an advantage
Hands-on experience Kubernetes/Docker containers would be an advantage.
DevOps tools Ansible, Jenkins (including scripting experiences)
AWS/Microsoft Azure cloud certification is desired
Red Hat Enterprise Linux & JBoss application server administration experience is required.
Hands-on experience on either of them: - RedHat Linux, JBoss, IBM Documentum, IBM Cognos/Websphere, IBM Business process Manager (BPM)
Kubernetes certification (CKA) , ITIL v3 certification , Red Hat Enterprise Linux certification will be an advantage"
Senior/Engineer - System Engineering,"R&D Environment (Urgent)
Basic $4.5-8.5k
Automotive Industry

Our client, a well-known Global MNC in the automotive industry is hiring multiple highly motivated Senior System Engineer.

Responsibilities:
Participating in a cross-functional design team and perform system level design of microcontroller-based modules
Perform controller integration test on test benches and in vehicles
Develop safety requirements in document form/implementation/test requirements
Product design for safety by creating required ISO 26262 supporting documents and test

Requirements:
Degree in Electrical/Electronics/Computer Engineering
Must have hands on experience with microprocessor-based design
Must have minimum 5 years experience with ASPICE/DOORS/Polarion/others equivalent tools
Must have minimum 5 years experience with capturing and documenting customer requriements
Stong knowledge in Embedded Software C programming/Assembly programming
Good to have experience or knowledge in Controller Area Network/Power electronics/National Instrument Labview/Battery Management/Motor Control
Must have good understanding of safety analysis for automotive system, ISO 26262 Functional Safety, DFMEA, FMEA, FMEDA or FTA analysis
Good team player and able to communicate cross functional

Other Information:
Location : Ang Mo Kio
Salary : Basic $4.5-8.5k + AWS + Variable Bonus
Working hour : Mon - Fri (Normal working hour)

The Company strives to achieve employee satisfaction by providing attractive staff benefits, welfare & training programmes to all staff.

How to Apply:
If you are organized, meticulous, adapt well to changes, and more importantly, believe that YOU CAN MAKE A DIFFERENCE, we would like to hear from you.

Simply submit your application by emailing your updated résumé (in MS Word format) to Martin Hu (EA Personnel Registration No: R1986096) at

martin.hu@achievegroup.asia
Click the ""Apply Now"" button at the bottom of the page or

Call your friendly Consultant, Martin Hu, at 6590 9962 for a confidential discussion. I will be glad to assist you!

YOUR SUCCESS IS OUR ACHIEVEMENT!


Notice:
We would like to inform that only short-listed candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.
By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read & agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration, and for our marketing EDMs which you may opt out by unsubscribing in the mailer. You may refer and access our website at
https://www.achievegroup.asia/privacy-policy/ for more information.

Cessation of Collection of full NRIC Numbers:
In compliance with the Personal Data Protection Act and commitment to protect candidates’ personal data, Achieve Group will cease to collect, process or use full NRIC numbers during our screening and job application process.
Kindly ensure your resume provided to us does not contain your full NRIC number and full home address during your job application."
"Software Engineer, Risk Data Mining - BRIC","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Business Risk Integrated Control (BRIC) team is missioned:
- To protect TikTok users, including and beyond content consumers, creators, advertisers;
- By securing platform health and community experience authenticity;
- Through building infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to collaborate with many cross-functional teams and stakeholders.

The BRIC team works to minimise the damage of inauthentic behaviours on TikTok, covering multiple classical and novel community and business risk areas such as account integrity, engagement authenticity, anti spam, API and growth health, live streaming security and financial safety (ads or e-commerce), etc.

In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and robust, intelligent and privacy-safe, secure and product-friendly systems and solutions. Our challenges are not some regular day-to-day technical puzzles -- You'll be part of a team that's developing novel solutions to first-seen challenges of a non-stop evolvement of a phenomenal product eco-system. The work needs to be fast, transferrable, while still down to the ground to making quick and solid differences.

Responsibilities
- Build rules, algorithms and machine learning models, to respond to and mitigate business risks in ByteDance products/platforms. Such risks include and are not limited to abusive accounts, fake engagements, spammy redirection, scraping, fraud, etc.
- Establish reliable, efficient and modularized risk defense solutions, reduce manual workload on ramping up risk controls on/against new business, risk area, or abusive means.
- Uplevel risk defence excellence on privacy/compliance, machine learning, risk perception and analysis, achieve in-depth defence portfolio.

Qualifications

- Bachelor or degrees above in computer science, computer engineering, electrical engineering, statistics or other relevant majors (e.g. finance if applying for applying for financial fraud roles).
- Solid engineering skills. Proficiency in at least two of: Linux, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Storm.
- Familiarity with data mining, data science or machine learning. Bonus given to proficiency in modern machine learning theories and applications such as deep neural nets, transfer/multi-task learning, reinforcement learning, time series or graph unsupervised learning.
- Ability to think critically, objectively, rationally. Reason and communicate in result-oriented, data-driven manner. High autonomy.
- Minimum 3 - 5 years relevant work experience from a large-scale internet business


TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Senior Engineer / Engineer, IT Infra, InfoComm Infrastructure","The Defence Science and Technology Agency (DSTA) brings you to the forefront of cybersecurity, digital transformation and engineering. From working on software development and systems integration to unmanned technologies and artificial intelligence, you can have an impact on Singapore’s defence.

Achieve your fullest potential with opportunities to build your technical expertise and hone your competencies in diverse domains. You can also expect an immersive learning experience, where you will work with bright minds and collaborate with global industry experts.

DSTA is recognised as one of the top 10 employers in the Engineering & IT sector, where our engineers and IT professionals work alongside procurement specialists to deliver state-of-the-art capabilities for Singapore’s peace and security.

Learn more about DSTA at https://www.dsta.gov.sg .

Opportunity
We are looking for an individual to join us in our InfoComm Infrastructure Programme Centre where you will provide day-to-day engineering support and perform system administration to ensure high availability of systems in our IT infrastructure (i.e. end terminals, networks and data centres).

This role will require you to:
Continuous enhancement of the IT infrastructure including upgrading networks, implementing additional compute and storage, setting up new management systems (e.g. SCOM, Solarwinds, Splunk, etc.)
Support incident management and management of vendor who provides support to the engineering team.
Lead as subject matters expert in the technologies for end-terminals, networks and/or data centres
Adhere to policy compliance via asset & configuration management, accounts & access management, vulnerability & patch management, log management, and backup management
Keep abreast of new emerging technologies, learn and support new technologies through their lifecycles
Continuously challenging the status quo to improve operation support, streamline processes and enhance users’ experience.
Review industry best practices, technology standards and policies. Propose and adopt changes required, implement solution and define operation support requirement.

Requirements
Tertiary qualifications in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Information Technology, Mechanical Engineering, Electrical Engineering or equivalent
Strong interest or technical competency in IT infra designs and technologies/solutions
Good understanding of the impact of IT technologies, deployment and operations/workflows on the data centre design and operations
Good understanding of the considerations for the power and cooling configurations/designs, physical and cyber security requirements, and operations and maintenance of IT infrastructure.
Past experience in IT infra design, implementation and/or operations, with relevant certifications, such as CCNA, CDCP, ITIL, CISSP, will be a plus
Experience on managing large scale IT Infrastructure deployment and/or operations will be a plus
Good communication and interpersonal skills.
Strong analytical skills, resourceful, meticulous and observant for details
Able to multi-task, work independently and as a team
Thrive in a dynamic working environment"
Senior System Engineer,"About Moonbug Entertainment

Description

Moonbug is a next generation entertainment company that has cemented itself in the children's media space. Would you like to be part of the next frontier of inspiring and engaging stories to kids around the world?

Founded in 2018, with primary offices in London, Los Angeles and Singapore. Moonbug creates, produces and publishes thousands of minutes of video and audio content every month with the goal of teaching compassion, empathy and resilience. We are a fast-paced global company, and have already grown to become the largest kids’ entertainment company on digital platforms in the world. Some of our existing titles include global sensations CoComelon, Blippi, Oddbods, Little Baby Bum, Morphle, Supa Strikas, ARPO and many more which are available in 32 languages and can be viewed on more than 100 platforms globally.

Moonbug is part of Candle Media, an independent, creator-friendly home for cutting-edge, high-quality, category-defining brands and franchises.

The Role

You will work closely with the management team and team leads to develop and execute IT strategies and initiatives, and support critical IT projects. Since we are a relatively flat organization, we are looking for someone who can lead and at the same time roll up the sleeves whenever needed.

Responsibilities
Serve as a strategic partner to the management team to define IT strategies and drive process optimization wherever necessary
Collaborate with the creative development team on identifying IT requirements and with the Technology department in pipeline tools development
Drive major decisions, identify and eliminate risks and blockers, communicate program status to stakeholders and leadership
Collaborate with the production and finance departments to create forward-looking IT budgets for each year, indicating ‘ideal’ and ‘must-have’ scenarios and their potential costs.
Form relationships with software and hardware vendors to negotiate best prices for the company and establish shipping and delivery timelines to ensure timely delivery of hardware.
Advise the company, and budget for, essential maintenance and/or upgrade services from vendors.
Monitor software expiration dates and software needs, and gain approval to place orders in time to ensure seamless use of critical software.
Ensure that projects goals, objectives, milestones and deliverables are achieved on schedule and within budget
Maintain and administer IT infrastructure
Manage One Animation’s digital assets, including back-up protocols, permission controls. emergency shutdown protocols, essential maintenance, storage, render capacity, air conditioning capacity for servers, physical and digital security of data, and security of systems from external threats,
Lead and deliver IT helpdesk services including managing outsourced vendors to ensure high-quality solutions and service levels. Inventory, maintenance and troubleshooting for all hardware and computer infrastructure.
Evaluate changing IT trends and adopt industry best practices to continuously drive improvements with the latest digital solutions.
Oversee the IT policies and practices in the Jakarta Indonesia Studio and ensure that their IT technician is observing best practices and ensuring uninterrupted continuity of production work.
Maintain and enforce IT policies and procedures.
Oversee other office facility aspects, which include but not limited to, electrical system, aircon system, security system, phone system, etc.
Requirements
Diploma or graduate degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent experience
PC and Apple hardware troubleshooting skills
Network and firewall knowledge
Experience with HP, HPE and Aruba hardware
Experience with VMware, KVM virtual infrastructures
Experience with MySQL, PostgreSQL, MongoD databases
Experience with network protocols and services - DHCP, DNS, CIFS, NFS, SNMP, PXE, OpenVPN
Solid knowledge and good troubleshooting skills of Linux(RedHat, CentOS) Windows and OSX on desktop and server.
Automation with shell and python scripts.
Ability to work both independently and within a team environment"
iOS Mobile Developer,"Project Description:
Are you an experienced Senior Mobile Application Developer with strong architecture sense looking to take a more active and impactful role in your work? Are you looking to take the next step in your career and really 'own' something?
Responsibilities:

This specific role is related to shared mobile services in the area of mobile development. The base components and services for mobile development, as well as the mobile foundation server components, for example, notification and analytics, must be provided. Later, the development of mobile banking applications as a development service must be provided.
Within the team, you will be able to contribute in your current specified area of expertise.

As a member of the Delivery Team you will:
• work in different roles across the whole solution lifecycle (system analysis & technical design, frontend- & backend-development, system integration, documentation, third level support)
• provide applications in best quality as requested by specifications
• document your provided solutions
• analyze root-causes in case of incidents and provide solutions for solving the problem
• support the business in case of effort estimations and feasibility studies
• perform code reviews and share best practices with colleagues
Mandatory Skills Description:

• Bachelors degree in technology or related field required OR equitable experience
• Minimum 4 years of hands-on software development with at least 3 years in native Mobile applications development on iOS (kotlin)
• Very good knowledge of the architecture of iOS and how to best utilize it, knowledge of Swift API code
• Strong knowledge of hybrid mobile design principles, patterns, and best practices
• Strong expertise in web services, and enterprise architectures, application development in Java and distributed system's engineering
• Experience in implementing security in mobile apps
• Experience in performance optimization of mobile apps
• Experience in consuming RESTful services, JSON, and HTTP
• Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Nice-to-Have Skills:

• Experience with JavaScript, CSS, HTML5
• Experience in server-based application development
• Version control system;
• Experience in app development process in an enterprise environment (testing, continuous integration, release process);
• Experience in building mobile application architecture.
• Mobile app deployment process
• Knowledge of agile development methodologies;
• Experience in coordinating team members
Languages:
English: C1 Advanced"
"Senior Java Developer - Remote - Up to SGD$250,000","Senior Java Developer
Location: Singapore (Remote)
Salary: Up to SGD$250,000 + Bonuses + Exciting Package

You'll have the opportunity to work directly on the trading platform itself.

Role
Working on an advanced trading platform
Ownership of entire software engineering process from design to delivery of the trading system

Requirements
Have 4+ years of work experience with Java as a programming language and as a technology
Have proficiency in multi-threaded programming
Have a low latency and performance focus
Ideally work experience of financial trading systems

Perks
Best compensation in the market
Work with the latest, most sophisticated technology in the industry
Very friendly/collaborative environment

📧 Interested in applying? Please click on the ‘Easy Apply’ button. or contact me at astewart@hunterbond.com"
"Senior Algorithm Engineer, Intelligent Creation","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance is a technology company operating a range of content platforms that inform, educate, entertain and inspire people across languages, cultures and geographies. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Douyin, Toutiao, Helo and Resso, ByteDance now has a portfolio of applications available in over 150 markets and 75 languages.

We focus on conducting cutting-edge research and development in the area of Computer Graphics, Computer Vision, Augmented Reality and Deep Learning, and continuously transfer innovative technologies to various ByteDance products. We are looking for talents at all levels to join us on this exciting journey!

Responsibilities

Design and apply machine learning algorithm and product strategies to novel technologies and applications in Computer Vision, Computer Graphics and Machine Learning.
Conduct offline and online experiments, analyze according data and evaluate to improve algorithms and strategies;
Work with product and DEs, DAs, and other engineers to deliver features that integrate core technologies into downstream products with optimized performance and high reliability.
Use data and machine learning algorithms or other strategies on multi-platform applications and explore new technologies and new product directions.

Qualifications

Bachelor or higher degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems, etc.
3+ years of experience in data structures and algorithms in one or more areas of Computer Vision, Computer Graphics and Machine Learning
Experience in AI-related products;
Software development experience through hands on coding in a general purpose programming language;
Experience with optimization and acceleration of computer vision and graphics algorithms
Advanced knowledge and experience about the framework with at least one major deep learning framework (e.g. PyTorch, Tensorflow, MXNet, Caffe/Caffe2, PaddlePaddle).
Familiar with deep neural network architectures such as CNN/RNN/LSTM etc."
Software Engineer #64498,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Industry/ Organization Type: Manufacturing and Production
Position Title: Software Engineer
Working Location: Kallang
Working Hours: 5 days (Monday to Friday, 9.00 am to 6.00 pm)
Salary Package: Up to $6000 + AWS + Variable bonus + Medical Benefits
Duration: 1-year contract (Convertible to Permanent Role)
Key Responsibilities
Maintain, improve, design and develop application software for car parking systems.
Any other duties as and when assigned.
APPLY NOW!!!
Diploma/Degree in Computer/IT, with 1-3 years relevant experience.
Knowledge in C/C++, Linux, R232 Protocol, TCP and UDP protocol preferred.
Kindly Apply Through ANY Of The Following Methods
Submit your application by clicking the APPLY button;
Email your resume to Job(at)anradus.com.sg. Please indicate #64498 on the email subject.
Anradus Policy: This clarifies Anradus' working procedures, from receiving the applicant's resume, screening to shortlisting. We assure you our consultants will go through every resume we receive but we regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Anradus Pte Ltd | EA License No. 20C0161 | Angel Lim | EA Reg No.: R1769781
Desired Skills and Experience
Staff responsibility, Discipline, Software Engineering, Agile, JavaScript, Protocol, Social Responsibility, SQL, Python, TCP, Java, C#, Screening, Manufacturing, Databases, Linux, Software Development, UDP, C++"
"Senior Java Developer, Fintech","Senior Java Developer - Fintech Payments

Description

Our client is a high-growth payment fintech company backed by large banks and state holding companies, that aims to disrupt the traditional cross-border payment and serve the world's leading financial institutions through blockchain technology.

You will implement the cross-border payment platform, build key features around privacy solution, and be at the forefront of technology innovation.

Requirement

With a bachelor's degree in computer science or a related field, with 5-10 years of development experience (i.e. Java, Go, Javascript). You should have strong knowledge of data structures, common algorithms, and design patterns. Experienced in building microservices structures and knowledge of cloud services is a plus.

To Apply

For interested candidates, please send your CV to ya@kerryconsulting.com. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Registration No: R1988390

Licence No: 16S806"
Systems Reliability Engineer (Edge),"About Us

At Cloudflare, we have our eyes set on an ambitious goal: to help build a better Internet. Today the company runs one of the world’s largest networks that powers approximately 25 million Internet properties, for customers ranging from individual bloggers to SMBs to Fortune 500 companies. Cloudflare protects and accelerates any Internet application online without adding hardware, installing software, or changing a line of code. Internet properties powered by Cloudflare all have web traffic routed through its intelligent global network, which gets smarter with every request. As a result, they see significant improvement in performance and a decrease in spam and other attacks. Cloudflare was named to Entrepreneur Magazine’s Top Company Cultures list and ranked among the World’s Most Innovative Companies by Fast Company.

We realize people do not fit into neat boxes. We are looking for curious and empathetic individuals who are committed to developing themselves and learning new skills, and we are ready to help you do that. We cannot complete our mission without building a diverse and inclusive team. We hire the best people based on an evaluation of their potential and support them throughout their time at Cloudflare. Come join us!

Production Engineering is responsible for the world’s most reliable, observable, performant, and safe network ecosystem. Our customers rely on our products and systems to safely modify, troubleshoot, and release products without external impact.

Our external customers rely on us to provide seamless and predictable incident, traffic, policy management, resulting in the fastest and safest network services in the world.

We are accountable for the overall performance of internal and external facing services, guiding our product teams to optimal configurations and maximum efficiency. From the moment that a packet enters the Cloudflare ecosystem, we know exactly what its expected purpose and behavior is and we are capable of determining and exposing anomalous behavior.

The Cloudflare network makes it possible to solve challenges at massive scale and efficiency which would be impossible for almost any other organization.

In this role, you can expect to:

Design, write, and deliver software that improves Cloudflare's Edge platform
Scale and evolve systems through software and automation to improve reliability and velocity
Work on highly distributed and scalable systems
Participate in the constant cycle of knowledge sharing and mentoring
Research and introduce cutting-edge technologies
Contribute to open-source

We are well-funded, growing quickly and focused on building an extraordinary company. This is a systems reliability engineering role and is a superb opportunity to be part of a high performing team and help to support Cloudflare’s mission and help build a better internet.

You will build services and APIs to constantly improve availability, performance, uptime and response times.

You may be a good fit for our team if you have:

Proficiency in distributed Linux/Unix environments
Proficiency in high-level programming (e.g., Golang)
Proficiency in configuration management (e.g., Saltstack, Chef, Puppet, Ansible)
Proficiency in networking protocols Layer 3-7 of the OSI model
Experience in performance analysis, debugging, and troubleshooting
Experience in SQL databases (e.g., Postgres, MySQL)
Experience in load balancing and reverse proxies (e.g., Nginx)
Familiarity with Key/Value stores (e.g., Redis)
Familiarity with Internetworking and BGP
Exquisite written and verbal communication skills
Strong bias for action

Bonus points if you have:

Experience with continuous integration and delivery (CI/CD)
Experience working in a 24/7/365 service environment
Experience with high-bandwidth transit Internetworking and routing
Passion for tooling and automation

What Makes Cloudflare Special?

We’re not just a highly ambitious, large-scale technology company. We’re a highly ambitious, large-scale technology company with a soul. Fundamental to our mission to help build a better Internet is protecting the free and open Internet.

Project Galileo : We equip politically and artistically important organizations and journalists with powerful tools to defend themselves against attacks that would otherwise censor their work, technology already used by Cloudflare’s enterprise customers--at no cost.

Athenian Project : We created Athenian Project to ensure that state and local governments have the highest level of protection and reliability for free, so that their constituents have access to election information and voter registration.

Path Forward Partnership : Since 2016, we have partnered with Path Forward, a nonprofit organization, to create 16-week positions for mid-career professionals who want to get back to the workplace after taking time off to care for a child, parent, or loved one.

1.1.1.1 : We released 1.1.1.1 to help fix the foundation of the Internet by building a faster, more secure and privacy-centric public DNS resolver. This is available publicly for everyone to use - it is the first consumer-focused service Cloudflare has ever released. Here’s the deal - we don’t store client IP addresses never, ever. We will continue to abide by our privacy commitment and ensure that no user data is sold to advertisers or used to target consumers.

Sound like something you’d like to be a part of? We’d love to hear from you!

This position may require access to information protected under U.S. export control laws, including the U.S. Export Administration Regulations. Please note that any offer of employment may be conditioned on your authorization to receive software or technology controlled under these U.S. export laws without sponsorship for an export license.

Cloudflare is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunity for all people and place great value in both diversity and inclusiveness. All qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to their, or any other person's, perceived or actual race, color, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, family care status, or any other basis protected by law. We are an AA/Veterans/Disabled Employer.

Cloudflare provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. Please tell us if you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job. Examples of reasonable accommodations include, but are not limited to, changing the application process, providing documents in an alternate format, using a sign language interpreter, or using specialized equipment. If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job, please contact us via e-mail at hr@cloudflare.com or via mail at 101 Townsend St. San Francisco, CA 94107."
Senior to Lead Software Engineer,"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

About Us - Collaboratory, Singapore Tourism Board
The Singapore Tourism Board (STB) aims to transform how visitors travel and experience Singapore through solutions that ease frictions in a user’s journey. We work on such solutions through collaborations with other government agencies and tourism businesses across Singapore.

The Collaboratory is an in-house development team that seeks to design and develop innovative and engaging solutions for our visitors to Singapore through an agile approach, adopting the best practices and tools to ensure a good user experience while meeting the actual user needs.

As the Technical Lead, you will be leading a small team of engineers to design, develop and deploy solutions across STB’s digital channels. You will also have opportunities to explore areas beyond software development, such as devops, cloud infrastructure, and software QA.

Main Responsibilities
Lead an agile development team to deliver high-quality software applications according to requirements. This may include web application/API backends, web application frontends and mobile applications. Adopt software engineering practices such as Scrum, code reviews and test-driven development.

Job Requirements
Translate business requirements into technical / architectural specifications
Collaborate with in-house development teams or vendor development staff to resolve technical challenges
Continuous integration/continuous deployment
Cloud/PaaS platforms, such as AWS, and docker/container technology
Modern web application technologies such as Node.js, Vue.JS and Ruby on Rails.
Experience with government projects and related compliance requirements
Experience working with multiple teams, especially in large cross-functional projects
A minimum of 5 years’ relevant working experience is preferred, with at least 1 year in a lead role
Mindset to challenge status quo and constantly seeking continuous improvement
Ability to present effectively and explain complex, technical concepts in simple, easy to understand terms
High attention to detail

Shortlisted candidates will be referred to GovTech."
"Lead/Engineer, Mobile Core, xCDI","What The Role Is
Lead Engineer / Engineer (Mobile Core, Enterprise communications and Digital Infrastructure) to manage and deliver enterprise communications projects. The jobholder would deliver communication capabilities and technologies to the Home Team. The jobholder is responsible for the system engineering aspects of various projects and trials within the Comms domain, identifying and evaluating technologies of interest to the Home Team.

What You Will Be Working On
Responsible for the design of Core and Infrastructure as part of Communications domain.
Strong technical knowledge in wireless communications technologies like professional mobile radio technologies, Radio Frequency (RF), 3G/4G/5G Core and expertise in telecommunications standards like 3GPP Release, ETSI Network Functions Virtualisation (NFV) Management and Network Orchestration (MANO).
Strong knowledge in end-to-end design (including security) in Core Network technologies, Service orchestration, Network Functions Virtualisation (NFV), Network Slicing (NS).
Responsible for end-to-end design (including security) of Core Network and NFVi to meet HTD’s operational needs, together with Cap sustainment.
Responsible for Core Network, including conduct gathering users’ requirements, conduct market survey, trials, writing tender specifications, perform tender evaluation and implementation to ensure that the recommended solution meets HTD’s needs.
Plan the near- and long-term network architecture evolution and capacity needs. Articulate architectural differences between solution methods and the challenges and approaches to integrating solutions built on different platforms.
Lead in the planning and project management of new or existing telecommunication Core Network, including technology selection, capacity planning, service rollout and service performance improvement, etc.
Lead in evaluation of tender from both a technical and commercial standpoint, and project manage the implementation of systems.
Ensure that the system is able meet the system availability required by design, and to incorporate life cycle costing (LCC) considerations and spares optimisation as part of the technical requirements.
Identify and study all the preliminary and critical design parameters, which can affect the operational and technical performance of the system.
Prepare various technical documents like the technical specifications (for tenders), system design documents, technical interface agreements, various test plans (factory acceptance, on site acceptance, etc.) and test reports.
Participate in acceptance tests like UAT, FAT, OSAT, SSAT and ensuring that the deliverables meet tender specifications.
Take charge of the System Configuration Management of the system. The job-holder controls the proper delivery of hardware and software components into the system, with proper system versioning and ensures the assets are properly updated. If delivery is meant for bug-fixing or upgrade, the job-holder has to ensure that regression testing has been done.
Assist Head, Mobile Core to ensure timely delivery of projects within the committed schedule and budget, ensuring project issues are timely resolved or escalated to management for attention.
Provide regular updates to HTX management on the project progress, highlighting project milestones, issues and expenditure.
Ensure projects are implemented based on the approved project plan that meets all identified operational needs, within agreed parameters of cost, duration and quality.
Gather users’ requirements, conduct trials, obtain budget approval, writing technical specifications, perform tender evaluation, project management and vendor management of projects.
Identify potential project risks early, assess its implications to the organisation and project, recommend risk mitigating measures to minimise project delay.
Effectively engage and manage all relevant stakeholders to deliver communications system.
Ensure proper integration and testing of all hardware and software components so that the system is delivered according to contractual requirements.
Work with external agencies and/or Home Team Departments (HTDs).
Perform any other duties as assigned by HTX Senior Management or Deputy Dir.

What We Are Looking For
Tertiary qualification in Electrical/ Electronics Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems or related Engineering fields.
At least 3 years of relevant working experience for Engineer/Lead in a suitably sized enterprise environment.
Working experience in telecommunications industry with 4G/5G and TETRA preferred, and knowledge in standards like 3GPP, ETSI.
Strong knowledge in 5G Network Functions (NFs)
Knowledge on Telecommunication Core Network, IP and Mobile Data, Mobile Applications is an advantage.
Preferably relevant disciplines and professional certifications from telecommunication principal vendors/suppliers.
Preferably relevant disciplines and professional certifications on Cloud deployment and automation i.e. Azure, AWS, GCP etc.
Knowledge on Telecommunications Mobile Network and Orchestration exposure is an advantage.
Strong planning and project management skills, with facilitation skills, problem-solving skills and organising capabilities. Project Management Professional (PMP) or equivalent certification would be an advantage.
Strong interest in technology and innovation.
Competent, self-motivated, pro-active, dedicated and responsible as well as having the ability to work independently without the need for close supervision.

All new appointees will be appointed on a two-year contract in the first instance.

We wish to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified within 4 weeks upon closing of the advertisement."
Full Stack Developer (Golang),"Hiring an experienced Golang Developer for one of the global top IT services and consulting firms!

Requirements:
• Preferably at least 7 years of experience in development and design of internet applications utilizing frontend and backend
• In-depth experience in using the backend programming languages: Java or Golang (especially in Golang)
• Strong foundation and knowledge of frontend web technologies: HTML / CSSS / Javascript
• Strong foundation and knowledge of Object-Oriented Programming (OOP) and Functional programming paradigm
• Strong foundation, knowledge and implementation experience on DevSecOps
• Experienced in implementing Microservices and its integration pattern like Orchestration and Event Driven framework
• Familiar with working and managing cloud infrastructure (eg: kubernetes clusters, compute engine, app gateways, etc) on Azure or AWS
• Experienced using and manipulating data of the following database servers: MS SQL, Oracle, PostgreSQL

Apply to this advertisement to not miss out on this great opportunity!
Open to all candidates located in Singapore."
"Software Engineer, Reusable modules (Embedded)","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Be part of a multinational team of engineers responsible for developing/integrating software for the platform team that builds the next big thing.
Job scope includes requirement analysis, software system (sub-system) design, code implementation
You will be responsible for the quality and on-time delivery of your work-products throughout the software development lifecycles.
You will be responsible for the system integration of SW components and/or SW (Sub-) systems into the platform repository.
You will work on various platforms and different hardwares to be able to cater to different setups and products
Job Requirements
Degree/Masters in Computer Science/Engineering, or a related discipline.
Good programming skills in ANSI/Embedded C/C++.
Able to learn and work independently and within a team and with global partners.
Basic knowledge of real-time system architecture/design.
Basic knowledge in unit testing and integration testing.
Effective communication and analytical skill with high level of commitment, flexibility, creativity, initiative, and teamwork.
Experienced or willing to picked up embedded development tools (emulators, analyzers, oscilloscopes, etc).
Interested in analyzing and resolving technical problem.
Self-motivation, and open-minded in learning new things.
Interested in HW related SW development using microcontrollers, HW boards, PCBs.
Experience with Agile software development and continuous integration is an added advantage.
Experience with static code analysis is an added advantage (e.g. MISRA rule, QAC, Klockwork.

Desired Skills and Experience
RTOS, Embedded Software, Hardware, ARM, Unit Testing, System Integration, Firmware, Microcontrollers, Continuous Integration, Software Design, Integration Testing, Agile Software Development, Linux, Software Development, C++"
Enterprise Service Engineer,"Key Responsibilities

Provide solution consultation to customer in addressing business and technical challenges to achieve customer’s business success.

Be a subject matter expert of e2open intelligent application product suite.

You will work on complex issue troubleshooting, investigation, replicating, root cause analysis and fixing application code defects found in production environment in collaboration with project leads, architects, testers and customer.

Support the test design, functional testing, and user acceptance testing of production defect fixes.

Ensure fixes are delivered to meet/exceed customer expectations in a timely manner.

Plan and perform solution deployment and application maintenance in company’s hosting environment, adhering to standards and best practices.

Plan and manage business solutions transition from project delivery team to Customer Success organization.

Ensure an incident ticket/problem ticket/change ticket is being resolved/executed as per the SLA.

Provide on-call support as part of a global engineering team.

Requirements

3+ years’ experience in a software development/consulting role, preferably in comprehensive eBusiness and Supply Chain Solutions

2+ years’ experience in Software Analysis, Design and Development using J2EE technology stacks (Core Java, JSP, XML, Hibernate & Java scripts) and Oracle database (PL/SQL)

1+ years’ working knowledge of Unix and Shell Scripting

Understanding of development methodologies, version control and configuration management.

Analytical and problem-solving skills with strong attention to detail.

Exceptional verbal and written communications skills

Excellent interpersonal & planning skills and cross-group coordination at all levels

Skilled in IT problem diagnosis and resolution.

A fundamental understanding of IT service management and the ITIL business process.

Must be able to work well both in a team environment and independently under minimal supervision.

He/she has the ability to work in a fast-paced environment as well as multitask and re-prioritize on a regular basis.

Outstanding organizational and time management skills

Bachelor’s Degree in computer science, or equivalent

Preferred Or Optional Skills

Supply-chain domain experience implementing and integrating Supply Chain solutions

Experience in the integration, deployment, or support of an ERP, SCM, or similar systems from SAP"
"Site Reliability Engineer / Senior Site Reliability Engineer, Reliability","The GitLab DevOps platform empowers 100,000+ organizations to deliver software faster and more efficiently. We are one of the world’s largest all-remote companies with 2,000+ team members and values that guide a culture where people embrace the belief that everyone can contribute.

Site Reliability Engineers (SREs) are responsible for keeping all user-facing services and other GitLab production systems running smoothly. SREs are a blend of pragmatic operators and software craftspeople that apply sound engineering principles, operational discipline, and mature automation to our environments and the GitLab codebase. We specialize in systems, whether it be networking, the Linux kernel, or some more specific interest in scaling, algorithms, or distributed systems.

GitLab.com is a unique site and it brings unique challenges–it’s the biggest GitLab instance in existence. In fact, it’s one of the largest single-tenancy open-source SaaS sites on the internet. The experience of our team feeds back into other engineering groups within the company, as well as to GitLab customers running self-managed installations

Responsibilities
Automating every operational task is a core requirement for this role. For example, package updates, configuration changes across all environments, creating tools for automatic provisioning of user facing services, etc.
Responding to platform emergencies, alerts, and escalations from Customer Support.
Ensure systems exist to manage software life-cycles (e.g. Operating Systems) with a minimum of manual effort.
Develop a fully automated multi-environment observability stack based on the existing SaaS system, and extend it to predict capacity needs based on the usage patterns.
Plan for new service roll-outs, expansion and capacity management of existing services, and work with users to optimise their resource consumption.
As an SRE you will:
Be on a PagerDuty rotation to respond to GitLab.com availability incidents and provide support for service engineers with customer incidents.
Analyze existing, create and maintain new GitLab.com Service Level Objectives .
Troubleshoot, evaluate and resolve operational challenges contributing to defined SLO's.
Define, improve, and engage in adapting architectural application bottlenecks as observed on GitLab.com.
Work with other engineering stakeholders on resolving larger architectural bottlenecks and participate by offering GitLab.com point of view.
Work in close collaboration with software development teams to shape the future roadmap and establish strong operational readiness across teams.
Scale systems through automation, improving change velocity and reliability.
Leverage technical skills to partner with team members and be comfortable diving into a problem as needed.
Work with counterparts in other teams of the Infrastructure department to improve infrastructure running with Chef, Terraform and Kubernetes.
Make monitoring and alerting alert on symptoms and not on outages.
Document every action so your findings turn into repeatable actions–and then into automation.
Debug production issues across services and levels of the stack.

You may be a fit to this role if you:
Are able to reason about large systems - how they work on large scale, edge cases, failure modes, behaviors.
Know your way around Linux and the Unix Shell.
Have experience in collaborating and communicating asynchronously.
Have an urge to document all the things so you don't need to learn the same thing twice.
Have an enthusiastic, go-for-it attitude. When you see something broken, you can't help but fix it.
Have a strong sense for action and know how to iterate through a problem quickly.
Share our values, and work in accordance with those values.
Have experience with Nginx, HAProxy, Docker, Kubernetes, Terraform, or similar technologies.
Are able to leverage GitLab as your day to day go-to tool.
Bonus: Strong programming skills as a (former) backend engineer - Preferably with Ruby and/or Go.

Projects you could work on:
Working from the Reliability team’s issue tracker , driving changes required to reliably support GitLab at GitLab.com size.
Work on the GitLab core projects such as, GitLab Rails , GitLab Workhorse , Gitaly , etc.
Work on projects that create deployment packages of GitLab such as, GitLab Helm Chart , omnibus-gitlab , etc.
Coding infrastructure automation with Chef and Terraform.
Improving our Prometheus Monitoring or building new Metrics

Senior Site Reliability Engineer Criteria

Technical
Deep knowledge in 2 areas of expertise and general knowledge of all areas of expertise. Capable of mentoring Junior in all areas and other SRE in their area of deep knowledge.
Contributes small improvements to the GitLab codebase to resolve issues
Execution
Identifies significant projects that result in substantial cost savings or revenue
Identifies changes for the product architecture from the reliability, performance and availability perspective with a data driven approach.
Proactively work on the efficiency and capacity planning to set clear requirements and reduce the system resources usage to make GitLab cheaper to run for all our customers.
Identify parts of the system that do not scale, provides immediate palliative measures and drives long term resolution of these incidents.
Identify Service Level Indicators (SLIs) that will align the team to meet the availability and latency objectives.
Collaboration And Communication
Know a domain really well and radiate that knowledge
Perform and run blameless RCAs on incidents and outages aggressively looking for answers that will prevent the incident from ever happening again.
Influence And Maturity
Lead Production SREs and Junior Production SREs by setting the example.
Show ownership of a major part of the infrastructure.
Trusted to de-escalate conflicts inside the team
Performance Indicators

Site Reliability Engineers Have The Following Job-family Performance Indicators
GitLab.com Availability
GitLab.com Performance
Apdex and Error SLO per Service
Mean Time to Detection
Mean Time to Resolution
Mean Time Between Failure
Mean Time to Production
Disaster Recovery Time to Recovery

Compensation Compensation

Please view the compensation range for this role at the bottom of the position description .

The base salary range for this role’s listed level is currently $100,800 - $183,600 for Colorado residents and $100,800 - $205,200 for New York and New Jersey residents only. Grade level and salary ranges are determined through interviews and a review of education, experience, knowledge, skills, abilities of the applicant, equity with other team members, and alignment with market data. See more information on our benefits and equity. Sales roles are also eligible for incentive pay targeted at up to 100% of the offered base salary.

Country Hiring Guidelines: GitLab hires new team members in countries around the world. All of our roles are remote, however some roles may carry specific location-based eligibility requirements. Our Talent Acquisition team can help answer any questions about location after starting the recruiting process.

Privacy Policy: Please review our Recruitment Privacy Policy. Your privacy is important to us.

GitLab is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. GitLab’s policies and practices relating to recruitment, employment, career development and advancement, promotion, and retirement are based solely on merit, regardless of race, color, religion, ancestry, sex (including pregnancy, lactation, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression), national origin, age, citizenship, marital status, mental or physical disability, genetic information (including family medical history), discharge status from the military, protected veteran status (which includes disabled veterans, recently separated veterans, active duty wartime or campaign badge veterans, and Armed Forces service medal veterans), or any other basis protected by law. GitLab will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. See also GitLab’s EEO Policy and EEO is the Law . If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation , please let us know during the recruiting process ."
AWS Cloud Engineer,"Cloud Kinetics (also known as CK) is a leading Cloud Transformation Solutions and Managed Services Provider headquartered in Singapore, offering a plethora of services across all major Public Cloud Operators. Cloud Kinetics is a Portfolio Company of I Squared Capital. I Squared Capital (ISQ) is a private equity firm focusing on global infrastructure investments.

Responsibilities:
Design, build and test and deployment of AWS Landing Zone across different regions
Design, build and test and deployment of AWS security, Firewalls and Cyberark
AD Integration and remediation for AWS
Hands on experience with Migration of workloads to AWS
Setup of Operations tools and processes
Client facing role and conducting workshops for requirements gathering, design and explanation of AWS concepts and problem solving
Be able to write and review technical documentation such as High/Low level designs
Status Reporting and risk/issue management

Skills
AWS
Migration
Arcsight SIEM
CyberArk
AD integration and remediation"
私有云交付工程师,"Job Responsibilities:
1. Analyze and resolve Tuya Cube Solution related technical issues on client servers, network equipment, and end user devices.
2. Accountability to performance and customer satisfaction indicators reviewed weekly with the Delivery team
3. Design and implement changes, deploy patches and fixes delivered by R&D, and adapt solution parameters to make architecture evolutions in accordance with the change management processes

Job Requirements:
1. Proficient in Java language and have a deep understanding of open source products in related technical fields;
2. Familiar with common middleware such as mysql, Redis, ZK, ETCD, Kafka, ElasticSearch, etc.
3. Proficient in Linux operating system, familiar with Linux common commands and system parameter configuration, and able to write simple shell scripts.
4. Familiar with Docker container technology and Kubernetes container orchestration tool
5. Clear thinking, flexible mind, able to analyze and solve complex problems independently."
Blockchain DevOps Engineer,"Founded in 2019, Cake DeFi is a leading decentralised finance services provider and Southeast Asia’s fastest growing fintech platform. ""We Do Crypto. You Do You."" - Our vision is to become a one-stop platform for all crypto users to get easy access to DeFi and Web3 services. To date, more than 1 million users from over 190 countries trust us to manage over $1 billion in assets. We are a profitable, cashflow positive private rocket ship that's just getting ready for take-off. Join us.

cakedefi.com - Engineering

Our engineering team is the backbone of everything you see at the company. We pride ourselves on writing good code. We care about good engineering practices, working with great people, and working on real and impactful products.

We practice test-driven development, and are more than happy to allow team members the opportunity to solve problems with unconventional or cutting-edge methods. If you care about continually improving your craft, and want to work with like-minded peers, this is the place for you!

What You Will Do
Collaborate with Software Engineers to design a highly scalable and secure cloud infrastructure to support our growth.
Build on top of our existing infrastructure playbook and runbook to support our growth targets.
Build comprehensive monitoring solutions and automate workflows for Cake engineers
Manage hundreds of different types of blockchain nodes
Ensure maximum security of internal and external infrastructure
Collaborate with multiple stakeholders from different departments
Be on incident response call rotation

What You Will Need
Experience working in a fast pace tech-driven startup as a SysOps Engineer, Site Reliability Engineer, or DevOps Engineer with at least 4 years of experience managing cloud infrastructure or in a similar capacity.
Experience managing cloud infrastructure such as Amazon Web Services with automation tools such as AWS CloudFormation, Ansible, Terraform, Helm, Puppet, or similar.
Experience in blockchain node setup
A strong foundation of common networking protocols such as layer 7 and layer 4 network load balancing.
Ability to take full ownership and work independently while collaborating with others in a fast-paced agile and async team.
A collaborative and resourceful individual with excellent communication skills able to make radical decisions while being empathetic and respectful.
Willingness to pick up new and emerging bleeding edge blockchain technologies.
Familiarity with container orchestration is highly preferred.
Familiarity with web-scale data management technologies such as NoSQL, SQL Sharding, and Data Warehouse is preferred.
Familiarity with using Kubernetes for container-orchestration is highly preferred.
Experience participating or maintaining in open source software development is highly preferred.

We want to transform and decentralise finance with tomorrow’s technology. This is where you come in. Join a company that is at the forefront of bleeding-edge innovations in blockchain and DeFi. You will be empowered to push boundaries and think out of the box. You will get to work with a bunch of ridiculously motivated and talented people. And most importantly, you'll have fun. The best places to work at, are often also the most fun to work at. That's us.

We hire based on merit, fit, and strong alignment to our culture. Our culture is defined by 7 team principles: Integrity, Resourcefulness, Ownership, Meritocratic Decision-making, Customer Obsession, Radical Candour, and Passion. These 7 principles guide our company, our people, and our work. At Cake DeFi, our culture is our pride. It has been instrumental to our success, so we are steadfast in our commitment to it. We welcome you to add to it."
"Backend Software Engineer (PCDN), Video-On-Demand","Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

Video-On-Demand (VOD) is a world-leading video platform that provides multi-media storage, delivery, transcoding, and streaming services. We are building the next generation video processing platform and the largest live streaming network, which provides excellent experiences for billions of users around the world. Popular video products of TikTok and its affiliates are all empowered by our cutting-edge cloud technologies. Working in this team, you will have the opportunity to tackle challenges of large-scale networks all over the world, while leveraging your expertise in coding, algorithms, complexity analysis, and large-scale system design.

Responsibilities
- Architect and develop efficient, highly scalable and secured services that power all the video products of TikTok and its affiliates.
- Design, implement and optimize our distributed upload services, including protocol stack innovation, transmission efficiency optimization, and storage engine performance optimization.
- Design and develop advanced intelligent scheduling services, including architecture design and algorithm design.
- Drive internal process, work with other modules and test teams to ensure stable service.

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical background involving software/system engineering, or equivalent working experience.
- At least 3 years of programming experience with at least one of the following languages: C, C++, or Go.
- Familiar with knowledge of networking fundamentals and protocols(eg. UDP/TCP/IP,HTTP, etc.).
- Familiar with CDN scheduling and scheduling strategies.
- Working experience in CDN and P2P is a plus.
- Understanding of various streaming packaging methods(eg. FLV,HLS,DASH, etc) is a plus.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Full Stack Developer - 5 days #60920,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Industry/ Organization Type: Manufacturing & Production
Position Title: Full Stack Developer
Working Location: Ubi
Working Hours: 5 days, Monday-Friday (9 AM - 5:30 AM)
Salary Package: Basic Salary + Performance Bonus (Bi-annually)
Duration: Permanent Role
Key Responsibilities
Design, develop and maintain front end, back end & info model for web application components.
Design and develop REST APIs.
Implement security and data protection features.
Implement testing pipelines from GIT to deployment.
Participate in product development, from ideation to deployment.
Provide software training and software-related support when needed.
APPLY NOW!!!
Proficient in .NET design and development (c#, .NET core), Angular, and SQL.
Proficient in HTML, CSS, Javascript, Typescript
Good Knowledge and hands-on developments in Flutter (Preferably) or other frameworks like React Native, Ionic, and Apache Cordova.
Proficient in writing and executing complex queries in SQL.
Knowledge and experience with REST API’s, creating API-centric microservices applications, working and connecting with API.
Working knowledge of code versioning and code testing.
Experienced in using clean code practices and writing readable, maintainable code.
Kindly Apply Through ANY Of The Following Methods
Submit your application by clicking the APPLY button;
Email your resume to Job(at)anradus.com.sg. Kindly indicate #60920 on the email subject.
Anradus Policy: This clarifies Anradus' working procedures, from receiving the applicant's resume, screening to shortlisting. We assure you our consultants will go through every resume we receive but we regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Anradus Pte Ltd | EA License No. 20C0161 | Angel Lim | EA Reg No.: R1769781
Desired Skills and Experience
Apache Cordova, Website Development, CSS, .NET, Pipelines, HTML, REST, TypeScript, JavaScript, Writing, React Native, Flutter, Angular, Product Development, Screening"
Web Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Delivering a high-quality application
Ensuring a required level of performance
Writing test-backed server-side code
Analyzing requirements and designing new functionality
Supporting and fixing existing functionality
Selecting and using the most appropriate and efficient technologies for a particular application
Designing and building application layers
Utilize established development tools, guidelines and conventions including but not limited to ASP.NET, SQL Server, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and C#/VB.NET
Investigate and develop skills in new technologies
Requirements
Proficiency in C#
Experience using .NET (4.5 | Core)
Experience in developing (ASP.NET Razor Pages| ASP.NET Core MVC) applications
Senior knowledge of (Entity Framework 6.* | EF Core)
Proficient knowledge in MSSQL & MYSQL
Database design including indexes and data integrity
Writing tests with NUnit
Implementing enterprise application patterns (good to have)
Understanding of HTML, JS, and CSS
Familiarity with the client side framework (jQuery, Metronic Boostrap UI)
Familiarity with Azure Web Apps/AWS Cloud
Experience with concurrent development source control (Git) and continuous integration (JIRA)
Understanding of Software Development Life Cycle and Agile methodologies.
Passion for technology and knowledge

Desired Skills and Experience
ASPNet, CSS, .NET, Azure, HTML, MySQL, Agile Methodologies, JavaScript, SQL, JIRA, SQL Server, Database Design, C#, Entity Framework, Software Development, jQuery"
Senior Software Engineer,"Roles And Responsibilities

The Snr Software Developer focuses on the strategy implementation and operations for design, development, testing, debugging and implementing software applications or specialised utility programs in support of end users' needs on platforms.

He applies critical and analytical thinking toward developing optimal application solutions. He is a strong leader who is decisive, able to engage, influence and communicate his ideas persuasively to others.

Implement application development strategy

Contribute to the development of functional strategy
Assist senior leaders in defining application roadmap
Develop models and structure changes needed to meet the evolving application strategies
Align application architecture priorities with longer term roadmaps for the technology landscape
Advise the creation of security standards from application development perspective
Support the evaluation and introduction of new technologies, platforms, products or vendors

Identify requirements

Determine user requirements based on business needs
Identify alternatives where multiple solutions to requirements exist
Oversee the preparation of design specifications
Prepare project and other relevant documentation

Implement applications

Oversee the integration of applications with back-end services
Ensure that application meets user requirements

Optimise applications

Review application performance to identify improvement opportunities
Provide recommendations to improve application services

Any other ad-hoc duties assigned by the manager

Requirements / Qualifications

Ideal candidate should have hands-on experience below;

5+ Years of experience

in SAP ABAP handling with many functional areas

Expertise in SAP ABAP technologies such as reports (ALV), data dictionary, adobe/smart forms, BAPI, Interfaces, workflows, OOPS concepts, Function modules, RFCs etc.
At least 3+ years of experience in S/4 Hana programming knowledge is must
Expertise in new S/4 Hana programming knowledge, SAP Fiori UI development, CDS, oData components, RAP, Web services etc.
Knowledge in SAP products such as ISH, Convergent Mediation, Convergent Charging, Rules Cockpit would be advantageous.
Ensure compliance of coding standards for developments.
Ensure the correctness of technical design documents with the developments.
Ability to help and resolve technical issues
Good verbal and written communication skills with the ability to communicate with team members
Experience in healthcare industry is an added advantage
Team player attitude
Having basic basis knowledge is highly desirable
At least 1 End to end of SAP Implementation experience"
"C++ Developer, GFI Software (Remote) - $60,000/year USD","Crossover is the world's #1 source of full-time remote jobs. Our clients offer top-tier pay for top-tier talent. We're recruiting this role for our client, GFI Software. Have you got what it takes?

GFI offers an award-winning suite of must-have network security and communication software products that are distributed through our well-established partners. We are looking for a highly skilled Solution Architect who will ensure that GFI products are the go-to solution for small and medium businesses.

As a C or C++ network security expert who loves hands-on coding, you will enjoy this strategic position in which you will empower Product Managers to define product roadmaps, help Support Leaders to troubleshoot highly complex product issues, enable our Partners and Resellers with the high-quality solutions.

What You Will Be Doing

Your end goal is to enable all GFI customers to take advantage of the high-end network security products to ensure secure and safe business operations. GFI software enables SMB clients with simple-to-use and featured solutions. You’ll commit to the company mission by:

Product Roadmap Reviews - participate in product roadmap ideation, challenge Product Manager specs
Troubleshooting complex Client problems - collect required evidence, locate the problem, debug software, deliver RCA to Engineers
Coding New Product Feature - analyze specs, do high-quality coding for high-performance apps
Making Product Certification - create environments, test the functionality of the critical/affected app
Performing Product Risk Assessment - analyze third-party risks to our products, define mitigation solution

What You Won’t Be Doing

Wasting your brainpower on routine solution implementations - this is not a consultancy or client billable work

C++ Developer key responsibilities

Product Architecture - documented and worked CI/CD pipelines, managed third-party dependencies, managed 99.99x% SaaS environments
Product Development - bug-free features rolled out to production
Support - have representative environments, have 0 backlogs of the complex unresolved client issues
Product Management - 100% risk assessed product roadmap, releases certified on various configurations

Basic Requirements

At least 5 years of professional C or C++ programming experience

About GFI Software

GFI Software develops essential applications for small and medium businesses. Over 80,000 customers choose GFI solutions for network management and performance, security, and collaboration applications. GFI Software available through thousands of channel partners dedicated to serving specific countries and regions worldwide.

GFI has a fully remote, global workforce. GFI has partnered with Crossover to administer its hiring and global workforce management.

There is so much to cover for this exciting role, and space here is limited. Hit the Apply button if you found this interesting and want to learn more. We look forward to meeting you!

Working with Crossover

This is a full-time (40 hours per week), long-term position. The position is immediately available and requires entering into an independent contractor agreement with Crossover. The compensation level for this role is $30 USD/hour, which equates to $60,000 USD/year assuming 40 hours per week and 50 weeks per year. The payment period is weekly. Consult www.crossover.com/help-and-faqs for more details on this topic.

What to expect next:

You will receive an email with a link to start your self-paced, online job application.
Our hiring platform will guide you through a series of online “screening” assessments to check for basic job fit, job-related skills, and finally a few real-world job-specific assignments.

Important! If you do not receive an email from us:

First, emails may take up to 15 minutes to send, refresh and check again.
Second, check your spam and junk folders for an email from Crossover.com, mark as “Not Spam” since you will receive other emails as well.
Third, we will send to whatever email account you indicated on the Apply form - by default, that is the email address you use as your LinkedIn username and it might be different than the one you have already checked.
If all else fails, just reset your password by visiting https://www.crossover.com/auth/password-recovery if you already applied using LinkedIn EasyApply.
Crossover Job Code: LJ-4706-SG-Singapor-C++Developer.008"
Embedded Software Developer,"Who should Apply?
Great embedded software experience
You want to be at the forefront of automotive advancement
Open to both Junior and Seniors!

Boon Keng (Hybrid )

About them:
The Company develops pioneering technologies and services for sustainable and connected mobility of people and their goods. Founded in the late 1800s, the technology company offers safe, efficient, intelligent, and affordable solutions for vehicles, machines, traffic, and transportation. In 2021, The Company generated sales of €33.8 billion and currently employs more than 190,000 people in 58 countries and markets. Recently, the company celebrated its 150th anniversary. The Automotive group sector comprises technologies for passive safety, brake, chassis, motion, and motion control systems. Innovative solutions for assisted and automated driving, display and operating technologies, as well as audio and camera solutions for the vehicle interior, are also part of the portfolio, as is intelligent information and communication technology for the mobility services of fleet operators and commercial vehicle manufacturers. Comprehensive activities relating to connectivity technologies, vehicle electronics and high-performance computers round off the range of products and services

Job Description
Analyze customer system requirements and create or update software requirement specification accordingly
Participate in the requirement reviews with other stake holders in the project
Design innovative and robust software with Good Quality that meets Software requirement Specification
Work with software Architects to perform design and architecture reviews
Implement software with automotive and Company’s Software Coding & Design Rules
Validate software design, hardware/software interface and functionalities of the product and generate test reports
Collaborate with other stake holders in the project for the effective implementation and testing
Participate actively in the Agile Scrum team to meet project schedule & timelines
Job Requirements
Masters or Bachelor Engineering Degree in Electrical/Electronics/Computer Science or a comparable field of study
Knowledge/experience in embedded C/C++
Good understanding of embedded systems
Knowledge/Experience in embedded and real time programming and related microcontroller architecture
Knowledge on electronic measurement tools (oscilloscopes, Emulators, CANoe etc.)
Knowledge/Experience in scripting languages
Knowledge/experience in Matlab will be an advantage
Fluent in English (written & verbal)
Effective communication and analytical skill with high level of commitment, flexibility, creativity, initiative, and teamwork
Good self-management and able to work with a global organization


HOW TO APPLY:
If you are a team player, meticulous & organized, and more importantly, believe that YOU CAN MAKE A DIFFERENCE, we would like to hear from you. Simply submit your application with your updated Resume in MS Word Format to Wong Wen Xin Cheryl (EA Personnel Reg. No.: R22106435) by clicking the ‘Apply link’.
Please indicate the below information in your resume:
Current & Expected Salary
Reason(s) for leaving
Notice Period / Availability to commence work

YOUR SUCCESS IS OUR ACHIEVEMENT!
Notice:
We regret that only short-listed candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.
By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read & agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration, and for our marketing EDMs which you may opt out by unsubscribing in the mailer. You may refer and access our website at
www.achievegroup.asia/privacy-policy/ for more information.
Cessation of Collection of full NRIC Numbers:
In compliance with the Personal Data Protection Act and commitment to protect candidates’ personal data, Achieve Group will cease to collect, process or use full NRIC numbers during our screening and job application process. Kindly ensure your resumes provided to us does not contain your full NRIC number and full home address during your job application."
Mobile Developer (Android+iOS),"Are you an experienced and passionate Senior Mobile Application Developer with strong architecture sense looking to take a more active and impactful role in your work? Are you looking to take the next step in your career and really 'own' something?
Responsibilities
This specific role is related to shared mobile services in the area of mobile development. The base components and services for mobile development, as well as the mobile foundation server components, for example, notification and analytics, must be provided. Later, the development of mobile banking applications as a development service must be provided.
Within the team, you will be able to contribute in your current specified area of expertise.

As a member of the Delivery Team you will:
work in different roles across the whole solution lifecycle (system analysis & technical design, frontend- & backend-development, system integration, documentation, third level support)
provide applications in best quality as requested by specifications
document your provided solutions
analyze root-causes in case of incidents and provide solutions for solving the problem
support the business in case of effort estimations and feasibility studies
perform code reviews and share best practices with colleagues
Skills- Must have
Bachelors degree in technology or related field required OR equitable experience
Minimum 4 years in native Mobile applications development on Android OS
At least 1 year in native Mobile applications development on iOS with good knowledge of the architecture of iOS and how to best utilize it
Strong knowledge of Kotlin, Kotlin core aspects, exception handing, understanding of how Kotlin converts to Java
Very good knowledge of the architecture of Android and how to best utilize it
Good understanding of MVVM architecture design
Strong knowledge of hybrid mobile design principles, patterns, and best practices
Strong expertise in web services, and enterprise architectures, application development in Java and distributed system's engineering
Experience in implementing security in mobile apps
Experience in performance optimization of mobile apps
Experience in consuming RESTful services, JSON, and HTTP
• Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Nice to have
Experience with JavaScript, CSS, HTML5
Experience in server-based application development
Version control system;
Experience in app development process in an enterprise environment (testing, continuous integration, release process);
Experience in building mobile application architecture.
Mobile app deployment process
Knowledge of agile development methodologies;
Experience in coordinating team members"
"Computer Vision Engineer, Data Monetization Technology","Responsibilities

Develop software systems providing CV service
Optimize the performance of the model inference with better usage of different resources like CPU, GPU, DSP, etc.
Develop the inference engine for deep learning model

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent practical experience
Solid knowledge of data structure and strong coding skills
Experience in C++ development under Linux environment
Familiar with at least one area of the computer vision including but not limited to 3D vision, image classification, image segmentation, etc.
Familiar with at least one area of the model inference acceleration including but not limited to Quantization, Pruning, Distillation, etc.
Familiar with at least one of the deep learning frameworks like Tensorflow / PyTorch / MXNet

Preferred Qualifications

Authors of published papers in top academia conferences
Winners of algorithm and machine learning competitions such as ACM and Kaggle
Knowledge of AutoML and hand-on experience of NAS
Experience in big data processing"
Android Developer,"Capgemini is a global leader in partnering with companies to transform and manage their business by harnessing the power of technology. The Group is guided every day by its purpose of unleashing human energy through technology for an inclusive and sustainable future. It is a responsible and diverse organization of over 340,000 team members in more than 50 countries. With its strong 55-year heritage and deep industry expertise, Capgemini is trusted by its clients to address the entire breadth of their business needs, from strategy and design to operations, fueled by the fast evolving and innovative world of cloud, data, AI, connectivity, software, digital engineering and platforms. The Group reported in 2021 global revenues of €18 billion.

Role Brief

We are looking for a motivated and talented native mobile developer who is proficient in developing Android/Kotlin applications.

The ideal candidate will be keen to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment. We’re looking for someone with the ability to provide advice, support, design, and implement technical solutions to business stakeholder(s). He/she must be at ease working in a self-driven environment with little supervision. This person should embody a passion for continuous improvement.

Requirements :-

More than 5-8 years’ experience on Android Development
At least 3 years in Kotlin on hands
Knowledge in architecture (e.g. MVP, MVVM, Clean Architecture)
Knowledge in writing unit test (e.g. JUnit)
Experience with Dependency injection frameworks like Koin, Hilt, Dagger.
Experience using Coroutines, Workmanager, Jetpack components.
Good Understanding of version control
Working experience in Confluence and Jira

Core Technical Expertise:
Experience in Kotlin/Java, Swift/Objective-C
Solid understanding of Android Applications life cycle.
Familiarity with DevOps (CI/CD), GIT, Confluence, Bitbucket, etc


Let's talk about what's in it for you!

Passionate people are Capgemini's Ace of Spades - join us to discover a career that will challenge, support and inspire you. Working at Capgemini you'll find the rewards are more than just financial. You will work alongside some very smart and inspiring people on exciting projects and you will also enjoy incredible benefits. We offer flexible work practices and 40 hours of self-development every year with a huge selection of learning opportunities to choose from.

As ""Architects of Positive Futures"", Capgemini actively supports the community in 3 ways:

Diversity and Inclusion - we believe diversity of thought fuels excellence and innovation, which is why we positively encourage applications from suitably qualified candidates regardless of their gender identity, ethnicity, sexual orientation, religion, ability, intersex status or age. To support our commitment to diversity and inclusion, we celebrate special events and days of significance that are important to our employees such as Diwali, Bastille Day, Pride, IDAHOBIT, IWD and International day of people with Disabilities. Our Employee Resource Groups Women@Capgemini and OutFront support the grassroots passion of employees to drive our diversity agenda and effect change.

Digital inclusion - at Capgemini we are using our skills to drive social impact initiatives focusing on helping society address the impact of the digital and automation revolution. We also provide employees with opportunities to give back to the community through charity projects and volunteer days.

Environmental Sustainability - Capgemini joined the CDP's (Carbon Disclosure Project) prestigious ""A list"" for its commitment to the Net-Zero economy. We are focusing on helping our clients transform towards more sustainable business models and committing to reduce our own carbon emissions (GHG) by 20% per employee by 2020.

Recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies for the last 8 years in a row, ethics and values are at the heart of Capgemini's corporate culture and business. Embedded in our DNA, our seven values - Honesty, Boldness, Trust, Team Spirit, Freedom, Fun and Modesty - have remained the same since company inception in 1967. To see how we bring these values to life, click here to listen to some of our employee’s stories.

Come join us, bring your whole self to work, create new possibilities for you, your customers and your community and help us to be Architects of Positive Futures."
OutSystems Software Developer (1 year contract),"The KPMG Digital Transformation team assists organisations in the development of digital products, solutions and services, including digital strategy and enterprise architecture, digital target operating model, digital labour, digital technologies and solution. Our goal is assist clients to understand technology trends and changes, and make the right technology choices to develop a business advantage.

The role includes:
Developing software using Agile methodology
Collaborating closely with Business Analysts and Quality Control Engineers for user stories elaboration, testing activities and bug fixing
Responsible for providing estimates for user stories during sprint planning
Responsible for converting acceptance criteria into automated unit tests
Championing Agile technical practices such as test-driven development, pair programming, and refactoring
Involving in application deployment

The ideal candidate should possess:
Degree or Diploma in Computer Science, Business or related IT discipline
At least 3 years of hands-on Full Stack experience of developing cloud-native applications using .NET Framework and interested in Outsystems
Working experiment on OutSystems projects will be an added advantage
Working experience in Agile software development and technical practices
Familiar with OOP programing and Design pattern
Familiar with HTML5, CSS and JavaScript frameworks
Working experience with interfacing using SOAP/REST API technologies
Working experience in full-stack development will be an added advantage
Working experience in Oracle database, SQL and PLSQL scripting will be an added advantage
Working experience in setting up, configuring and administrating Microsoft IIS will be an added advantage
Experience in workflow products
Positive and willing to learn new technologies
Ability to understand complex systems and think strategically about business, products and technical challenges
Team player and passionate in championing the team to continuously refactor and improve to deliver the quality software product

Only shortlisted candidates will be contacted by KPMG Talent Acquisition team, personal data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only.

At KPMG in Singapore we are committed to creating a diverse and inclusive workplace. We believe that diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. As an equal opportunity employer, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of age, race, gender identity or expression, colour, marital status, religion, sexual orientation, disability, or other non-merit factors. We celebrate the different talents that our people bring and support every staff member in their journey to achieve personal and professional growth. One of the ways we do this is through Take Charge: Flexi-work, our flexible working framework which enables agile and innovative teams to help deliver our business goals."
SaaS DevOps Engineer,"Murex is a global fintech leader in trading, risk management and processing solutions for capital markets. Operating from our 19 offices, 2500 Murexians from over 60 different nationalities ensure the development, implementation and support of our platform which is used by banks, asset managers, corporations and utilities, across the world.

Join Murex and work on the challenges of an industry at the forefront of innovation and thrive in a people-centric environment.

You’ll be part of one global team where you can learn fast and stay true to yourself.

Role Responsibilities

As part of a project team, work on the technical implementation of MX.3 platform in SaaS mode
Manage the non-functional requirements (NFR), non-functional testing (NFT) and all performance related topics of MX.3
Work closely with integration stream to handle the development and adaptation of interfaces between the client information systems and Murex MX.3
Ensure quality and stability of the MX.3 platform
Design and implement tools needed for the operations and management of MX.3 in SaaS (monitoring, automation, etc.)
Work in continuous integration model using Jenkins, Ansible and GIT
Act as the technical contact for SaaS clients and as escalation on all technical incidents
Work on proposals for Murex prospects interested in the SaaS offering (provide the hardware capacity needed to Implement Murex modules, answer RFPs around Murex technical architecture, network, security, etc.)

Skills And Attributes For Success

Bachelor’s in computer science, Computer Engineer, Information Technology, or related discipline
0 to 4 years of experience
Knowledge in programming: namely Java, groovy and python
eager to work with new technologies and models (Agile, DevOps, automation tools)
Knowledge in Shell scripting and Unix systems
Database knowledge (Practical experience of Oracle, Sybase or MS SQL Server is a plus)
Ability to explain technical architecture in non-technical terms to communicate to a broad audience of different backgrounds
Demonstrate excellent engineering and automation skills in the context of Cloud based platform offering
Strong problem-solving attitude
Following skills are a plus to have: Citrix, AWS, Jenkins, Oracle
Exposure to As-A-Service models is a plus: IaaS, BPaaS and SaaS

Why be a Murexian

Join a global market leader with a strong people-first focus
Be part of a diverse and inclusive team
Work in an agile environment where you can collaborate with global teams from various expertise"
Java Engineer,"Java Engineer

Description:
Responsible for the service-side development of BIGO's core product revenue, operation and other business directions.
Develop , optimize and maintain the code of responsible module.
Participate in the company's product architecture optimization, performance optimization and assist other modules to implement the technology.


Requirement:
3+ years of Java development.
Proficient in IDE, Git, Maven, JUnit, etc.
Be familiar with popular web development frameworks and tools, such as Spring, Spring Boot, Spring Cloud.
Good knowledge of Databases (Mysql, Redis ) and Linux system.
Familiar with one or more of the following middleware: kafka, rocketmq, zookeeper, etc.
Good communication and teamwork skills.
Quick learning and self-motivated.
High-concurrent and high-volume website development experience is preferred."
Blockchain Developer,"About us

Synpulse is an international management consulting and technology company, and valued partner of many of the world's largest financial services providers

About Digital Assets practice

It is increasingly clear that Digital Assets, tokenization, and distributed ledger technology will play a significant role in the future of financial services. The market development is exponential, and we at Synpulse believe in its transformative character and unique benefits for our clients, broader industry, and economy.

Our Digital Assets practice help our clients shape the future of finance across the whole value chain. We are here to help disrupt our clients’ core businesses and transform the industry to deliver better products and services. We are a regional team of strategists, architects and engineers devoted to solving their problems from market access, custody, execution and tokenization to risk & compliance and interoperability.

Our ideal candidate

Passionate leader who brings wealth of technology architecture and financial services experience. A person who brings technology innovation, facilitation skills and entrepreneur mindset. A lifelong learner not afraid to challenge status quo, with excellent communication and listening skills.

Role & Responsibilities

As a developer, you will be:

• Working with our clients, a big financial institutions to help solve their problems.
• Building and scaling capability through knowledge sharing and training of others.
• Helping to drive creation of web3 and DLT related products and assets that solve real-world problems.
• Supporting the presale activities.

What we are looking for in the ideal candidate:

• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related fields
• Previous experience with technology and enterprise architecture at reputable financial institution.
• Knowledge and good understanding of architecture of public and private DLT/blockchain system technologies (at least two like Ethereum, Hyperledger, Quorum, R3 and similar)
• Experience with DLT/blockchain system design, development including end-to-end core components of multi-tier applications: client-side/user interface, backend services and data repositories
• Understanding of the client's requirements and ability to generate technical solutions
• Ability to identify issues and implement solutions to complex problems
• Experience in building applications using at least three of languages like Go, JavaScript, C#, .Net, C++, Python, Java, Swift, Kotlin, PHP or similar;
• Ability to produce high-quality, efficient, clean, and modular code Experience coding smart contract-based solution is a plus (Daml, Solidity)
• Experience in development on Linux or Windows Practical experience in the application deployment and problem diagnosis
• Experience with security design and cloud architecture.
• Experience with internet protocols and connectivity (REST API, TLS, scripting)"
Senior Front-End Developer,"We are looking to for a Senior Front-end Developer to work with Web Development Team at Business Intelligence division.

Role Purpose

The objective of this role is to provide support in application development design & creation of top level user experience to Business Intelligence (BI) .The role will be primarily responsible for development of commercial web applications.

What this job involves

Develop front-end and full stack solutions based on JavaScript, Typescript, Angular, RXjs, GIT, HTML, CSS, REST, LESS, node.js

Working on smaller projects independently under supervision.

Being part of a developer team on larger projects using Scrum / Agile methodology.

Understand business/client requirements: ensure the solutions & services provided are relevant and address the key business needs.

Collaborate with BI developers and business experts to define and implement bespoke, user experience focused web applications

Supporting development of applications architecture (front-end & back-end)

Creating, modifying and implementing prototypes to support evolving software application development.

Assisting in developing design concept and implementation providing input on user design considerations.

Sound like you? To apply you need to be / have:

Experience in web development
Proficiency in HTML, CSS, and JavaScript (Typescript)
Experience using Javascript frameworks (Angular, react etc) and node.js
Experience in testing (unit, integration, e2e)
Effectively adhere to clean coding practices
Knowledge of relational databases SQL
Experience in consuming Restful APIs
Experience in node.js (express, koa,) servers.
Experience in working with Google Cloud services will be a plus
Ability to think critically, solve problems creatively and effectively
Ability to challenge other (also more senior) team members regarding functional user experience of discussed solutions
Passion for data & analytics will be a plus
Experience in supporting BI/IT solutions or data visualization – will be a strong plus

Fluent English is a must"
"AVP/VP, Quantitative Developer, Investment Insights Group 14542","GIC is a custodian of Singapore’s Reserves and a Sovereign Wealth Fund to secure Singapore’s financial future. GIC is entrusted with a critical mission that impacts the lives of all Singaporeans. We are looking for the best talent to help us fulfil our commitment to the future of Singapore and its people.

Investment Insights Group (IIG)

The Investment Insights Group (IIG) uses advanced quantitative techniques and cutting-edge technological tools to generate insights that drive outstanding investment outcomes for GIC.

We are a multi-disciplinary team of Quantitative Researchers and Software Developers that work closely with each of our investment departments – from Public Markets like Equities and Fixed Income, to Private Markets like Private Equity and Real Estate – to drive superior returns.

Our team of software developers, whom we call “Alpha Technologists”, develop platforms for investment teams and quantitative researchers, allowing GIC to harness our differentiated quantitative methods at scale. They also drive synergy across departments to enhance cross-asset investment capabilities at GIC.

We are looking for a Quantitative Developer to partner with our Quantitative Strats in Systematic Investment Group (SIG) to transform our quantitative research and modeling engineering stack.

Responsibilities

Be part of the team to design, develop and maintain our next generation event-based quantitative modeling platform for quantitative research and model productionisation
Devise and implement the best-in-class DevOps to support rapid research and model productionisation demands with the necessary control and governance
Handle production issue relating to our end-to-end quant operations
Be a core contributor and gatekeeper to our quantitative libraries written in R and Python for scientific modelling, evaluation, back testing, as well as reporting purposes
Implement best practices for coding in R and Python for the quant strats

Join us if you have/are

A Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Engineering/Applied Mathematics/Computer Science subjects with exposure to financial markets or scientific modeling
Proficient in R and Python. Have experience building libraries supporting a group of researchers for scientific modelling, evaluation, as well as reporting purposes
Experience in designing and maintaining data processing systems for both batch and streaming demands (e.g. Apache Spark, Apache Beam, Apache Kafka, Apache Airflow)
Familiar with different database, object store and caching technologies (e.g. MSSQL, Snowflake, Neo4j, S3, NoSQL, Redis)
Familiar with cloud services and serverless technologies including and not limited to AWS, Docker, Kubernetes
Familiar with DevOps (e.g. Jenkins, GitOps) and/or MLOps (e.g. AWS SageMaker, ML Flow)

Our PRIME Values
GIC is a values driven organization. GIC’s PRIME Values act as our compass, enabling us to fulfil our fundamental purpose and objectives. It is the foundational bedrock which governs our behaviors, our decision making, and our focus. It informs both our long-term strategy as a firm, and the way we relate to our Client, business partners and employees. PRIME stands for Prudence, Respect, Integrity, Merit and Excellence."
"Full Stack Developer (Python/React) – Elite Quant Fund – S$200,000","Client: Tech-driven Quant Fund
Role: Permanent
Salary: Up to S$200,000 + market-leading bonus
Location: Singapore
My client is a newly-formed fund run by industry-leading quants, systematic traders and computer scientists based in Central London. Tech is the lifeblood of their business, so they are looking for full-stack engineers from all backgrounds to join an already top-tier development team and work on designing and building their bespoke, cutting-edge systems.
What you’ll be doing:
· Build full stack web applications and microservices for the trading technology stack
· Work with massive data sets for critical trading usage
· Work with smart people in a flat structure who value creative ideas and strong opinions.
Skills/Experience
· Strong knowledge of Python or React - There is zero legacy tech at this firm!
· Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related subject (min 2:1).
· A good personality – team player with excellent communication skills!
The client is happy to wait for notice periods and bonuses to be paid. Also, a full job spec is available.
Prior finance knowledge is not required.
📧 Interested in applying? Please click on the ‘Easy Apply’ button. or contact me at astewart@hunterbond.com"
FullStack Lead Developer (Team Management Role),"Independent design, development and management agency.

This role will manage the technical infrastructure to fulfil the web services.

The candidate works closely with creative and client servicing team to plan and execute the web-based project's deliverables. The candidate will provide guidance on web issues and lead a team of web-developer and multimedia designers to work on the development of new sites, enhancing new feature to existing sites and management of database.

What will be the expectation for the talent
Ensure sites under management are maintained on regular basis
Achieve high accuracy and precision for data extraction of site user behaviour
Highly proficient in web architecture and content delivery network
Manage and Lead team of multimedia designer and developer for new and existing projects
You will need
At least a Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma, or Professional Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
Proficiency in HTML, CSS and JS
Proficiency in PHP, Python, Java, Node JS, CMS Platforms
Familiarity in database management systems SQL
Good understanding of server architecture in AWS or equivalent platform
Attention to details while multi-tasking
At least 8 years of experience in web development and management experience
To be able to work on holidays and weekends when required (Off-in-Lieu to make up for off-hours worked)
Desirable experiences but not essentialProficiency in Adobe Design Software, ie. XD, Illustrator or Photoshop

Interested candidates, who wish to apply for the advertised position, please email us an updated copy of your resume.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Job Code: JYK
Email Address: tech2_sg@persolkelly.com; sg_job_boards@persolkelly.com
EA License No.: 01C4394
EA Registration No. R1873450


By sending us your personal data and curriculum vitae (CV), you are deemed to consent to PERSOLKELLY Singapore Pte Ltd and its affiliates to collect, use and disclose your personal data for the purposes set out in the Privacy Policy available at https://www.persolkelly.com.sg/policies. You acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agree with the Privacy Policy."
Head of Sales SE Asia,"Position Purpose

To effectively lead and manage an assigned team of Sales Associates to consistently achieve results that contribute to the growth of the organization.

c
Responsible for the selection, performance and development of Sales Associates.
Coach, support and develop Sales Associates. Conduct quarterly performance reviews and prepare development plans; monitor performance against agreed targets, and take action as necessary.
Host regular one-on-one catch-ups, team meetings and training sessions to improve effectiveness and knowledge of the Sales Associates.
Primarily responsible for the on-boarding of Sales Associates.
To grow market share and revenue for ADP. To represent ADP in the market, and raise the profile of the organisation through interactions.
Balances business needs (margin, service-ability) with market demand and solutions focus.
To contribute to longer term sales and growth strategies.
Delivery of recurring revenue sales target.
Delivery of accurate sales forecasts and situation reports as determined by senior management.
Delivery and execution of business plan.
Fiscal responsibility around expenses to align to national budget.
To act as liaison internally on new approaches, crafting solutions, performing due diligence on prospective solutions.
Active engagement in key MNC, Multi Country Payroll, Enterprise & Mid-Market level sales processes and internal strategy sessions to maximize close rates.
Negotiate pricing and contractual conditions in conjunction with Sales Associate and Internal Counsel of ADP.
Business conversations with C-level contacts (CEO/CFO/CIO) to promote outsourcing as a business strategy.
Input to product development teams and keep up to date on legislative and product changes.
Monitor, evaluate and report on market conditions including competitor product strategies, win/loss data, industry trends, potential acquisition targets or new markets.
Track statistical sales trends and provide insight to the business via reporting and presentations.
Work effectively across departments (Finance, Implementation, Service, HR) to ensure client satisfaction, Associate and client effectiveness/retention.
Deliver effective presentations, internal and external to ADP.
Be a presence in the payroll/HR community at events and through associations. Conduct presentations at industry and client/prospect events. Promote the best of breed and global branding of ADP.
Experience
Previous sales management experience (3-5 years) in large Enterprise and Multi-National markets (1000+ employees) with proven track record in achieving targets and driving Associate retention.
Proven previous successful sales experience to senior decision makers in fortune 500 companies, preferably in Finance, HR/Payroll or IT service areas.
Experience working with multinational and matrix organisations.
Experience in negotiation of complex contracts through multiple stakeholders in large MNCs including procurement and legal.
Proven ability to work with broader sales teams
Minimum 8 years sales experience in a business to business corporate environment
Demonstrated previous experience success in a new business development and solution sales role
Proven track record of identifying, pursuing and closing new business
Demonstrated experience in explaining complex systems to non-technical clients
Previous experience with the development and delivery of presentations, proposals and quotes to win new business
Experience using networking to drive sales opportunities
Previous experience in all sales reporting including completing sales forecasting and analysis of key metrics.
Sales scoping and qualification experience
Significant experience responding to Tenders, RFP, EOI's, etc.
Previous direct sales experience in a solution sell environment.
Payroll and Human Resources experience preferred.
Proven track record of identifying, hunting and closing new business.
Demonstrated experience in presenting and communication with 'C' level executives.
High level of integrity and business ethics.
Trained in strategic selling and marketing
Certifications / Qualifications

A tertiary qualification in Business, Marketing or a related discipline is preferred.

Skills
Sales Management
Sales Coaching
Forecasting Analysis & Reporting
Solution Focus
Networking
Social Media Selling
Team Management
Drive Sales Growth
Stakeholder Management
Service Delivery
Results Accountability
Explore our COVID-19 page https://jobs.adp.com/covid19/ to understand how ADP is approaching safety, travel, the hiring interview process, and more.

Diversity, Equity, Inclusion & Equal Employment Opportunity at ADP: ADP affirms that inequality is detrimental to our associates, our clients, and the communities we serve. Our goal is to impact lasting change through our actions. Together, we unite for equality and equity. ADP is committed to equal employment opportunities regardless of any protected characteristic, including race, color, genetic information, creed, national origin, religion, sex, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, lawful alien status, ancestry, age, marital status, or protected veteran status and will not discriminate against anyone on the basis of a disability. We support an inclusive workplace where associates excel based on personal merit, qualifications, experience, ability, and job performance.

Ethics at ADP: ADP has a long, proud history of conducting business with the highest ethical standards and full compliance with all applicable laws. We also expect our people to uphold our values with the highest level of integrity and behave in a manner that fosters an honest and respectful workplace. Click https://jobs.adp.com/life-at-adp/ to learn more about ADP’s culture and our full set of values."
Software Product Frontend Developer,"Company Overview

Our client is a homegrown SME sized system integration firm that provides digital transformation solutions to Fortune 500, public sectors, and unicorn tech companies in Singapore. As the company has been awarded with a number of new long-term projects, we’re looking to recruit an eager to learn and mid-senior level Software Product Frontend Developer to join the team.

Job Responsibilities

As a Software Product Frontend Developer, your responsibilities include:
Perform product systems analysis and design.
Analyze systems specifications and develop our product to support the use cases and user stories.
Prepare detailed specifications from which complex programs will be written.
Deliver a complete front-end application
Ensure high performance on mobile and desktop
Write tested, idiomatic, and documented JavaScript, HTML and CSS
Coordinate the workflow between the graphic designer, the HTML coder, and yourself
Cooperate with the back-end developer in the process of building the RESTful API
Collaborate with the stakeholders, the users, the build team and other development partners to implement state-of-the-art user experiences.
Design, code, test, debug, document and maintain the software.
Evaluate and resolve software development modelling issues and coordinate implementation of modifications or enhancements. Evaluate interrelationships in immediate programming area to determine how changes in one program will affect another related area. Analyze and revise system logic. Recommend the development of new code or reuse of existing code.
Responsible for process modelling, code generation via rapid application toolkits, testing, implementing, maintaining and supporting the software to be delivered on time (in sprints) and within budget.
Work closely with Product management team to understand business requirements that drive the analysis and design of quality technical solutions. Participate in component and data architecture design, and performance monitoring.

Job Requirements
At least 2 years of experience in the front-end development framework, application development, systems testing or other job-related experience.
Good understanding of front-end development tools and technologies.
Experienced in web technologies such as HTML5, CSS3(Bootstrap), JavaScript, jQuery and Ajax.
Experience building REST APIs using Python and NodeJS and familiarity with OpenAPI.
Experience building web applications using AngularJS, ReactJS, NodeJS, html, css, jquery/javascript and Redux.
Experience with Windows Powershell and Linux shell, writing shell scripts in bash, python, ps scripting.
Experience with Regular expressions for log entry pattern matching.
Familiarity with Git and NPM.
Familiarity with Serverless or microservices design and implementation.
Basic understanding of Cloud technologies - AWS or Microsoft Azure.
Web development quality assurance: automated testing, code linters (ESLint, Pylint), cross-browser compatibility, responsive design.
Experience with Elastic (ELK) Stack will be advantageous.
Understands coding best practices and writing clean code.
Strong understanding of applications/development, quality assurance and integration methodologies, concepts, and facilities in a cloud environment.
Interest or familiarity with Cybersecurity concepts will be advantageous although not essential.
Strong analysis, decision-making, and problem-solving skills.
Demonstrates logical abstract thinking and assimilating/adhering to project goals and deadlines.
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with employees, clients, vendors etc.
Strong knowledge of relevant operating systems, rapid application development tools and their usage.
Resourceful and able to manage your own work with minimal supervision.
Ability to communicate effectively verbally and in writing.

Working Location: Singapore

Apply online or feel free to contact me directly (via email:sarah.chin@jac-recruitment.com) for more information about this opportunity. Due to the high volume of applicants, we regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. Thank you for your understanding.

Sarah Chin (R 1655546)

JAC Recruitment Pte Ltd (EA Lic No: 90C3026)

#countrysingapore"
Senior/Development Engineer (Firmware) (Infosecurity),"Job description:

ST Engineering is a global technology, defence and engineering group with offices across Asia, Europe, the Middle East and the U.S., serving customers in more than 100 countries. The Group uses technology and innovation to solve real-world problems and improve lives through its diverse portfolio of businesses across the aerospace, smart city, defence and public security segments.

Cyber business area An industry leader in cybersecurity with over two decades of experience, we deliver a holistic suite of trusted cybersecurity solutions to empower cyber resilience for government and ministries, critical infrastructures, and commercial enterprises. Backed by our indigenous capabilities and deep domain expertise, we offer robust cyber-secure products and services in cryptography, cybersecurity engineering, digital authentication, SCADA protection, audit and compliance. We specialize in the design and build of security operations centres for cybersecurity professionals and provide managed security services to strengthen the cybersecurity posture of our government and enterprise customers. Committed to building up the competencies of cybersecurity professionals to support the growing demand, our Cybersecurity Academy has certified and trained more than 2000 cybersecurity professionals in more than 150 organisations. We continue to innovate through our Research Lab, Strategic Technology Centre, and Engineering Centres and develop future-ready cybersecurity solutions that position us at the forefront of the dynamic digital economy.

Find out more: https://www.stengg.com/cybersecurity

Senior/Development Engineer (Firmware)

Job Description

Develop state-of-the-art Cybersecurity products for current and new market segments
Translate product/Cybersecurity requirements into firmware design
Product design & development (firmware), testing and troubleshooting for final product translation
Requirements

Degree in Electronics Engineering, Computer Engineering or related disciplines
Experience in firmware development on embedded systems using C/C++ and/or assembly
Knowledge and/or experience in embedded systems such as Arm-Linux
Knowledge and/or experience in porting codes (especially assembly language) from Intel-Linux to Arm-Linux
Knowledge of information security and standards is an added advantage
Knowledge in the secure boot for NXP i.MX solution is an added advantage
Entry-level candidates with good academic results are welcome to apply (product-specific and on-job trainings will be provided)"
"Frontend Developer(ReactJs),Trading","Frontend Developer (ReactJs), Trading Application

Description

My client is one of the world largest trading and mining company. They are looking for a frontend engineer to be part of the digital application team and build commodities trading application.

Responsibilities

You will be involved in the entire software development lifecycle, from conception to completion. You will be responsible to build efficient, reusable and high-quality front-end systems for trading and risk management. You will be able to translate user requirements into high-quality code. You will be building reusable components and front-end libraries for future.

Requirements


Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of solid experience in ReactJS and experience in React workflows (Flux/Redux)
Familiarity with RESTful APIs/GraphQL APIs
Experienced in using and configure CI/CD pipelines is a plus
Possess strong attention to detail and take pride in delivering high-quality work in a timely manner
To Apply

For interested candidates, please send your CV to ya@kerryconsulting.com. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Registration No: R1988390

Licence No: 16S8060"
Software Engineer,"GRG Banking Equipment (HK) Co. Limited.
( A World Leading Self-service Terminal and Service Provider)

Title: Software Engineer
Report to: Technical Manager
Category: Software Development
Location: 2 Changi Business Park Cres, Singapore 486029


Key Responsibilities:
Job Description:
Develop and customize the terminal software, provide the technical support to partners and customers.

1. Develop and customize the software as per the client’s needs.
2. Support and implementation of customer certifications/pilot projects.
3. Respond to customer inquiries, primarily via email, telephone and on-site visit.
4. Resolve any customer technical issues through diligent research, reproduction, and
troubleshooting.
5. Gather technical requirements from customers and translate into gap analysis
documentation and work orders.
6. Work directly with HQ and local staff in engineering, sales, marketing, operations, and administration to prepare/present the software demonstration and resolve
problems.
7. Document all technical inquiries for sharing with other engineers and project
manager.
8. Provide training or assistance to customers and partner.
9. Participate in testing the new-released software products.


Qualification Requirement:
1. Experience in Microsoft Windows JAVA/C++/C# programming under .NET
environment
2. Experience in providing technical support to software customers is preferred
3. Excellent interpersonal skills
4. Strong in spoken and written English. Other languages are a plus.
5.Preferably be familiar with the knowledge of EFT (Electronic Fund Transfer) network.

About the Company:
Embracing the future, GRGBanking focuses on Fintech & Smart City with four artificial intelligence elements including data, algorithm, computing power, and scenario. The company devotes itself into the digitalization and intelligence of technological solutions for global market. While rapidly expanding artificial intelligence industry, the company builds intelligent applications and scenarios for customers in various fields, and commits to becoming a leading innovative solutions provider.

Company Website: https://global.grgbanking.com/en/
Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/GRGbankingEquipment
LinkedIn:https://www.linkedin.com/company/grg-banking-equipment-hk-co--limited-?trk=top_nav_home"
Software Developer (Backend),"DSTA is a top-notch technology organisation that drives innovation and delivers state-of-the-art capabilities to make the Singapore Armed Forces (SAF) a formidable fighting force. Our engineers and IT professionals harness multidisciplinary expertise to equip our soldiers with advanced systems to defend Singapore.

We also contribute our technological expertise to support national-level developments. To achieve our mission, DSTA performs a variety of roles ranging from acquisition and procurement to cybersecurity and software development.

Opportunity
Imagine developing the brain, heart and soul of complex systems that serve as the nerve centre to plan and monitor mission executions. If this sounds exciting to you and you are passionate about technology, we welcome you to join us on this journey!

At DSTA’s Command, Control and Communications Development (C3D) Programme Centre, we develop software systems that enable decision makers in the SAF and government agencies to execute missions successfully. We are looking for a Backend Developer with strong technical competencies and problem-solving skills to join us. You can find more examples of the systems we develop at https://www.dsta.gov.sg/programme-centres/c3d .

What can the team offer you?

Our Team: You will join a multi-disciplinary team of developers, architects and product managers who are passionate about creating meaningful and impactful software systems. It’s a place where you can solve diverse, complex challenges, alongside thoughtful, intelligent individuals who lead with curiosity, empathy, and optimism.

Career Opportunities: We work on different projects, ranging from experimentations to operational system development in different domains spanning across Air, Land, Sea and Whole-of-Government systems. You will also have the flexibility and whitespace to work on exciting side projects and hone your skillsets in different technical areas like artificial intelligence, modelling and simulation, cybersecurity and internet of things (IoT). At times, you will have the chance to share at brown bag sessions and townhalls, as well as collaborate with worldwide leading research institutes and industry commercial partners.

Professional Development: There are numerous opportunities to grow and excel professionally in your career with us. From your first day with us, your onboarding experience includes mentorship, buddy system and technical courses to build your competencies and connect with colleagues on a personal level. On top of that, we work with DSTA’s in-house Academy to curate courses taught by both industry professionals as well as in-house lecturers.

Culture: We encourage our community to bring their whole selves to work, respect the need for work-life balance and allow for autonomy in the software development process and your career.

Once here you will:

Collaborate closely with product managers, developers and stakeholders to deliver valuable and impactful software that combat evolving threats.
Work in a multidisciplinary software development team to define technical requirements and architecture, scope tasks, and develop software applications geared towards scale, robustness and performance.
Design and develop robust backend services based on our Technology Stack.
Perform automated build and tests in our DevSecOps pipeline.
Adopt continuous delivery practices to improve software delivery performance.
Exchange technical knowledge and experiences with like-minded developers.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related fields.
Candidates with more than 2 years of relevant working experience may be considered for a Senior Software Developer position.

Relevant Experience And Mindset
Good knowledge in one or more programming languages, such as Java, C++, Python.
Familiarity with networking protocols (e.g. TCP/IP, UDP etc.), messaging protocols (e.g. MQTT etc.) and developing REST APIs.
Familiarity with database storage technologies such as RDBMS and No-SQL.
Good understanding of data structures, design patterns, algorithms and software design.
Have a passion for software development and technology.
Thrive in a team-oriented, project-based work environment.
Excellent analytical and communication skills including the ability to deliver technical concepts clearly across different audiences.
Have a passion for innovation and learning new software architectures, frameworks, languages and technologies.

It would be a bonus if you have:
Experience in Agile (e.g. Scrum or Extreme Programming) practices and software development lifecycle.
Working experience with cloud computing providers (e.g. Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure etc.).
Knowledge of microservices development and containerisation technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Docker etc.).
Knowledge of DevSecOps practices, and use of continuous integration and continuous delivery tools.
Knowledge of role-based access control, authentication and authorization.
Experience with Linux OS.
Knowledge of secure coding and cybersecurity.

As DSTA is an agency under Ministry of Defence, only Singapore Citizens will be considered."
Mobile Software Engineer (iOS),"The Mobile team is responsible for developing secure mobile SDKs and apps for Trusted Digital solution that involves mobile & backend that is used by worldwide customers.



Nearest MRT: OneNorth


Job Scope:

Participate in the design, implementation, and validation of mobile (iOS), SDK libraries and applications.
Work together with local and remote development team to deliver the common features with agile development methodologies.
Contribute to the improvement of existing technology platform/baseline, development methodology and product evolution through prototyping and patent proposal.
Work together with the team in creating test strategies, test plans, automated test codes, test execution, follow up and reporting
Perform peer code review to ensure code quality and that team follows best engineering practices
Participate in security risk assessment of mobile solutions - identifying assets, attacks, and relevant applicable mitigations
Support customer deployment and maintenance activity when required.


Job Requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, related technical field or equivalent practical experience.
Proficiency in mobile application development for iOS (Swift or Objective C)
Kotlin knowledge (or Java) will be a bonus
Indepth knowledge on unit testing and test automation
Knowledge on PKI, Cryptographic and mobile app security
Experienced with API design (client-server projects) and mobile SDK development
Experienced with mobile device hardware API (e.g. NFC, BLE, Biometric, Camera, Sensor, Secure Element, etc)
Experience with continuous integration and build automation (GIT/ Mercurial/Jenkins)
Comfortable to work with parties across multiple geographical sites and flexible in working hours


*Shortlisted candidates will be informed.



Interested applicants please send in your updated resume to jeffrey.koh@experis.com.sg with the subject ""iOS Mobile Software Engineer""



Jeffrey Koh Kok Ann
Registration No.: R1770345
EA License No.: 02C3423"
"Lead/Engineer, Data Transformation & ML Ops, xData","What The Role Is
We are looking for someone who is creative, curious, collaborative and relishes challenges. If you are entrepreneurial, resourceful and enjoy crafting tech strategic roadmaps, we want you!

Successful candidate’s primary job role would assist to plan and prioritises tech projects, facilitate and drive collaboration with respective Home Team agencies, promote adoption of tech-push products, raise enterprise ICT and services standards for the Home Team, etc.

We also believe in upskilling our officers and exposing them to work spanning from end-to-end of the technological lifecycle.

What You Will Be Working On
Track and monitor progress of data science, AI & analytics projects.
Provide technical guidance and advisory services on governance related matters to various Home Team agencies.
Collaborate with various teams to understand needs to build scalable and data-driven products and assist with data-related technical issues.
Keep abreast of technological advances in Big Data Technologies, database designs & architecture and government policies & recommendations, etc.
Evaluate existing data governance framework and identify areas of non or partial compliance and rectify any issues.
Ensure compliance with internal and external requirements before pushing data-driven models to production.
Identify plausible risk mitigation measures to lower potential biasness generated from AI models.

What We Are Looking For
Preferably with at least 3 years of working experience in project management & governance/ compliance related roles in the tech industry.
Degree in STEM or relevant disciplines
Though this role does not require you to develop any deep technical solution, you will have to conduct some form of data analysis/visualisation. Familiarity with technical know-how and policy implications/limitations would be advantageous.

Candidates Possessing The Following Would Be Advantageous
Experience in staff work & policy making
Experience in data analysis/ visualisation

Personal Traits
Entrepreneurial and resourceful, able to work around ambiguity and seek out opportunities to advance agenda.
Possess strategic and critical thinking mindset, with strong ability to articulate concepts, strategies, issues and challenges with clear framing.
Multi-stakeholder management (within HTX and across Home Team), with the ability to plan and execute stakeholder engagement activities to facilitate conversations and create valued proposition.
Ability to cope with stress, demonstrate resiliency, drive, level-headedness, and professional integrity.
Possess good verbal and written communication skills.
Able to work independently and in teams.

All new appointees will be appointed on a two-year contract in the first instance.

We wish to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified within 4 weeks upon closing of the advertisement."
"Software Engineer, Mobile","We are living in dynamic times. Technology is reshaping how we live, and we want to use it to redefine how financial services are offered. Grab is the leading technology company in Southeast Asia offering everyday services to the masses. Singtel is Asia’s leading communications group connecting millions of consumers and enterprises to essential digital services. This is why we are coming together to unlock big dreams, and financial inclusion for people in our region is just one of them. We want to build a digital bank with the right foundation - using data, technology and trust to solve problems and serve customers. If you have what it takes to help build this new Digibank with us.

Get to know the team:

We are seeking talented & passionate Mobile Engineers (Junior and Senior) to join our team.

When people talk about Digibank, they generally refer to the apps that we develop, optimize and maintain. With all eyes on us, you’ll be treated as a hero when you deliver according to our high expectations. Our mobile engineering team is a large international group of highly talented developers who strive for quality and innovation. You’ll be working in an agile and test-driven development environment. Apart from developing new features, platforms and maintaining existing products, you also trial and evaluate new mobile technologies.

We are continuously looking to innovate payment platforms, which requires the help of top-notch engineers. Operating on this level is hard but deeply rewarding.

Get to know the role:
Work closely with the Product, UX/UI and Backend teams to design, build and extend consumer and/or partner facing new products, platforms and features.
Build reusable Android software components.
Collaborate with QA on continuous integration and delivery (CI/CD) as well as other automated and manual testing to make sure our app releases are always worthy of five star ratings.
Monitor the performance of the live apps and continuously improve them on both code and experience level.
Raise the bar by reviewing each other's code, share knowledge, tips and tricks, and generally help out - within and across teams. This may include pair programming.
Evaluate new mobile methodologies and technologies.

The Must-Haves:
A degree in computer science, software engineering, information technology or related fields.
Up-to-date on the modern Android programming paradigm, including the use of RxJava and/or Kotlin.
Strong UX/UI design exposure and experience in making apps work intuitively and with pixel perfect interfaces.
Familiar with MVVM, Clean Architecture.
Strong CS fundamentals (with competencies in algorithms and data structures).
You are highly accountable and take ownership. You also have a collaborative attitude, because ‘Your Problem Is My Problem’ (YPIMP).
(For Senior Engineers) At least 5 years of mobile engineering experience with a track record of building and maintaining complex applications.
(For Senior Engineers) Working knowledge of several architectural approaches, caching, data storage and security."
Software Engineer(2-3 years)-C,"Job Position

Firmware Engineer

Job Description

Job Description: FW build and release, defects triaging, test script development. Education and Experience Required: Education in Computer/Electrical & Electronics engineering or computer science Good programming and analytical skills Working experience in C/C++ and Python programming language Understanding of firmware testing methodology, including Test Driven Development and writing automated tests. Experience in source code management system Knowledge in embedded system and programming in Linux OS is preferred Experience in low-level FW configurations for MPCA board and hardware would be advantageous Years of experience: 1 - 5 Yrs of exp. """
Enterprise Service Engineer,"Key Responsibilities

Provide solution consultation to customer in addressing business and technical challenges to achieve customer’s business success.

Be a subject matter expert of e2open intelligent application product suite.

You will work on complex issue troubleshooting, investigation, replicating, root cause analysis and fixing application code defects found in production environment in collaboration with project leads, architects, testers and customer.

Support the test design, functional testing, and user acceptance testing of production defect fixes.

Ensure fixes are delivered to meet/exceed customer expectations in a timely manner.

Plan and perform solution deployment and application maintenance in company’s hosting environment, adhering to standards and best practices.

Plan and manage business solutions transition from project delivery team to Customer Success organization.

Ensure an incident ticket/problem ticket/change ticket is being resolved/executed as per the SLA.

Provide on-call support as part of a global engineering team.

Requirements

3+ years’ experience in a software development/consulting role, preferably in comprehensive eBusiness and Supply Chain Solutions

2+ years’ experience in Software Analysis, Design and Development using J2EE technology stacks (Core Java, JSP, XML, Hibernate & Java scripts) and Oracle database (PL/SQL)

1+ years’ working knowledge of Unix and Shell Scripting

Understanding of development methodologies, version control and configuration management.

Analytical and problem-solving skills with strong attention to detail.

Exceptional verbal and written communications skills

Excellent interpersonal & planning skills and cross-group coordination at all levels

Skilled in IT problem diagnosis and resolution.

A fundamental understanding of IT service management and the ITIL business process.

Must be able to work well both in a team environment and independently under minimal supervision.

He/she has the ability to work in a fast-paced environment as well as multitask and re-prioritize on a regular basis.

Outstanding organizational and time management skills

Bachelor’s Degree in computer science, or equivalent

Preferred Or Optional Skills

Supply-chain domain experience implementing and integrating Supply Chain solutions

Experience in the integration, deployment, or support of an ERP, SCM, or similar systems from SAP"
iOS Developer,"Capgemini is a global leader in partnering with companies to transform and manage their business by harnessing the power of technology. The Group is guided everyday by its purpose of unleashing human energy through technology for an inclusive and sustainable future. It is a responsible and diverse organization of over 340,000 team members in more than 50 countries. With its strong 55-year heritage and deep industry expertise, Capgemini is trusted by its clients to address the entire breadth of their business needs, from strategy and design to operations, fueled by the fast evolving and innovative world of cloud, data, AI, connectivity, software, digital engineering and platforms. The Group reported in 2021 global revenues of €18 billion.

Role Brief

Roles & Responsibilities :-

We are looking for a qualified mobile developer, familiar with SDLC process, have exposure working with cross functional teams. You will be part of the banking technology team to make breakthroughs and innovation in designing and implementing next generation mobile applications. As an iOs Mobile Developer, you’ll be in charge of building the mobile app from scratch. You’ll work closely with fellow engineers along with our Tech Lead, product manager, and designer to create and launch the App.

Requirements :-

More than 5-8 years’ experience
At least 3 years in Swift programming
Knowledge in architecture MVVM/CleanSwift
Knowledge in writing unit test
Working experience with Dependency Managers like Carthage, CocoaPods, SPM.
Module creation via cocoa pods / SPM (required but not mandatory)
Good Understanding of version control
Working experience in Confluence and JIRA

Let's talk about what's in it for you!

Passionate people are Capgemini's Ace of Spades - join us to discover a career that will challenge, support and inspire you. Working at Capgemini you'll find the rewards are more than just financial. You will work alongside some very smart and inspiring people on exciting projects and you will also enjoy incredible benefits. We offer flexible work practices and 40 hours of self-development every year with a huge selection of learning opportunities to choose from.

As ""Architects of Positive Futures"", Capgemini actively supports the community in 3 ways:

Diversity and Inclusion - we believe diversity of thought fuels excellence and innovation, which is why we positively encourage applications from suitably qualified candidates regardless of their gender identity, ethnicity, sexual orientation, religion, ability, intersex status or age. To support our commitment to diversity and inclusion, we celebrate special events and days of significance that are important to our employees such as Diwali, Bastille Day, Pride, IDAHOBIT, IWD and International day of people with Disabilities. Our Employee Resource Groups Women@Capgemini and OutFront support the grassroots passion of employees to drive our diversity agenda and effect change.

Digital inclusion - at Capgemini we are using our skills to drive social impact initiatives focusing on helping society address the impact of the digital and automation revolution. We also provide employees with opportunities to give back to the community through charity projects and volunteer days.

Environmental Sustainability - Capgemini joined the CDP's (Carbon Disclosure Project) prestigious ""A list"" for its commitment to the Net-Zero economy. We are focusing on helping our clients transform towards more sustainable business models and committing to reduce our own carbon emissions (GHG) by 20% per employee by 2020.

Recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies for the last 8 years in a row, ethics and values are at the heart of Capgemini's corporate culture and business. Embedded in our DNA, our seven values - Honesty, Boldness, Trust, Team Spirit, Freedom, Fun and Modesty - have remained the same since company inception in 1967. To see how we bring these values to life, click here to listen to some of our employee’s stories.

Come join us, bring your whole self to work, create new possibilities for you, your customers and your community and help us to be Architects of Positive Futures."
"Senior Back End Engineer, Django (Bangkok, Relocation)","Manatal is an AIbased recruitment software company based in Bangkok, Thailand. Our mission is to offer an easy-to-use software to empower small, medium and large companies in their staffing & recruitment transformation.

Our goal is simple: to provide solutions to the recruitment world's difficulties and make the entire process simple and enjoyable for recruiters, hiring managers, and candidates alike.
Globally trusted by thousands of companies in over 130 countries, Manatal's growth goes hand in hand with our client's own. We're passionate about developing solutions for the changes they encounter and filling the recruitment gap with innovative tech implementation.

Overview
We're looking for an outstanding Python / Django Engineer to work with a backend team in the continued development of a wide range of features and services within the recruitment sphere.
As the team's Senior Backend Engineer, you will play a critical role in bridging the gap between the business and development ends of our software as a service (SaaS).
Our ideal candidate is one who is passionate about building elegant and scalable software and combines superb communication skills and analytical capabilities with a demonstrated ability to get the right things done quickly and effectively.

Responsibilities
Plan and implement key tasks for current and upcoming features
Design new APIs or contribute to improving existing APIs
Review, merge and deploy code submitted by other engineers.
Coordinate with the frontend team and project managers when building APIs
Be prepared to quickly and efficiently investigate, debug, and resolve unforeseen backend issues related to the server or database

Technical Requirements
Minimum of 2 years building and scaling APIs
Bachelor's degree or higher in computer science or related field
Ability to communicate and comprehend high-level spoken and written concepts in English
Python:
Hands-on experience with the Python programming language
Experience in writing unit tests
Django:
Experience with the Django web framework for Python or other Python Web Frameworks
Proven track record in building scalable APIs
Experience with REST APIs and the Django REST Framework
Experience in Celery and Redis for background and periodic task management
Databases:
Postgres: Familiarity with relational databases and experience with Postgres
ElasticSearch: Experience in working with ElasticSearch and other NoSQL database
Familiarity with scaling databases is a big plus (e.g. sharding)
Github: Experience and fluency using Github within a collaborative work environment
AWS: Experience in working with S3 and other AWS services
APM: Experience in using Application Performance Management tools (APM) is a plus
Functional knowledge of the staging - production pipeline workflow (CI/CD)
Experience breaking a monolith in microservices is a big plus

Non-technical Requirements
Possesses a strong sense of ownership and accountability for each project undertaken
Passionate about automation and optimization in daily tasks
A strong proponent of the Don't Repeat Yourself (DRY) principle
Open-minded, confident, humble, self-managing, and a solid team player
Patient and consistent when mentoring or guiding team members

What You'll Get
A competitive salary and many new opportunities
More responsibilities and greater recognition for the work you do
The opportunity to be a part of a lively and international development team
A pioneering mindset shaped by a challenging and innovative work environment

Get to know more about us and our product: www.manatal.com
Demo Video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xlJAk71H-_s
**Interested candidates can apply via this link: https://www.careers-page.com/manatal/job/YR4Y9V"
Senior Embedded Solutions Engineer,"At Microchip, we work every day to innovate and develop products that solve our customers’ technology challenges. Our team of more than 20,000 people worldwide is dedicated to delivering on the promise of working together to improve lives.

Learn about our guiding values that are the building blocks and foundation of our culture and discover how we make a positive impact in the communities in which we operate. We believe our culture fosters trust, collaboration and belonging.

Our people serve the industrial, computing, automotive, communications, aerospace and defense, and consumer market segments. As part of our global team, you can build technology solutions in our six growth areas – 5G, data centers, autonomous driving, the Internet of Things, electric vehicles, and artificial intelligence and machine learning.

Around the world, we are committed every day to recruiting, retaining and promoting people in our diverse workforce. Your perspective, passion and ingenuity will contribute to achieving more as we fulfill our mission as a leading provider of smart, connected and secure embedded control solutions.

Join our community of exceptional people doing incredible things.

Job Description

The Senior Embedded Solutions Engineer (Analog and Power Conversion Specialist) provides in-depth engineering consultation to clients and creates Solutions focusing on Analog applications and Power Supply designs. Analog ESE plays key role to ease adoption of microchip analog products in client designs hence the overall growth of analog business in the region. Strong knowledge and experience in Power supply designs, Signal Chain design and High Voltage Power Discrete Devices are the key attributes of analog ESE.
Drive focus customer projects to success by providing in-depth engineering consultation and assisting customers with analog application design support and associated hardware development.
Engage with Sales and Marketing teams to provide pre and post sales technical support to clients for analog and Power management products.
Co Create and execute business development strategies along with Client engagement team from technical perspective.
Adopt, lead and comprehensively utilize all elements of Microchip’s Sales Operating System to create and secure design-wins
Deliver/facilitate technical training to fellow ESEs, Sales team, clients, and channel partners.
Support Client engagement team in new opportunity identifications, hold discussions with Customers System Architects and R&D Teams, understand their needs and propose solutions based on Microchip product offerings that can solve their challenges and help differentiate them from their competitors.
Technical coordination and project management for in house projects and developments.
Willingness to travel to any part of the region for client engagement activities.
Willingness to travel to the US, Europe or Asia to receive training or to support other regions as and when needed
Requirements/Qualifications
BE/B-Tech/ME/M-Tech in Electronics
5 or more years of Experience in analog application design, Power supply design and hardware development
Hands on experience in DC-to-DC Convertors, LED Drivers, gate drivers, Mosfet Designs, high power discrete.
Hands on experience in signal conditioning designs such as amplifiers, filters, ADCs, DACs etc.
Hands on experience in analog simulations tools (Spice/SIMetrix/SIMPLIS).
Hands on experience in thermal design, Power quality corrections, Efficiency improvements etc.
Strong knowledge of power conversion topologies.
Strong knowledge of high power discrete such as Mosfets, IGBTS, Diodes etc.
Strong knowledge of wide bandgap devices and application design.
Strong knowledge of SMPS control system design.
Experience in PCB design and design tools will be plus.
Experience in reviewing schematics and layout designs will be plus.
Knowledge of Crystals and MEMS oscillators will be plus.
Strong analytical & problem-solving skills.
Excellent interpersonal, written and oral communication skills , Presentation Skill"
"C# Developer, Trilogy (Remote) - $200,000/year USD","Crossover is the world's #1 source of full-time remote jobs. Our clients offer top-tier pay for top-tier talent. We're recruiting this role for our client, Trilogy. Have you got what it takes?

“Coding competitions are for university students” - Wrong.

“Competitive programming is a sport for your free time. Building a software development career is something completely different” - Incorrect.

“Software developers work in Agile teams. You need to collaborate and participate in daily project and team meetings.” - Not when you are with us.

Trilogy uses cloud-native technologies to improve software products for dozens of customers, and we are looking for veteran competitive programmers to help us. We have reinvented the software development process to break down product specs and milestones into individual code challenges with 4-8 hour SLAs, and your job is to crack the problem and beat the clock. It’s no different from a coding competition - except for the US$200k salary and the chance to double your compensation as you move up the Engineering ladder.

The future of work started long ago with us. Home office twice a week? We have been working from wherever we want for the last fifteen years in our 100% remote model. While scrum rituals and daily standups are still dominating the rest of the industry, our team is already operating under a global asynchronous model where each developer follows 8-hour shifts three or four days a week, plans the rest of their workweek flexibly, and never exceeds 40 hours. The development operates 24x7, but you are free to choose your own schedule!

What You Will Be Doing

Designing innovative commercial software and writing high-quality code to bring them into production.
Implementing new features on existing software products by solving complex implementation problems and making the appropriate technical decisions.
Fixing bugs to permanently eliminate defects that impair product functionality.

What You Won’t Be Doing

Dealing with unclear expectations or non-technical managers. Every task will have a clear scope and objective for you to implement.
Executing repeated tasks for the same product using the same tech stack. Our portfolio of 60+ products ensures you are always tackling new challenges.
Non-technical tasks. This is a role for those who love coding and want to dedicate time to solving complex technical issues.

C# Developer key responsibilities

Solve the most difficult coding challenges and develop great software products that delight millions of customers.

Basic Requirements

5+ years of commercial software development experience
Experience in competitive programming proven by placement in ICPC, ICPF, TopCoder, or another renowned coding competition
Availability to work during US business hours

About Trilogy

Hundreds of software businesses run on the Trilogy Business Platform. For three decades, Trilogy has been known for 3 things: Relentlessly seeking top talent, Innovating new technology, and incubating new businesses. Our technological innovation is spearheaded by a passion for simple customer-facing designs. Our incubation of new businesses ranges from entirely new moon-shot ideas to rearchitecting existing projects for today's modern cloud-based stack. Trilogy is a place where you can be surrounded with great people, be proud of doing great work, and grow your career by leaps and bounds.

There is so much to cover for this exciting role, and space here is limited. Hit the Apply button if you found this interesting and want to learn more. We look forward to meeting you!

Working with Crossover

This is a full-time (40 hours per week), long-term position. The position is immediately available and requires entering into an independent contractor agreement with Crossover. The compensation level for this role is $100 USD/hour, which equates to $200,000 USD/year assuming 40 hours per week and 50 weeks per year. The payment period is weekly. Consult www.crossover.com/help-and-faqs for more details on this topic.

What to expect next:

You will receive an email with a link to start your self-paced, online job application.
Our hiring platform will guide you through a series of online “screening” assessments to check for basic job fit, job-related skills, and finally a few real-world job-specific assignments.

Important! If you do not receive an email from us:

First, emails may take up to 15 minutes to send, refresh and check again.
Second, check your spam and junk folders for an email from Crossover.com, mark as “Not Spam” since you will receive other emails as well.
Third, we will send to whatever email account you indicated on the Apply form - by default, that is the email address you use as your LinkedIn username and it might be different than the one you have already checked.
If all else fails, just reset your password by visiting https://www.crossover.com/auth/password-recovery if you already applied using LinkedIn EasyApply.
Crossover Job Code: LJ-4493-SG-Singapor-C#Developer.002"
"Software Engineer (Kubernetes Edge Platform), Infrastructure Engineering","Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

To support the content platform, ByteDance's infrastructure team is seeking experienced software engineers to build globally distributed edge platform for provisioning and deploying edge services. Our team operates a large network of POPs around the world that we use to accelerate site traffic and cache CDN content, on top of which we build the edge platform (PaaS) to allow edge services to be easily deployed around the world close to end users. We use Kubernetes to orchestrate various services with automatic deployment and scaling in order to maximize efficiency in daily management and operations. In addition, our team builds global and local load balancers, acceleration proxies, RPC frameworks, content delivery networks, and the automation machinery to operate an internet scale edge network and handle all of ByteDance's DNS and HTTP traffics.

Responsibilities

Build Kubernetes-based edge platform (PaaS) with cutting-edge Cloud Native Computing Foundation (CNCF) technologies.
Design pipelines and develop microservices for platform monitoring, alerting, logging, CI/CD, etc.
Improve Kubernetes system efficiency in networking, storage, scheduling domains.
Collaborate with open-source communities to advance edge computing technology.

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science or related major
Solid understanding in Kubernetes and Docker technology: production experience of creating and administrating Kubernetes based systems.
Experience with microservices, API design (REST and gRPC), and cloud-native application development.
Experience with one or more programming languages including Go, Python, JavaScript, and C++.
Experience working on Unix/Linux based platforms."
Lead iOS Developer,"Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of experience with iOS software development.
Experience managing engineering projects for quality and time to market.
Expertise in writing automated tests (Unit, Instrumentation, UI tests) and using testing tools / libraries for iOS.
Experience working in CI/CD pipelines.

Preferred Qualifications:
High proficiency in Swift: Objective C and iOS frameworks: UIKit, Combine
Experience with implementing software architecture and design patterns such as MVVM, MVC, etc.
Familiarity with RESTful APIs and ReactiveX Programming
Know how with AWS frameworks (Amplify, AppSync, Cognito, Pinpoint)

About the Job:
As a Lead iOS Developer, you will be helping to build the future of fan, community and brand engagement, content creation and distribution.

This will be a hands-on role that will involve technical planning and strategy, architectural decision making, research and code review. Successful candidates should have experience collaborating closely with product managers, designers and other non-engineering stakeholders.

You and your team would be responsible for developing in-house solutions to add new functionality to Zuju Digital’s line up of products, owning the experience from ideation to execution and maintenance.

Responsibilities:
Perform profiling to find bottlenecks and optimize performance, ensuring that performance metrics are set up and monitored.
Collaborate with platform leads and the product team to constantly improve customer experience within the application platform.
Contribute by creating a Release/Delivery Management practice and associated metrics.
Experience in optimizing and solidifying performance, security and stability throughout a codebase.
Influence technical decisions and designs whilst aligning best practices and technical standards."
"Senior Software Developer, Python","Senior Software Developer, Python

Description

My client is a globally renowned investment bank. They are offering a highly technical track to developers who would like to pursue a career in the technical domain.

You will participate in global agile development and interact with traders. You will be working on the existing legacy system and working on developing/migrating to the firm-wide strategic system. You will be working closely with sales and trading systems for all financial instruments across business lines.

Requirement

With a bachelor's degree in computer science or a related field, with 3-5 years of solid backend development experience (i.e., Python, Java, C#). You should also possess good written and verbal communication with a good ability to collaborate within a geographically distributed team.

To Apply

For interested candidates, please send your CV to ya@kerryconsulting.com. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Registration No: R1988390

Licence No: 16S806"
"Senior Engineer, SRE","Rakuten Group, Inc. is the largest e-commerce company in Japan, and third largest e-commerce marketplace company worldwide, with over 1.5 billion registered users worldwide. The Rakuten brand is recognized worldwide for its leadership and innovation, and provides a variety of consumer and business-focused services including e-commerce, e-reading, travel, banking, securities, credit card, e-money, portal and media, online marketing and professional sports. The company is expanding globally and currently has operations throughout Asia, Western Europe, and the Americas.

Rakuten Viki is a premier global entertainment streaming site where millions of people discover and consume primetime shows and movies subtitled in more than 200 languages, by our community of fans. With billions of videos viewed and more than 1 billion words translated, Viki brings global entertainment to fans everywhere!

We are in search of a Senior Engineer, SRE to join our team and support our business growth. This role will be based in Singapore and reporting to SRE Manager.

About the SRE Team:

The SRE team at Viki is responsible for building infrastructure for the large distributed components that run Viki. We develop and maintain services that power Viki's API and business intelligence, as well as make architecture changes to scale them. We handle everything from Performance engineering, Cost optimisation, Security, Reliability engineering to Configuration and deployment pipelines. We run our systems on GCP with GKE and our media pipeline on AWS. We also use Spinnaker, Cloudbuild, ELK, Postgresql, Redis to name a few tools.

Key Responsibilities:
Run Incident Management, Capacity Planning and SLO definition with various stakeholders
Keep using every opportunity to automate infrastructure tasks with Infrastructure as Code mindset
Work closely with developers to help build systems that abstract out infrastructure for the organisation
Instill a sense of current SRE principles into various development teams
Focus on non functional aspects obsessively such as security, performance and reliability
Ensure we are instilling security and budget management processes into the development cycle
Continuously improve our system, scale it to the next level and create guidelines for developers to follow

Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science/Engineering or equivalent
Minimum 5 years of experience in SRE or devops domain
Passion to build scalable systems and deliver top tier services with impact worldwide
We don't require experience in any particular technology, but you should have the ability to chew through difficult technical problems and gain insights from them
A solid foundation in understanding of practical operating system concepts around Linux/ Unix and grasp of basic networking are essential
Familiarity with Docker / Kubernetes or any equivalent systems is a must
Familiarity with either AWS or GCP or Azure is a must
Familiarity with IaC, CI/CD and Observability concepts & tools would be an added advantage
Experience in scaling systems or working with high scale systems is a must

Rakuten is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, color, ethnicity, ancestry, national origin, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, marital status or any legally protected status. Women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and protected veterans are encouraged."
Java Developer,"At AIA we’ve started an exciting movement to create a healthier, more sustainable future for everyone.

As pioneering innovators for over 100 years, we’re now transforming our organisation to be faster, simpler and more connected. Because we want to be even better equipped to develop digital solutions and experiences that help more people live Healthier, Longer, Better Lives.

To get there, we need people with tech/digital/analytics expertise and passion to help develop positive, sustainable change through digitally enhanced experiences that will impact the lives of millions of people and create a healthier future for everyone.

If you believe in developing a better tomorrow, read on.

WE ARE LOOKING FOR .....

A backend development of applications using Java and Microservices.

What You’ll Be Doing

Build the next generation Insurance platform using Java with microservices architecture.
Perform technical planning, architecture development and modification of specifications.
Work on enhancements related to Incidents and Problem tickets.
Work with technical team to support existing application and BAU related matter.
Develop specifications for new information technology products, applications and system service offerings.

We Are Looking For Someone With

Solid experience (min 5 yrs) of Core Java development (Spring/Quarkus).
Very good experience in SQL (PostgreSQL/MS SQL).
Strong experience in a Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) environment with strong appreciation of change/version control process and methodologies.
Worked with DevOps and Automation tools (E.g. Bamboo, Jenkins, Github, Bitbucket, Nexus, Jira, Confluence etc)
Experience with Docker/Kubernetes is an advantage.

About Aia

For over a century, AIA has served the ever-changing needs of our customers across Asia-Pacific. Our Purpose to help millions of people live Healthier, Longer, Better Lives is at the heart of everything we do.

As pioneering innovators, we’re now transforming AIA to be faster, simpler and more connected to create better solutions and impactful experiences for our customers and communities. AIA encourages and enables our people to act with clarity, courage and humanity in service of our Purpose.

OUR CULTURE

At AIA, we believe in empowering every one of our people to find their 'better' - in the work they do, the career they build, the life they live and the difference they make. Whether it’s investing in better wellbeing, building better relationships, or making a better impact on customers, a career at AIA will challenge you to find new ways to pursue your ‘better’.

AIA is committed to building a vibrant, diverse, and inclusive workforce for all employees to thrive in. Join us if you believe in creating a better tomorrow!


Build a career with us as we help our customers and the community live Healthier, Longer, Better Lives.

You must provide all requested information, including Personal Data, to be considered for this career opportunity. Failure to provide such information may influence the processing and outcome of your application. You are responsible for ensuring that the information you submit is accurate and up-to-date.



ABOUT AIA

For over a century, AIA has served the ever-changing needs of our customers across Asia-Pacific. Our Purpose to help millions of people live Healthier, Longer, Better Lives is at the heart of everything we do.
As pioneering innovators, we’re now transforming AIA to be faster, simpler and more connected to create better solutions and impactful experiences for our customers and communities. AIA encourages and enables our people to act with clarity, courage and humanity in service of our Purpose.

JOIN US

At AIA, we believe in empowering every one of our people to find their 'better' - in the work they do, the career they build, the life they live and the difference they make. Whether it’s investing better wellbeing, inspiring better learning, building better relationships, or making a better impact on customers, a career at AIA will challenge you to find new ways to pursue your ‘better’.
AIA is committed to building a vibrant, diverse, and inclusive workforce for all employees to thrive in. Join us if you believe in creating a better tomorrow!"
Data Scientist cum Engineer,"overseas MNC
joining asap
location: Suntec
with Spark devt experience

Job Scope:
You have a minimum of 5 years software experiences, where you would have understood the process of negotiating and unraveling the nitty gritty details of your customer or user’s datasets
You should have a good repertoire of software tools and programming languages to which you can apply to building an MVP or enterprise ready product
You have experience setting up Spark and using it for batch processing, and possibly streaming experience with Flink or Kafka.
Good to have experience with natural language processing
You should have good working knowledge about Machine Learning and or Deep Learning algorithms in the realm of supervised, unsupervised, reinforcement not limited to ANN, CNN, RNN, GAN
You should have good working knowledge in statistical classification domain eg. Logistic Regression, K-nn, Kernel SVM, Naïve Bayes, Decision Tree, Random Forest, Clustering domain e.g. K-means clustering, hierarchical clustering
You should have a good understanding of applying gradient boosting in regression and classification problems. E.g. XGBoost and in anomaly detection and outlier detection techniques e.g. DBSCAN, Gaussian Mixture Models
You would have working knowledge of Java & Python and you should be able to explain the underlying mechanics in addition to the theoretical Machine/Deep Learning model
You would have good working knowledge of the Machine Learning and Deep Learning toolkits available in OSS, commercial software
Worked in a squad or guild team setup and understand the agile processes, ceremonies and appreciates them
You are an open, strong communicator who communicates effectively across teams, locations and cultures, in-person and virtually
You are autonomous and know how to adapt quickly and drive change for the better
You bloom in a team and like working in a collaborative environment
You agree that data over opinion is a healthy and an important mentality


HOW TO APPLY:
If you are a team player, meticulous & organized, and more importantly, believe that YOU CAN MAKE A DIFFERENCE, we would like to hear from you. Simply submit your application with your updated Resume in MS Word Format to Zhao Zi Yuan Anna (EA Personnel Reg. No.: R22090617) by clicking the ‘Apply link’ / or call Consultant, Anna, at 6590 9966 for a confidential discussion.

Please indicate the below information in your resume:
· Current & Expected salary
· Reason(s) for leaving
· Notice Period / Availability to commence work

YOUR SUCCESS IS OUR ACHIEVEMENT!
Notice:
We regret that only short-listed candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence. By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read & agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration, and for our marketing EDMs which you may opt out by unsubscribing in the mailer. You may refer and access our website at www.achievegroup.asia/privacy-policy/ for more information. Cessation of Collection of full NRIC Numbers: In compliance with the Personal Data Protection Act and commitment to protect candidates’ personal data, Achieve Group will cease to collect, process or use full NRIC numbers during our screening and job application process. Kindly ensure your resumes provided to us does not contain your full NRIC number and full home address during your job application."
SAP ABAP Developer,"607629BR

Introduction

As an Application Developer, you will lead IBM into the future by translating system requirements into the design and development of customized systems in an agile environment. The success of IBM is in your hands as you transform vital business needs into code and drive innovation. Your work will power IBM and its clients globally, collaborating and integrating code into enterprise systems. You will have access to the latest education, tools and technology, and a limitless career path with the world’s technology leader. Come to IBM and make a global impact!

Your Role and Responsibilities

About You

You are someone we are looking for if you have the following expertise:
Experience in the SAP ABAP development, interface development, support project is required.
Proficient in ABAP, including Reporting, Interface, Conversion, Enhancement & Forms (RICEF) with exceptional functional knowledge in the area of FICO
Experience in web-service development and S/4 HANA.
Experience worked in BADI, BAPI, user exit, BTE, and FICO substitution.
Strong Exposure to tools such as Extended Program Check, Code Inspector, Dump analysis (ST22), Runtime Analysis (SE30), SQL Trace (ST05), ST12, SQL analysis, Work Process Overview, ATC for performance and quality management of ABAP programs.
Experience in TRFC, QRFC, Gateway Monitor, and OSS Note Analysis.
Working experience in LSMW, Data migration tool/Mass data management tool, CCLM process.
SAP IS-Healthcare knowledge is an added advantage

Desired Background

Degree in Computer Science or Information Technology or equivalent
At least 3 years of SAP ABAP experience
Must have experience in SAP FIORI (Enhancement and development); Core Data Services (CDS) (Enhancement and development with authorization); ABAP on HANA
Good to have experience in ABAP RESTful Application Programming Model (RAP); IDOC, Web Service and OData; SAP Workflow (Classic/Flexible); Standard Report (ALV, OOP)
Able to work independently and efficiently, manage timelines and user expectation, and produce high quality deliverables (documentation, presentations, and research)
Possess excellent verbal, written and presentation skills;
Ability to work collaboratively and productively with globally dispersed teams
Ability to manage ambiguity, yet producing tangible results

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

As shared above.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

As shared above.

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

Are you craving to learn more? Prepared to solve some of the world's most unique challenges? And ready to shape the future for millions of people? If so, then it's time to join us, express your individuality, unleash your curiosity and discover new possibilities.

Every IBMer, and potential ones like yourself, has a voice, carves their own path, and uses their expertise to help co-create and add to our story. Together, we have the power to make meaningful change – to alter the fabric of our clients, of society and IBM itself, to create a truly positive impact and make the world work better for everyone.

It's time to define your career.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Software Engineer (Backend),"Founded in 2019, Cake DeFi is a leading decentralised finance services provider and Southeast Asia’s fastest growing fintech platform. ""We Do Crypto. You Do You."" - Our vision is to become a one-stop platform for all crypto users to get easy access to DeFi and Web3 services. To date, more than 1 million users from over 190 countries trust us to manage over $1 billion in assets. We are a profitable, cashflow positive private rocket ship that's just getting ready for take-off. Join us.

Birthday Research

Birthday Research (BR) is our Blockchain Research and Development arm. Fuelled by the best minds in the industry, BR seeks to develop best-in-class blockchain innovations with the mission of enabling the next bound of Web3.

As a pioneering force, our work spans cryptographic research, deep blockchain consensus development, and smart contracts development — with a laser-sharp focus on driving the industry frontier while tackling the most demanding DeFi challenges of today. To date, one of our core contributions, DeFiChain, has garnered over 1 billion USD in total value locked on the layer-1 protocol.

We are a fast-growing, globally distributed, close-knit team of multi-disciplinary doers and getters. Join Birthday Research today to be a part of the driving force shaping the future of decentralization.

What You’ll Do
Collaborate with cross-functional teams and product managers to design and develop TypeScript based applications using Node.js.
Write highly performant codes that are clean, simple, maintainable, and battle-tested with test-driven development (TDD) for maximum test coverage automated from pull request all the way to release.
Design and develop highly distributed backend micro-services with the ability to scale to thousands of requests per second using cloud-native solutions.

What you’ll need:
Experience working in a fast pace tech-driven startup as a Software Engineer with at least 2 years of experience or in a similar capacity.
Strong proficiency in TypeScript or JavaScript software stack with experience developing highly scalable systems.
Familiar with distributed systems, database optimization, performance tuning, concurrency handling, and caching mechanisms.
Ability to take full ownership and work independently while collaborating with others in a fast-paced agile and async team.
A collaborative and resourceful individual with excellent communication skills able to make radical decisions while being empathetic and respectful.
Willingness to pick up new and emerging bleeding edge blockchain technologies.
Experience participating or maintaining in open source software development is highly preferred.
Deep technical understanding of blockchain technologies, cryptography, BIPs, DeFi, UTXO, EVM, or Nakamoto Consensus is highly preferred.

We want to transform and decentralise finance with tomorrow’s technology. This is where you come in. Join a company that is at the forefront of bleeding-edge innovations in blockchain and DeFi. You will be empowered to push boundaries and think out of the box. You will get to work with a bunch of ridiculously motivated and talented people. And most importantly, you'll have fun. The best places to work at, are often also the most fun to work at. That's us.

We hire based on merit, fit, and strong alignment to our culture. Our culture is defined by 7 team principles: Integrity, Resourcefulness, Ownership, Meritocratic Decision-making, Customer Obsession, Radical Candour, and Passion. These 7 principles guide our company, our people, and our work. At Cake DeFi, our culture is our pride. It has been instrumental to our success, so we are steadfast in our commitment to it. We welcome you to add to it."
Technical Lead Data Engineer,"Up to $170-180k + super + bonus

Multiple vacancies

This fast-growing global scale-up data analytics tech software company is seeking experienced Data Engineers to join their Singapore division.

You will be using the latest and leading open source big-data technologies, such as Spark, Hadoop, Scala and Elasticsearch, with our platform being hosted on Google cloud (GCP). With the help of these tools you will be required to deliver complex projects in enterprise companies, including major banks.

On a daily basis you will be managing, transforming, and cleansing high volume data, all to help our Tier 1 clients solve business problems in the area of fraud, compliance and financial crime. Whilst remaining hands-on, you will be providing technical leadership, mentor other Data Engineers and be responsible for project delivery.

Key Requirements:

• Extensive data engineering experience.
• Highly skilled with Big Data technologies, such as Spark, Hadoop and Elasticsearch.
• Comfortable programming in Scala.
• Experience mentoring and providing technical guidance to other Data Engineers.
• Experience delivering complex enterprise Agile data projects.
• Exceptional communication skills, including the ability to explain complex ideas to non-technical, and senior, stakeholders.
• A delivery / client-focused mindset."
Senior Software Engineer - Up to $250 000 SGD!,"Job title: Senior Software Engineer
Client: Hedge Fund - Award winning, tech focused run by passionate Computer Scientists
Salary: Up to $250 000 + package + offers an exceptional guaranteed bonus
Location: Singapore(relaxed/flexible working)

Responsibilities
Take responsibility for ownership of the full development lifecycle, all the way from product, design, and implementation, to testing, deployment and monitoring
Design, implement, test and deploy high performance backend systems and services
Improve the scalability, reliability, security, and performance of our platform
Qualifications
3+ years of software engineering experience, ideally in Java, C++, C#, Python, or Go
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science or related field or experience
Track record of building and working with complex backend systems
Perks
Best compensation in the market (20-30% more than FAANG or XXXX offer guaranteed)
Unique opportunity to build the company and infrastructure that powers this emerging asset class.
Software Engineers are treated as the companies #1 asset

📧 Interested in applying? Please click on the ‘Easy Apply’ button. or contact me at song@hunterbond.com"
Test Automation Engineer with Java,"Project Description
We are looking for a QA Automation with Java Engineer to join in Credit Risk Monitoring Solution within the Wealth Management business. In this role, you will be key member in implementing automated software test procedures. Besides, you will be highlighting problem areas and suggesting good solution leveraging from past experience to address bugs that hinder software delivery effectively.

Responsibilities
QA to work on Testing Automation using Java 8 or above
Key member in implementing automated software test procedures.
Besides, you will be highlighting problem areas and suggesting good solution leveraging from past experience to address bugs that hinder software delivery effectively.
Design test automation architecture of client applications for cross-platform and technologies such as UI, REST/SOAP API and backend automation especially on microservices.
Integrate QA Automation into the build and deploy pipelines supporting a drive towards CI/CD using Jenkins.
Experience with source code management and build process for building and maintaining automation libraries such as JUnit framework and build tools such as Maven
Evaluate and Implement new software test automation tools and tooling standards
Understand what test plan and test strategy are on project - testing process, testing types and technics, etc.
Provide review and analysis on functional requirement and specification
Estimate own activities based on main test estimation methods, and prioritize own tasks
Execute test cases, report defects and perform root cause analysis on issues
Plan own tasks according to project schedule, perform primary testing tasks without supervision
Collaborate with end users for acceptance test activities
Work independently while in close collaboration with others in the team and across projects

Skills
Must have
5+ years of experience
Degree in Computer Science or equivalent/higher.
In-depth work experience as a QA Engineer, QA Tester, or relevant position in the IT department.
Good understanding of automation systems and databases.
Strong analysis and design skills; Test Driven Development, strong unit and integration testing experience.
Good experience in Java 8+, Gitlab, Gradle, Intellij.
Good experience in Agile, SCRUM, independent, motivated, reliable and organized.
Strong communication skills and good command of English.
Excellent technical writing skills.
Strong ability to debug code, analyze failures and trace defects to root cause
Strong interpersonal communication skills and a successful team player.
Ability to interpret, evaluate and communicate detailed information. Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and meet deadlines.
Extensive experience in Developing, Executing and Maintaining Test Plan, Test Strategy, Test Scenarios and Test Cases and Reporting system
Understanding of project and requirement documentation, experienced in requirement testing and clarification, and static testing
Intermediate skills in test case design, workload estimation and test execution, and be able to create good quality testing artifacts - test cases, test result reports
Experienced in different types of testing - functional testing, non-functional testing, SIT, UAT, etc.
Nice to have
Hands on experience on Kafka & Azure certified

Languages: English: C1 Advanced
Seniority: Senior"
Full Stack Engineer,"⚡Senior Full Stack Engineer
📍Remote
💼Permanent role
💵Competitive Package

Our client is a well-funded, cross-border payments company that leverages on blockchain technology.

We are hiring a Senior Full Stack Engineer remotely to join their team of high-performing technical professionals. They are looking for someone who is passionate about technology and would work well with the team to help drive and oversee the delivery of the platform.
📌 Responsibilities
✅ Develop company's web application portal for partners and customers
✅ Work closely with remote teams to ensure smooth integration and onboarding of clients into the company's network
✅ Contribute and help improve company's existing core services to stay competitive in the market
📌 Requirements
✅ React, Java and Spring Boot Framework
✅ AWS Services
✅ MySQL, Postgres
✅ CI/CD tools
✅ Writing Unit tests

📧 Interested in applying? Please click on the ‘Easy Apply’ button. Alternatively, send your resume to neil.engay@storm2.com for more info or to have a confidential conversation.


⚡ Storm2 is a specialist FinTech recruitment firm with clients across Europe, APAC, and North America. To discuss open opportunities or career options, please visit our website at storm2.com and follow the Storm2 LinkedIn page for the latest jobs and intel."
Software Engineer in Test,"Job Reference #

266102BR

Job Type

Full Time, Part Time

Your role

Do you rigorously test every application, before handing it over to production? We are looking for someone with that passion who can help us define the product test strategy and own the delivery of automation testing for the best UX and Production stability:

The candidate would:


analysis and review of the requirement for the tested system/application
define and own the automation test strategy and test automation framework
develop and promote best practices in test automation and ensure their adoption among all teams
develop a set of metrics for automation testing for each release, and define and produce status reports for the management
create and maintain automation scripts and enhance existing scripts
collaborate with Business & IT SMEs to troubleshoot issues
defect management – bug reporting, retesting and tracking till the closure

Your team

You'll be working in the Be a Client Stream, Client Contract & Sign Crew, supporting our newly created chapters to embed the unified model of Agile@UBS and take our platform to next Level.

Your expertise


have 5+ years of hands-on experience pre-dominantly in the area of Quality Assurance (QA) and test automation
experience in developing automated solutions for integration and regression testing
hands-on experience in testing distributed server-side applications
experience in collaboration tools and processes: Jira, Gitlab
aware of latest trending best practices, tools, techniques, tips, and tricks in automation testing
experience in creation and execution of automation testing strategies and framework
experience in Java, REST and API testing tools
experience in Manual, integration and E2E testing

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Senior C++ Developer,"Our client is a wealth management and investment advice firm that provides trading, fundamental stock analysis, investment strategies, financial planning, and consulting services. They are looking for highly skilled and experienced C++ Developer to join their Front Office Development teams. We are looking for candidates who enjoy solving problems and optimizing code for the continuous improvement of performance, functionality and stability of a system.

You will be joining team who:
focused on building a state-of-the-art next generation latency sensitive trading platform.
dedicated to building and delivering the best real-time market data solutions to our Portfolio Managers.
focused on developing and supporting the buildout of a crossing platform front the engine to the algo wheel.

Responsibilities:
You will participate in the buildout of best-in-class platforms across market data, trading and crossing engines.
You will participate in an Agile working model, continuously improving and expanding platform capabilities based on rapidly changing business requirements as well as providing Level 3 support.
You will help in the onboarding and integration of portfolio managers to the platform.

Requirements:
Expert C++ development experience
Expertise in building and developing electronic trading systems, market data systems or crossing engines
Experience with Linux servers and relational databases
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal
Experience with low latency systems and equity trading
Experience with Python
Experience and knowledge of Cloud services such as AWS, Azure, etc.
Knowledgeable on DevOps methodologies such as CI/CD and build automation

If you think you are a strong candidate for this exciting role, please do send your CV to jackie@gritsearch.com and I would love to have a chat with you. Referrals are welcome and greatly appreciated."
Back End Developer,"Roles & Responsibilities:
Must have experience in Python and C# Dotnet core
Must have experience in React, Microservices, PostgreSQL
Experience with developing on AWS, knowledge of S3, API Gateway, etc.
Experience with REST APIs and GRPC protocol
Experience with TDD and Test Automation
Experience with Docker and containerization
Problem solving and logical thinking.
Familiar with SDLC cycle for development and bug fixing.
Able to provide documentation support e.g. in technical/functional specifications.
Experience in data analysis.
Able to manage data reconciliation/quality checks (implementation, monitoring and troubleshooting).
Able to perform system/user testing.
Able to manage SLA and queries from end users."
Java Software Engineer,"Top tech-driven FX solutions specialist firm is seeking to make a strategic hire for a Java developer who is open to a new challenge and enjoy working on interesting projects.

You will be coming on board within an agile team, and building out their in-house trading system, while partaking in scaling the firm's next phase of growth.

Requirements:
BS in Computer Science or a related field
Proficiency in one of the following: Java and Spring framework"
DevOps Engineer/Sr. DevOps Engineer,"Responsibilities:
• Troubleshoot production systems and resolve issues.
• Create, debug and optimize the automation script; and automate the daily routine tasks.
• Assist in conducting evaluations on new technologies and creating POC to showcase the solutions.
• Analyze and deploy the new business requirements as and when there are updates.
• Build Docker image(s) and facilitate container deployments using Kubernetes or similar tools.
• Any other ad-hoc matters as assigned.

Requirements:
• Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science or relevant qualification(s).
• Experience as a DevOps Engineer with strong knowledge of process automation and DevOps’ best practices.
• Experienced in architecture implementation and in container technologies like Docker.
• Possess hands-on experience in implementation of new technology and process improvement.
• Highly organized and detail-oriented.


Best Regards


Geetali Rastogi

EA License Number: 19C9859 | Registration Number: R1108137"
Software Engineer C/C++,"We are looking for a Software Engineer (C/C++) to join my client, a global technology and engineering leader in the Cyber security department.

Responsibilities:
Create action plans to handle resources, technical assessment and support for projects/Maintenance
Evaluate technical issues and challenges
Identify root causes and resolve technical issues
Lead projects /maintenance Systems and coordinate all team members to ensure workflow is on track
Properly maintain, file and store paperwork related to projects
Facilitate Maintenance Systems’ fulfilment and compliance by working with back-end support
Collaborate with Service Partners and contractors for the project/Maintenance Systems’ fulfilment
Responsible for Monthly Report and Fault management
Qualifications and Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree or Diploma in the field of Electrical or Electronic Engineering, Computer Science, Information Technology, or connected fields
Understanding on Programming skills/experience in C/C++
Soft skills – problem solving, communication and teamwork skills
Junior post is considered as there will be a product-specific and on-job trainings to be provided
Singaporeans only

If this is a position of interest, please apply!
EA License: 20S0080 CEI Reg Nu.: CEI: R1989346"
Software Engineer (Distributed Storage System) - Cloud Infrastructure,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.

We are looking for a Distributed Storage System Software Engineer who is experienced in designing and developing several software systems described below.
- Object Storage Service: Store objects like pictures, videos, documents, etc. (Requires object storage design and development experience).
- HDFS: As a traditional storage product in the BigData area, we re-design and implement HDFS with C++. So far, it's supporting not only Data Platform, but also Advertisement, Machine Learning, and Search services. (Requires a solid technical foundation in distributed storage systems. Big Data experience will be a plus.)
- ByteStore: A shared storage system, the underlying platform of our storage systems, supports applications such as object, block, table, file, etc.


Responsibilities
- Design and develop innovative distributed storage systems, including but not limited to Object Storage, HDFS, ByteStore;
- Continuously improve the storage system in terms of stability, scalability, functionality and performance according to business requirement;
- Formulate development goals according to the project schedule, write detailed design documents and be responsible for module implementation, performance tuning, and functional testing;
- Provide timely technical support for online applications, extract potential needs and points of optimization from it, and continuously optimize the system.

Qualifications

- Bachelor's or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields;
- Familiar with C++/Golang/Java/Python program development (at least one), pursue high-quality code and focus on code engineering quality;
- Familiar with Linux system, with high proficiency in multi-threading, network programming, and distributed development in any programming language;
- Strong understanding of database principles, proficient in key technologies of distributed storage and computing, and possess practical experience with them;
- Good at independent thinking, able to find problems proactively, and have systematic problem analysis and problem solving skills.

Preferred Qualifications
- At least 3 years of relevant experience;
- Familiar with large-scale distributed storage system design and implementation, such as HDFS/Ceph/S3/OSS/EBS;
- Contributor/Committer of the open-source community is a plus."
Software Developer (C++),"A US trading firm is looking to expand their software engineering team in Singapore and you'll dive deep into the world of C++, OS internals, CPU architecture, and networking hardware and protocols. And you will be surrounded by amazing developers who are honing their skills every day. This is a great opportunity to work on the latest technologies, be part of a relatively new team in Singapore and enjoy a flat culture with above-market staff benefits.

You should have;

More than 5 years of experience in application development and enterprise software design
Secure in knowledge of C++ 11/14/17
Multi-threading & concurrency
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Knowledge of UNIX operating systems (Linux), system/processor performance, and network communication

If you are interested to find out more, drop me your number and CV to isabelle.ho@hudson.com. Should this not be a fit to what you're looking for, happy to have a confidential chat about how I can help in your next move.


Isabelle Ho|18S9265|#R1879966|Hudson Global Resources Pte Ltd"
"Software Engineer/ Senior Engineer, Enterprise IT","The Defence Science and Technology Agency (DSTA) brings you to the forefront of cybersecurity, digital transformation and engineering. From working on software development and systems integration to unmanned technologies and artificial intelligence, you can have an impact on Singapore’s defence.

Achieve your fullest potential with opportunities to build your technical expertise and hone your competencies in diverse domains. You can also expect an immersive learning experience, where you will work with bright minds and collaborate with global industry experts.

DSTA is recognised as one of the top 10 employers in the Engineering & IT sector, where our engineers and IT professionals work alongside procurement specialists to deliver state-of-the-art capabilities for Singapore’s peace and security.

Internship opportunities and a meaningful career await you.

Learn more about DSTA at https://www.dsta.gov.sg .

Opportunity
The Enterprise IT Programme Centre is looking for software engineers to deliver MINDEF/SAF digitalisation initiatives. You will be part of our engineering teams harnessing digital technologies and driving meaningful initiatives to transform MINDEF/SAF business processes and digital experience.

This role will require you to:

Adopt design thinking and user-centric approach to work with business stakeholders and ground users to elicit latent needs and business requirements.
Conduct market research, identify and propose technical solutions and perform trade-off analysis.
Work with engineering teams to ensure technical solutions adhere to standards, personal data and security policies
Work with vendor and ICT service providers in systems development, enhancement and maintenance
Perform user acceptance and usability tests
Gather user feedback, identify and plan for continuous improvements for IT solutions
Ensure that systems implemented comply with organization’s governance and compliance policies and procedures such as IT management, quality management and IT security.

Requirements
Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Computer Engineering, or related fields
3 years or more experience in designing, development and supporting web and mobile experience for IT solutions. Fresh graduates are welcome to apply too.
Experience in web applications, cybersecurity, open source technologies, CI/CD, cloud technologies.
Possess strong understanding of software life cycle models as well as in-depth knowledge of agile or traditional project management principles and practices.
Familiar with design and architecture patterns and application security standards"
Lead Frontend Engineer,"About Daraz
Founded in 2015, Daraz is South Asia’s leading e-commerce platform in Pakistan, Bangladesh, Sri Lanka, Nepal and Myanmar. It empowers more than 100,000 active sellers with world-class marketplace technology to reach the fast-growing consumer class in a region of 500 million people. Through Daraz Express and Daraz Pay, it operates the most efficient and digitalised logistics and payments infrastructure in its markets. Daraz’ vision is to be a champion of South Asia serving 100 million customers and businesses by 2030.

For more information, please visit www.daraz.com

Job Description:

Your role is to:
Working in Daraz E-Commerce End2End flow
Developing new user-facing features
Building reusable components and front-end libraries for future use

A bit about you:
Strong proficiency in JavaScript, CSS, HTML and other frontend technology
Thorough understanding of at least one of popular frontend framework and it's core principle
Familiarity with modern front-end build pipelines and tools
Familiarity with code versioning tools such as Gitlab and Github
Built frontend common modules/libraries or finish at least one project as the main frontend contributor
Strong logical thinking, willing to explore; taking the ownership, great team player
Ability to read Chinese documentation is a plus

What we offer:
An international working environment in a start-up setting, and a unique opportunity to learn from the best in e-commerce (Alibaba Group) and business growth.
A platform to learn from Alibaba’s world-leading ecosystem
Rigorous training and exposure in team management, leadership, business analytics, and operations.
An opportunity to train the next generation of business leaders in the ‘tech’ industry.
Competitive salary and incentive package"
"Lead Front End Engineer, Vue.js (Bangkok, Relocation)","Manatal is an AIbased recruitment software company based in Bangkok, Thailand. Our mission is to offer an easy-to-use software to empower small, medium and large companies in their staffing & recruitment transformation.

Our goal is simple: to provide solutions to the recruitment world's difficulties and make the entire process simple and enjoyable for recruiters, hiring managers, and candidates alike.
Globally trusted by thousands of companies in over 130 countries, Manatal's growth goes hand in hand with our client's own. We're passionate about developing solutions for the changes they encounter and filling the recruitment gap with innovative tech implementation.

Role
We're looking for an outstanding Vue.js Engineer to work with a frontend team in the continued development of a wide range of features and services within the recruitment sphere.
As the team's Lead front-end Engineer, you will play a critical role in bridging the gap between the business and development ends of our software as a service (SaaS). This means that you will enjoy a high level of involvement and direct hands-on experience in the planning and development of new and exciting features from inception to deployment.
Our ideal candidate is one who is passionate about building elegant and scalable software and combines superb communication skills and analytical capabilities with a demonstrated ability to get the right things done quickly and effectively.

Responsibilities
Plan and implement key tasks for existing and new features
Review, merge and deploy code submitted by other frontend team members
Be prepared to quickly and efficiently investigate, debug, and resolve unforeseen front-end issues.
Coordinate with the frontend engineers, testers, and project managers about the status and direction of ongoing projects
Define and refine the direction of Manatals front end architecture

Technical Requirements
You have 2+ years of experience in building single-page applications using React, Angular, or Vue (we use Vue.js)
You have high code quality standards and a good knowledge of engineering best practices
You have built mobile-responsive web applications
You have exceptional proficiency with CSS and you are someone that has a passion for crafting beautiful User Interfaces and User Experiences
You have excellent design skills and an exceptional eye for details
Experience and fluency using Github within a collaborative work environment
Experience building user interface based on material UI is a big plus

Non-technical Requirements
Bachelor's degree or higher in computer science or related field
You are a highly motivated individual that thrives in fast-paced environments
Ability to communicate and comprehend high-level spoken and written concepts in English
Possesses a strong sense of ownership and accountability for each project undertaken
Passionate about automation and optimization in daily tasks
A strong proponent of the Don't Repeat Yourself (DRY) principle
Open-minded, confident, humble, self-managing, and a solid team player
Patient and consistent when mentoring or guiding team members

What You'll Get
A competitive salary and many new opportunities
More responsibilities and greater recognition for the work you do
The opportunity to be a part of a lively and international development team
A pioneering mindset shaped by a challenging and innovative work environment

Get to know more about us and our product: www.manatal.com
Demo Video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xlJAk71H-_s
**Interested candidates can apply via this link: https://www.careers-page.com/manatal/job/XRWY8R"
"Senior Software Architect, Trilogy (Remote) - $800,000/year USD","Crossover is the world's #1 source of full-time remote jobs. Our clients offer top-tier pay for top-tier talent. We're recruiting this role for our client, Trilogy. Have you got what it takes?

Zero politics, no office or travel, hardly any meetings. Senior technical architects at Trilogy focus on what really matters, without the BS. They make foundational, strategic—yet deeply technical—decisions that determine the success of our software products. They are responsible for identifying which decisions will have the greatest impact.

Trilogy thinks big. Whether adopting fully-remote work over 10 years ago or pioneering cloud-based charging engines for telcos, we aren’t afraid to make huge bets. We own over 100 SaaS products in our ever-growing portfolio and have an endless supply of technical challenges. Superior technical designs always outweigh cost considerations and we expect our team to make important decisions that will give our products a technical advantage for the next decade.

Join us to earn $400/hour for up to 40 hours per week while expanding your technical abilities, impacting millions of users, and having full control over when and where you work. You will collaborate with an asynchronous, fully-remote team of technical experts who are pushing the boundaries of what is possible with the latest cloud tech.

What You Will Be Doing

Creating, reimagining, and rearchitecting a virtually endless supply of software products by identifying patterns in complex systems and finding ways to make them 10x simpler
Making foundational technical architecture decisions that will give our products a competitive advantage for the next decade
Leveraging the full array of AWS products, without cost constraints

What You Won’t Be Doing

Navigating internal politics to push forward your technically superior architecture
Spending your day in meetings, creating slide decks, and managing other people
Traveling

Senior Software Architect Key Responsibilities

Make clear, simple, and technically superior design decisions
Apply an exceptionally high-quality bar to the core technical design decisions - data structures, algorithms, architectural patterns, and the leverage of third-party implementations
Utilize other architects as force multipliers, mentoring them by providing high-quality feedback on their work
Synthesize your decisions and designs into clear and structured written specs

Basic Requirements

At least 15 years of experience making important architecture and design decisions on software projects, such as the application of architecture design patterns or significant open source technologies
2+ years of experience making technical design decisions involving the use of cloud computing services
Experience working as a senior influencer on complex software systems
Ability to simplify complex ideas and communicate them in writing with clear, logical thinking

About Trilogy

Hundreds of software businesses run on the Trilogy Business Platform. For three decades, Trilogy has been known for 3 things: Relentlessly seeking top talent, Innovating new technology, and incubating new businesses. Our technological innovation is spearheaded by a passion for simple customer-facing designs. Our incubation of new businesses ranges from entirely new moon-shot ideas to rearchitecting existing projects for today's modern cloud-based stack. Trilogy is a place where you can be surrounded with great people, be proud of doing great work, and grow your career by leaps and bounds.

There is so much to cover for this exciting role, and space here is limited. Hit the Apply button if you found this interesting and want to learn more. We look forward to meeting you!

Working with Crossover

This is a full-time (40 hours per week), long-term position. The position is immediately available and requires entering into an independent contractor agreement with Crossover. The compensation level for this role is $400 USD/hour, which equates to $800,000 USD/year assuming 40 hours per week and 50 weeks per year. The payment period is weekly. Consult www.crossover.com/help-and-faqs for more details on this topic.

What to expect next:

You will receive an email with a link to start your self-paced, online job application.
Our hiring platform will guide you through a series of online “screening” assessments to check for basic job fit, job-related skills, and finally a few real-world job-specific assignments.

Important! If you do not receive an email from us:

First, emails may take up to 15 minutes to send, refresh and check again.
Second, check your spam and junk folders for an email from Crossover.com, mark as “Not Spam” since you will receive other emails as well.
Third, we will send to whatever email account you indicated on the Apply form - by default, that is the email address you use as your LinkedIn username and it might be different than the one you have already checked.
If all else fails, just reset your password by visiting https://www.crossover.com/auth/password-recovery if you already applied using LinkedIn EasyApply.
Crossover Job Code: LJ-3686-SG-SouthWes-SeniorSoftware"
DevOps Engineer,"⚡ DevOps Engineer (Crypto)
📍 Singapore (100% remote)
💼 Permanent role
💵 Competitive Salary

Organization
My client is a globally-leading, culture-driven DEX built on DAO architecture - they're expanding despite the current crypto winter, and have been smashing targets since their inception in 2017.

They are now looking to onboard a DevOps Engineer to design and build cloud infrastructure within a high-performing engineering team.

What you'll do
✅ Design, build and support Ethereum L1/L2
✅ Oversee Docker/Rancher stack deployment and maintenance
✅ Take charge of system incident management (network, security, storage, database)
✅ Coordinate with engineering team to automate, improve CI/CD pipelines

Must-haves
✅ >2yrs exp in DevOps
✅ Tech stack: Kubernetes/Docker, Rancher, Prometheus, Python, AWS (GitHub deployment)
✅ Keen interest in Web3/Crypto/Blockchain/DeFi
✅ Bilingual - fluent in English and Mandarin

🌏 The role is remote.

📧 Interested in applying? Click on 'Easy Apply' or email me at saywei.tan@storm2.com for a confidential chat.

⚡ Storm2 is a specialist FinTech recruitment firm with clients across Europe, APAC, and North America. To discuss open opportunities or career options, please visit our website at storm2.com and follow the Storm2 LinkedIn page for the latest jobs and intel."
QA Automation Test Engineer (SDET) 2270,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Main Responsibilities
Take ownership of leading the quality of an assigned project and its features.
Coordinate the execution of automated tests with a project’s testing cadence.
Functional/ Regression testing verification.
Requirement and test analysis.
Test design and test case review.
API and backend testing.
Data analytics testing.
UI and UX analysis and testing.
Communicate with stakeholders and teammates of testing status and results.
Contribute to collaboration with test automation team to continuously expand test coverage.
Contribute to test case prioritization for manual and automated testing prioritization.
Contribute to optimizing test case prioritization to increase testing velocity.
Contribute to Global QA org’s continuous improvement and project team’s quality process.
Should have worked on Automation Tests for desktop based application.
Qualifications And Profile
Good Knowledge of programming languages like Java, JavaScript and HTML
Good to have knowledge on Banking or Finance.
Expertise in automation testing tools like Selenium, Auto IT, Rest Assured , Cypress and Cucumber
Takes initiative to chase down answers.
Hands on knowledge of desktop based app and its automation
Able to adapt to changing business and project priorities.
Proactive in bringing solutions to observed gaps in requirements and process.
Proactive in test planning, able to identify and breakout tasks based on a test plan.
Able to prioritize and execute QA tasks with minimal supervision.
Execute tasks from QA lead or above.
Mentor and guide junior level Associate QA Engineers and QA Engineers.
Perform root cause analysis.
Install and/or configure tests for systems.
Optimize test cases for higher efficiency, especially for specific changes in code or features.
Test client-server interaction.
Test user behavior analytics.
Analyze and test UI and UX requirements.
JIRA and Confluence
Nice to have
Automation test result analysis and investigation of failures.
Perform change impact analysis.
Perform risk-based test analysis.
Bonus skills and tools knowledge:
GitHub and Bitbucket
Docker
Postman
Jenkins CI
Node.js & Selenium WebDriverIO
JavaScript
Kubernetes
Xray test case management tools
Education & Work Experience
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent working experience.
4 or more years of experience as a QA Engineer.

Desired Skills and Experience
Cucumber, Confluence, Automation Testing, Node.js, Regression Testing, Root Cause Analysis, JavaScript, UI, API testing, Test Cases, Test Automation, JIRA, Functional Testing, Selenium, Docker, Java, X-ray, UX, Testing, Test Planning"
Senior Full Stack JavaScript Developer,"Viseo APAC is continuously growing a team that have passion in Full Stack Development using cutting edge technologies in the Web App. We are looking for a Senior Developer that has experience in variety of domain ..(Financial, Banking, Retail) to join our team in APAC Region.

Your responsibilities will be to:
Participate in the full development lifecycle including design, estimation, planning, development, unit test, release and implementation support.
Maximizes team performance through collaboration and delegating based on team members strengths.
Participate in Agile Projects
Project manage resources and delivery of business implementation successfully.
Engage clients & prospects and conduct technical presentation meetings.
Design and conceptualize business solutions to match client needs
Capture, understand and analyze client user requirements and objectives
Engage internal implementation team on client requirements and solution design
Create and implement good practice of coding, testing and deploying
Document solution for IT and client reference
Assure code review
Practice TDD and BDD for code test
Utilize CI/CD process
Conduct training on implemented solution
Continually improve knowledge and expertise

Your Profile:
Degree in Computer Science or related course
Expert with JavaScript using Framework such as Vue.JS or React JS or Angular v.7,8,9
Good understanding or experienced with backend technology such as NodeJS
Experience working for Multi-region/Global project
Worked with distributed team and Agile environment
Experience with client facing role
Experience with modern system architecture
Excellent verbal communication skills.
Good problem-solving skills.
Attention to detail."
"Application Engineer - Java, Linux and SQL- Only Singaporean","Hiring for E2OPEN

Position: Application Engineer (Customer Success)
Experience: 3 years & above
Work Location: Singapore
Only Singaporeans/ Holding PR

Job overview:
Role: Configuration and customized E2open Intelligent Application Suite
Mandatory Skills: Software Analysis, Design and Development using J2EEApp
Expertise: Core Java, JSP, XML, Hibernate & Java scripts) and Oracle database (PL/SQL), Unix and Shell Scripting

Key Responsibilities:
•Provide solution consultation to customer in addressing business and technical challenges to achieve customer’s business success.
•Be a subject matter expert of e2open intelligent application product suite.
•You will work on complex issue troubleshooting, investigation, replicating, root cause analysis and fixing application code defects found in production environment in collaboration with project leads, architects, testers and customer.
•Support the test design, functional testing, and user acceptance testing of production defect fixes.
•Ensure fixes are delivered to meet/exceed customer expectations in a timely manner.
•Plan and perform solution deployment and application maintenance in company’s hosting environment, adhering to standards and best practices.
•Plan and manage business solutions transition from project delivery team to Customer Success organization.
•Ensure an incident ticket/problem ticket/change ticket is being resolved/executed as per the SLA.
•Provide on-call support as part of a global engineering team.

Requirements:
•3+ years’ experience in a software development/consulting role, preferably in comprehensive eBusiness and Supply Chain Solutions
•2+ years’ experience in Software Analysis, Design and Development using J2EE technology stacks (Core Java, JSP, XML, Hibernate& Java scripts) and Oracle database (PL/SQL)
•1+ years’ working knowledge of Unix and Shell Scripting
•Understanding of development methodologies, version control and configuration management.
•Analytical and problem-solving skills with strong attention to detail.
•Exceptional verbal and written communications skills
•Excellent interpersonal & planning skills and cross-group coordination at all levels
•Skilled in IT problem diagnosis and resolution.
•A fundamental understanding of IT service management and the ITIL business process.
•Must be able to work well both in a team environment and independently under minimal supervision.
•He/she has the ability to work in a fast-paced environment as well as multitask and re-prioritize on a regular basis.
•Outstanding organizational and time management skills
•Bachelor’s Degree in computer science, or equivalent Preferred/optional

Skills:
•Supply-chain domain experience implementing and integrating Supply Chain solutions
•Experience in the integration, deployment, or support of an ERP, SCM, or similar systems from SAP"
Undergrad Program/ Job Seekers/ Open To Work,
Full Stack (MERN) Engineer,"Responsibilities:
Work cross-functionally across product, design and engineering to develop internal product
Contribute quality code across the full-stack in developing and rolling out new features
Authoring functional and integration tests to ensure features meet product requirements
Tackle bugs and troubleshoot production issues for different platforms in tandem with operations

What We’d Like You To Have:
At least 2 to 4 years of experience in full-stack MERN development
Proficient in Javascript / Typescript
Experience building responsive single-page application
Extensive knowledge of a backend Stack like Javascript, Nodejs, Typescript, Mongoose, MongoDB, PostgreSQL and Redis
Experience working with Frontend tools and technologies like React, Redux, JavaScript, HTML and CSS and/or SCSS, JSON and JWT
Experience consuming and/or designing RESTful APIs
Experience with large-scale application development (e.g. microservice architectures)
Experience using AWS, Azure or GCP (AWS preferred)"
Blockchain Application Engineer - Defi Blockchain Protocol,"Our client, who is a Decentralised Exchange, is currently looking for Senior Blockchain Application Professionals as part of their rapid expansion plans in the APAC region. With their strong regional presence, this is a great opportunity to partner with senior blockchain experts across the APAC region, and provide significant contributions to the defi blockchain protocol that they are currently working on. We are looking for Blockchain Application Engineering professionals with strong experience working on Crypto/Blockchain-related products.

Responsibilities:

Responsible for implementing and maintenance of the match node (L3 matchmaking) for trustless transactions.
Coordinate the implementation of Zero-Knowledge (ZK) Proofs and ZK circuits to create the transactions.
Utilising the Blockchain Layer 3 concepts, successfully implement the L3 matchmaking consensus.
Support the development of zero-knowledge proof, DApp integration and design integration.

Requirements:

Curiously passionate about Blockchain, Cryptography and related technologies.
Strong competence in algorithmic and programming skills, particularly with Go Programming Language, Golang Channel & Golang Lock.
Must have working experience in Kafka, MySQL and/or Redis
3 years and above of Go / Java development experience.
Experience with database operations such as MySQL and Redis.
Preferably understand and have written smart contract protocols using Solidity.
Preferable experience with developing Trading related systems and products.

Selby Jennings is a Trading Style of Phaidon International (License number 16S8194)"
Software Engineer (Distributed Graph Database) - Cloud Infrastructure,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.

The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.

Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!


Responsibilities
- Participate in the architecture design of distributed graph-databases. Responsible for the R&D of distributed query engines and distributed storage engines;
- Combined with graph models to provide better solutions for social networking, recommendation, and knowledge graphs under massive concurrent query requests.

Qualifications

- Bachelor's/Master's Degree in Computer Science or related major;
- Familiar with C ++, Go or other mainstream programming languages, and have high-performance service R&D experience;
- Familiar with Linux system principles, understand the system structure or distributed system knowledge;
- Familiar with TAO, Dragon, neo4j, JanusGraph graph database or graph query engine implementation.

Preferred Qualifications
- At least 3 years of relevant experience."
"Software Engineer #Tomcat, Weblogic, Websphere #Data Warehousing","Budget strictly 5k - 7k (depends on experience) 
overseas MNC
Office: CBD


Responsibilities

Drive the installation, customization and configuration of Actimize products and provide technical assistance to Actimize clients
Self-starter that can navigate complex requirements and independently execute projects in large enterprise organizations
Understand and explain functionality of Actimize products to business users
Coach client in detailed data requirements for Actimize package
Assist clients in developing ETL and help perform data validation activities
Support users through testing, UAT and product acceptance phases
Act as liaison between the customer, IT and Actimize R&D sites across the globe
Work a considerable amount of time at customer sites, mostly in Singapore, however there is a need for periodical travel

Desired Skills and Experience

Qualifications

Databases: SQL Skills (Oracle, SQLServer) or Data Warehousing, ETL
Operating systems: Windows and Linux
Programming language: Java Script, Shell Scripting, Java
Web Technologies: HTML, XML, XSL
Application Servers: Tomcat, Weblogic, Websphere
Excellent communication skills
Good written and spoken English
Pro-active and Team Oriented approach
5+ years’ experience with a Software Company or in a consulting role
Cloud SAAS or Software as a service (SAAS) experience is a PLUS.
Actimize experience is a PLUS
Business analyst skills
Ability to travel
Domain knowledge background in realms of Anti Money laundering, Trading Surveillance and Fraud Prevention is good to have
Previous experience in financial industry



HOW TO APPLY:
If you are a team player, meticulous & organized, and more importantly, believe that YOU CAN MAKE A DIFFERENCE, we would like to hear from you. Simply submit your application with your updated Resume in MS Word Format to Zhao Zi Yuan Anna (EA Personnel Reg. No.: R22090617) by clicking the ‘Apply link’ / or call Consultant, Anna, at 6590 9966 for a confidential discussion.
Please indicate the below information in your resume:
· Current & Expected salary
· Reason(s) for leaving
· Notice Period / Availability to commence work
YOUR SUCCESS IS OUR ACHIEVEMENT!
Notice:
We regret that only short-listed candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence. By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read & agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration, and for our marketing EDMs which you may opt out by unsubscribing in the mailer. You may refer and access our website at www.achievegroup.asia/privacy-policy/ for more information. Cessation of Collection of full NRIC Numbers: In compliance with the Personal Data Protection Act and commitment to protect candidates’ personal data, Achieve Group will cease to collect, process or use full NRIC numbers during our screening and job application process. Kindly ensure your resumes provided to us does not contain your full NRIC number and full home address during your job application."
Senior Full-stack Engineer,"About the company:
Singapore headquartered Cybersecurity Vendor who have received significant funding to build a next generation Cybersecurity detection monitoring system for OT Environments.

About the role:
Working in collaboration with the CTO, local and overseas Software Engineering teams, you will use your ability to translate architecture to meet product design objectives. Your passion for problem solving, learning from mistakes and mentoring junior Engineers in best practices will ensure your success in this role.

Responsibilities:
• Design and manage data lake and events/log flow within the program logic
• Intensively code
• Actively participate in technical vision discussions to continuously drive innovation
• Develop web applications with reusable components
• Solve performance issues

Experience:
• Minimum 5+ years of experience as a Full-stack Software Engineer
• RESTful API design & implementation using Java
• At least one Javascript framework with React preferred
• Skilled in ELK and container management
• Knowledge of Web/Application Security is a bonus
• Singaporean Citizen (Cat 2A security clearance eligible)


Roger Guzman
Reg No: R1987368
Xcede Pte Ltd
EA Licence No. 16S8096"
Sales Associate - LOEWE,"Job Highlights
Luxury Career Path
Great working culture
Attractive package

Job Description
Create a good shopping experience for our clients
Provide exceptional customer service
Assist the team in store operation matters
Assist with refilling, unpacking, packing and sorting of stocks
A team player to support the retail team wherever necessary

Job Requirements
Minimum 2 years of retail sales experience will be an added advantage
Ready-to-Wear (RTW) and/or luxury fashion experience will be an added advantage
Good understanding of luxury market and practices
Good communications and interpersonal skills
Good team player
Motivated and driven
Good customer service and selling skills
Good in mix and match on Ready-to-Wear (RTW)
Good flair of fashion sense

How to Apply?
Attach your CV for your application
We wish to inform you that only short-listed candidates will be notified by phone or email"
"Rewards Specialist (Bangkok-Based, Relocation Support Provided)","About Agoda

Agoda is an online travel booking platform for accommodations, flights, and more. We build and deploy cutting-edge technology that connects travelers with more than 2.5 million accommodations globally. Based in Asia and part of Booking Holdings, our 6,000+ employees representing 90+ nationalities foster a work environment rich in diversity, creativity, and collaboration. We innovate through a culture of experimentation and ownership, enhancing the ability for our customers to experience the world.

*This is a Bangkok based role*

Headquartered in Asia, Agoda is proud to be one of the world’s largest online travel accommodation platforms. Founded in 2005 and now a Booking Holdings (Nasdaq:BKNG) company, Agoda has over 2.5 million daily visitors from over 200 countries, searching over 2 million properties worldwide. Our web and mobile products provide a first-rate reservation service in 38 languages that uniquely combines local knowledge and local connections to provide the best deals for business and leisure travelers.

The People & Organization Development department was established in 2012 to help Agoda effectively and efficiently attract, assess, reward, excite, and retain its travel professionals. Today, Agoda has 5,000+ employees around the world in more than 30 office locations. The People team has been integral to building and executing core tasks that help us scale our growth and business results globally. At Agoda, we believe our people are our strength. We work hard and have fun, and we choose people who are dedicated to making things exceptional.

The Compensation & Benefits team at Agoda has been instrumental in launching innovative benefits programs, providing key insights to managers, and working with our Management to build a world-class company. Agoda has experienced dramatic growth and as we attract more talent, we are looking for an analytical, business-oriented, individual who can identify new solutions to attract and retain our global employee base. We are looking for someone who thrives in analyzing and communicating data efficiently to identify compensation trends while improve our existing offerings by introducing new approaches and solutions.

The ideal candidate will report to the Compensation & Benefits Manager and bring his or her prior knowledge, quantitative acumen, as well as relevant implementation experience to the role. You will work closely with the strong team in place and with other People functions such as Talent Acquisition, Talent Management, and Payroll, to ensure a coordinated approach to talent attraction and retention. This individual will also play a role in partnering with business leaders across Agoda, including Finance, Information Technology, Partner Services, and the Customer Experience Group.

This role is based in our Bangkok office which is in the heart of the city; we welcome both local and international applications for this role.

This position is open to both local and international candidates with relocation support available for eligible candidates to help ensure a smooth transition to working and living in Bangkok.

What you’ll do:

Compensation

Own and conduct analyses of a variety of our data sets and translate into actionable dashboards (Tableau) and insights, to make sure that our total rewards programs are competitive, yet also aligned with business goals
Ensure highly accurate and timely fulfillment of the compensation review cycles
Work closely with our People Operations team to integrate the compensation cycle and benefits programs in Workday
Support management of personnel costs in alignment with Agoda’s financial plan

Benefits

Support the implementation of an innovative and expanding benefits program worldwide that meets the needs of different employee groups
Help implement a quality-of-life benefits and employee perks program that helps us to attract and retain top talent while managing cost and labor requirements
Identify opportunities to leverage external vendors and partners to accelerate implementation of benefits

Agoda is a dynamic and fast-changing environment. We expect the person in this role to be flexible in his or her understanding of the role and to be able and willing to adapt, to add additional areas of focus, and to respond to changing organizational needs, viewing them as an opportunity to grow and develop a varied portfolio of career skills.

What you need:

At least 3 years of work experience
At least one (1) year experience in analysis using BI tools (SSRS, Tableau, Power BI, Cognos, etc…) to communicate insights
Bachelor’s degree required; relevant advanced degree (e.g., M.B.A.) highly desirable
Proven, deep analytic and problem-solving skills
Superb, demonstrated quantitative skills, including the ability to translate data to insights for different audience types
High level of discretion, confidentiality, and ethics
Strong project management skills and excellent attention to detail
Expertise in Excel; good, working proficiency in related programs
Excellent communication skills. Fluency in English required; knowledge of Asian languages (Chinese/Malay/Thai) a plus
Good fit with our highly multi-cultural, fast-innovating environment
Ability to cope well with ambiguity and change
Humility, flexibility, good interpersonal skills a must
A formal background in compensation is not required, we are not bound by traditional approaches and frameworks

Agoda is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of sex, age, race, color, national origin, religion, marital status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, citizenship, veteran or military status and other legally protected characteristics. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, please let us know.

By applying to this job, you agree that Agoda may process your personal data in accordance with Agoda applicants privacy statement. (link to https://careersatagoda.com/privacy-statement/ )

#3 #HR #singapore #kualalumpur #Taiwan #korea #hongkong #newdelhi #boston #washington #amsterdam #berlin

Equal Opportunity Employer

At Agoda, we pride ourselves on being a company represented by people of all different backgrounds and orientations. We prioritize attracting diverse talent and cultivating an inclusive environment that encourages collaboration and innovation. Employment at Agoda is based solely on a person’s merit and qualifications. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunity regardless of sex, age, race, color, national origin, religion, marital status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, citizenship, veteran or military status, and other legally protected characteristics.

We will keep your application on file so that we can consider you for future vacancies and you can always ask to have your details removed from the file. For more details please read our privacy policy .

To all recruitment agencies: Agoda does not accept third party resumes. Please do not send resumes to our jobs alias, Agoda employees or any other organization location. Agoda is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
BOUCHERON Sales Associate,"Summary

About us
Created by Frédéric Boucheron in 1858, Maison Boucheron has evolved through four generations of direct descendants. A visionary designer and the very first of the great contemporary jewelers to open a boutique on Place Vendôme, Boucheron still embodies absolute excellence in Jewelry, High Jewelry and Watchmaking today. The Boucheron style, free and daring, never ceases to invent the classics of tomorrow.

Job Description

Your opportunity

Ability to deliver good sales performance through exceptional standard of luxury excellence, develop new loyal customers and retain existing customers.

How you will contribute

Maximize sales performance, achieve assigned boutique team target and KPIs
Deliver luxury and caring customer service, build customer relationship and loyalty
Handle customer enquiries and complaints, ensure issues are resolved to the satisfaction of customers and company
Support boutique operation and ensure all aspects at top quality
Follow company compliance, to conduct regular stock checks and assist the annual stock take

Who you are

Prior experience in luxury retail or premium jewelry brands is preferred
Excellent communication, customer service and interpersonal skill
Enthusiastic team player, friendly personality with can-do attitude
Immediate availability is preferred

Why work with us?

Boucheron is part of the Kering Group, this is a fabulous opportunity to join the Kering adventure and and to actively contribute to the development of the business by becoming part of a thriving Atelier in a global Luxury Group that offers endless possibilities to learn and grow. Talent development is a managerial principle at Kering and we are committed to fostering internal mobility. Our common vision promotes leadership skills and helps every employee to reach their full potential in a stimulating and fulfilling workplace environment.

Kering is committed to building a diverse workforce. We believe diversity in all its forms – gender, age, nationality, culture, religious beliefs and sexual orientation – enriches the workplace. It opens up opportunities for people to express their talent, both individually and collectively and it helps foster our ability to adapt to a changing world. As an Equal Opportunity Employer we welcome and consider applications from all qualified candidates, regardless of their background.

Job Type

Regular

Start Date

2022-09-01

Schedule

Full time

Organization

Kering (Singapore) Watches and Jewelry Pte. Ltd. (BOU)"
Java/Senior Java Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Key Responsibilities

Application Development, Resolution & Management
Study the requirements from users / customers
Work with the team and team lead to develop a solution with innovative ideas
Participate in brain-storming sessions and provide innovative ideas.
Estimate the effort for the work unit assigned.
Develop the module/project assigned as per the agreed requirements / Functional Specifications and timeline
Report status and progress to Technical Lead / Manager on a regular basis.
Work with the Technical Lead / Manager to ensure the technical support is provided to users/testers within the SLA agreed.
Maintain a positive mindset to provide continuous support and the application of tools for monitoring, management and optimization of support.
Participate in enhancement of the application (including documentation, effort estimation, development and unit testing).
Present and communicate effectively on the project/work matters to team and users / customers
Prepare / update the relevant documentations related to the project / change appropriately.
Job Requirements
Bachelor Degree Computer Science / Engineering or its equivalent.
Good understanding of Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
Technically sound with at least 5+ year of hands-on experience in Java, J2EE/JEE, Oracle, SQL/ PLSQL, Jasper report, APIs (RESTful and SOAP) and XML.
Working experience in Spring 4.x / 5.x and Struts 2.x frameworks, SpingBoot and SpringBatch. Basic understanding of Solaris and Linux OS.
Domain knowledge of Financial Clearing and Payment Systems is a plus.

Desired Skills and Experience
Strong Attention To Detail, Struts, Oracle SQL, SOAP, Unit Testing, Application Development, SDLC, SQL, Adaptability, Team Lead, Java, Solaris, Linux, Software Development, Hibernate, Technical Support"
QSSE Administrator,"Job description:

Summary
In this role, you will be reporting to the Marine Investigator and Trainer. As the QSSE Assistant, you will be responsible for providing administrative support to Investigation, Terminals & Inland and Cargo entity. In addition, you will be coordinating workshops, seminars and facilitating training.
We are looking for someone who is independent and meticulous with good communication and interpersonal skill.



Main Responsibilities:

Manage scheduling of assets and requirements to facilitate training needs
Ensure the conduct of duties are in accordance with quality, health, safety, environmental and ethics policies company’s policy
Participate and contribute to the continuous performance improvement plan which will be reviewed on a periodical basis
Organise and arrange meeting with key stakeholders
Compile and distribute materials for meetings
Prepare weekly reports and KPI for Investigation, Terminals & Inland and Cargo entity
Provide administrative support on travel arrangement including business visa application when required
Maintain Investigation, audits and training records, feedbacks and lessons learnt
Monitor action plans and follow-ups derived from investigations and audits
Provide support for some transversal tasks of QSSE department when required
Conduct of Maritime related projects when assigned


To excel in this role, you should be a great team player with the ability of multi-tasking.



Minimum Requirements:

Diploma in Business Administration or equivalent will be added advantage
Well versed with MS office application such as MS PowerPoint, MS Words and MS Excel
Prior experience in Marine Safety and training assistance would be advantageous


**This role is opened for local employment only.

We will only consider applicants who have received, or are willing to receive by the date of recruitment, the full regimen of a WHO EUL vaccine (examples include Pfizer-BioNTech/COMIRNATY, Moderna, Sinovac-CoronaVac, and AstraZeneca). Proof of vaccination will be required.



**Salary package (local) & job title shall commensurate with experience.
**Kindly note that only short-listed applicants will be contacted.



** By applying for this role, you hereby consent to the CMA CGM Group collecting, processing and using any personal information you submit, for the following purposes:
(i) To process the application for the role being applied for;
(ii) To process the application for other open positions within the CMA CGM Group which may be suitable to you;
(iii) To conduct necessary reference checks; and
(iv) Any other purpose related to one or more of the above.
You further consent to the CMA CGM Group retaining such personal information for a period of two years following your submission thereof, so that we may consider you for other open positions within the CMA CGM Group which may be suitable to you in the event that you are not selected for this role.



NOTICE TO THIRD PARTY AGENCIES: Please note that CMA CGM Group does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or employment agencies. In the absence of a signed Recruitment Fee Agreement, CMA CGM Group will not consider or agree to payment of any referral compensation or recruiter fee. In the event a recruiter or agency submits a resume or candidate without a previously signed agreement, CMA CGM Group explicitly reserves the right to pursue and hire those candidate(s) without any financial obligation to the recruiter or agency. Any unsolicited resumes, including those submitted to hiring managers, are deemed to be the property of CMA CGM Group."
Accounts Executive,"About Symrise AG

Symrise is a global supplier of fragrances, flavors, food, nutrition, and cosmetic ingredients. Its clients include manufacturers of perfumes, cosmetics, food and beverages, pharmaceuticals and producers of nutritional supplements and pet food. Its sales of € 3.8 billion in the 2021 fiscal year make Symrise a leading global provider. Headquartered in Holzminden, Germany, the Group is represented by more than 100 locations in Europe, Africa, the Middle East, Asia, the United States and Latin America.

Symrise works with its clients to develop new ideas and market-ready concepts for products that form an integral part of everyday life. Economic success and corporate responsibility are inextricably linked as part of this process.

Symrise - always inspiring more …

Accounts Executive

You will be a trusted member of the SG Finance team responsible for AR incoming clearing and collection reporting. You will be working closely with customer service team and shipping department. This role reporting into the Regional Finance Manager offers the possibility to develop your expertise to full scope of AR and participate in various automation projects. In additional, it is a great opportunity of career progression for those who is looking to grow into an accountant/senior accountant.

The Position:

Check and monitor incoming fund from the banks and update the receipt entries in SAP
Maintains historical financial records by filing accounting documents
Prepare and send monthly statements of accounts
Monitor closely AR ageing report and outstanding customers' account via regular phone calls, email reminder, frequent communications with Account Management personnel
Proactively follow up on customers' queries, resolves any outstanding AR issues and invoices
Justify and resolve discrepancies/disputes and, issue debit or credit notes
GST reconciliation and reporting pertaining to AR
Support monthly and year end closing activities
Support internal and external audit queries
Handles intercompany billing/cross charges
Participate in continuous improvement activities to ensure optimal efficiency
Any other ad hoc duties as assigned

The Ideal Candidate:

Diploma in Accounting and above
3 years of working experience in Account Receivable Functions
Good communication and interpersonal skills, may need to communicate with overseas vendors and staff in English/Mandarin
Able to work independently, well organized, meticulous, positive attitude and a team player"
"Engineer/ Senior Engineer/ Principal Engineer (AI Engineering), Digital Hub","The Defence Science and Technology Agency (DSTA) brings you to the forefront of cybersecurity, digital transformation and engineering. From working on software development and systems integration to unmanned technologies and artificial intelligence, you can have an impact on Singapore’s defence.

Achieve your fullest potential with opportunities to build your technical expertise and hone your competencies in diverse domains. You can also expect an immersive learning experience, where you will work with bright minds and collaborate with global industry experts.

DSTA is recognised as one of the top 10 employers in the Engineering & IT sector, where our engineers and IT professionals work alongside procurement specialists to deliver state-of-the-art capabilities for Singapore’s peace and security.

Internship opportunities and a meaningful career await you.

Learn more about DSTA at https://www.dsta.gov.sg . You may also email us at hrjobs@dsta.gov.sg if you have any enquiries pertaining to careers.

Opportunity

We are looking for an individual to join us in our Digital Hub Programme Centre where you will participate in AI Engineering initiatives. The role will require you to execute the AI Engineering roadmap through research, experimentation and implementation of

MLOps (CI/CD/CT) pipelines and tools
Supporting infrastructure for AI development and deployment, and
Governing processes and release criteria

Some examples of your work could include,

Design and build pipelining tools and processes to automate the MLOps process
Research, design and build ML-specific testing and remediation techniques (E.g. Unit tests, Robustness tests) for the AI community
Research, design, develop and optimize domain specific ML deployment, monitoring and retraining techniques for the AI community

Requirements
Tertiary qualification in Computer Science, Information Systems, Computer Engineering, or related fields
1 year of experience in MLOps domain/ area preferred.
Excited to gain knowledge in a new domain
Team player with good communication skills
Passionate and self-motivated
Required skills
ML development
Basic ML tasks (E.g. Object Detection as a ML CV task).
Modular coding for Machine Learning (Pipelines)
Data preprocessing and ML model training using any ML frameworks
Software Engineering and Infrastructure.
Programming: Python
Scripting: Bash
Linux Operating Systems (E.g. Debian, RHEL)
Version control (E.g. git)
Containerization and Container Orchestration (E.g. Docker, Kubernetes.)
Preferred skills (Previous experience would be advantageous)
MLOps
Data Versioning
Experiment Orchestration (E.g. MLOps E2E Tools)
Model Versioning
Model Serving (E.g. Inference engines)
Unit Testing (E.g. Directional Expectation Tests, Invariance Testing)
Robustness Testing (E.g. Adversarial AI, Brittleness, Explainability)
Model/Data Monitoring pipelines
Model retraining pipelines
Labeling (E.g. multi-type labelling tools)
Cloud Infrastructure
Hyperconverged Infrastructure (HCI)
Networking
Storage (E.g. S3)
DevOps
Automation (E.g. Jenkins)
Monitoring dashboards (E.g. Prometheus/Grafana.)
Messaging (E.g. Kafka.)
RESTful web services (E.g. https, gRPC)"
Senior Software Engineer (embedded C++),"My client is a Global Leader in the Semiconductor industry. They are currently looking to expand the Singapore office and would like to bring in talented Senior Software Engineers.

You will be working on the software design, development and requirement analysis of semiconductor equipment. You will also be interacting closely with other engineering functions to enable system level performance meeting product requirement specification.

Requirements

Min Bachelor in Electrical Engineering/Computer Science.
Min 3 years of hands-on development experience
Proficient in C++
Good knowledge in RTOS and OOP


Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Hudson's personal information and privacy policy. Please submit your application using the appropriate link below or email your CV in Microsoft Word format to shayna.chan@hudson.com.
Shayna Chan Sheng Hui
Reg. #: R1980684
Hudson Global Resources (Singapore) Pte Ltd
EA Licence #: 18S9265"
Accounts Executive - Payable,"Core Work Activities

Accounts Payable
Support the Accounts Payable functions in Asia Pacific for various countries
Review invoices and requisitions for satisfactory payment approval.
Ensure all payment transactions are properly recorded.
Process approved associate expense claims.
Liaise with Marketing & Sales team on any payment issues.
Prepare schedules and reconciliations to support period close balances.
Reconcile bank statements.
Record reconciling entries resulting from reconciliation each period.
Continue to improve the payment process.
Execute period close process
Prepare standard journal entries pertaining to accounts payable function.
Ensure that accruals and prepayment calculations and postings are done to correctly reflect period expenses.
Arrange to email monthly accounting transactions (including invoices) to local accounting firm if need be.
Inter-company and International Billings
Check that inter-company billings are valid and well supported.
Challenge billings that are incorrect, invalid or not adequately supported.
Book billings to correct Peoplesoft operating unit and account code.
Periodically confirm and reconcile intercompany balances.
Periodically process intercompany balances settlement.
Accounting and Month End Close Execution
Ensure all financial closing timelines are met. Ensure overall processing integrity and accuracy.
Ensure all month-end close journals are prepared accurately and on a timely manner.
Book billings to correct Peoplesoft operating unit and account code.
Balance Sheet Management
Prepare monthly balance sheet schedules and reconciliations.
Ensure all balance sheet reconciliation are supported with adequate documentation.
Investigate reconciling items and ensure corrections are made, and all issues identified during the reconciliation process are resolved in the next reporting period.
Compliance
Prepare statutory reporting deliverables for audit, tax and others accurately and timely.
Assist with statutory audit and SOX compliance
Ad-hoc requests
Assist on other accounting work as required by the business.

Candidate Profile

Diploma/Degree in Accounting or equivalent/relevant education in Accounting.
Proven at least 3 years working experience with full-cycle Accounts Payable processing.
Experience with utilizing ERP system or tool such as Oracle (Peoplesoft)/ Concur preferred.
Solid understanding of basic bookkeeping and accounting payable principles.
High degree of accuracy and attention to detail.
Experience with US Multi-National Corporation preferred, understands and possesses the ability to work in a multi-cultural environment.
A team player with ability to collaborate with functional departments and external partners.
Motivated self-starter, resourceful, initiative, well-organized and motivated to learn.
Strong customer service skills in responding to both internal and external inquiries.
Strong business integrity and holds sensitive information in confidence
Fluent in English (written and spoken) and other language skill advantage (e.g. Japanese, Chinese etc.)

Marriott Vacations Worldwide is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture."
ETL Developer - SSIS/SSRS (1-year Direct contract),"Job Description

Job Description:

We are looking for a SSIS/SSRS Developer to produce scalable software solutions. You’ll be part of a cross-functional team that’s responsible for the full software development life cycle, from conception to deployment.

Responsibilities
Design and develop SQL Server stored procedures, functions, views and triggers to be used during the ETL process
Designing and developing SSRS / SSIS / SQL ETL solutions to acquire and prepare data from numerous upstream systems
Builds data transformations with SSIS including importing data from files, moving data from one database platform to another. Building reports using SSRS
Debug and tune SSIS, SSRS or other ETL processes to ensure accurate and efficient movement of data
Design, implement and maintain database objects (tables, views, indexes etc) and database security
Experience working with SSIS, SSRS packages
Proficient with ETL tools such as Microsoft SSIS, SSRS
Analyze and develop strategies and approaches to import and transfer data between source, staging, and ODS/Data Warehouse destinations
Test and prepare ETL processes for deployment to production and non-production environments
Support system and acceptance testing including the development or refinement of test plans
Job Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree and 5+ years of hands–on experience developing applications
Proven experience as a SSIS, SSRS Developer or similar role
Very Good experience in SSIS, SSRS
Familiarity with databases (e.g. MySQL, SQL Server, Oracle)
Excellent communication and teamwork skills
Experience on development using PowerBI or Tableau will be advantageous
Good problem-solving skill and able to multi-task in a challenging technical environment
Good system knowledge relating to Data Warehousing, BI, and Regulatory Reporting.
Familiar with SQL Server installation and configuration, able to analyze and fine-tune SQL Query performance
Experience in production support and attend incidents and resolve user queries
Can contribute individually and collaborate well in a team
Responds with speed and flexibility"
Test Automation Engineer with Java 8 & Above,"Project Description:

We are looking for a QA Automation with Java Engineer to join in Credit Risk Monitoring Solution within the Wealth Management business. In this role, you will be key member in implementing automated software test procedures. Besides, you will be highlighting problem areas and suggesting good solution leveraging from past experience to address bugs that hinder software delivery effectively.
Responsibilities:

• QA to work on Testing Automation using Java 8 or above
• Key member in implementing automated software test procedures.
• Besides, you will be highlighting problem areas and suggesting good solution leveraging from past experience to address bugs that hinder software delivery effectively.
• Design test automation architecture of client applications for cross-platform and technologies such as UI, REST/SOAP API and backend automation especially on microservices.
• Integrate QA Automation into the build and deploy pipelines supporting a drive towards CI/CD using Jenkins.
• Experience with source code management and build process for building and maintaining automation libraries such as JUnit framework and build tools such as Maven
• Evaluate and Implement new software test automation tools and tooling standards
• Understand what test plan and test strategy are on project - testing process, testing types and technics, etc.
• Provide review and analysis on functional requirement and specification
• Estimate own activities based on main test estimation methods, and prioritize own tasks
• Execute test cases, report defects and perform root cause analysis on issues
• Plan own tasks according to project schedule, perform primary testing tasks without supervision
• Collaborate with end users for acceptance test activities
• Work independently while in close collaboration with others in the team and across projects
Mandatory Skills:
Automation QA Java 8
Mandatory Skills Description:


• 5+ years of experience
• Degree in Computer Science or equivalent/higher.
• In-depth work experience as a QA Engineer, QA Tester, or relevant position in the IT department.
• Good understanding of automation systems and databases.
• Strong analysis and design skills; Test Driven Development, strong unit and integration testing experience.
• Good experience in Java 8+, Gitlab, Gradle, Intellij.
• Good experience in Agile, SCRUM, independent, motivated, reliable and organized.
• Strong communication skills and good command of English.
• Excellent technical writing skills.
• Strong ability to debug code, analyze failures and trace defects to root cause
• Strong interpersonal communication skills and a successful team player.
• Ability to interpret, evaluate and communicate detailed information. Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and meet deadlines.
• Extensive experience in Developing, Executing and Maintaining Test Plan, Test Strategy, Test Scenarios and Test Cases and Reporting system
• Understanding of project and requirement documentation, experienced in requirement testing and clarification, and static testing
• Intermediate skills in test case design, workload estimation and test execution, and be able to create good quality testing artifacts - test cases, test result reports
• Experienced in different types of testing - functional testing, non-functional testing, SIT, UAT, etc.
Nice-to-Have Skills:
• Hands on experience on Kafka & Azure certified
Languages:
English: C1 Advanced"
Specialist (Office of Career Development),"The Student SUcceSS Centre (SSC) would like to invite dynamic and collaborative individuals to apply for this exciting role in nurturing young adults to become professionally competent and contributing citizen who is employment ready and able to make responsible and ethical career choices and decisions.

You will be supporting the Career Development Office in the engagement of SUSS stakeholders, locally and overseas, to strengthen academic-industry relations and to identify work attachment/internship and employment opportunities for SUSS students. You will also play a part in the assessment and development of SUSS students, providing mentorship and guidance in their acquisition of professional skill sets and career choices.

We need someone who possess good industry knowledge (preferably in Marketing-related industry), with strong coaching experience, has awareness of current and emerging practices in human capital development, and is committed to the preparation and capitalization of young undergraduates.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Provide career coaching and career advisory for students throughout their studies in SUSS
Conduct mentoring and assessment for students during the 6-month local/overseas Work Attachment programme across different disciplines
Design and conduct workshops and programmes that help students to develop professional competencies
Design and instruct career-related credit bearing courses that leverage on experiential learning pedagogy to enhance theory-practice link
Initiate and develop long-term partnerships with local and overseas companies to create learning, applied research and work opportunities for students
Initiate and lead applied research to enhance the expertise of Career Development Office
Undertake administrative work to support programming and learning of students

Job Requirements
We are looking for senior people from the industry. They should have the required job experience, network and industry knowledge.

In particular, candidates are expected to have/be:
A good university degree, preferably with postgraduate degree and/or professional qualification
Minimum of 10 years work experience (preferably in the Marketing industry), with at least 5 years in a supervisory capacity
Experience and/or certification in career coaching
Good understanding of global and local hiring/employment trends and methods
Passion for working with students and able to build rapport, motivate and inspire young people
Meticulous and able to work in a fast-paced environment, perform as a team that is highly diverse and traversing across functions, and manage multiple tasks, including administrative processes
Ability to travel overseas (estimated once every 3 to 6 months)
Strong overseas network will be an advantage
Certification in personality profiling tools will be an advantage"
Technology - Risk Services (Financial Services) Associate - 2023 Intake,"Line of Service

Assurance

Industry/Sector

TMT X-Sector

Specialism

Product Innovation

Management Level

Associate

Job Description & Summary

Our Risk Services team helps clients to analyse, assess and address a wide range of risks by providing insights and assurance which is invaluable in today's high-risk business environment.

We work with our clients to build trust across their digital/technology-enabled businesses and address areas such as the loss or misuse of important data, failure to react to changes in the market, implementing and reviewing systems or business processes and ensuring third-party providers are working as expected in managing and controlling their existing and future financial regulatory risk.

Apply for our FS Tech team where you will undergo a 9-months training programme with PwC to acquire skillset in IT audit and compliance review and having mentors to advise and support in the development of your career, training pathway and everyday working practices.

We are looking for Associates to fill our 2023 intake. ‌

Responsibilities:

Will vary by role, but will include an element of:
Execute audits and assessments on cybersecurity, IT systems and infrastructure and processes
Collaborate with stakeholders such as clients and managers to identify opportunities to improve their key controls across cybersecurity, business and technology processes
Provide assurance and advisory related services through all major milestones of the sales and delivery lifecycles including identification, proposal development, planning, fieldwork, reporting and debrief processes
Work on specific projects to substantially improve and evolve the capability and quality of the processes, deliverables and thought leadership
Provide coaching and/or conduct training to junior staff to develop communication, analytical and technical skills

Requirements:
Final year students in Business, Engineering, Computer Science, Information Technology (IT) or related disciplines with IT focus or experience in IT Audit and Risk/ Control experience
Demonstrated track record in leading engagements within a professional services or consulting environment, combined with ability to work in teams effectively
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Good presentation skills, both oral and written
Able to work in a fast pace environment
Good analytical, organizational, and conceptual skills
Excellent soft skills and able to manage stakeholders across multiple disciplines
Excellent project management skills and a demonstrated ability to follow through and complete tasks within tight deadlines
Experience in management and/or assessment of adequacy of controls over technology activities at financial institutions is preferred.
Familiar with regulatory requirements such as MAS Notices and Guidelines related to technology, cyber security and outsourcing risk management etc. is a plus
Experience in cybersecurity processes such as vulnerability and threat management, patch management and identity and access management is a plus
Ability to provide recommendations, approaches and good industry practices
Experience in providing regular communication and preparing reports and presentations for clients and senior stakeholders
Good interpersonal skills to successfully interact with internal and external stakeholders such as clients, managers and team members
CISA, CISM, CISSP, PMP or other professional certification is preferred

Next Step:

You will receive an email from us to complete pymetrics within 3 working days of your application submission. Pymetrics is a series of engaging online games that will assess cognitive, behavioural and emotional traits. This allows us to learn more about you and gives us insights into where you will thrive the most in our business.

Note:
Please note we accept only one application per candidate. You may indicate your second preference in the same application. We recommend that you apply to your preferred position that closely aligns with your skills, passions and interests.
You can indicate another role in the same application form. Duplicate entries will slow down your application with us.
Kindly upload both your resume and degree audit or transcript in PDF format all under Resume attachment upload
Kindly note only shortlisted candidates will be contacted.



Got a question? Email to sg_graduate_recruitment@pwc.com.

There have been reports of scammers impersonating PwC HR professionals contacting individuals about fraudulent job opportunities using non-PwC domain email addresses and an overseas number. Please note that genuine communications from our HR team will only come from ""@pwc.com"" email address.

Education (if blank, degree and/or field of study not specified)

Degrees/Field of Study required:

Degrees/Field of Study preferred:

Certifications (if blank, certifications not specified)

Optional Skills

Required Skills

Desired Languages (If blank, desired languages not specified)

Travel Requirements

Not Specified

Available for Work Visa Sponsorship?

Yes

Government Clearance Required?

No

Job Posting End Date"
Lead Software Engineer,"About Daraz

Founded in 2015, Daraz is South Asia’s leading e-commerce platform in Pakistan, Bangladesh, Sri Lanka, Nepal and Myanmar. It empowers more than 100,000 active sellers with world-class marketplace technology to reach the fast-growing consumer class in a region of 500 million people. Through Daraz Express and Daraz Pay, it operates the most efficient and digitalised logistics and payments infrastructure in its markets. Daraz’ vision is to be a champion of South Asia serving 100 million customers and businesses by 2030.

For more information, please visit www.daraz.com

Job Description

Your role is to:

Work in Daraz E-Commerce End2End Flow
Lead the development in one or multiple domains
Contribute in all phases of the development life-cycle
Work on the tech architecture design

A bit about you:
Ability to read, write and communicate in both English and Mandarin is required
BS/MS degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related subject
Proven hands-on Software Development experience
Proven working experience in Java development
Proven architecture design experience
Strong logical thinking, willing to explore; taking the ownership, great team player

What we offer
An international working environment in a start-up setting, and the unique opportunity to learn from industry leaders, including Alibaba teams
A platform to learn from Alibaba’s world-leading ecosystem
Rigorous training and exposure in team management, leadership, business analytics, and operations
An opportunity to train the next generation of business leaders in the ‘tech’ industry
Competitive salary and incentive package"
"Lead Back End Engineer, Django (Bangkok, Relocation)","Manatal is an AIbased recruitment software company based in Bangkok, Thailand. Our mission is to offer an easy-to-use software to empower small, medium, and large companies in their staffing & recruitment transformation

Our goal is simple: to provide solutions to the recruitment world's difficulties and make the entire process simple and enjoyable for recruiters, hiring managers, and candidates alike.
Globally trusted by thousands of companies in over 130 countries, Manatal's growth goes hand in hand with our client's own. We're passionate about developing solutions for the changes they encounter and filling the recruitment gap with innovative tech implementation.

Job Description
Overview:
We're looking for an outstanding Python / Django Engineer to work with a small backend team in the continued development of a wide range of features and services within the recruitment sphere.
As the team's Lead Backend Engineer, you will enjoy a high level of involvement and direct hands-on experience in the planning, design, and development of new and exciting features from inception to deployment.
Our ideal candidate is one who is passionate about building elegant and scalable software and combines superb communication skills and analytical capabilities with a demonstrated ability to get the right things done quickly and effectively.

Core Responsibilities :
Help planning and then implementing or delegating key tasks for current and upcoming features
Review, merge and deploy code submitted by other backend team members
Coordinate with the frontend and project management teams about the status and direction of ongoing projects
Be prepared to quickly and efficiently investigate, debug, and resolve unforeseen backend issues related to the server or database
Play an active role in shaping the vision and roadmap of the product/technology teams going forward
Ensure maximal security of the application

Functional Requirements :
Bachelor's degree or higher in computer science or related field
Ability to communicate and comprehend high-level spoken and written concepts in English
Open to All nationalities
Technical Requirements:
Python 3:
Fluency and hands-on experience with the Python programming language
Experience in writing automated unit tests
Experience/familiarity with Celery and Redis for background and periodic task management
Fluency in reading and writing JSON
Experience with web scraping using Requests, Beautiful Soup, and Selenium is a plus
Experience in machine learning or natural language processing (NLP) is a plus
Django:
Experience with the Django web framework for Python
Experience with REST APIs and the Django REST Framework
Heroku:
Experience using Heroku and functional knowledge of the staging - production pipeline workflow (CI/CD)
Postgres:
Familiarity with relational databases and experience with Postgres
Amazon Web Services (AWS):
Experience using AWS S3 for file hosting
Github:
Experience and fluency using Github within a collaborative work environment

Personal Requirements:
Possesses a strong sense of ownership and accountability for each project undertaken
Passionate about automation and optimization in daily tasks
A strong proponent of the Don't Repeat Yourself (DRY) principle
Open-minded, confident, humble, self-managing, and a solid team player
Patient and consistent when mentoring or guiding team members

What Youll Get:
A competitive salary and many new opportunities
More responsibilities and greater recognition for the work you do
The opportunity to be a part of a lively and international development team
A pioneering mindset shaped by a challenging and innovative work environment

Get to know more about us and our product: www.manatal.com
Demo Video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xlJAk71H-_s
**Interested candidates can apply via this link: https://www.careers-page.com/manatal/job/X4XWY"
Engineering Executive,"Job description:

Responsibilities
Oversee the M&E aspects of the assigned properties including the efficient and orderly running of the engineering office, workshop and all M&E plant rooms.
Lead and motivate a team of technicians to provide facility management and building M&E services
Plan and schedule daily duties for the team of technicians and ensure standards of performance
Plan and implement building maintenance programme, AEI, M&E plants and equipment maintenance programme
Recommend necessary repair work, renovation, furnishings and equipment replacement for the properties
Prepare and review tender specifications for all M&E upgrading works at properties assigned
Supervise all M&E works carried out by site team and contractors
Do regular site inspection and supervision of works to ensure the quality of works carried out
Identify potential energy conservation opportunities and possess basic knowledge of energy management
Monitor and check compliance of all safety equipment, work methods and procedures
Create and maintain good rapport with tenants/guests
Attend to emergency situations in the property/properties assigned and provide timely updates to stakeholders
Liaise with government authorities/statutory boards, architects and engineers on management and maintenance matters
Requirements
Degree in Mechanical or Electrical Engineering, or equivalent
At least 2 years of relevant experience in retail malls, hotels, serviced residences or residential properties
Strong leadership, good planning, organisational, communication and interpersonal skills
Knowledge of chiller system and M&E services in commercial buildings"
Firmware Verification Engineer,"Position With Excellent Opportunities For Career Progression|Excellent Chance For Enhancing Your Professional Knowledge

About Our Client

The client is a global MNC with a large presence in Singapore who manufactures advanced scientific analytical instruments. They are known for their innovative technologies and is one of the market leaders in various types of scientific instruments used across a wide range of industries and disciplines.
Job Description

Verify firmware of new products related to medical and mission-critical systems.
Develop automated testing tools and process.
Assess and update documentation of systems components according to relevant standards.
Plan and support verification and validation activities.
The Successful Applicant

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electronics Engineering or Software Engineering.
At least 3 years of work experience related to software or firmware verification and validation activities such as methodologies, documentations and regulatory requirements.
Deep knowledge in embedded software or firmware development on Linux, embedded Windows platform or RTOS.
What's on Offer

You will be working with an experienced first-rate team who are not only technically skilled and knowledgeable, but also fun, energetic, and highly creative.
Contact: Tia Hsu

Quote job ref: JN-072022-5684426"
"Senior Consultant, Platform Products","Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Team Summary

Job Description

Client Services provides industry-leading operational support to Visa’s clients around the world. With our deep knowledge and expertise, we bring the voice of the customer into the design, development and successful deployment of Visa products and services. We are trusted partners to Visa’s clients, providing expertise to support and successfully grow their business.

The Client Delivery team is responsible for designing the client service experience for new solutions and delivering end-to-end client implementations for products, solutions, infrastructure, and new client onboarding.

What a Sr Consultant, Platform Products Does At Visa

CS Product Solutions team is part of Client Services organization that designs and manages a highly tailored service experience to maximize value to clients. We look across the end-to-end client service journey to design meaningful and positive client experiences at every significant moment. We partner with Product, Technology & other client-facing teams to segment our Asia Pacific clients and implement scalable strategies that enable unique and innovative solutions.

This Senior Consultant role will focus on digital platform products including Visa Token Service (VTS) and Token Gateway Service (TGS). The role holder has the unique and exciting opportunity of leading and deploying new capabilities for Token Requesters, Acquirers, Merchants, I-TSPs (Issuer Token Service Providers) & TR-TSP’s (Token Requester – Token Service Provider). This role is a good mix of business, functional and technical knowledge providing the role holder flexibility and learning in the dynamic digital payments’ ecosystem. This is a senior level individual contributor role reporting into the Senior Director, CS Product Solutions.

In This Role, You Are Expected To

Design and enable delivery of a scalable and repeatable and effective client service experience from implementation to support for new solutions, while anticipating and planning for deviations to intended experience
Lead client pilots of new solutions
Define strategic plan to migrate support to wider Client Services teams with a focus on operational efficiency
Lead platform products initiatives that may impact clients from a business operations perspective including changes to current products, implementations of new products and the business and digital release cycle
Primary liaison with Digital Solutions team to identify client impacts, support and implementation gaps, assist in resolution of gaps prior to product rollouts
Become platform products subject matter expert in Client Services including knowledge of the APIs, implementation guides, client integration options, deployment, and post-production support
Use technical expertise blended with business acumen to solve complex problems independently by analyzing transaction level detail, API field data, and leveraging Visa tools
Be accountable for delivering agreed objectives. Responsible for own workflow assignments and must be able to be a fast responder and be proactive in resolving problems and meeting deadlines
Collaborate, influence others, and be a change agent within the team and with cross-functional partners (at multiple levels) to achieve targeted goals
Embrace and implement new methodologies on an ongoing basis as the business scales within the organization
Assume appropriate decision-making authorities to ensure flawless execution of project objectives
Coach & review the work of other team members

Why This Is Important To Visa

Platform Products are an important element of Visa Inc.’s vision of digitizing payments through additional channels. This role is key to execute Visa’s strategy for Consumer Payments & Value-Added Services (VAS) to achieve the targeted goals for the company.

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office two days a week, Tuesdays and Wednesdays with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% of the time based on business needs.

What You Will Need

Qualifications

As a Candidate, You Should Have

We are looking for an individual who brings breadth of experience, a curiosity about payments, is results-driven and client focused.

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Technology or equivalent
Minimum 10+ years of experience in product/project management or product development in the payments industry
Proficient in Japanese language to support Japanese speaking clients in the AP region.
Functional Project management experience in a client facing role
Understanding of digital payments and web-based technology including HTML, web- based service APIs, JSON, XML
Working knowledge of core transaction processing (message routing, authorization, clearing & settlement)
Strong technical aptitude with the ability to absorb technical information and apply to business solutions where little or no precedence exists. Be able to communicate complex, technical concepts in a focused and well-organized manner
Willingness to take on new challenges in a fast-paced environment and be flexible with multi-tasking and changing priorities. Ability to work in the “grey area” where answers may not be known but need to be developed
Effective verbal and written communication skills, problem solving skills, attention to detail and interpersonal skills in negotiating and influencing internal and external stakeholders
Organized self-starter, result oriented, and a passion for scaling new products
Orientation towards quality enhancement and process improvement, proactively identify opportunities and recommendations to increase service quality and/or efficiency
Team collaboration demonstrated by desire and willingness to share knowledge with a broader team, be receptive to new ideas and changes to the standard operational procedures

What Will Also Help

Subject Matter Expertise in multiple areas such as card payments, products and services, payment technologies, wallet services gained through years of experience supporting clients and new product initiatives within a payment-processing environment
Experience of working with Acquirers, Merchants & Token Requesters in the Asia Pacific region

Projects You Will Be a Part Of

This is an incredibly exciting time to join the CS Product Solutions team. You will be operating in a fast paced, unstructured environment to contribute establishing new product lines. You will work with Visa clients to deploy and operationalize new solutions by collaborating with a high performing team.

Please Note: Due to the COVID-19 pandemic and the evolving visa/travel restrictions in place, we are currently only able to extend offers to candidates with the right to work in Singapore. We are keeping the situation under close review and will adjust accordingly should the restrictive measures be lifted.

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
Staff DBA,"Why apply to Circles.Life?

Circles.Life is not just your digital telco provider. Since our launch, we revolutionised the telco industry by seamlessly integrating both telco and digital lifestyle services on our Circles-X platform. Over the past years, we have captured more than 5% market share in Singapore, launched in Australia and Taiwan while attaining record breaking CSAT and NPS (+50). We were voted the Top Employer in Digital Telco and also became an accredited winner in showcasing excellence in workplace culture in 2019.

About Circles.life

Circles.Life is Asia's first and most successful digital telco and we are on a mission to re-imagine the customer experience for the digital consumer and disrupt the multi-trillion dollar industry. We launched our services in Singapore in 2016, and have since expanded to Australia, Taiwan, Indonesia and Japan. We are leading the market in innovation, customer satisfaction and growth.

Circles.Life was founded by Rameez Ansar (ex-Temasek, BCG), Abhishek Gupta (ex-McKinsey, Bain Capital, StanChart PE) & Adeel Najam (ex- Nokia, Huawei, Starhub), who are supported by an all-star leadership team including C-suite executives from Tata Docomo, Paypal, Vodafone, Bharti Airtel, Hooq/ Singtel, and Flipkart (to name a few)

It now employs 400+ people over 5 APAC offices. It is the portfolio company of Warburg Pincus and Sequoia

Notable accolades from past years include: Top 5 most loved Singapore brands (2nd year running)- YouGov Customer's Choice; Top Telco for Customer Service- Seedly; and Top Employer- Influential Brands (2019)

About This Role

Responsibilities:
Install, design and maintain database system software and implement database security.
Monitor and analyze database performance and ensure effective and efficient utilization of database systems/processes.
Maintain database dictionaries and support tools; develop and maintain accurate system documentation.
Participate in the development and maintenance of strategic, architectural and tactical plans for the database; be conversant with, and cognizant of, the future direction of systems, how that directly impacts the company and how future and current database systems can be exploited for the company’s benefit.
Provide individual mentoring and training on databases and tools. Recommend, test, and evaluate new technologies, software tools, and required skill sets; recommend and implement improvements.
Implement a Business Continuity solution for the database environment, including the installation and configuration of database software and replication processes.
Set and maintain database standards.
Participate in On-Call roster.
Requirements
Degree in Information Technology/Computer Science or equivalent combination of education and experience.
One or more years of MongoDB, MySQL and RDS database experience as Database Administrator (DBA), including experience installing, configuring, designing, patching, archiving, and monitoring to include performance tuning databases with indexing.
Experience utilizing various high availability (HA) and disaster recovery (DR) options for MongoDB, MySQL and RDS.
Experience with backup/recovery best practices.
Extensive experience with query tuning and troubleshooting.
Working knowledge of data encryption techniques and database querying and management tools.
Experience running and creating Database Server health assessments reports.
Scripting and automation knowledge. (preferred)
Competencies
Adaptable to change and able to work independently and as part of a team.
Strong interpersonal, communication, and writing skills.
Capable of managing multiple projects concurrently while maintaining a high level of attention to detail on each project.
Manage and prioritize work effectively with minimal supervision.
Ability to learn new technologies as needed to provide the best solutions.
Strong problem analysis skills to include the use of mathematical concepts to validate results.
Good understanding of Redis, RabbitMQ and ETCD.
Interested to know more about us?
LinkedIn | Facebook | Instagram | Twitter
“Telco start-up Circles.Life snags funding from Warburg Pincus”
“A deep-dive into how Circles.Life can become Singapore's unicorn”
Circles.Life is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, disability or age.

To all recruitment agencies: Circles.Life will only acknowledge resumes from agencies specifically retained for the role.

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted for interviews."
"Special Programs & Analytics Lead, SEA","Responsibilities

 TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo. 

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About Team
TikTok's Client Solutions Team (CST) aims to establish and build scalable, healthy, long-term client relationships by solving direct client's and agencie's challenges through scalable, best in class campaign services. Our Client Solution Managers have a holistic understanding about TikTok's ad products and are humble, dynamic and open for change. You are joining a team of operational expertise with a customer-centric mindset, who proactively drive the client’s growth strategy, including upsells, renewals and campaign reactivations. 

The CST Special Programs & Analytics Team accelerates the growth of TikTok’s business through precise data and analytics, and predictive insights that both raise the top line and lower the bottom line. The SP&A Lead will shape the future of CST key focuses and business directions in the region. In this role, you will drive consistency and ensure the business is appropriately benchmarking our activities holistically across product, commercial, and programs. In close partnership with various cross functional departments, you will know how to connect the dots and help the business identify opportunities, and drive sustainable revenue impact. 

Responsibilities:
- Lead a team as well as influence the broader CST organization on business tracking, product insights analysis and experiment best practices 
- Work as the lead data strategist by identifying relevant data sources and sets to mine for client business needs, and collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables
- Build effective data tracking workflow that allows the business to monitor progress, and find problems or roadblocks in a timely manner
- Track and analyze advertising data, drawing actionable insights for campaign optimization and revenue growth
- Responsible for managing some of our top programs including creative programs, inhouse managed service projects etc
- Initiate and develop new programs which will create value or breakthrough for our advertisers
- Execute & lead the programs involving multiple internal as well as external parties including our partnership managers, client solutions managers, advertisers & their agencies, to ensure excellent execution
- Support ad-hoc reporting and data analysis requests from the business teams 

Qualifications

 Job Requirements
The ideal candidate will be a self-starter who is excited about data, excels in logical and strategical thinking, has clear communications, and brings distinctive problem solving skills and impeccable business judgment.

Qualifications:
- 3-5 years of experience in data science, algorithmic engineering, or machine learning
- Bachelor's degree or Master's degree in data analytics related fields such as Math, Statistics, Engineering
- Demonstrated leadership and self-direction. Willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
- Ability to conduct rigorous analysis and communicate conclusions to both technical and non-technical audiences
- Experience in business analysis, and product analysis. Product management experience or digital marketing industry knowledge is a plus
- Proficiency in BI tools, SQL, Python or R
- Solid communication and collaboration skills with the ability to work effectively with internal teams in a cross-cultural and cross-functional environment
- Proven ability to succeed in an innovative and fast-paced environment
- Technical leadership and managing experience preferred

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
IT Analyst Programmer,"Work :Location: 5A Serangoon North Avenue 5, Singapore 554575


Job Description
You will be joining the DT-IT organization, integrated in the multisite External partners/eWip framework team. We support Global Outsourcing Business Management operations, through various solutions like Datawarehouse and ERP solutions.


The Analyst Programmer is the technical expert of the application and has a very good view on the functional and business processes. He/she has a key role to perform the application maintenance, develop new features and collaborate with the support team to ensure 24/7 service.


In this scope, your missions will be to:
Maintain current system: develop new features, bugs fixing, code refactoring and performance optimization, data analytics
Ensure robustness of application, with 24/7 application availability
Interact regularly with various customer/business users, gather user requirements, to investigate, analyze and provide solution for enhancements
Interact with Business Analyst, Technical and Support team
Define Use Case and tests plans, execute Integration Test and coordinate UAT with users
Provide training to end-users for the available features or new solutions


Requirements

Minimum Bachelor’s degree in computer science/Computer Engineering /Information Technology
At least 4-8 years working experiences in software development
Experience in Linux and Windows environment
Experience in PL/SQL, ,MySQL/MariaDB, Oracle, JAVA, PHP, TWS Scheduler, JIT Scheduler, Cron Scheduler, FileZilla, SFTP, Windows and Linux Shell Scripting,
Ability to adapt quickly to new technology and in-house application
Flexibility to support on weekend, in case of major incidents
Hands-on knowledge on Big Data concepts and Data analytics would be an added advantage
Proactivity, autonomy, creativity and personal development."
Frontend Engineer,"⚡ Frontend Engineer (Crypto)
📍 Singapore (100% remote)
💼 Permanent role
💵 Competitive Salary

Organization
My client is a globally-leading, culture-driven DEX built on DAO architecture - they're expanding despite the current crypto winter, and have been smashing targets since their inception in 2017.

They are now looking to onboard a Frontend Engineer to design and build frontend architecture within a high-performing engineering team.

What you'll do
✅ Analyze customer demands, identify issues and implement solutions
✅ Oversee design, development, and improvement of frontend architecture
✅ Spearhead technical decisions surrounding tech stack and technology adoption
✅ Coordinate with engineering team to optimize frontend development

Must-haves
✅ >4yrs exp in frontend/fullstack(FE focus) development
✅ Immersed in Blockchain/Web3 space for >2yrs
✅ Tech stack: React, HTML, CSS, Javascript/Typescript
✅ Keen interest in Web3/Crypto/Blockchain/DeFi
✅ Bilingual - fluent in English and Mandarin

🌏 The role is remote.

📧 Interested in applying? Click on 'Easy Apply' or email me at saywei.tan@storm2.com for a confidential chat.

⚡ Storm2 is a specialist FinTech recruitment firm with clients across Europe, APAC, and North America. To discuss open opportunities or career options, please visit our website at storm2.com and follow the Storm2 LinkedIn page for the latest jobs and intel."
Machine Learning Engineer (Recommendation) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About the Team
E-commerce is a new and fast growing business that aims at connecting all customers to excellent sellers and quality products on TikTok Shop, through E-commerce live-streaming, E-commerce short videos, and commodity recommendation. We are a group of applied machine learning engineers and data scientists that focus on E-commerce recommendations. We are developing innovative algorithms and techniques to improve user engagement and satisfaction, converting creative ideas into business-impacting solutions. We are interested and excited in applying large scale machine learning to solve various real-world problems in E-commerce.

Responsibilities
- Participate in building large-scale (10 million to 100 million) e-commerce recommendation algorithms and systems, including commodity recommendations, live stream recommendations, short video recommendations etc in TikTok.
- Build long and short term user interest models, analyze and extract relevant information from large amounts of various data and design algorithms to explore users' latent interests efficiently.
- Design, develop, evaluate and iterate on predictive models for candidate generation and ranking(eg. Click Through Rate and Conversion Rate prediction) , including, but not limited to building real-time data pipelines, feature engineering, model optimization and innovation.
- Design and build supporting/debugging tools as needed.

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline
- Strong programming and problem-solving ability.
- Experience in applied machine learning, familiar with one or more of the algorithms such as Collaborative Filtering, Matrix Factorization, Factorization Machines, Word2vec, Logistic Regression, Gradient Boosting Trees, Deep Neural Networks, Wide and Deep etc.
- Experience in Deep Learning Tools such as tensorflow/pytorch.
- Experience with at least one programming language like C++/Python or equivalent.

Preferred Qualifications
- Experience in recommendation system, online advertising, information retrieval, natural language processing, machine learning, large-scale data mining, or related fields.
- Publications at KDD, NeurlPS, WWW, SIGIR, WSDM, ICML, IJCAI, AAAI, RECSYS and related conferences/journals, or experience in data mining/machine learning competitions such as Kaggle/KDD-cup etc.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Service Engineer (Airframe & Engine),"Job description:

Roles & Responsibilities

Inspect and examine aircraft components for leaks, cracks, breaks or other issues
Read and utilize blueprints, maintenance manuals, ATA codes, illustrated parts catalogues, service bulletins and other maintenance documents to troubleshoot and complete work assignments
Maintain, repair, and rebuild aircraft structures, functional components, and parts such as wings and fuselage, rigging, hydraulic units, oxygen systems, fuel systems, gaskets, and seals
Perform routine maintenance operations, such as the replacement of equipment’s and aircraft components
Modify aircraft structures, space vehicles, systems, or components, following drawings, schematics, charts, engineering orders, and technical publications
Interpret blueprints, specifications, or diagrams to inform installation, development or operation activities
Perform hourly, daily and monthly inspections to check for cracks, oil leaks, burned areas, foreign object damage, warping, distortions, missing segments and wear
Complete all tasks in the allotted time frame and to the quality standards of our company, our customers and the FAA
Promote safety within the workplace by monitoring others and yourself to guarantee all tasks are performed within the safety manual guidelines, and communicate with other mechanics and supervisors to coordinate repairs and keep apprised of safety concerns
Order supplies, equipment, materials and parts for repairs and general maintenance
Keep detailed records of the inspections performed, repairs finished, maintenance procedures and ordered parts


Job Requirements

Relevant NITEC/Higher NITEC/Diploma in Aerospace Technology/ Aerospace Engineering or equivalent
Independent
Proactive and keen interest to learn
Willing to work on rotating shifts
Willing to work in airbases (Paya Lebar or Sembawang)"
"Sales Associate, Full Time","Artifactt offers a thoughtfully curated collection of fine tableware and homeware from producers around the world. Our artisanal collections are mainly from Japan and Europe. We celebrate the subtle imperfections of handcrafted things in our tableware and homeware collection.

We are looking for a highly motivated Full-Time Sales Associate!

Location: Palais Renaissance (Orchard)

Job Description:
House keeping
Cashiering
Handle retail showroom sales
Managing of company's online sales
Fulfilment (Pick & Pack)
Coordinate with logistic partner for delivery
Handle customers' enquiries
Support operation manager in management of the shop, admin work, other ad hoc duties
Product inbounding
Regular stock take

Requirements:
Prefer candidate with prior retail experience.
5 working days per week
Must be able to commit to retail shifts (working hours 11am to 8pm with 1 hr lunch break) and weekends
Fluent English and Chinese Speaking"
ECC Engineer,"The Enterprise Command Center (ECC) is Millennium’s first line of defense and first response against Infrastructure disruptions and failures. The teams goal is to react quickly, efficiently and effectively in order to maximize uptime of systems and minimize trading downtime. He or she will work on resolving infrastructure issues and fulfilling service requests across the following platforms: Compute (Unix, and Windows), Monitoring, Database, Storage, and Networking while also managing infrastructure and trading outages that can potentially impact the business.

The successful candidate will work within the Enterprise Command Center (ECC) team based in Asia. The candidate should have a good understanding of IT Infrastructure with some relevant experience. Excellent communication skills and work schedule flexibility are required. Mobility to other teams within infrastructure is possible based on skills and knowledge developed within the role.

Responsibilities
Infrastructure Monitoring
Eyes on glass continuous monitoring of our technology estate to either anticipate or identify technology issues
Infrastructure Operations
Troubleshoot and remediate issues within Millennium’s IT infrastructure
Fulfill adhoc and scheduled operational requests
Collaborate with local and global teams to continuously share knowledge of the health of the production environment
Write and maintain detailed runbooks with specifications for alert escalation and other processes
Infrastructure and Trading Incident Management
Drive support teams to address and resolve incidents
Coordinate responses to outages, communicate to stakeholders, and manage incident bridges / calls
Ensure all incidents are accurately documented within our ITSM toolsets
Continuous Improvement
Identify and look at ways of improving current processes or increasing service quality
Constantly review and evaluate methods of working to look for efficiencies and ways to improve workflow

Qualifications/Skills Required

Network experience (Cisco CCNA certified preferred)
Basic Compute (Linux and Windows) operational experience
Candidates would ideally have a Bachelor's Degree in an IT discipline
Excellent collaboration and interpersonal skills with the ability to collaborate in a global team environment
High level understanding of general Infrastructure components and topology
Good problem solving skills
Quick learner, Detail oriented; Demonstrable thoroughness and strong ownership of work.
Good team player with a strong willingness to participate and help others.
Able to prioritize in a fast moving, high pressure, constantly changing environment; High sense of urgency with ability to adapt to new responsibilities
Strong communication skills
Knowledge of monitoring tools is a plus
Experience in running incidents / situations / crisis events in a complex environment desired but not essential

Schedule

Public Holiday rotation coverage required
Weekend coverage required"
DevsecOps Engineer,"502864BR

Introduction

As a DevsecOps Engineer, you will lead IBM into the future by translating system requirements into the design and development of customized systems in an agile environment. The success of IBM is in your hands as you transform vital business needs into code and drive innovation. Your work will power IBM and its clients globally, collaborating and integrating code into enterprise systems. You will have access to the latest education, tools and technology, and a limitless career path with the world’s technology leader. Come to IBM and make a global impact!

Your Role and Responsibilities

Work along with the Project teams to onboard new squads in the DevOps environment.
Guiding the continuous integration, continuous deployment and continuous testing.
Work closely with the development team and operation team to create DevOps strategy and toolset that suits the individual squads.
Setup, deploy and maintain scalable, high availability systems
Perform and automate deployment and security hardening of systems
Automate and build up scalable systems/environment using latest technologies (e.g. Kubernetes)
Automate security hardening in testing, deployment and production setup based on industrial best practices
Setup and maintain CI/CD, automated testing, development and delivery environments
Writing scripts/programs for service monitoring and health check of systems
Day-to-day monitoring, backup, deployment and maintenance of systems

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

Diploma/Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Communications Engineering or equivalent
Minimum 3 years in software development industry or server infrastructure setup
Experience in software-defined infrastructure (OpenStack, CloudStack, VSphere).
Experience with infrastructure provision tools (Docker, Ansible, Puppet, Chef etc.).
Good understanding of hardware infrastructure systems (network switches, firewalls, routers etc.) and Linux operating system.
Basic understanding of DevOps principles and practices. Knowledge in DecSecOps will be an added advantage.
Self-motivated and good communication skills. Good hands-on experience on using AWS Cloud Formation scripts for configuration management and application deployment.
At least 1-year experience working closely with infrastructure. Experience in Linux, Windows, network troubleshooting is a plus,
Experience on working in an Agile environment, in a close collaboration with developers, Knowledge on continuous integration, test automation, version control, and software configuration management
Excellent communication skills

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

Experience with cloud orchestration, configuration management and auto-scaling techniques
Thorough knowledge of networking, routers, switches, and WiFi setup.
Good knowledge of storage technologies, such as NAS, SAN, SDS
Experience with automation tools such as Salt/Chef/Puppet/Ansible
Experience with load balancing setup for TCP/IP, HTTP, DNS, routings.
Knowledge of IT security standards, for instance from CIS or IM8.
Experience on building and developing CI/CD pipeline and workflow (Gitlab CI/CD preferred)
Good hands-on experience on using AWS Cloud Formation scripts for configuration management and application deployment
Overall knowledge on one or more of the following programming language (Java, Spring Boot, Node JS, Angular JS, React Native)
Knowledge on continuous integration, test automation, version control, and software configuration management.

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

What matters to you when you’re looking for your next career challenge?

Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world? What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities – where you can truly discover your passion? Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust – where everyone has a voice? What about all of these? If so, then IBM could be your next career challenge. Join us, not to do something better, but to attempt things you never thought possible.

Impact. Inclusion. Infinite Experiences. Do your best work ever.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that progress is made through progressive thinking, progressive leadership, progressive policy and progressive action. IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition. Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are the largest technology and consulting employer in the world, with more than 380,000 IBMers serving clients in 170 countries.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM"
Technical account manager,"Our Purpose

We work to connect and power an inclusive, digital economy that benefits everyone, everywhere by making transactions safe, simple, smart and accessible. Using secure data and networks, partnerships and passion, our innovations and solutions help individuals, financial institutions, governments and businesses realize their greatest potential. Our decency quotient, or DQ, drives our culture and everything we do inside and outside of our company. We cultivate a culture of inclusion for all employees that respects their individual strengths, views, and experiences. We believe that our differences enable us to be a better team – one that makes better decisions, drives innovation and delivers better business results.

Job Title

Technical account manager

Corporate Security Responsibility

All activities involving access to Mastercard assets, information, and networks comes with an inherent risk to the organization and, therefore, it is expected that every person working for, or on behalf of, Mastercard is responsible for information security and must
Abide by Mastercard’s security policies and practices;
Ensure the confidentiality and integrity of the information being accessed;
Report any suspected information security violation or breach, and
Complete all periodic mandatory security trainings in accordance with Mastercard’s guidelines."
Software Engineer (Machine Learning Infrastructure) - AML,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

Responsibilities:
The mission of our AML team is to push next-generation machine learning algorithms and platform for the recommendation system, ads ranking and search ranking in our company. We also drive substantial impact for core businesses of the company. Currently we are looking for Software Engineer - Machine Learning Infrastructure to join our team to support and advance that mission.

What You'll Do
- Responsible for the design and implementation of a global-scale machine learning system for feeds, ads and search ranking models.
- Responsible for improving use-ability and flexibility of the machine learning infrastructure.
- Responsible for improving the workflow of model training and serving, data pipelines and resource management for the multi-tenancy machine learning systems.

Qualifications

Qualifications:
- At least 3 years of work experience in related field
- Proficient in C/C++/Python, and have solid programming skills.
- Familiar with deep learning frameworks (TensorFlow/Pytorch).
- Experience in developing and deploying large-scale systems.
- Ability to work independently and complete projects from beginning to end and in a timely manner.
- Good communication and teamwork skills to clearly communicate technical concepts with other teammates.

Preferred Qualifications:
- Experience contributing to an open sourced machine learning framework (TensorFlow/PyTorch).
- Experience in big data frameworks (e.g., Spark/Hadoop/Flink), experience in resource management and task scheduling for large scale distributed systems.
- Strong background in one of the following fields: Hardware-Software Co-Design, High Performance Computing, ML Hardware Acceleration (e.g., GPU/TPU/RDMA) or ML for Systems.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Sales Associate - CELINE,"Job Highlights
Luxury Career Path
Great working culture
Attractive package

Job Description
Create a good shopping experience for our clients
Provide exceptional customer service
Assist the team in store operation matters
Assist with refilling, unpacking, packing and sorting of stocks
A team player to support the retail team wherever necessary

Job Requirements
Minimum 2 years of retail sales experience will be an added advantage
Ready-to-Wear (RTW) and/or luxury fashion experience will be an added advantage
Good understanding of luxury market and practices
Good communications and interpersonal skills
Good team player
Motivated and driven
Good customer service and selling skills
Good in mix and match on Ready-to-Wear (RTW)
Good flair of fashion sense

How to Apply?
Attach your CV for your application
We wish to inform you that only short-listed candidates will be notified by phone or email"
Blood Professional Executive (Blood Bank) – Blood Resources Division,"We are a statutory board under Ministry of Health that regulates health products, serve the administration of justice, secure the nation’s blood supply, and safeguard the public’s health.

About Blood Services at HSA
We secure the nation’s blood supply by ensuring a safe and adequate blood supply for public and private hospitals.
To learn more about us, visit About HSA and HSA – Blood Services.[What the role is:]
Calling out to those with a Passion to Serve! If you are on the lookout to transition into a healthcare executive role in a Public Service setting, we would like to hear from you. We are looking for driven individuals to be part of HSA’s Blood Resources Division- Blood bank team. where you will play a key role in securing the nations’ blood supply. In this front-facing role, the individual will perform executive functions in a dynamic and close-knit team.

[What you will be working on]
Responsibilities:
Blood Collection Support (Interested candidates with limited exposure to Phlebotomy are welcomed to apply. Training will be provided prior to deployment)
Candidates who are competent Phlebotomist will be deployed to support blood collection operations within donation rooms
Those with limited exposure to Phlebotomy will assist with the following blood collection support processes while undergoing training.
Assist phlebotomist in Whole Blood (collection of blood in its complete form, not separated into its various components) pre and post donation procedure which includes blood bag preparation, bandaging and stripping of blood bags
Support Apheresis (an automated process where plasma, platelets or red cells in the blood drawn is separated and remaining components are returned to donor during the donation process) pre & post donation which includes registering donors and test tubes preparation
Conduct capping which includes taking blood for haemoglobin test, explaining to donor on deferral if required, checking, sorting blood bags and sample tubes before passing it to the laboratory

Operational Admin Support
Support key executive duties, ensuring smooth operations at blood collection centres
Assist in preparation of key statistic reports and management updates
Assist in store management and maintenance of equipment and consumables
Records Management of vendors’/contractors’ performance
Support Purchasing and Procurement activities of collection centres
Contribute to Improvement and Transformation projects on a team/Division level

What you can look forward to:
Comprehensive training and extensive Learning and Development opportunities and career progression prospects for all qualifying officers
A competitive total package comprising of basic salary, shift allowances, bonus payouts and other staff benefits.

[What we are looking for]
Requirements:
Minimum Diploma in Healthcare/Community Care services, Biomedical/Social Sciences, Hospitality/Tourism Management or equivalent, with a minimum 2 years of relevant work experience as an executive or in a healthcare setting
Experienced professionals exploring a mid-career switch are welcomed
Our Blood Professional Executives will be rostered to support morning, afternoon and weekend shifts, across a 5-day work week
Team members are not required to perform night shift.

Our blood banks operate 6 days a week*, between 9am – 8pm*
(Operating days/hours vary based on location).
Visit https://giveblood.sg to find out more.

Shortlisted candidates would be contacted within 30 days from the closing date of the advertisement. We regret that only shortlisted candidates would be notified."
Technical Support Engineer,"Job description:



We are currently looking for Technical Support Engineer & this position will be based at Singapore.



Candidate Profile:

Singapore Citizen or PR
Experience in technical support and systems administration in a vendor environment
Enterprise scale Linux and Windows administration with strong troubleshooting skillset
VMware ESXi and vCenter administration with strong troubleshooting skillset (Preferable with CLI knowledge) (6.5 and above)
TCP/IP Networking, Network/Security devices (e.g. Cisco Switch, Firewall)
PostgreSQL, MySQL, Oracle, and other database servers
Monitoring systems (e.g. Centreon, Nagvis)
Management of SAN storage, NetApp storage and tape library
Administration/Management of security tools, e.g. Antivirus, EDR, etc.
Windows PowerShell, Unix Scripting
Good knowledge and practical experience in ITIL framework
Independent team player with a people-oriented personality
Good leadership skills; able to motivate team members to achieve goals
Strong verbal/written communication skills


Job Profile:

Ensure customer satisfaction in maintenance and support
Manage IT components and related border-control endpoints, including Hardware and Software
Troubleshoot, analyse and resolve tickets escalated by on-site Level 1 and Level 2 Teams
Commit to a resolution date, formalize action plan and implement workaround for fault rectification
Perform root cause analysis of technical issues
Communicate and interface with vendors and customers
Generate reports and write documentation, e.g. maintenance guide, operation manual, test procedures and test reports
May be required to stand in and perform 24/7 shift duty in case of resource shortage
As a senior engineer, he/she is also expected to: -
Act as subject matter expert to impart knowledge and grow technical capability within the team
Mentor junior engineers to better manage various customer sites, improve troubleshooting efficiency and streamline work processes


Skills:

Ability to work alone and in a team
Good communicator and at building relationships (with customers, partners and internal teams)
Readiness to work under time pressure and be able to adjust quickly to project demands
Well versed in technical writing, documentation and presentation"
Quality Technician 2,"What if the work you did every day could impact the lives of people you know? Or all of humanity?

At Illumina, we are expanding access to genomic technology to realize health equity for billions of people around the world. Our efforts enable life-changing discoveries that are transforming human health through the early detection and diagnosis of diseases and new treatment options for patients.

Working at Illumina means being part of something bigger than yourself. Every person, in every role, has the opportunity to make a difference. Surrounded by extraordinary people, inspiring leaders, and world-changing projects, you will do more and become more than you ever thought possible.

Position Summary

This individual will work as part of the Quality team to support the QA/QC operations. The individual will be responsible for incoming inspection of raw materials, reagent and components, executing and/or verifying tasks for Nonconformance (NCR) process; and SAP master data maintenance for materials. Individual will also assist in documentation review and NC process that arises from these inspections.

Responsibilities

Document and review executed procedures and record data in compliance to Quality System specifications.
Support Return Material Authorization (RMA), Incoming Quality Control (IQC), Nonconformance (NCR) and SAP Master Inspection Characteristics (MIC) activities.
Execute and/or verify tasks related to NCR containment, disposition and any other routine NCR actions.
Support MIC setup, maintenance activities for incoming materials and outgoing products.
Documentation review and release of incoming raw materials in compliance to internal specifications.
Tests and inspects incoming materials using standard operating procedures.
Maintenance / calibration / inspection of measuring devices, equipment and procedures for accuracy.
Report abnormalities and support troubleshooting / investigation of laboratory equipment/test/nonconforming material.
Participate in developing and validating testing methodology, revising and updating Standard Operating Procedures.
Perform Peer review to the test/inspection report.
Perform release at SAP system.

All listed tasks and responsibilities are deemed as essential functions to this position; however, business conditions may require reasonable accommodations for additional task and responsibilities.

Preferred Education

Diploma in Biomedical Sciences, Life Sciences, Biotechnology, Chemistry or related discipline.

Preferred Requirements

At least 3-5 years of relevant experience of quality assurance/ quality control experience preferred.
Good understanding of GDP and cGMP, knowledge of ISO and FDA requirements preferred.
Understanding and working knowledge in Geometric Dimensioning & Tolerancing.
Must have working knowledge of acceptance sampling plans and basic statistics.
Proficient with the use of standard measurement tools such as calipers, micrometers, height gage, thread gages and pin gages etc. Experience in CMM and Vision Measuring Systems are desirable.
Familiar with basic laboratory procedures. Relevant experience with laboratory testing and QC of molecular-biology-based assays will be an advantage.
Must have computer skills and competent in Microsoft Office Applications.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Must be able to identify and recommend effective solutions to problems and working individually and with others within and outside his/her function.

Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list, of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs.

Illumina believes that everyone has the ability to make an impact, and we are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information."
Tech Lead Full Stack (DevOps),"We are looking for a Tech Lead Full Stack (DevOps) who will join our client, an asset management and technology company, who will be a hands-on developer working to design and develop both improvements to existing products and the building of new ones. You will have opportunities to work on all product work streams, with most of the upcoming work being new greenfield projects other than maintaining legacy systems.

Key Responsibilities:
Participate in an agile development sprint to create high-quality, fault-tolerant, and secure software solutions.
Develop the entire stack, including:
Frontend and backend development
Changing the database schema
AWS CloudFormation deployment infrastructure is being updated.
Ensuring that updates can be delivered and tested automatically in our CI/CD system
Collaborating with the rest of the development team, including examining pull requests, and providing constructive criticism, as well as assisting colleagues in designing solutions.
Working closely with QA to ensure that development and QA work together smoothly and that development work meets business needs.
Participate in daily scrum meetings and sprint planning sessions every two weeks.

Qualifications and Requirements:
Bachelor's degree (or higher) in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related technical discipline.
Significant experience working as a hands-on full stack software engineer is required, with a least of three (3) years of experience, however we are open to anyone from the mid to senior levels.
Significant knowledge of Java and/or Kotlin
Build web applications using a modern framework such as Spring Boot.
Working knowledge of Java build automation tools such as Maven and/or Gradle
Knowledge of relational databases, SQL, and ORM tools
Outstanding written and oral communication abilities
Highly desirable experiences:
Experience with a current frontend JavaScript framework, preferably Angular or React.
Experience with cloud technologies, ideally AWS and CloudFormation (or another infrastructure-as-code tool like Terraform) is required.
Docker expertise is required.
Knowledge of CI/CD software such as Jenkins, Circle CI, Travis CI, Bamboo, GitLab, and others.
Working experience in an Agile context
Working knowledge of Python
Working knowledge of Blockchain or distributed ledger technology
Work experience in the FinTech or high-security sectors is preferred.

If interested, please apply!

Please note that due to high application volumes, we regret that only successful candidates will be contacted.

EA License: 20S0080 CEI Reg Nu.: CEI: R1989346"
Data Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
We are seeking a highly skilled and experienced data scientist to join our team. The ideal candidate will have a strong background in data science and experience with tools like Snowflake and PowerBI or Tableau.

In this role, you will be responsible for using your expertise in data analysis and visualization to extract insights from large and complex datasets. You will work closely with our business teams to understand their needs and develop predictive models and algorithms that can help improve our decision-making.

Roles and Responsibilities
Developing and implementing advanced data analysis and modeling techniques using Snowflake cloud data warehouse and PowerBI or Tableau visualization and analytical tool.
Collaborating with business teams to understand their data needs and provide data-driven insights and recommendations
Building and maintaining predictive models and algorithms that can help improve our decision-making
Communicating your findings and recommendations to stakeholders in a clear and concise manner
Maintaining a strong understanding of industry trends and developments in the field of data science
Additionally, the data scientist may be responsible for other tasks, such as:
Working with large and complex datasets, and using statistical and machine learning techniques to extract insights from the data
Developing and implementing data-driven strategies that can help improve business performance and decision-making
Collaborating with other data scientists and analysts to share knowledge and best practices
Mentoring and training other team members on data analysis and visualization techniques.
Qualifications And Other Requirements
A Degree in a related field, such as computer science, statistics, or mathematics
Strong experience with data analysis and visualization tools like Snowflake, PowerBI, and Tableau
Proficiency in programming languages like Python and R, with experience in building and testing predictive models
Excellent communication and collaboration skills, with the ability to work effectively with cross-functional teams
A passion for data and a strong desire to use it to drive business decisions and improvements.
Preferred Knowledge And Skills
Experience working with large and complex datasets
Familiarity with advanced data analysis and modeling techniques, such as machine learning and artificial intelligence
Strong problem-solving skills, with the ability to identify and solve complex data-related problems
Proficient in Snowflake cloud data warehouse
Proficient in PowerBI or Tableau
Proficient in Python, R, and SQL
AWS or Azure and Salesforce CRM will be a plus
Knowledge in digital marketing platforms that leverage digital data collected from websites, mobile apps, emails, cookies, device identifiers, and third-party providers (such as Google Analytics and Facebook)
Knowledge of industry-specific data and trends, and an understanding of how data can be used to drive business decisions.

Desired Skills and Experience
Tableau, Snowflake Cloud Data Warehouse, Machine Learning, Data Analysis, Azure, Hadoop, Artificial Intelligence, ETL, PowerBI, SQL, Python, Statistics, Data Science, Visualization, Google Analytics"
Associate Engineer,"At Singtel, we believe in the strength of a vibrant, diverse and inclusive workforce where backgrounds, perspectives and life experiences of our people help us innovate and create strong connections with our customers. We strive to ensure all our people practices are non-discriminatory and provide a fair, performance-based work culture that is diverse, inclusive and collaborative.

Join us and experience what it’s like to be with an Employer of Choice*. Together, let’s create a brighter digital future for all. *Awarded at the HR Fest Awards 2020.

Singtel Networks, the most established telecommunications infrastructure provider in Singapore is transforming to enable the digital generation of tomorrow. We are introducing new capabilities in 5G, Cloud, Analytics, Digital Commerce, Software Engineering, Cyber Security to enhance our core competencies and deliver innovative and differentiated Mobile and Fixed services (Broadband, TV and Telephony) for our customers. We are committed to celebrating inclusion and diversity and is a strong believer to upskill and nurture all individuals. Come join us today as we build Singtel’s Networks of tomorrow, and Empower Every Generation to live, work and play in new ways!

Responsibilities
Conduct site audit for Cable Infrastructure work completed by contractors
Audit documents of Cable Infrastructure work completed by contractors
Ensure data integrity of Singtel’s Fiber, Copper and Pipe Network.
Investigate on any record discrepancies reported.
Any other responsibilities assigned by the manager.
The Ideal Candidate Should Possess
Diploma in Engineering, Civil or Electrical with 1 year of working experience.
Experience in conducting manhole/fiber/copper testing.
Basic knowledge of telecommunication infrastructure.
High degree of computer literacy including knowledge of applications such as MS Office suite, Data Analytics and RPA would be an added advantage.
Able to manage contractor effectively and communicate with internal stakeholders.
Keen learner with an eye for details.
We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated."
"Executive, Ecom Operations","SPEED & SPIRIT is what we look for in our candidates, defined by some simple values that inspire us to BE DRIVEN in our performance, BE VIBRANT in our sporting legacy, BE TOGETHER in our team spirit, and BE YOU to let our individual talent and experience shine. Applying for a job at PUMA is easy and all genders are welcome. Simply click APPLY ONLINE and follow the steps to upload your application.

This role will focus primarily on managing operational process supporting PUMA Ecommerce business. This includes inventory management, replenishment strategy, order processing and fulfillment, customer service, information technology and financial operations/payment processing.



Task 1:

Ensure efficient and effective delivery of services by external partners in areas such as information technology, fulfillment and logistics, call center, and payment processing. Process ecom wholesale deliveries to ensure timely deliveries to wholesale partners.



Task 2:

Manage 3rd party fulfillment and operation partner(s) Work in close collaboration with PUMA buying, planning, content, marketing and finance teams to achieve the group's overall ecommerce business and financial goals.



Task 3:

Optimize business processes to increase operating efficiency and enable increased focus on strategic, value-adding activities. Provide reporting and KPIs.



Task 4:

Work with customer service team and handle all customer service escalation. Ensure best in class for customer service.



Task 5:

Fraud management and manage new payment gateway initiatives to increase revenue and opportunities.



Education: Bachelor Degree in Supply Chain/Statistics/Business



Professional: Minimum 2 to 3 years of experience in Ecommerce Retail Operations. Marketplaces and Systems handling experience would be a plus.



IT Skills: Profound knowledge of Microsoft Office (Excel, PowerPoint). SAP knowledge



Language Skills: Fluent in English (Written and Oral)



Competencies: Analytical Thinking / Problem Solving; Drive for Results; Oral Communication / Presentation; Planning & Organizing



Functional Skills: Flexibility; Vendor Management; Written Communication; Commercial and marketplace awareness

PUMA supports over 19,000 employees across 120+ countries. The PUMA Group owns the brand PUMA, Cobra Golf and Stichd, and is headquartered in Herzogenaurach, Germany. PUMA provides equal opportunities for all job applicants, regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or disability. Equality for all, is one of the core principles at PUMA and we do not tolerate any form of harassment or discrimination."
IT Specialist/EUC Support Specialist,"Autonomy to make key decisions
Regional role
Exposure to latest technologies
About The Company

Our Client is a well-established company within the financial services industry with a presence in the market for almost 50 years. With rapid expansion plans, they are now looking for an EUC Support Specialist/IT Specialist (trade floor) to join their team.

About The Job

Your role involves:
Provide first point of contact support to end users, including guidance, training, and advice where applicable
Onboarding and offboarding of employees in a professional and timely manner
Take ownership of issues and requests and manage to resolution
Manage customer expectations and provide regular updates
Manage the flow of work coming into the team effectively, escalating where necessary
Ensure BAU and projects are delivered to a high quality and on time
Ensure incidents and problems are managed correctly always documenting all steps for later analysis
Maintain personal/professional development to meet the changing demands of the role, including all relevant regulatory and legislative training
Skills And Experience Required

As a successful applicant, you will have at least 5 to 10 years of experience in trade floor support in an end-user environment. Experience in M365, Active Directory, DHCP, DNS are required for the role.

Prior experience in Citrix would be an added advantage.

Whats on offer

This is an excellent opportunity to join a leading end user environment and also have the opportunity to have regional exposure.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you can reach me at https://www.linkedin.com/in/teohchinying/ or 6510 6320. (EA: 94C3609/ R1981920)

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM’s regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
"Database Engineer (SQL, Oracle)","Role and Responsibilities
The Assoc Database Engineer identifies, tests and deploys all database technologies and support tools. Candidate ensures system improvements are successfully implemented and is responsible for verifying that all data that is entered into database meets set standards and requirements as well as installing, configuring and maintaining the database infrastructure within assigned span-of-control. Candidate assists in project planning by establishing work plans, estimates, milestones and schedules. Candidate is required to be on standby with on-call availability.
Candidate exhibits excellent attention to detail and is meticulous in the execution of tasks assigned to him. Candidate has a passion for problem-solving and relishes the opportunity to take on new challenges. Candidate is able to communicate effectively and displays high service level standards.

Execute database administration service levels
• Administer database components with the goal of meeting overall database requirements
• Perform maintenance of corporate databases including backup, database optimising, re-indexing, initiating recovery procedures and routine troubleshooting
• Manage the security and integrity of the databases
• Liaise with relevant parties to meet data storage and access priorities
• Produce systemic and/or ad hoc reports

Develop new databases
• Assist with the development of new databases as per the business requirements
• Implement database security and data integrity controls
• Assist with new database testing
• Assist with piloting of new tools, technologies, and/or processes

Optimise database performance
• Perform ongoing optimisation of database components to ensure availability, reliability, scalability, and security
• Assist with regular database audits and maintenance activities
• Maintain documentation of all conducted database optimisation activities
• Track key operational metrics, including performance, utilisation, throughput, capacity etc.

Resolve issues
• Identify database issues
• Use prescribed guidelines or policies to analyse and resolve problems
• Solve faults occurring in the operation of databases

Develop Documentation
• Maintain technical documentation including databases structures, database requirements, process flows, operating procedures and management guidelines
• Maintain database support tools, database tables and dictionaries and recovery and back-up procedures
• Document maintenance procedures and activities

Requirements / Qualifications
At least 8 years of experience in support Oracle database in production 24x7 environment. Primary focus should be Oracle database with experience in supporting Oracle 19c and Oracle RAC.

It only a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!!
#LI-IHIS39 #M-2022-1755"
Technology - Risk Services (Data Trust Services) Associate - 2023 Intake,"Line of Service

Assurance

Industry/Sector

FS X-Sector

Specialism

Risk

Management Level

Associate

Job Description & Summary

We at PwC believe that challenges are better solved together. That's why you'll join a diverse, global community that comes together to build trust in society and solve important problems. With us, you are encouraged to lead with your heart and values, and where your skills are developed and put to work in exciting ways, superpowered by technology.

How will you value-add:

We aspire to build a team of data professionals with the ability to apply their knowledge in helping our clients solve their business challenges while future proofing their business.

Our practice is integrated across different PwC Lines of Services, and works collaboratively with our clients to manage engagements and lead teams of data and analytics resources in various aspects digital, data and analytics solutions

We are looking for Associates to fill our 2023 intake.

Choose your track:

There are multiple tracks within our team where you can find your niche. Please apply to at least one and not more than two - based on your experience, expertise, and interest. You also need to explicitly mention to the concerned person involved in the recruitment process about your choices.

Track A: Data Engineering

A data engineer is responsible for collecting, managing, and transforming raw data into information that can be consumed and interpreted downstream by end users, facilitated by data scientists and business analysts. Your ultimate goal is to enable organizations to utilize their data for performance evaluation and optimization. Here are some of the skills and experience you may need to be effective in your role:
Bachelor’s degree and above in Analytics, Information Systems Management, Computer Science or related fields
0-1 year of experience – depending on grade, in data integration strategy, data modeling, designing, building ETLs, data ingestions, and/or transformations
Interest in working with RDBMS such as DB2, Oracle, Microsoft SQL Server, PostGresSQL, Teradata, etc.
Knowledge in data integration or ETL tools such as Informatica PowerCentre, Oracle Data Integrator, SAP Data Services, Ab Initio, IBM DataStage or Microsoft SSIS
Process good knowledge and experience in data quality definition, data cleansing and data treatment/profiling process using industry standard tools like Informatica Data Quality, Trillium Software, SAS Data Quality, SAP Data Quality Management, etc. is an advantage
Good knowledge of data warehouse and data management implementation methodology
Good conceptual knowledge of the data management frameworks, including operating model, data governance, data management, data security, data quality and data architecture
Experience in big data platforms like Cloudera and HortonWorks
Knowledge in Cloud technologies including AWS, Azure, Google Cloud and their respective ETL specific services (eg: AWS Glue)
Knowledge in cloud data warehouses like Snowflake, Redshift, Synapse etc.
Knowledge in API Management software design and build
Good knowledge of data visualisation concepts using tools such as Tableau, Microsoft PowerBI, Qlik, etc.
Interest in Agile Methodology implementation
Certification in any of database, data integration, data management, visualisation tools and cloud is an added advantage
Knowledge about the infrastructure paradigms such as OS, network, etc. is an added advantage
Ability to pick up new tools and able to be independent with minimal guidance from the project leads/managers
Strong analytical and creative problem-solving capabilities
Ability to establish personal credibility quickly and demonstrate expertise
Must be able to stay up to date on the latest trends in data analytics, like Data Fabric, Data Lakehouse, Data Mesh to name a few.

Track B: Data Management and Governance

A data management professional develops and governs data-oriented systems designed to meet the needs of an organization or research team. Data Management includes accessing, validating, and storing data that is needed for research and day-to-day business operations. Key areas of work include data quality, metadata and masterdata management, creation of data catalogues to name a few. Here are some of the skills and experience you may need to be effective in your role:
A degree in technology or business-related subject is recommended (e.g. Business analytics, Computer science, accounting, business management)
0-1 year of relevant experience, depending on the grade applied for
Knowledge in Financial industry will be an added advantage
Strong technical and analytical skill sets
Possess good presentation skills, both oral and written
Ability to interact with various levels of internal and external stakeholders both in written and verbal forms
Good client management skills, authoritative and credible in a client conversation - both in terms of personal style and subject matter expertise
Strong problem-solving skills and an ability to prioritise and manage multiple task
Ability to lead teams under pressure with demonstrated experience in project management
Willing to listen to your client and discern the best course of action for them
Self-driven, curious, a fast-learner and a strong practitioner of self-development
Must be able to stay up to date on the latest trends in data analytics, like Data Fabric, Data Lakehouse, Data Mesh to name a few.
Conceptual understanding of various data platforms, including major cloud players like AWS, Azure and GCP
A passion for client service and an ability to work from both the PwC Singapore office and client sites

Track C: Data Science

A data scientist’s primary job, in simple terms, is to extract actionable insights of value from data. But we expect certain more skills and qualities in the data scientists who wish to join us, like
Ability to work with data to get it into proper form amenable for analysis which includes data preparation/wrangling and integration experience, feature engineering
Business acumen so that you are able to understand the business problem, translate the requirements into technical requirements and then ensure use cases you formulate see the light of the day

Read on only if you think you can deliver on both of the aforementioned aspects.

How will you value add:
Using Data Science Methods and Artificial Intelligence to enhance innovation, profitability and growth of our clients in three dimensions:
(1) Business Innovation: Design and implement innovative, data-driven business models, identification, conception and assessment of industry and client specific Use Cases, Utilization of data-modeling and -analysis in every aspect of Sales, Marketing, Operations and Business-model innovation
(2) Big Data and Analytics: Extract new insights from various data sources leveraging sophisticated Machine Learning and AI solutions
(3) Digital Transformation: Define and implement corporate transformation as well as Strategy development towards a “Data-Driven Business” leveraging data science, AI, ML and digital technologies
Work with business and tech to develop end-to-end advanced analytics solutions, from problem formulation, data sourcing to developing and deploying the solution into production
Understand the business domain and relevant dataset
Provide end-to-end advanced solutions to design, develop and deploy to production system
Build MLOps, CI/CD practices to manage models regarding quick experiments and feedback loop and their ultimate operationalization
Communicate, interpret, execute analytics results and machine learning model details with business as well as technical stakeholders

About You:
PhD, Master’s or Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Economics, Computer Science or other relevant fields with deep theoretical knowledge in machine learning, data mining or statistical / mathematical modelling
0-1 year experience from leading consulting organizations and/or working on transformation projects and/or in-house consulting, with proven delivery success of data science and analytics related projects and transformation programmes.
Proven experience in projects related to Data Analytics, Data science and digital transformation and up-to-date on methods and technologies related to Data Science, Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning and Automation
Practical experience in solving complex problems using scientific methods and modelling approach using experimental, statistical, machine learning and visualization techniques.
Clear and proven project delivery expertise and client-facing experience in Singapore and/or Asia
Identify, pursue and covert a pipeline of business development opportunities leveraging sharp intellect and strong problem-solving skills to address complex client challenges
Proven practical interest in statistical modelling, Machine Learning, Text Mining or Data Visualization for use cases including segmenting, customer value modelling, marketing optimization, campaign management, Pricing, image and voice recognition, fraud detection, Robotics and Chatbots as well as real time data capture and evaluation.
Proficient in the technical skills such as SQL, Python, PySpark, ML packages and tools
Knowledge in Business Intelligence tools and relevant statistic tools/languages (e.g. R, Python, SAS) as well as Data Storytelling and visualization skills (e.g. with Tableau or QlikView)
Other tools/cloud platform knowledge and experience valued: Alteryx, GCP, Azure, AWS

Track D: BI and Data Visualisation

Specific responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Perform work across diverse industries and projects ranging from developing organisational strategies for analytics to building sophisticated data architectures and analytical models
Analyse and interpret large volumes of data from client data systems and external sources using proprietary and open source data tools, platforms and analytical tool kits
Translate complex findings into simple language and communicate them to internal and external stakeholders, such as your team members and clients executives
Deliver excellent client service and work from both the PwC Singapore office and at client sites

About You
Degree in Business Analytics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Economics, Engineering, Information Systems, Sciences, Mathematics, Statistics, Physic or other related disciplines that possesses an analytical and quantitative component from a reputable university
Strong communication skills and an awareness of global trends
Strong preference for basic competency in two or more of the following:
an analytical software (e.g. R, SAS)
a data visualization tool (e.g. Qlik, Tableau, PowerBI,)
a relational or graph database management tool (e.g. SQL, NoSQL, Neo4J)
programming (e.g. VBA, C++, Java, Python)
distributed architectures (e.g. HDFS, Mapreduce, Sqoop, Flume, Kafka, Pig, Hive)
A self-driven learner with the ability to quickly learn and apply new tools and techniques such as proprietary analytical software, data models and programming languages
An appreciation for structured methodical research, critical thinking and problem solving skills with an understanding for the application of these skills in the business environment
A natural curiosity to identify, investigate and explain trends and patterns in data
An ability to analyse and break down complex concepts and technical findings into clear and simple language for communication to team members and clients
A passion for Emerging Technologies related to Big Data, Machine Learning and AI

Track E: Data Generalist / Analytics focussed Business Analyst (BA)

A business analyst plays a key role in across the lifecycle of an analytics project, by analyzing data and providing insights that can help the stakeholders make better business decisions. As a Data Generalist or a Business Analyst, you would often work closely with data analysts to collect, clean, and analyze data from various sources, and business stakeholders to elicit analytics requirements around use cases. The ability to wear multiple hats, translate business requirements into technical requirements, drive UATs and test case scenarios, guide and manager the team delivering the data analytics project will be some of the key responsibilities in your job.

About You
Someone who has interest in at least two of the below tracks:
Data Engineering
Data Management
Data Science
BI and Data Visualisation
Knowledge in creating and maintaining documents like Business Requirements Document (BRD), Requirements Traceability Matrix (RTM), Functional Specification Document (FSD)
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, as well as the demonstrated ability to communicate complex ideas clearly and effectively.
Track record of providing ongoing support and guidance to stakeholders to help them understand and use data effectively, like conducting adoption trainings, hackathons etc.
Ability to collaborate with multiple stakeholders to identify and prioritize business needs
Interest in developing and implementing data collection and analysis processes
Evaluating data to identify areas for improvement and making recommendations to senior management
At least a bachelor's degree in a related field, such as business management, engineering, economics, or statistics

You will receive an email from us to complete pymetrics within 3 working days of your application submission. Pymetrics is a series of engaging online games that will assess cognitive, behavioural and emotional traits. This allows us to learn more about you and gives us insights into where you will thrive the most in our business.

Note:
Please note we accept only one application per candidate. You may indicate your second preference in the same application. We recommend that you apply to your preferred position that closely aligns with your skills, passions and interests.
You can indicate another role in the same application form. Duplicate entries will slow down your application with us.
Kindly upload both your resume and degree audit or transcript in PDF format all under Resume attachment upload
Kindly note only shortlisted candidates will be contacted.



Got a question? Email to sg_graduate_recruitment@pwc.com.

There have been reports of scammers impersonating PwC HR professionals contacting individuals about fraudulent job opportunities using non-PwC domain email addresses and an overseas number. Please note that genuine communications from our HR team will only come from ""@pwc.com"" email address.

Education (if blank, degree and/or field of study not specified)

Degrees/Field of Study required:

Degrees/Field of Study preferred:

Certifications (if blank, certifications not specified)

Optional Skills

Required Skills

Desired Languages (If blank, desired languages not specified)

Travel Requirements

Not Specified

Available for Work Visa Sponsorship?

Yes

Government Clearance Required?

No

Job Posting End Date"
"Product Analyst, SEA (Flight Product Oriented)","Responsibilities:
Responsible for flight product localization for SEA market, regularly provide local market intelligence to local team and headquarter to influence global product and marketing direction.
Actively think, plan, identify, build localized flight products and features with integrate usability studies, conduct research and market analysis that address customer needs to empower trading and commercial decisions
Use self-service dashboards to monitor and report out on onboarding programs.
Leverage data to identify business opportunities and circulate them into actionable business solution, shape future effective profitable strategies and making recommendations for flight improvements.
Work closely with other local teams and headquarter teams to collaborate on marketing / merchandising campaigns / BD / product / design functions to drive flights growth.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Business Analytics, Computer Science, Finance, Accounting, Engineering, or any similar discipline
Minimum 3 years of relevant experience, background in Airline is a plus
In-depth understanding of native consumer market
Experience in Tableau or equivalent data visualization tool
Strong communication skills to influence your stakeholders and manage expectations
Proficiency in SQL is a plus"
Software Engineer (Graph Computing / Mining System) - Cloud Infrastructure,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.

The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.

Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!


Responsibilities
- Participate in the research and development of large-scale graph processing/mining systems, and be responsible for the maintenance of existing distributed graph processing system;
- Support graph computing related application scenarios, including but not limited to recommendation, search, advertising, risk control, etc.;
- Explore the future development of graph computing areas and build a new generation of distributed graph computing/mining systems.

Qualifications

- Familiar with C/C ++ development under Linux environment, familiar with multi-threading, network programming and other technologies;
- Familiar with distributed computing, high performance computing, non-volatile memory storage, and relevant development experiences;
- Strong self-learning ability, familiar with SOTA research works in the graph computing community;
- Possess good communication skills, teamwork, and a strong ability for research.

Preferred Qualifications
- At least 3 years of relevant experience."
Sales Associate,"Crisp color, graphic prints and playful sophistication are the hallmarks of Kate Spade New York. From handbags to clothing and décor, our exuberant approach to the everyday encourages personal style with a dash of incandescent charm. We call it living colorfully. A member of the Tapestry family, we are part of a global house of brands that has unwavering optimism and is committed to being innovative and wholly inclusive.


Primary Purpose:
Contribute to achieving store goals in sales, productivity, and service by utilizing selling skills, and Service training. You will be responsible for meeting store sales and productivity goals, and delivering service that meets or exceeds expectations. You represent Kate Spade to the consumer, acts as an ambassador of the brand, and ensures customer needs are consistently exceeded.
The successful individual will leverage their proficiency to...
Takes ownership and accountability for individual productivity and utilizes resources effectively to impact individual productivity
Tailor approach to different customers by reading cues
Build long-term relationships with clients, such as loyalty program (Clienteling)
Services all customers according to the Kate Spade approach standards and maintain an energetic presence and high level of enthusiasm on the sales floor
Participates as a team member and encourages team to meet and exceed performance standards
Consistently uses Kate Spade Communication tools to remain informed of individual performance, store performance and company information.


The accomplished individual will possess...
Individual who are passionate about retail and service industry are welcome to apply.
Individual with retail experience may be considered for senior position.
Excellent client service and communication skills
Comfortable with flexible work schedule to meet the needs of the business, including nights, weekends and holidays


Our Competencies for All Employees
Courage: Doesn’t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and “actionable” positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.
Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.
Customer Focus: Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.
Dealing with Ambiguity: Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.
Drive for Results: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.
Interpersonal Savvy: Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.
Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.


Kate Spade is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer and we pride ourselves on hiring and developing the best people. All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant's or employee's qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under the consideration. These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law. Visit Kate Spade at www.katespade.com."
Demand Generation Professional,"617807BR

Introduction

At IBM, work is more than a job - it's a calling: To build. To design. To code. To consult. To think along with clients and sell. To make markets. To invent. To collaborate. Not just to do something better, but to attempt things you've never thought possible. Are you ready to lead in this new era of technology and solve some of the world's most challenging problems? If so, lets talk.

Your Role and Responsibilities

A Demand Strategist is responsible for the design, development and optimization for omni-channel marketing programs associated with demand motions.

A Demand Strategist Will

Understand business requirements and develop the strategy for the full customer journey to drive demand, in partnership with Marketing disciplines (Media, Automation, Digital) and with other Marketing teams for Singapore, Southeast Asia, and Japan region.
Translate business objectives into world-class marketing experiences with committed outcomes and expected ROI for the business of Systems and Cloud business unit.
Define audience targets and priority markets in partnership with other Marketing teams to align to a globalization plan.
Outline the required business outcomes and objectives from the Demand Plan to the Marketing discipline teams, providing direction regarding suitable channels for execution.
Utilize end-to-end marketing funnel and business contribution reporting, communicating results with the business and with Marketing disciplines in order to optimize the customer journey for Singapore, Southeast Asia and Japan region.
Own elements of Sales enablement, including response projections.
Own the relationship from a Sales-Qualified Lead to Win conversion viewpoint, to ensure that opportunities are converting into revenue for real business growth.

Requirements

Minimum of 15 years of marketing experience in IT business segment.
Strong understanding of IBM’s Systems and Cloud products and services.
Client-Centricity and Understanding the buyer.
Ability to work in tight collaboration with marketing and sales teams.
5+ yeas of sales experience is desirable to create business opportunity from marketing side.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

As above.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

As above.

About Business Unit

IBM Corporate Headquarters (CHQ) team represents a variety of functions such as marketing, finance, legal, operations, HR, and more, all working together to solve some of the world's most complex problems, help our clients achieve success and build collaborative work environments for IBMers.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Platform Operation Associate,"About Us
As Singapore’s leading supermarket retail player and a household name close to all, we have grown with you over the years. It is now your turn to grow an exciting new career and fulfil your aspirations with us. Join us as we embark on a journey to make lives better for our customers, community, environment and employees.

At NTUC FairPrice, we offer you more than just a job. We are committed in giving our employees a rewarding career through comprehensive development opportunities. We promise a wonderful workplace culture with ample opportunities for growth at different levels of your career. Every of our 10,000 employees across Singapore is important.
If the prospect of working in an organization at the forefront of retail technology and innovation excites you, look no further.

Grow your career with us today and make a difference.

Summary of the role
You are responsible for assisting in campaign set-up, creation of promotions, uploading of banners, editing of images when required and other ad-hoc daily tasks. You are required to be familiar with system flows and understand the different promotion mechanic setups and ensure all promotions are activated timely and accurately.

Key tasks and responsibilities
Manage day to day operations such as ensuring promotion are created accurately, monitoring and tracking of redemptions, update and maintain content on the homepage, brand page and campaign page
Assist with campaigns and placements set-up and deployment
Uploading of weekly promotions
Manage CS tickets, BAU projects / refreshes (eg. WO/MO, FR).

Job requirements
Minimum GCE O/N’level or ITE certificate
Ability to multitask and prioritize well
Familiar/have worked with operating system at previous jobs (if have)
Basic Microsoft and G-suite skills required (Excel, Word, Google Sheets)
Meticulous and organized"
Sales Associate,"We are a leading independent global asset manager, dedicated to delivering the best outcomes for our clients through a highly diversified range of actively-managed products. We are truly global, supporting our individual and institutional investors across a range of products, encompassing equities, fixed income, multi-asset and alternatives. Our high-energy and collaborative culture at Janus Henderson helps our client achieve their goals and ensures that our people love the place they work.

Our culture is the foundation for how we interact with clients and one another as part of our unique, people-focused work environment. We support a flexible hybrid working model that allows teams to build a strong and positive culture by inspiring innovation and increasing collaboration. Currently our hybrid working model allows employees to work 3 or more days in office and the remaining time remotely.

Employees and Managers will discuss and determine what schedule works best for them and the team, with additional flexibility available based on the role, business needs, and individual circumstances.

JHI Workplace Practices is subject to change as the future of work within our organization evolves.

Your opportunity
Support the intermediary distribution channel in all sales-related and marketing activities as required.
Support and coordinate all aspects of new client onboarding in collaboration with internal stakeholders and relevant functions.
Support the intermediary distribution channel in coordinating RFP & ad hoc requests.
Monitor and actively track progress of opportunities and prospects in a timely manner on Salesforce, including updating of contact details, meeting notes and any post meeting follow-up actions.
Research and monitor asset management development in key Asian markets to develop competitor analysis and other market intelligence. through usage of analytical tools and in collaboration with relevant teams.
To work with Sales Managers where relevant to handle client enquiries including operational matters pertaining to daily business activities.
Carry out other duties as assigned

What to expect when you join our
Hybrid working and reasonable accommodations
Paid volunteer time to step away from your desk and into the community
Support to grow through professional development courses, tuition/qualification reimbursement and more
All-inclusive approach to Diversity, Equity and Inclusion
Maternal/paternal leave benefits
Complimentary subscription to Headspace – the mindfulness app
Corporate membership to ClassPass and other health and well-being benefits
All employee events including networking opportunities and social activities

Must have skills
Related work experience within the Investment Management Industry
Excellent communication and written skills
Relevant client service experience within the asset management space is preferred
Ability to comprehend Janus Henderson’s array of asset class strategies
Ability to prioritize and manage time efficiently
Proficient in MS Office programs and good working knowledge of CRM systems

Nice to have skills
Excellent interpersonal skills
Ability to form good working relationships with all clients and internal stakeholders
Confident and proactive approach
Attention to detail
Ability to manage multiple tasks with competing deadlines
Team player

Supervisory responsibilities
No

Potential for growth
Mentoring
Leadership development programs
Regular training
Career development services
Continuing education courses

Janus Henderson (including its subsidiaries) will not maintain existing or sponsor new industry registrations or licenses where not supported by an employee’s job functions (as determined by Janus Henderson at its sole discretion).

All applicants must be willing to comply with the provisions of Janus Henderson Investment Advisory Code of Ethics related to personal securities activities and other disclosure and certification requirements, including past political contributions and political activities. Applicants’ past political contributions or activity may impact applicants’ eligibility for this position. Janus Henderson is an equal opportunity /Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status. All applications are subject to background checks."
System Administrator Linux/Windows,"Job Description

At Boeing, we innovate and collaborate to make the world a better place. From the seabed to outer space, you can contribute to work that matters with a company where diversity, equity and inclusion are shared values. We’re committed to fostering an environment for every teammate that’s welcoming, respectful and inclusive, with great opportunity for professional growth. Find your future with us.

Boeing Global Services has an exciting opportunity for a System Administrator - Linux/Windows based in Singapore.

Position Overview:

We are looking for a motivated individual with very strong technical capabilities combined with the ability and desire to learn about and work with complex system installations.

This is an opportunity for you to work in an international environment with a team of like-minded infrastructure experts in a cutting edge expanding Software Company. The global hosting and deployment team operates from five different locations: Gothenburg, Montreal, New York, Denver and Singapore.

Our team is providing Platform as a Service for airlines that are using our Crew and Network & Operations Management optimization products.

We are looking for someone that can help us support all of our customers globally in general and the APAC customers in particular. You need to have a broad and general knowledge about both local IT infrastructure and Cloud hosting environments. This position will be responsible for the daily and long-term support and services of both locally-deployed and cloud-hosted customers.

What’s in it for you?

You will be joining one of the largest companies in the world which means access to a wide range of products, technologies, training and benefits.

You will be able to work with colleagues and customers from all over the globe in an expanding and demanding business.

You get the opportunity to work with the biggest airlines in the world and help them with their Crew and Network & Operations Management production systems.

What do we do?

As a System Administrator you will spend a significant part of your time in the following areas:

Work close to our customers globally to provide application management, system administration and advanced technical support to our Airline Crew and Network & Operations Management systems
Work close to customers (both external and internal) as an infrastructure expert
Assist clients with knowledge injections, proactive problem solving and daily management of production installations.
Act as the primary infrastructure contact for the customer and work internally with different teams to ensure issues are resolved with quality and within expected time frames
Install and maintain cloud based servers
Support and maintain client’s production deployments on a daily basis and 24/7 through periodically on-call assignments

The team you will be working with, consists of 12 IT Infrastructure experts (globally). The team is today serving about 40 airline customers. We are supporting all our customers 24x7 with a Follow-the-Sun support model on weekdays and periodically on-call rosters during the weekend. (Not a shift worker)

Who are you?

Required competencies:

Work experience in Infrastructure/Sysadmin, or an equivalent degree
Red Hat on VMware
Experience with Active Directory, IdP, SAML, LDAP and similar technologies
Network design, administration and troubleshooting, Routers/Firewalls/NAT/DNS
Ansible
UGE
Citrix
ETX
OpenVPN
Unix and/or Linux and shell scripting.
IBM Cloud
Netscaler

Preferred competencies:

Experience/knowledge of working with either development, configuration, support or infrastructure of Jeppesen Crew and Network Operations products
AWS
Databases (Oracle preferred)
Server Density
Satellite
Nexus7
Network Administration

We put great emphasis on your personal characteristics. We value individuals who:

Have excellent written and verbal communication skills in English
Ability to perform under pressure occasionally
Take ownership of issues and work well both independently and within a team
Are service-minded and enjoy helping customers and colleagues
Get excited from technical challenges and solving technical problems
Enjoy a variety of challenges of a highly technical nature

Relocation:

Relocation assistance is not a negotiable benefit for this position. Candidates must live in the immediate area or relocate at their own expense.

Other Job Related Information

Benefits and pay are determined in line with Singapore labor market practices. This is not an expat assignment.

The Company

The Boeing subsidiary Jeppesen is one of the largest software development companies in Digital Aviation. We develop optimization solutions for the world’s leading airlines. We focus on innovation and continuous improvement to bring more value to our clients, and explore emerging technologies such as quantum computing, AI and big data analytics.

The Crew Portfolio is based in Sweden, Gothenburg. You will work in a one-of-a-kind software development organization with fascinating solutions that make a real difference to people around the world. You will be working in an agile learning organization, surrounded by a team of talented and creative colleagues who are dedicated to our customers. You will learn and broaden your perspective by working with 400 IT professionals from more than 30 different nations, as part of a global organization where you collaborate with customers and colleagues across the world. Most importantly, you will be expected to make a difference.

Export Control Requirements: Not an export control position

Equal Opportunity Employer:

We are an equal opportunity employer. We do not accept unlawful discrimination in our recruitment or employment practices on any grounds including but not limited to; color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, genetic factors, military and veteran status, or other characteristics covered by applicable law.

We have teams in more than 65 countries, and each person plays a role in helping us become one of the world’s most innovative, diverse and inclusive companies. Applicants are encouraged to share with our recruitment team any accommodations required during the recruitment process."
DevOps Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Activate Interactive Pte Ltd (“Activate”) is a leading IT solution and service provider headquartered in Singapore with a presence in Malaysia and Indonesia. Our clients are empowered with quality, cost-effective, and impactful end-to-end application development, like mobile and web applications, and cloud technology that remove technology roadblocks and increase their business efficiency.

We believe in positively impacting the lives of people around us and the environment we live in through the use of technology. Hence, we are committed to providing a conducive environment for all employees to realise their full potential, who in turn have the opportunity to continuously drive innovation.

We are searching for our next team members to join our growing team.

If you love the idea of being part of a growing company with exciting prospects in mobile and web technologies that create positive impact on people’s lives, then we would love to hear from you.

We adopt an Agile development approach and work towards adopting tech best practices and cutting edge tools.

We are seeking highly motivated individuals skilled in DevOps to join us for some exciting projects.

What will you do?
You’ll work with a multidisciplinary team of designers, developers and business experts to create solutions that exist in both digital and physical realms.
As we launch new products, your role will be to ensure that the future of public service is not just functional, but delightful to use.
Manage the development of the internal engineering productivity tools and environments.
Providing DevOps architecture implementation and operational support
Architecture and planning for cloud deployments (Private and Public Cloud)
Be an innovative and hands-on DevOps engineer capable of looking at both the technology and strategy around the platform.
Future-proofing the technical environments and ensuring extremely high levels of automation, availability, scalability and resilience.
Manage the development of the internal engineering productivity tools and environments.
Manage processes, automation, best practices, documentation.
Development and operation of continuous integration and deployment pipelines.
Monitoring automation to effectively detect/predict/prevent issues in the environment and code base.
Ability to conduct research into software issues and products as required
Working with the latest tools and techniques
Hands-on coding and mentoring, usually in a pair programming environment
Working in highly collaborative teams and building quality environments.
Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure, fast paced, global environment
Knowledge in lots of different open source technologies and configurations.
What are we looking for?
Degree or Diploma in Computer Science/Engineering, Information Technology, Communications or other related disciplines.
At least three years of professional experience in a DevOps engineer or equivalent position.
Strong knowledge and experience in Devops automation, containerisation and orchestration using tools like Kubernetes, Terraform, Ansible and Docker
Strong scripting skills e.g. Python, Bash, JavaScript
Cloud computing deployment and management experience - AWS
Understand/practice Agile projects
Strong understanding of networking
Experience in implementing monitoring strategies and dashboards or Experience with highly scalable distributed systems is a plus
Breadth of knowledge - OS, networking, distributed computing, cloud computing is a plus
What do we offer in return?
Fun working environment
Employee Wellness Program
Does it sound like something you are interested in exploring further?

Please be in touch with our team for an initial chat at chi@activate.sg

Activate Interactive Singapore is an equal opportunity employer. Employment decisions will be based on merit, qualifications and abilities. Activate Interactive Pte Ltd does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, colour, religion, sex, sexuality, national origin, age, disability, marital status or any other characteristics protected by law.

Protecting your privacy and the security of your data are longstanding top priorities for Activate Interactive Pte Ltd.

Your personal data will be processed for the purposes of managing Activate Interactive Pte Ltd’s recruitment related activities, which include setting up and conducting interviews and tests for applicants, evaluating and assessing the results, and as is otherwise needed in the recruitment and hiring processes.

Please consult our Privacy Notice (https://www.activate.sg/privacy-policy) to know more about how we collect, use, and transfer the personal data of our candidates. Here you can find how you can request for access, correction and/or withdrawal of your Personal Data.
Desired Skills and Experience
Scalability, Kubernetes, Cloud Computing, Pipelines, Agile, Scripting, JavaScript, Information Technology, Open Source, Networking, Python, Continuous Integration, Docker, Ansible, Orchestration, Agile Development"
PSA JUNIOR S.E.A.L Programme,"The PSA Junior S.E.A.L Programme is a premier IT internship programme aimed at attracting the top IT talents and is designed to provide exposure to PSA’s core business and ICT operations.

Under this programme, interns can look forward to attachment to PSA’s core business units and rotations across 4 IT pillars - Agile Development, Cyber Security, Data Analytics and IT Infrastructure

There will be networking with Senior Management and mentoring by experienced managers so that interns can build industry connections and gain valuable insights from our top leaders.

We empower our interns to create their own learning as you are free to propose your own projects and apply your knowledge to solve business problems.

Requirements
• Computing/Computer Engineering/IT/IS undergraduates currently enrolled at NUS/NTU/SMU/SIT/SUTD
• Strong academic background
• Passionate about Technology
• Strong communication skills
• High learning agility and driven to deliver outstanding results"
SAINT LAURENT Trainer SEA,"Summary

ABOUT SAINT LAURENT

Founded in 1961, Yves Saint Laurent was the first couture house to introduce the concept of luxury prêt-à-porter in a 1966 collection called ‘Rive Gauche’, synonymous with youth and freedom. This shift represented a first critical step in the modernization of fashion and revolutionized the socio-cultural landscape.
In 1999, the luxury goods division of the Kering Group acquired Yves Saint Laurent and, under the creative direction of Anthony Vaccarello since April 2016, continues to position the house at the summit of the luxury universe.
Today, Saint Laurent collections include women’s and men’s ready-to-wear, shoes, handbags, small leather goods, jewelry, scarves, ties and eyewear.

Job Description

ROLE

The purpose of this role is to develop the knowledge and skills of the Singapore & Malaysia teams by partnering closely with retail business partners and the APAC Training Manager to ensure that a comprehensive training plan is implemented and executed throughout the region.

MISSION

FACILITATION

Assist SEA HR Manager to deploy retail training activities
Implement and localize training initiatives from headquarters for program delivery
Select, brief and monitor external providers/facilitators when necessary
Ensure induction sessions for all new hires are conducted within appropriate formats
Delivery of focused training sessions for the store based on local needs (with focus on Brand, Products, Selling, Customer Service & CRM topics)
Manage training logistics process (classroom settings, venue rental and its logistic, electronic equipment, training material interpretation & preparation)

FOLLOW UP

Develop follow-up tools for the participants and on-the-job check
In-store coaching of the retail team and ensuring that constructive training feedback is gathered and any development areas are implemented
Conduct regular store visits and attachments for preparing quick-fix workshops
Monitor the usage of training and information material
Ensuring that all new joiners complete the mandatory training programs
Follow up on all e-learning initiatives, ensuring a high completion rate for all
Consolidate and update training databases (attendance, participant name, training dates, programs, records, evaluations etc.)

TRAINING NEEDS ANALYSIS

Work with HR Manager and APAC Training Manager to understand and identify the training needs from retail team

PROFILE

Previous training experience, preferably in the retail industry or consultancy company with exposure in facilitation and content development
Open minded, inspiring, adaptable, energetic and passionate
Strong communication and coordination skills
Excellent time and task management skills
Able to work independently
Proficient in MS Office functionalities & e-learning platforms
Traveling within the region and extensive time spent in store required

Saint Laurent is committed to building a diverse workforce. We believe diversity in all its forms – gender, age, nationality, culture, religious beliefs and sexual orientation – enriches the workplace. It opens up opportunities for people to express their talent, both individually and collectively and it helps foster our ability to adapt to a changing world. As an Equal Opportunity Employer we welcome and consider applications from all qualified candidates, regardless of their background.

Job Type

Regular

Start Date

2023-02-01

Schedule

Full time

Organization

Saint Laurent (Singapore)"
Senior Engineer,"Job description:

ST Engineering is a global technology, defence and engineering group with offices across Asia, Europe, the Middle East and the U.S., serving customers in more than 100 countries. The Group uses technology and innovation to solve real-world problems and improve lives through its diverse portfolio of businesses across the aerospace, smart city, defence and public security segments.



Cyber business area An industry leader in cybersecurity with over two decades of experience, we deliver a holistic suite of trusted cybersecurity solutions to empower cyber resilience for government and ministries, critical infrastructures, and commercial enterprises. Backed by our indigenous capabilities and deep domain expertise, we offer robust cyber-secure products and services in cryptography, cybersecurity engineering, digital authentication, SCADA protection, audit and compliance. We specialise in the design and build of security operations centres for cybersecurity professionals and provide managed security services to strengthen the cybersecurity posture of our government and enterprise customers. Committed to building up competencies of cybersecurity professionals to support the growing demand, our Cybersecurity Academy has certified and trained more than 2000 cybersecurity professionals in more than 150 organisations. We continue to innovate through our Research Lab, Strategic Technology Centre, and Engineering Centres and develop future-ready cybersecurity solutions that position us at the forefront of the dynamic digital economy.



Find out more: https://www.stengg.com/cybersecurity



Job Responsibilities:

Work with users to understand requirements
Work with suppliers to develop a comprehensive solution
Work within a team responsible for implementing IT infrastructure projects involving server, security or network administration
Diagnose and resolve issues relating to servers, security or network equipment
Create and maintain technical documentation
Support project manager to ensure that the deliverables address cyber-security & integrated logistics support requirements
Actively participate in project reviews and post mortems with the goal of ensuring that quality goals are met and improvements identified and implemented


Job Requirements:

Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or Electrical Engineering or equivalent
Possesses valid CCNA certification or equivalent
Working knowledge of server, firewall or network equipment configuration
At least 2 years of working experience in the Information Technology industry as a system or network administrator
Shall have experience in liaising with the user and vendor to define business requirements and deliver technical solution."
Engineer,"Responsibilities

Manage post implementation support issues (fault call tickets)
Conduct post implementation review as part of quality process
Participate in regular operations review meetings, including operational issues, tickets review etc.
Conduct internal training as part of knowledge sharing
Prepare Network/Security analysis reports, including findings with analysis
Provide Level 2/3 operations support for Network and Security infrastructure
Ensure compliance to policies, processes and standards, both internal and clients’ organization
Bi-monthly after-hours standby support (24x7) for a week

Requirements

Singaporeans / Singapore PR applicants only
Knowledge of CISCO network routing and switching technologies and protocols
Knowledge of security firewall and VPN technologies
Able to work extended hours and on duty, when required
Able to work independently as well as in a team
Analytical in nature and possess good trouble shooting skills
Willing to work hard and eager to learn about new technologies
Polite and able to communicate well to clients

Preferred Requirements

Experience from System Integrator environment
Hands-on experience in the following:
Cisco ASA Firewall and VPN
Cisco ACS / ISE
Cisco Firepower
Bluecoat Proxy & Packetshaper
RSA Authentication Manager
Palo Alto firewall
Fortinet firewall
Checkpoint
Juniper
McAfee SIEM/IPS/DLP
Splunk Enterprise/Cloud Platform"
"Account Associate, SW, SEA and ANZ","Primary Purpose:

Based in SG, the Account Associate is responsible for supporting Account Manager in sales, retail presentations, account management, product assortment and brand building activities. The ideal candidate will quickly gain a good understanding of the business and be able to identify issues and recommend action plans. The Account Associate has strong follow thru, is solution-driven, possesses strong analytical acumen and takes initiatives. They will be relied upon to build relationships internally and externally to gain support and cooperation.


The successful individual will leverage their proficiency as an Account Associate to...

Drive the Business

Develop strong business relationships externally and internally to gain support and cooperation to drive business.
Support seasonal sales initiatives to drive business (ex: staff incentives, Exclusives launch) and able to measure results and effectiveness
Participate in business review meetings with distributors, maintain close partnership with accounts by understanding and supporting their business day to day

Sales and Order Shipment

Coordinate seasonal market week organization and appointment arrangement, as well as order management throughout the buy.
Follow up on order shipment delivery on selling merchandise as well as not-for-selling goods such as Uniform, Packaging, VM and GWP, etc
Partner closely with wholesale operation on order confirmations and local price maintenance.


Planning and Analysis

Validate and analyze weekly POS inventory data and identify ATS risk and opportunities
Maintain monthly report data and product reporting
Closely monitor on actual shipment vs. Shipment plan and update shipment forecast, responsible for fill rate optimization

Customer Service/Operations

Support new store openings: work and follow up with internal and external partners and vendors on deliverables
Partner with Area Manager in preparing training material
Act as Area management office liaison

Marketing
Coordinate with NY / regional marketing team on help strategize and map out yearly plan
Ensuring execution closely with our external partners


The accomplished individual will possess...

Bachelor Degree with 2-4 years of international sales and/or account management experience, preferably in Asia and with Travel Retail.
Advanced Retail Math and Excel skills; Experience with business intelligence systems is a plus
Superior organizational skills, ability to multi-task and strong analytical skills
Initiative, strategic thinking and detail oriented
Excellent communication and presentation skills


Tapestry is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer and we pride ourselves on hiring and developing the best people. All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant’s or employee’s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration. These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law."
Software Engineer - Recommendation Architecture,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Our Recommendation Architecture Team is responsible for building up and optimizing the architecture for our recommendation system to provide the most stable and best experience for our TikTok users.

Responsibilities - What You'll Do
• Build and maintain high performance online services for TikTok recommendation system；
• Build extremely efficient and reliable data pipelines for candidates generation, profile generation, training examples generation, realtime online training, etc;
• Build globalized large-scale recommendation system;
• Design and develop high performance computing frameworks and storage systems.

Qualifications

• Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields, with 2+ years of experience building scalable system;
• Experience programming in at least one of the following programming languages: C, C++, Java or Golang;
• Effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive;
• Experienced in at least one area of the following areas: personalized recommendations, search engine, machine learning, distributed storage system, big data frameworks is a plus."
Office Specialist,"Zouk Group is a global lifestyle company with establishments across the nightlife, entertainment, and dining sectors. Its namesake, Zouk, is a 31-year-old nightlife brand known for pushing the boundaries of dance music and propelling Singapore on the global map. Ranked Asia’s best club on DJ Mag’s annual Top 100 Clubs list since 2017 and top globally since 2010, Zouk is Singapore’s foremost clubbing institution, delivering the freshest in dance music across genres, state-of-the-art sound and lighting systems, a constant roster of stellar international, regional and local residents, and top-notch service and hospitality.

Zouk has since evolved into an all-encompassing global lifestyle brand that has expanded into the food & beverage sector with new brands like social gaming bar RedTail, vibe dining restaurant Ichizuke, and more concepts in the pipeline. Aside from club offerings, Zouk Group also owns ZoukOut, Asia’s premier dawn-to-dusk music festival featuring world-class DJs, attracting a cosmopolitan mix of locals and tourists within and beyond Asia to the beachfront of Singapore.

Zouk Group now oversees all club and lifestyle entities in Singapore, Genting Highlands in Malaysia, on board Genting-owned cruise ships, and the ambitious and immersive entertainment and lifestyle concept — Zouk Las Vegas. The company also owns the franchise to Five Guys in Singapore and Malaysia.

OVERVIEW

We are looking for a talented Executive Assistant to join us at the Zouk Group. You will be the guardian and gatekeeper for the Zouk Group key executives, and look to help organise their dynamic schedules. We expect you to be detail oriented, have excellent communication skills, and be able to represent our company’s views effectively and professionally. Ultimately, you will be helping coordinate schedules on a daily basis. Last, but certainly not least, a love for music, nightlife, hospitality, F&B and entertainment is advantageous - these are the things we live and breathe on a daily basis.

ROLE RESPONSIBILITIES

Things You’ll Own

Act as the point of contact among key executives
Ensure flawless internal communication
Coordinate schedules across several calendars
Manage senior executives’ travel logistics and activities, including accommodations, transportation, meals, etc.
Rack daily expenses and prepare weekly, monthly and quarterly reports
Act as an office manager – screen phone calls, take meeting notes, maintain file organisation, etc.
Help format information for internal and external communication – memos, emails, presentations, and reports

Teamwork Makes the Dream Work

Be able to seamlessly move cross-functionally across many groups in the company to keep key stakeholders updated
Work closely with department heads
You will feel right at home if you have a positive attitude, a great sense of humour and a can-do attitude


ROLE REQUIREMENTS

At least 2+ years of experience as an Executive Assistant, Personal Assistant or similar role
Supporting and reporting to director level preferred
Proficient in MS Office platforms - Outlook 365, Microsoft Teams, Word, Excel, etc.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Flexible team player, willing to adapt to changes and unafraid of challenges
Proficient in both oral and written English
Great emotional intelligence
Double Master's degree in Work Life Balance and Having Fun

JOIN US NOW

We build our culture based on mutual respect and good working ethics. We offer an environment that supports personal growth and excellence and career growth opportunities. We assure you a career that can be exceptionally rewarding:

Career growth opportunities
Best-in-industry training from leaders
Fun and vibrant environment
Medical Benefits
Quarterly employee parties and social events
Employee Discounts given when you dine in at our F&B outlets (Zouk/Red tail/Ichizuke/Here Kitty Kitty/Maison Shuko/Five Guys Singapore)"
Technical Support Engineer,"Job description:



We are currently looking for Technical Support Engineer & this position will be based at Singapore.



Candidate Profile:

Singapore Citizen or PR
Experience in technical support and systems administration in a vendor environment
Enterprise scale Linux and Windows administration with strong troubleshooting skillset
VMware ESXi and vCenter administration with strong troubleshooting skillset (Preferable with CLI knowledge) (6.5 and above)
TCP/IP Networking, Network/Security devices (e.g. Cisco Switch, Firewall)
PostgreSQL, MySQL, Oracle, and other database servers
Monitoring systems (e.g. Centreon, Nagvis)
Management of SAN storage, NetApp storage and tape library
Administration/Management of security tools, e.g. Antivirus, EDR, etc.
Windows PowerShell, Unix Scripting
Good knowledge and practical experience in ITIL framework
Independent team player with a people-oriented personality
Good leadership skills; able to motivate team members to achieve goals
Strong verbal/written communication skills


Job Profile:

Ensure customer satisfaction in maintenance and support
Manage IT components and related border-control endpoints, including Hardware and Software
Troubleshoot, analyse and resolve tickets escalated by on-site Level 1 and Level 2 Teams
Commit to a resolution date, formalize action plan and implement workaround for fault rectification
Perform root cause analysis of technical issues
Communicate and interface with vendors and customers
Generate reports and write documentation, e.g. maintenance guide, operation manual, test procedures and test reports
May be required to stand in and perform 24/7 shift duty in case of resource shortage
As a senior engineer, he/she is also expected to: -
Act as subject matter expert to impart knowledge and grow technical capability within the team
Mentor junior engineers to better manage various customer sites, improve troubleshooting efficiency and streamline work processes


Skills:

Ability to work alone and in a team
Good communicator and at building relationships (with customers, partners and internal teams)
Readiness to work under time pressure and be able to adjust quickly to project demands
Well versed in technical writing, documentation and presentation"
"Strategic Initiatives, Innovation and Incubation Associate","The Strategic Initiatives, Innovation and Incubation (SIII) Team was established in 2020 as a core part of IB's mission to develop an increasingly diverse and inclusive ecosystem by developing strategic initiatives for and partnerships with communities, organizations and governments that are not yet part of the IB community. The SIII Associate is responsbile for providing overall day to day administrative support towards the multiple projects and initiatives managed by the SIII team.

Responsibilities

Stakeholder Management

Organizing internal and external meetings, scheduling, agendas and minutes.
Manage stakeholder information to collect information and provide regular consolidated updates on project deliverables.
Ensure all communications, internal as well as external, are aligned with IB's policies, processes and guidelines.
Payment of consultants who develop resources/materials/ conduct webinars on behalf of SIII.
Project Administration

Assist members of the SIII team in all administration functions and processes.
Facilitate the development of project plans and manage them from inception to completion.
Monitor all moving parts of the project, keeping them synchronized and moving forward.
Prepare, organize, and distribute all necessary project materials.
Foster positive and productive stakeholder relationships.
Budget Management

Seek necessary input and information to create an annual project budget and monitor the expenditures to ensure these are in line with the FEM.
Change Management

Provide appropriate tools and templates to manage necessary change consistently across the various project teams to ensure BAU, and out-of-the-ordinary processes, initiatives, activities are clearly understood, planned, developed and delivered.
Reporting and documentation

Regularly report to team and project sponsor on progress, maintain clear documentation on decision paths, challenges, successes, and learnings for future projects and document lessons learned as the project develops.
Document meeting minutes, decision paths and maintain an up-to-date SharePoint site.
Data - cleaning, updating, and managing data regarding cohort sizes and schools to support presentations, reports, and business proposals. Deriving insights from varying datasets.
Ongoing management and updating of SIII dashboards.
Risk Management

Ensure all project risks are effectively and efficiently managed in collaboration and consultation with relevant internal and external stakeholders.
Requirements

Associate's or bachelor's degree required.
2+ years proven experience as a project administrator or in similar management role.
Proficiency in Microsoft Suite Excel, Access, PowerBI, Salesforce.
Extremely organized and focused.
Excellent communication skills both oral and written.
Propensity for multi-tasking.
Deadline driven.
Strong organizational and change management skills.
Knowledge of Microsoft Office.
Ability to be a team player and work in an ambiguous, rapidly-changing environment."
HR Business Partner - Data AILab - Singapore,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team
The Data & AI Lab HRBP Team focuses on TikTok and its affiliates, and builds a team of some of the best Engineers, Product Managers, Designers, Data Scientists, as well as Go-to-market teams in the world. We work directly with the teams from all over the world to help them grow their teams and businesses, and strive to bring the best HR practices and improve processes to enhance our efficiency as well!

About the role
The Human Resources Business Partner will be responsible for performance reviews, learning and development, and employee retention. You will be involved in improving existing processes and procedures while collaborating with key stakeholders across the business. This role will actively participate in translating business plans into talent, engagement, and organization plans. Our HRBPs uniquely partner with our Talent Acquisition team to manage the growth of the organization ranging from headcount planning, conducting interviews, to job architecture design. Our HRBPs are trusted advisors to the business, and champions of our company culture. Most importantly, we operate as a team; we are highly collaborative, humble, and supportive of each others growth and success.

Responsibilities
- Partner with your assigned business unit and ensure a deep understanding of business strategy and implement high-quality HR practices within the team.
- Partner with the Talent Acquisition team to grow the business through interviewing, onboarding, and evaluating candidates.
- Coach and mentor business team-leaders to help build a strong community that will improve the development of the business.
- Collaborate with stakeholders and leadership and provide HR guidance when appropriate; including staffing, talent development, performance management, and employee relations.
- Be the ambassador for the TikTok organizational culture as well as plan and implement activities to continue driving employee engagement.
- Guide employees through their onboarding experience, providing a great landing program, and continued 1:1 coaching in their first 90 days.
- Support HR operation activities: e.g. issuance of offer letters, on-boarding of new employees, exit reviews, etc.
- Manage employee disciplinary issues and provide advice to business leaders on ways to manage each case.

Qualifications

- 5-7 years of Human Resources working experience with minimum of 3 years HRBP or relevant working experience.
- Comprehensive HR knowledge, especially hands-on experience in employee relations and performance management.
- Excellent communication and collaboration skills, good at structural thinking and problem solving.
- Experience with regional/global/cross cultural project management preferred.
- BA/BS degree preferred.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
QC Specialist,"Overview

Kemin Industries (Asia) Pte. Ltd, Singapore, with manufacturing and research facilities in Singapore, is the regional headquarters for Asia Pacific, which includes Australia, China, New Zealand, Japan, Korea, Philippines, Thailand, Malaysia, Myanmar, Indonesia, Taiwan and Vietnam. We have vacancy for:

Position: QC Chemist/QC Specialist

Reports To: Senior Quality Manager/QC Manager

Direct Reports: Nil

Key Portfolio

You will be a member of Kemin’s dedicated and highly effective Quality Control (QC) team. Your knowledge of quality control, good manufacturing and laboratory practices will be helpful to support our quality programs. Your contribution to analytical testing, equipment calibration and maintenance, thorough investigations, certification of products and continuous improvements will help Kemin provide quality and safe ingredients to our customers in the animal nutrition and health industry.

With efficient quality control checks, analytical testing and instrumentation management, you will help meet accurate specifications for qualifications, certification, data interpretation and provide the relevant data for decision-making. You will also be relied on for monitoring quality of our raw materials, production samples, maintaining laboratory instruments and implementation of innovative solutions.

Responsibilities

Perform routine quality control checks involving analytical lab testing, evaluation, interpretation and reporting of technical data.
Conduct lab method validation, method transfers, protocol harmonization and optimization of analysis in order to qualify new raw materials and new products from R&D stage all the way to commercialization and production phase.
Support technical requirements and enquiries from customers.
Conduct timely analytical instrument calibration and preventive maintenance for the QC lab.
Ensure real time documentation, maintain data integrity and appropriate traceability system as per Kemin’s quality management system.
Work with all other functional teams (eg. R&D, Production/Operations/Purchasing/Logistics, Marketing, and Sales) to solve issues and contribute to the overall success of Kemin.
Conduct internal audits and ensure compliance to ISO17025, ISO9001 and FAMI-QS requirements.
Implement process monitoring using Statistical Process Control (SPC) techniques.
More experienced candidates may be considered for the Senior Chemist/Senior QC Specialist role who will assist the QC Supervisor and Senior Quality Manager in the day-to-day management of the QC Lab to ensure analysis are done on time and robust data are generated. He/She will also be expected to provide analytical and instrumentation expertise to the team, solve technical problems and guide/train other QC Specialists. The Senior Chemist/Senior QC Specialist will also be working on strategic continuous improvement projects from time to time.

Qualifications

Qualification: Degree in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering, Food Science and/or other relevant technical qualifications and working experience.

Experience: At least five (5) years of working experience in a laboratory. Ability to develop new and improve analytical methods

Personal Qualities

Team player with an innovative mindset and a collaborative spirit.
Good writing and communication skills.
Analytical, observant and meticulous.
Independent and thrive on challenges.
Able to work on shifts schedules.
There will be two working shifts for our QC laboratory.
Experience using High Performance Liquid Chromatography (HPLC), Gas Chromatography-Mass Spectrometer (GC-MS), Fourier Transform Near-infrared spectroscopy (FT-NIR) and knowledge of ISO17025, ISO9001, GMP and FAMI-QS would be an added advantage."
"Senior Backend Software Engineer, Monetization Technology","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

[About the Team]
As the Senior Backend Software Engineer with the Monetization Technology team, you would be responsible for the following:

Responsibilities
- Engineering the infrastructure for advertisement quality control, case analysis and machine learning model training to enforce content integrity
- Building products to enhance the trust between advertisers and TikTok, improve advertiser experience and enforce actor integrity
- Design and build data-driven applications to help both local and global partners to unlock monetization opportunities
- Work closely with operations and infrastructure to build and scale back-end services

Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications
- Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent with 3+ years of relevant experience
- Solid programming capabilities, exhibits good code design and coding style.
- Familiarity with at least one of the programming languages: Go, Python or Java
- Pragmatic understanding of data structure, algorithm design and analysis, networking, data security and distributed system
- Prior experience working with Internet Products or large scale platforms.
- Working experience in advertisement technology or business integrity
- Experienced in engineering the infrastructure for advertisement quality control, case analysis and machine learning model training to enforce content integrity"
"Executive Administrative Assistant, Marketing & Communications","We are looking for a high caliber Executive Administrative Assistant to support our Marketing & Communications team in Singapore.

Job Description

Managing staff onboarding & offboarding logistics
Overseeing calendar and organizing schedule for the Regional Head of Communications
Assisting and/or leading the organization of internal Communication events such as town halls and business updates
Creating quarterly Communications reports while working closely with the Communications team across the region
Provide timely and proactive updates on new functional protocols that will impact the team.
Responsibility for media clippings and distributing morning news reports
Team travel arrangements and coordinating logistics for business trips
Responsibility for ensuring business resiliency protocols remain updated and effective across APAC
I nvoicing and processing of expense claims
Maintaining group leave records and handling phone enquiries
General administrative duties
Assisting in ad hoc project administration support when required

Requirements

Secretarial / Administrative professional certification
Minimum of 5 years' experience in secretarial, executive or administrative assistant field, experience in banking or finance an advantage
Proactive, e xcellent interpersonal & communication skills
Strong organizational skills and attention to detail are critical
Strong stakeholder management across all levels of the organization.
Able to work under pressure , against tight deadlines and in a confidential environment
Knowledge of using Concur will be an advantage (current expenses / claim system)
Team player who wants to share and execute against new ideas
Willing to learn new skills and become an integral partner within the regional Communications team
We're a global company whose primary business language is English and so fluency in English is required

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Clearing Specialist,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities:

According to the online banking details, make daily reconciliations with the system deposit and withdrawal funds
Responsible for tracking and processing the status of system deposit and withdrawal transactions
Daily docking customer service to deal with customer funding issues
Responsible for the adjustment and processing of customers' wrong currency deposits
Cooperate with the distribution and processing of market and other activities
Statistics and collation of daily system operation data
Docking work of connecting new channel and all related work before successful launching
Other system-related funding issues

Requirements:

Three years related working experience, fluent in English.
Bachelor degree or above, accounting, finance, economics and other related majors.
Working experience in trading market, third-party payment, clearing and settlement positions in commercial banks is preferred.
Have a keen sense of risk and a good ability to identify risks.
Have good logic analysis ability and communication and expression skills.
Work commitment, energetic, innovative spirit, strong pressure resistance, strong sense of responsibility and teamwork awareness.
Familiar with Internet finance and traditional financial services.
Experience in leading teams, and independently docking and completing projects.

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Technical Support Engineer,"Company Overview
Kiteworks (Legally known as Accellion Pte Ltd) is the provider of the first Content Firewall, a hardened platform that helps organizations prevent data breaches and compliance violations from third party cyber risk.

Our customers operate in an increasingly active regulatory environment with HIPAA, GDPR, CCPA and the likes. CIOs and CISOs rely on the Kiteworks platform to gain the necessary visibility, security and control over the communication of IP, PII, PHI, and other sensitive content across email, file sharing, mobile, enterprise apps, web portals, SFTP, and automated inter-business workflows.

Kiteworks is used by more than 25 million end users and have been installed at more than 3,000 of the world’s leading corporations and government agencies including Pfizer, CDC, New York City Health + Hospitals; KPMG; Kaiser Permanente; Latham & Watkins; US Senate; US SEC; Hilton; Deutsche Bank; Volkswagen; NIST; Mandiant and other leading security and defence vendors globally.

Kiteworks is carrying its bold vision forward while maintaining strong profitability and growth. This is a perfect time to join the company as it has started to move into a high growth phase and there are many opportunities to make a meaningful contribution to its future.

Position
The role of Technical Services Engineer position based in Singapore is currently available to provide customer support, installation services for products deployed as a physical or virtual appliance on premise or off-premise in a public cloud.

You will be performing customer installs, supporting customer inquiries, educating customers on our service offerings and providing web product demonstrations as required.

Responsibilities
Investigate and resolve incoming questions (phone and email) and issues in a timely and effective manner. You will be on-call as scheduled to support customer in Asia and Australia and would also be expected to work with the US/UK based support team to assist our European and Middle Eastern Customers.
You would work within the professional services group on remote and on-site customer installations.
You would document all contact activity, including troubleshooting steps and problem resolution, in the CRM.

Requirement
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or a related field.
Hands-on experience (2 to 5 years) supporting global enterprise software companies.
System Administration in LAMP environment (Linux, Apache, MySQL,Perl/Python/PHP).
Familiarity with enterprise environments: Directories (LDAP, Active Directory), Single sign-on, Windows SharePoint, Networking, Firewalls, Routing issues, WAN, VPN, Proxy, and DNS.
Understanding of protocols DNS, SMTP, SFTP, HTTPS, SNMP, SSL, SSH etc.
Strong Customer service skills with high level of professionalism and ability to work in complex situations.
Outstanding oral and written communication skills with both technical and non-technical audiences.
Exhibit extremely high ethical standards and code of conduct.

Desired Skills:
Strong Technical Proficiency in Windows desktop and server environments, networking, security, virtual platforms, mobile devices and web applications.
Experience resolving complex product issues, security software products preferred.
Must be self-motivated, able to multi-task and manage priorities effectively and work well as a part of a globally distributed team.
Driven, resourceful and proactive thinkers to solve complex customer challenges.

Work Environment
Kiteworks has a very dynamic and flexible work culture and we’re looking for driven, resourceful, and proactive thinkers to solve complex technical challenges.

Compensation/Perks:
You’ll be rewarded with a competitive compensation package including excellent benefits and stock options. Other benefits include: medical, dental, 18 days of annual leave going up to 21 days after 3 years.

Location: Singapore / On-site / Flexible Work arrangements"
Solution Architect | Learning Technology,"Job description:

As part of the role:

The Solution Architect require to work with our clients to design and deliver systems for complex custom projects using the latest technologies, and to build application that transcend today’s digital world and fundamentally enable change for our clients businesses.

Be the expert to construct total solutioning proposal includes USP (Unique Selling Point) of offering, costing and pricing, high level scope of both functional and technical requirements, data and security blueprint, resources planning and timeline during pre-sales stage

Design and deliver complex cross-domain solutions encompassing a rich variety of technologies and using a mixture of agile and planned methods to provide innovative solutions to address clients’ needs

Work with internal teams client technical teams, client executives, and partners to manage and deliver successful solutions during implementation stage

Participate in or to drive deep architectural discussions to build trust and rapport with clients during implementation stage

Be a trusted technical advisor to clients and project members to solve complex technical challenges, and establish credibility & build deep relationships with senior technical individuals within client organization



What is needed:

The ideal candidate should possess strong technical knowledge in software architecture, have breadth across technology stacks with deep hands on skills, and passionate about working with customers to help build applications at scale.

Technical degree or equivalent experience required; Computer Science background desired

5+ years design & implementation experience on complex, large scale distributed applications

Systems design experience, with the ability to architect or explain complex systems interactions including data flows, common interfaces, APIs and other methods

Broad architecture skills, covering application, infrastructure, data and integration

Sound understanding and experience of contemporary paradigms, such as Cloud, DevOps and Agile

Demonstrated ability to adapt to new technologies and learn quickly

Experience in client service role would be advantageous

Effective project management, communication, and stakeholder management skills with the ability to work well with a cross-functional and geographically dispersed team and customer base

Presentation skills with a high degree of comfort speaking with executives and IT Management

Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, create technical definition around customer objectives in complex situations, develop solution strategies, motivate & mobilize resources, and deliver results

Experience / Knowledge on Enterprise Architecture methodology such as TOGAF is a plus (but not mandatory)



Preferred Skills:

Experience in writing software in one or more languages, such as Java, C#, JavaScript, Python.

Microservices, Event Driven, or other Cloud Native experience

Working knowledge of container technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Docker), services, and API models (e.g. OpenAPI)

Hands-on experience with different storage solutions (e.g. SQL database(s), NoSQL such as MongoDB, Hadoop, Redis, etc.)

Experience with scalable networking technologies (e.g. Load Balancers, Firewalls) and web standards (e.g. REST APIs, web security mechanisms)

Experience with Learning and Training Industry."
Technical Architect,"596132BR

Introduction

As an IBM Application Architect, you directly help clients transform their business and solve complex problems. You will define the scope and vision for projects that deliver customized solutions using your knowledge of IBM platforms. You are a technical leader, serving as a liaison among business partners, technical resources, and project stakeholders.

Your Role and Responsibilities

About The Job

As a Architect in IBM, You will:

Lead project requirements with hands-on codes, tests, debugs, implements, and documents programs. Assists in the modification of products and systems to meet the needs of the client and/or end-user.
Contribute materially to a well-informed cloud strategy and manage our Cloud Adoption Model
Explore new technologies and drive innovation through experimentation
Build competency center and subject matter expertise that business and tech stakeholders can depend on
Performs advanced and complex programming, coding and documentation of systems and applications software.
Conduct, and guides others, in technical software development, testing and debug systems and software applications, as needed.
Compile and prioritize enhancements and defect resolutions to applications, implementing changes.
Analyze business requirements and prepare detailed technical specifications to write applications and programs.
Key contributor into the strategy and technical planning of system/application technology in accordance with internal and external software compliance standards
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Work with business stakeholders in defining the lifestyle app strategy and roadmap. Bring product thinking into all business requirements across countries. Interface with business, UX and technology teams to drive towards common requirements
Manage and lead Agile / Scrum development teams in design and development activities and guide them on technical direction.

About You

You are someone we are looking for if you have the following expertise:

Preferably have completed at least one (3) project using Scrum or equivalent as the Agile software development framework if participating in an Agile development project.
Ability to communicate ideas in both technical and user-friendly language.
Knowledge and experience with REST APIs, creating API centric microservices applications, working and connecting with API.
Proficiency in one or more API M platforms (WSO2 / Mulesoft / Azure/AWS API gateway/ Apigee).
Proficiency in one or more backend languages (Spring boot / NodeJS / Python).
Proficiency in one or more frontend framework (HTML5 / Angular / React).
Experience developing on both mobile and web platforms.
A proven track record of successful project/product implementation with Continuous Integration, Continuous Delivery, Pair programming, and Test-Driven Development.
Knowledge in Redis, Docker, Jenkins, Teamcity, SVN, GIT, and GIT LAB.
Knowledge in HTML5, CSS, Javascript, React, Redux, Angular, NodeJS, Java, Spring Boot, C#, Python AWS Cloud, J2ee
Full-stack development background especially in HTML/CSS/JavaScript, ReactJS frameworks, IOS Swift, Android Java, Java Spring Boot framework, JBoss/Tomcat, MariaDB, Redis, and Cloud Foundry
Working knowledge of the general Mobile App development landscape, architectures, trends, and emerging technologies.
Ability to build applications using distributed microservice architecture, and capacity to debug and optimize code and automate routine tasks
Understand API architectures; hands on experience with designing and deploying APIs through API gateways and portals, including API documentation using standards such as OpenAPI/Swagger
Familiarity with modern Public Cloud services on AWS and Azure; relevant certifications preferred

Desired Background

Diploma/Degree in Computer Science, Computing, Electrical Engineering, IT or equivalent with Java training or certification with
At least one (5) year experience in system analysis, design, and programming.
full stack development experience
Experienced in Cloud and Data application such as React.JS, Power BI, Kong, AWS
Excellent communication and articulation skills.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

As shared above.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

As shared above.

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

Are you craving to learn more? Prepared to solve some of the world's most unique challenges? And ready to shape the future for millions of people? If so, then it's time to join us, express your individuality, unleash your curiosity and discover new possibilities.

Every IBMer, and potential ones like yourself, has a voice, carves their own path, and uses their expertise to help co-create and add to our story. Together, we have the power to make meaningful change – to alter the fabric of our clients, of society and IBM itself, to create a truly positive impact and make the world work better for everyone.

It's time to define your career.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Cloud Engineer/ Cloud Specialist (Devops),"Regional role
Exposure to latest technologies
About the company

Our Client is a well-established company within their industry. With rapid expansion plans, they are now looking for an Cloud Specialist/Engineer (Devops) to join their team.

About the job

Your role involves:


Build and operate cloud infrastructure using best industry practices in coordination with IT
infrastructure and network teams
Manage and continue improving cloud product reliability, availability, maintainability &
cost/benefit - incl. automating scale down/up of environments
Support data engineers / software engineers in setting up, optimizing and automating cloud
engineering infrastructure (e.g. provisioning and deployment, etc)
Manage cloud infrastructure cost and plan for the forecast of the future investment
Build, operate and improve DevOps platform

Skills and experience required

As a successful applicant, you will have at least 3 to 5 years of experience in Microsoft Azure, Python and Shell scripting in an end-user environment. Experience in Devops platform is required for the role.

Whats on offer

This is an excellent opportunity to join a leading end user environment and also have the opportunity to have regional exposure.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you can reach me at https://www.linkedin.com/in/teohchinying/ or 6510 6320. (EA: 94C3609/ R1981920)


Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
Senior Software Engineer / Software Engineer /.NET Developer (Web)," Build solutions with emphasis in Microsoft technology-centric solutions (.NET Framework, particularly C#)
 Programming Structured Query Language (SQL)
 Work closely with Project Managers and Technical Consultants to understand and manage expectations
 Participate in the implementation and test effort
 Provide business application support which includes new enhancement deployment, conducting end user testing, and bug fixing.
 Strong candidates will be able to progress to senior developer, and team lead roles
 A strong background and love for Web.
 Degree, Diploma, Higher NITEC, NITEC or A/O Level qualifications or equivalent, in Digital Media, Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related fields
 Working knowledge in .NET Framework: ASP.NET, C#
 Familiar with Object Oriented Application Design, AJAX
 Database skills required: Microsoft SQL Server
 Experience in CMS software (e.g DNN Evoq, Sitefinity, Sitecore) will be a plus
 Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
 Self-motivated, driven & possess strong initiative"
Digital Innovation Office (Software Engineer) Associate - 2023 Intake,"Line of Service

Assurance

Industry/Sector

TMT X-Sector

Specialism

Technology Strategy

Management Level

Associate

Job Description & Summary

The recently formed PwC Singapore’s Digital Innovation Office (DIO) team have embarked on a digital expedition to boost our commitment to transform how we work and operate, our offer and value proposition to the market, and how we engage and deliver on client engagements.

The recently formed PwC Singapore’s Digital Innovation Office (DIO) team have embarked on a digital expedition to boost our commitment to transform how we work and operate, our offer and value proposition to the market, and how we engage and deliver on client engagements.

The DIO is currently looking for a passionate Software Engineer to work alongside teams and key stakeholders to execute engagement sprints.

We are looking for Associates to fill our 2023 intake.

Responsibilities:
To work with client team and key stakeholders to execute engagement sprints with exceptional status reporting.
To continuously collaborate with other Technology-oriented functions of the Firm, to foster innovation, efficiency and holistic solutions.
To identify risks and client needs, while developing ground-breaking digital solutions for the Firm and its clients.
To consistently demonstrate teamwork dynamics, while contributing to a positive working environment and building relationships.

Eligibility:
We are inviting applications from final year students in the field of Computer Science, Information Management, Mathematics and Statistics, showing deep interest in further developing their software development related skills.
Experience to HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Jquery, APIs, SQL, .NET or PHP.
Prior exposure to Python and Data analytics (programming or visualization) a plus.
Possess strong analytical, business and project management skills.
Ability to work independently, be a team player contributing to a positive working environment by building solid relationships.
Strong presentation skills both oral and written.
Strong relationship development skills.
Self-motivated, curious and detail-orientated
Passionate about technology enabled business innovation

Next Step:

You will receive an email from us to complete pymetrics within 3 working days of your application submission. Pymetrics is a series of engaging online games that will assess cognitive, behavioural and emotional traits. This allows us to learn more about you and gives us insights into where you will thrive the most in our business.

Note:
Please note we accept only one application per candidate. You may indicate your second preference in the same application. We recommend that you apply to your preferred position that closely aligns with your skills, passions and interests.
You can indicate another role in the same application form. Duplicate entries will slow down your application with us.
Kindly upload both your resume and degree audit or transcript in PDF format all under Resume attachment upload
Kindly note only shortlisted candidates will be contacted.

Got a question? Email to .

There have been reports of scammers impersonating PwC HR professionals contacting individuals about fraudulent job opportunities using non-PwC domain email addresses and an overseas number. Please note that genuine communications from our HR team will only come from ""@pwc.com"" email address.

Education (if blank, degree and/or field of study not specified)

Degrees/Field of Study required:

Degrees/Field of Study preferred:

Certifications (if blank, certifications not specified)

Optional Skills

Required Skills

Desired Languages (If blank, desired languages not specified)

Travel Requirements

Not Specified

Available for Work Visa Sponsorship?

Yes

Government Clearance Required?

No

Job Posting End Date"
"Senior Digital Forensic Examiner, APAC","Job Description

The Senior Forensic Examiner role, as part of a global Digital Forensics team, supports the Information Security mission by driving the strategic forensic response program goals within the Information Security Division while providing guidance to stakeholders within the business units which they support. The Senior Forensic Examiner must demonstrate proven forensic skills and be the point of contact and subject matter expert for forensic investigations across all business and business partners. This position will act as the APAC regional point of contact for Digital Forensic response for the Bank and report to the ISD Digital Forensics Manager. This person will partner with other Forensic Examiners across the globe to conduct expert level forensic investigations in support of Incident Response, Corporate Security, Legal and HR related events. The Senior Forensic Examiner must be able to work across global regions and communicate security and information risk matters effectively to their senior management.

Responsibilities

Perform expert level digital forensic investigations across multiple platforms throughout the global organization utilizing commercial and open source forensic tools.
Assist in the design, implementation, and maintenance of the digital forensic infrastructure.
Point of contact and subject matter expert for forensic investigations across all business and business partners, specifically in the APAC region.
Participate in oversight and monitoring functions to ensure compliance with all internal and external audits and reviews for the digital forensics program.
Provide expert witness testimony in court proceedings as required and/or review detailed and comprehensive investigative reports that may be utilized for criminal/civil litigation, if necessary.
Follow industry best practices for evidence collection, handling, digital forensic analysis, and reporting.
Proactively research and recommend technology solutions and process improvements for digital forensics tools and processes.
Document newly developed processes, procedures, or research for distribution within the digital forensics team, or appropriate stakeholders when necessary. Produce processes, policies, or procedures in official format when necessary.
Take ownership of projects and tasks with minimal supervision, providing updates to team management and appropriate stakeholders as necessary.
Perform forensic analysis on various operating systems
Perform acquisition and analysis of cloud based platforms.
Participate in cyber hunt activities for advanced persistent threats
Assist with insider threat investigations and analysis

Required Qualifications

Have solid MS Office skills along with strong verbal and written communication skills.
Experience various commercial and open source forensic tools.
Proficient in the examination and analysis of various operating systems, both server and user based.
Understanding and working knowledge of industry best practices in forensic examinations (i.e., NIST, ISO, CoBIT, OWASP, ITIL) is required.
Possess an excellent knowledge of cyber intrusion incident response procedures and related forensic response tactics to enable quick response, analysis, and incident mitigation.
Possess solid judgment along with excellent analytical, communication and problem-solving skills as well as advanced technical skills with the ability to apply subject matter expertise to address information risk vulnerabilities.
Bachelor's degree in computer science or a related discipline (Cybersecurity or Forensics preferred), or equivalent work experience required. 10-12 years of experience in information security or related technology experience required. Experience in the securities or financial services industry is a plus.

Preferred Qualifications

Masters degree or above in Cybersecurity or Forensics preferred
Industry recognized certifications (CISSP, GCFA, GCFE, GREM, CHFI, GCIH, GCIA, GDSA, etc)
Related incident response or forensics experience in SOC environments.
Knowledge and understanding of Advance Persistent Threats methodologies and cyber hunt activities
Knowledge and understanding of Insider Threat methodologies, investigative, and analysis techniques
Knowledge of forensic procedures for cloud based platforms"
Work Study Diploma - Technician,"In your new role you will:

Support Lot-On-Hold (LOH) disposition & Lot Disposition Request (LDR) creation
Perform set-ups & 1st level troubleshooting (low yield, disable site, eqpt jamming, etc.)
Support TP buyoff activity on J750/FLEX/V93k/IBIS platform
Support TP remote debugging
Support new hardware buyoff activity
Perform Rejects verification when it’s neededSupport PE to do AMSA run
Logistics Support – Raising NOSTAS to ship devices according to PE requirements
Collect good sample and reject sample when PE needs
Perform Setup calibration
Support PE DOE activities
Platform Migration support - buyoff run, chipsort, rejects verification
Any other engineering activities

You are best equipped for this task if you have:

Min Higher Nitec/ Nitec in Engineering related
Registered to Work Study Diploma in Microelectronics with ITE
Able to perform permanent 12 hours AM shift 7am to 7 pm, working for 3 days, 2 days of
Must be a team player and able to work independent
Good interpersonal, analytical, problem-solving, and communication skills
Willing to learn and able to pick up skills quickly
Enjoying Infineon's employee benefits based on company policy

Part of your life. Part of tomorrow.

Infineon is a world leader in semiconductor solutions that make life easier, safer, and greener. Our solutions for efficient energy management, smart mobility, and secure, seamless communications link the real and the digital world.

In accordance with the requirements set by the Singaporean Government, Infineon Technologies Asia Pacific Pte Ltd (“Infineon”) can only allow individuals who are (a) fully vaccinated, (b) certified to be medically ineligible for a vaccine or (c) have recovered from COVID-19 within a prescribed period, onto company premises. Therefore, Infineon requires all new employees, as well as contractors and business partners, to be fully vaccinated against COVID-19. “Fully vaccinated” means individuals have completed the full regime of an approved COVID-19 Vaccine as listed under the World Health Organization (WHO) Emergency Use Listing (EUL) including the respective post-vaccination period to ensure the vaccine has become full effective. Anyone who is unable to be vaccinated due to an approved and/or recognised exemption condition may apply for special consideration."
"Manager, System Specialist (Group Contact Centre)","Job description:

Manager, System Specialist (Group Contact Centre)



Overview

NUHS provides healthcare delivery through the National University Hospital (NUH), Ng Teng Fong General Hospital (NTFGH), Jurong Community Hospital, Alexandra Hospital (AH) and the National University Polyclinics (NUP). As part of the strategic roadmap, the 4 Contact Centres have integrated into one, forming the OneNUHS Group Contact Centre, to handle enquiries, appointment related requests etc. from patients and the public.



As the System Specialist, you will be responsible for managing and maintaining the digital system comprising of the Telephony, Customer Relationship Management and Knowledge Management system used within OneNUHS Group Contact Centre. Working closely with the business users, you will also be responsible to drive the enhancements required to deliver personalised care for the patients.



Job Responsibilities

Conduct daily health checks on the digital system to ensure that it is performing within stipulated performance standards.
Problem solve workflow issues and work through barriers to achieve results by collaborating effectively with users, vendor and IHIS etc.
Ensure that contract is valid and up to date and track the SLA as agreed with the Vendor.
Lead and manage on boarding of other departments within NUHS to the digital system and maintain an oversight on all requirements.
Extracts relevant report for KPIs monitoring and any other reports required by users, and provide analytics of data extracted.
Ensures compliance and manages data integrity and ethical use of data.
Adhere to IT Security requirements while managing the accesses given to the digital system.
Ensures 6 monthly UAM is done so that the list of users is kept up to date and unnecessary accesses are deleted.
Delivers training for all new joiners within the department on the use of the digital system.
Ensure training materials and programs are current, relevant to staff, meets learning objectives and operational needs.
Works with team to conduct pre and post implementation evaluation.
Gathers feedbacks for system enhancements and present to management for approval.
Ensures system enhancements are budgeted for and approved in the IT workplans.


Job Requirements

Minimum 5 years of working experience in IT/Operations.
Bachelor's Degree in Computing or equivalent
Prior Healthcare/IT experience will be beneficial.
Knowledge and experience in data analytics.
Good interpersonal and management skills.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Strong planning, observational and analytical skills.
Possess a passion for coaching and training.
Able to work under pressure in a fast-paced environment and meet deadlines.
Adaptable and able to respond to changing and ambiguous situations."
"Technical Program Manager, Privacy & Security","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team
We are responsible for project management of Non-China monetization data compliance projects and compliance related processes such as SDLC. Outside monetization, we collaborate with various data compliance project initiators such as TikTok compliance PM/PMO/Engineering, GSO and TTMP Privacy PM. And we help to converge and prioritize various projects, and provide holistic project management solutions to those projects. Inside monetization, we coordinate various monetization engineering/product/operation teams to achieve the data compliance project goals as efficiently as possible.

We are looking for a highly-motivated Technical Program Manager (TPM) to join our TikTok Monetization team to support that growth and help us empower creators, connect people, and explore possibilities by building the next-generation monetization platform together.

As a TPM for TikTok Monetization team, you will be challenged to undertake complicated projects driving the team to enhance the business. Your focus area will be privacy data protection and information security. You will be responsible for strategic cross-functional project planning, prioritization, execution and communication with key stakeholders. Meanwhile, you will learn and grow in a fast paced environment alongside talented teammates on TikTok Monetization team.

Responsibilities
• Define strategy, roadmap, and drive execution for TikTok Monetization privacy and security initiatives and key projects.
• Work with cross-functional teams to translate the strategy into detailed requirements with a clear timeline by exercising technical and business judgment.
• Build effective and transparent communication channels to align and partner with internal as well as external stakeholders and delivery team.
• Work with cross-functional teams to continuously improve work efficiency.

Qualifications

• 2+ years of experience in project management
• Entrepreneurial spirit with strong leadership, who can develop and lead a new initiative from the ground up; self-initiating; thrive in ambiguity.
• Excellent cross-functional stakeholder management, trust building, and verbal/written communication skills are essential.

Preferred Qualifications
• Technical background and the ability to quickly understand technical designs, challenges and risks.
• Experience in security, integrity, etc.
• Experience with GDPR , CCPA and other privacy regulations.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Machine Learning Engineer, Recommendation - TikTok","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Our TikTok team is responsible for developing state-of-the-art machine learning models and strategies to improve user consumption experience, inspire creativity, build a fair and flourishing ecosystem.

1. Build industry leading recommendation system; develop highly scalable classifiers and tools leveraging machine learning;
2. Understand product objectives and machine learning techniques; improve model and recommendation strategy;
3. Understand user behavior and apply ML algorithms to optimize content consumption and production experience;
4. Understand content security strategy and apply ML algorithms to improve content audit process;
5. Work with TikTok cross functional teams to grow TikTok in important regional markets.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor's degree in computer science or a related technical discipline, with at least 2 years of related work experience;
2. Solid experience with data structures or algorithms;
3. Software development experience through hands on coding in a general purpose programming language;
4. Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, data mining or other related areas;
5. Strong communication and teamwork skills;
6. Passion about technologies and solving challenging problems.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"R0239485 - CAO - Compliance Testing Officer, AVP","Job Description:
Details of the Division and Team:
Deutsche Bank AG (the “Bank”) has established the Controls Testing & Assurance department (“CT&A”) as an independent function, reporting to the Chief Administrative Officer (“CAO”). The Compliance Testing (“CT”) team within CT&A is responsible for providing assurance testing on the design and operating effectiveness of the businesses’ control environment and adherence to applicable regulations and the Bank’s policies. CT develops and executes an annual, risk-based testing plan that covers the risk categories owned by Compliance, across all businesses in the region.

For Singapore (SG), the key relevant businesses are:
Investment Bank (IB) – Fixed Income and Currencies, Origination & Advisory, Deutsche Bank Research;
Corporate Bank (CB) – Trade Finance & Lending, Cash Management, Securities Services, Risk Management, Trust & Agency Services;
International Private Bank (IPB); and
Deutsche Asset Management (DWS).

What we will offer you:
A healthy, engaged and well-supported workforce are better equipped to do their best work and, more importantly, enjoy their lives inside and outside the workplace. That’s why we are committed to providing an environment with your development and wellbeing at its center.

You can expect:
Flexible benefits plan including virtual doctor consultation services
Comprehensive leave benefits
Gender Neutral Parental Leave
Flexible working arrangements
25 days of annual paid leave, plus public holiday & Flexible Working Arrangement

Your key responsibilities:
Collaboration with various Compliance stakeholders to ensure the implementation of adequate and effective testing program for APAC that meet both BaFin and local regulatory requirements;
Supporting the execution of the testing program for L1 controls, potentially including reviews at the non-hub offices; the opportunity for travel to other jurisdictions may be available
Ensuring that all issues raised in CT have adequate remediation plans that are tracked and escalated promptly and appropriately;
Developing relationships with the relevant Business Management offices, Divisional Control teams and Infrastructure functions;
Sharing best practice and learnings with CT colleagues locally/regionally/globally;
Assisting in the development and maintenance of appropriate Management Information to inform Senior Management of pertinent matters, in line with global Deutsche Bank/Compliance/CT standards;
Liaising regularly with relevant businesses, Business Line Compliance and other colleagues to remain abreast of developments as it pertains to CT; ensuring stakeholders are aware of the likely impact on the controls testing program and implementing changes where necessary; and
Assisting in any ad-hoc projects and tasks as necessary.

Your skills and experience:
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in a Compliance function primarily in compliance or assurance testing within a Financial Institution or Investment Bank
Good understanding and application of compliance risks and the ways in which the risks will crystallize in practice, so as to be able to test adequacy and effectiveness of the Compliance Risk Management framework implemented to address those risks.
Proven investigative and analytical mindset & skills – enquiry, analysis, interviewing, testing; well versed with technology and applications that can be utilized for assurance testing.
Good drafting skills, including the ability to record and describe complex issues clearly and succinctly, in a way that is easily understandable by any recipient of the relevant reports.
Strong attention to detail and ability to identify changes and impact of any changes to documents, systems and processes in the context of compliance risks, remediation required, etc.
The drive, discipline and enthusiasm to work independently under pressure. Able to quickly understand complex issues and set a course of action (that others are prepared to follow) to meet specific goals.
Strong verbal, written and presentation skills. Proactive – will seek to find the right solution and options to issues within and outside their specific remit, without being prompted and within an appropriate matrix management framework.
Assertive and engaging and able to quickly build and maintain effective working relationships.
Strong collaborative team player receptive to constructive criticism and a leader to facilitate exchange of ideas.
Multi-cultural awareness and sensitivity.
Ability to work with different review support and managers within Compliance Testing.
Proficient in the use of Microsoft Outlook, Excel (i.e. organizing data sets), Word, and PowerPoint.
Role is required to be performed on-site at One Raffles Quay office. Relevant vaccination requirement applies

How we’ll support you:
Flexible working to assist you balance your personal priorities
Coaching and support from experts in your team
A culture of continuous learning to aid progression
A range of flexible benefits that you can tailor to suit your needs
Training and development to help you excel in your career

About us and our teams:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network click here to see what we do.

Deutsche Bank & Diversity
Our values define the working environment we strive to create – diverse, supportive and welcoming of different views. We embrace a culture reflecting a variety of perspectives, insights and backgrounds to drive innovation. We build talented and diverse teams to drive business results and encourage our people to develop to their full potential. Talk to us about flexible work arrangements and other initiatives we offer.

We promote good working relationships and encourage high standards of conduct and work performance. We welcome applications from talented people from all cultures, countries, races, genders, sexual orientations, disabilities, beliefs and generations and are committed to providing a working environment free from harassment, discrimination and retaliation.

Click here to find out more about our diversity and inclusion policy and initiatives."
PSA S.E.A.L PROGRAMME,"We are looking for the next generation of global technology leaders to drive PSA’s digital transformation. Under the PSA S.E.A.L. (Structured Enrichment & Accelerated Leadership) Programme, you can look forward to high-impact development experiences designed to grow your digital capabilities and business acumen and achieve your potential.

The two-year programme features rotations across different IT & business areas as well as international assignments to provide you with broad exposure to the industry. Drawing on the deep expertise and experience from a diverse global team, PSA actively collaborates alongside its customers and partners to deliver world-class port services, develop innovative cargo solutions and co-create an Internet of Logistics.

You will lead by doing, gaining real-world experience by working on high-profile and challenging projects. With PSA S.E.A.L., you will go further and reach higher than you ever thought possible.”

Requirements:
• Strong academic achievements in the relevant ICT disciplines (e.g. Computing, Computer Science, Computer Engineering)
• Has outstanding CCA/NS records and strong leadership experience
• Has high learning agility, strong analytical abilities, and is driven
• Has excellent communication and interpersonal skills
• Open to international assignments
• Passionate and curious about Info-communication and Digital Technology and the Logistics industry

Scholarship Award
• Our Scholarship sponsors tertiary education in local universities. The scholarship includes a lump sum grant to cover tuition and other miscellaneous fees.
• Successful applicants will be required to serve a bond of 4 years with PSA upon completion of their studies."
Operations Engineer 1,"Site Name: Singapore - Tuas

Posted Date: Jan 4 2023

Are you looking to enhance your technical capability by working in a global manufacturing environment that allows you to leverage state-of-the-art systems and technologies? If so, this Operations Engineer role could be an ideal opportunity to explore.

As an Operations Engineer, you will lead a team of technicians to provide cost-effective and efficient maintenance service that will ensure plant availability in delivering a secure supply of products to customers.

This role will provide YOU the opportunity to lead key activities to progress YOUR career. These responsibilities include some of the following:

Identify the root cause of technical problems and effectively resolve these to ensure process and equipment availability
Lead and supervise a team of technicians to approach complex and multidiscipline work to ensure a responsive and effective resolution of problems
Conducts quality checks with owners, where appropriate, upon completion of the work
Co-ordinate, organize and supervise contractor work associated with multi-disciplinary activities, e.g. annual statutory inspection
Comply with related Group Quality Policy requirements and ensure full familiarity and implementation of all applicable GSK Corporate Governance Policies
Assist the maintenance team in providing technical expertise for the troubleshooting of equipment breakdown and failures
Communicate with maintenance supervisors and other departments stakeholders for improvements
Maintain the site equipment and facility to high Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP) standard meeting the regulatory expectations such that the site is always inspection ready
Lead technicians in identifying areas of improvement and implementing continuous improvements to enhance reliability and cost-effectiveness of Engineering activities
Accountable for the Operation & Maintenance of the Factory water systems and responsible for the supervision of all the water services to ensure the availability and quality in accordance with required design specifications
Responsible for the operation and maintenance of the Heating Ventilation & Air Conditioning (HVAC) systems to ensure the continuous supply of air-conditioning as per required quality and design specifications
Accountable for identified risks as well as the development and monitoring of risk mitigation plans

Why you?

Basic Qualifications:

We are looking for professionals with these required skills to achieve our goals:

Associate degree in Engineering
7 years or more of experience in water treatment plants, steam, compressed air and HVAC Plants
Experience working in a Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP) environment
Experience with safety hazards and safety assessments

Preferred Qualifications:

If you have the following characteristics, it would be a plus:

Excellent Tech understanding over a broad range of mechanical systems
Good understanding of compliance (Engineering, Quality, Safety)
Good written and verbal communications skills
Solid computer skills (Excel, Word, Powerpoint)

To learn more about Singapore GSK and our people, please click on this link: https://www.linkedin.com/company/glaxosmithkline/life/gsksingapore

Why GSK

Uniting science, talent, and technology to get ahead of disease together

GSK is a global biopharma company with a special purpose –to unite science, technology and talent to get ahead of disease together –so we can positively impact the health of billions of people and deliver stronger, more sustainable shareholder returns –as an organization where people can thrive. Getting ahead means preventing disease as well as treating it, and we aim to impact the health of 2.5 billion people around the world in the next 10 years.

Our success absolutely depends on our people. While getting ahead of disease together is about our ambition for patients and shareholders, it’s also about making GSK a place where people can thrive. We want GSK to be a place where people feel inspired, encouraged and challenged to be the best they can be. A place where they can be themselves –feeling welcome, valued and included. Where they can keep growing and look after their wellbeing. So, if you share our ambition, join us at this exciting moment in our journey to get Ahead Together.

GSK is a global biopharma company with a special purpose – to unite science, technology and talent to get ahead of disease together – so we can positively impact the health of billions of people and deliver stronger, more sustainable shareholder returns – as an organisation where people can thrive. Getting ahead means preventing disease as well as treating it, and we aim to impact the health of 2.5 billion people around the world in the next 10 years.

Our success absolutely depends on our people. While getting ahead of disease together is about our ambition for patients and shareholders, it’s also about making GSK a place where people can thrive. We want GSK to be a place where people feel inspired, encouraged and challenged to be the best they can be. A place where they can be themselves – feeling welcome, valued and included. Where they can keep growing and look after their wellbeing. So, if you share our ambition, join us at this exciting moment in our journey to get Ahead Together.

Important notice to Employment businesses/ Agencies

GSK does not accept referrals from employment businesses and/or employment agencies in respect of the vacancies posted on this site. All employment businesses/agencies are required to contact GSK's commercial and general procurement/human resources department to obtain prior written authorization before referring any candidates to GSK. The obtaining of prior written authorization is a condition precedent to any agreement (verbal or written) between the employment business/ agency and GSK. In the absence of such written authorization being obtained any actions undertaken by the employment business/agency shall be deemed to have been performed without the consent or contractual agreement of GSK. GSK shall therefore not be liable for any fees arising from such actions or any fees arising from any referrals by employment businesses/agencies in respect of the vacancies posted on this site."
Sales Development Representative - Outbound,"Company Description

Imagine what we can do together. At LinkedIn, we believe amazing things can happen when we work together in an environment where everyone feels a true sense of belonging and their ideas are heard. Join us and help make a direct impact on the world’s workforce in ways no other company can.

Job Description

At LinkedIn, we trust each other to do our best work where it works best for us and our teams. This role offers a hybrid work option, meaning you can both work from home and commute to a LinkedIn office, depending on what’s best for you and when it is important for your team to be together.

As the Outbound Sales Development Representative, you will assist in generating new business by qualifying leads and driving various outbound campaigns but, more importantly, you will focus on the development of the individuals qualifying those leads.

What You’ll Do:
Qualify and develop outbound sales leads and respond to product enquiries
Run email campaigns to generate new sales prospects
Complete accurate tracking of communication with current and potential customers in SalesForce.com
Work with the Account Executive team to design industry-specific outbound efforts
Schedule demonstrations between Account Executives and potential customers

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Undergraduate university degree and 1+ year of experience in a metrics-driven sales or client-facing role
If no undergraduate university degree, 3+ years of experience in a metrics-driven sales or client-facing role

Preferred Qualifications

Experience working with Salesforce.com or other CRM platforms
Expert knowledge of MS Office (Outlook, Word, PowerPoint and Excel)
Ability to effectively manage time, prioritize tasks and work within deadlines with little supervision
Ability to analyze business opportunities and read situations well
Ability to gather and use data to inform decision making and persuade others
Ability to develop compelling strategies that deliver results with strong attention to detail
Ability to work in a fast-paced, startup environment
Experienced in Australia market would be a plus

Suggested Skills

Communication
Stakeholder Management
Organisational
Sales Acumen

Additional Information

Global Data Privacy Notice for Job Candidates

Please follow this link to access the document that provides transparency around the way in which LinkedIn handles personal data of employees and job applicants: https://legal.linkedin.com/candidate-portal.

Global Data Privacy Notice for Job Candidates

Please follow this link to access the document that provides transparency around the way in which LinkedIn handles personal data of employees and job applicants: https://legal.linkedin.com/candidate-portal."
Accounts Payable Executive,"Position Purpose:

Primary job scope focus on accounts payable and expenses for the company as part of the new regional payables team. Ensuring that invoices and expenses are processed timely for the region together with the wider finance team


Primary Accountabilities/Responsibilities:


Handling of Accounts Payable, including receipt of invoices, routing for approvals and ensuring payments are released
Ensure that all invoices are posted timely in the accounting system
Handle bi-monthly payment cycle
Prepare accrual journals for month end reporting
Perform accounts analysis and audit schedules
Assisting in the Employee expense reimbursement process
Assisting in providing information for the submission of quarterly GST
Liaise with internal/external accountants for accurate upkeep of books
Liaise with internal/external auditors over yearly financial audits


Job Requirements:

Certificate, Diploma or Degree in Accounting or equivalent.
2 – 3 years’ experience in relevant fields an advantage.
Meticulous and diligent/
Ability to work well in teams.
Experience with accounting software."
"Computer Vision Research Scientist, Data Monetization Technology","Responsibilities

1. Conduct cutting-edge research in the fields of computer vision and machine learning.
2. Ensure technologies get successfully applied to products.
3. Incubate new products with computer vision and machine learning technologies.

Qualifications

1. Ph.D. degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or other relevant majors.
2. Rich research experience in but not limited to the following areas (as main authors of published papers at CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ICML, NeurIPS, and ICLR)
1. Image/video search
2. Image/video classification/understanding
3. Object detection, segmentation, and tracking
4. Representation learning (multi-modality, pre-training, vision transformer, etc.)
5. OCR"
Data Analytics and Insights Specialist,"In this role, you will oversee data analytics and insights efforts for the entire Southeast Asia Region & International Marketing.
You will be working with global, regional and local teams to develop analytical tools for our SEA markets and you will be delivering regular reports that help drive informed decision making.

What you'll do:

• Synthetize data and analysis into impactful, action-orientated reports for stakeholders.
• Communicate the key findings and insight to senior managements and peers both conversationally and in formal presentation style.
• Conduct analysis using in-house analytics tools, and be comfortable analysing a range of social and business data.
• Provide qualitative and quantitative analysis and insights to inform business strategy, marketing, digital marketing, and product development.
• Maintain knowledge of previous analysis to avoid duplication and to share learnings from relevant past projects.
• Follow-up meetings with stakeholders after received analysis, to ensure it is helpful and documented any scope for improvements.
• Responsible for Business Performance Reporting to Senior Leadership Teams on a Regional Level. Managed datasets, designed data visualization dashboards on Tableau, and delivered relevant insights to key stakeholders through strategic analysis and storytelling.
• Analyze a wide range of data to help inform marketing, brand and business strategies.
• Ensure the analysis is relevant for SEA and/or International Marketing, and local SEA markets’ analysis needs/requests.
• Work across 6 Local Teams (Indonesia, Malaysia, Philippines, Singapore, Thailand and Vietnam) as well as the Regional SEA team and also the Global Data Team on cross functional and cross geographical projects.
• Use a wide range of analytical tools to help with analysis of both digital data such as social and search right through to traditional business data such as penetration and brand equity.
• Assess data quality to gauge suitability for analysis.
• Conceive templates, dashboards and other visualisation tools for data analysis.
• Interpret data analytics findings.
• Perform data cleaning and transformation to ensure suitability for analysis.
• Provide inputs on current available metrics and data collection to develop new metrics for research projects.
• Generate graphs, dashboards and visualisations with core metrics and key performance indicators (KPIs) to measure business performance.


Who you are:

• You have at least 5 years of experience working with insight & analytic background
• An analytical role and providing insight and recommendation based on analysis
• “Storytelling” in a music context, and crafting clear, compelling messaging
• A thoughtful, organized and data analytic-oriented professional
• An excellent communicator and enthusiastic collaborator who works well with team members, external partners, and senior management
• You have a strategic mindset and lean on data to inform and track business goals
• Strong with analytical tools
• Excellent communication skills to liaise with stakeholders of different level across the business.
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
• Good leadership and team player.
• Passion for digital and analytics, not afraid to break convention and want to be a revolutionary within the music business.


What we give you:

•You join an inclusive, collaborative and global community where you have the opportunity to fuel the creative journey
•A modern office environment designed to foster productivity, creativity, and teamwork
•We invest in your professional growth & development


Equal Opportunities

As an active part of a culturally and socially diverse society, Sony Music’s aim is that our workforce is diverse and inclusive. Sony Music is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

We employ, retain, promote and otherwise treat all employees and job applicants according to their merit, qualifications, competence and talent. We apply this policy without regard to any individual’s sex, race, religion, origin, age, sexual orientation, marital status, medical condition or disability."
Field Application Engineer,"We’re looking for people who put their innovation to work to advance our success – and their own. Join an organization that ensures a more secure world through connecting and protecting our customers with inventive electrical solutions.
Company Overview
nVent is a $2.5 billion, high-performance electrical company with a dedicated team of 9,000 people and trusted brands such as CADDY, ERICO, HOFFMAN, RAYCHEM, SCHROFF and TRACER. Known for innovation, quality and reliability, our products connect and protect, consistently delivering value to industrial, commercial, residential, energy and infrastructure customers.
While our name may be new, our products have set the standards for quality for more than a century. Today as nVent, we are focused and forward-looking, ready to build upon our legacy. The future is now.
Key role responsibilities
Main responsibilities include but are not limited to the following:
Serves as a subject matter expert for Hoffman products including Sales, Product Management, Operations, etc.
Travel across Southeast Asia, Australia & New Zealand.
Provide first line product support by providing help to customers and colleagues using Hoffman products and services.
Provide technical application assistance to identify modified and engineered products based on customer specification and application requirements.
Prepare and submit quotations& proposal of non-standard products using internal CPQ and ERP systems.
Conduct product training to customers & channel partners.
Prepare compliance documents against customer specifications.
Manage strategic projects for product enhancements, cost reduction, product consolidation and new product development.
Review training literature for technical accuracy including installation guides and procedures, operations manuals, online learning.
Represent nVent in industry codes and standards committees.
Provide market specific intelligence and feedback on products and services to the commercial teams. Assist commercial teams with voice of customer (VOC) visits.
Identify project in closing phase with sales team and provide necessary technical support.
Informs his/her superior about all situations, developments and occurrences which are important for the superior or are requested by him/her, as well as about all upcoming decisions which require his/her approval.
May be required to perform additional duties as assigned.
qualifications and experience
University Degree/ Diploma in Engineering
2 - 5 years Manufacturing/Technical experience
Work with a dynamic and inclusive multinational company
Previously worked in teams and a good team player
PREFERRED SKILLS
Very strong engineering background, preferably manufacturing
Demonstrated problem solving and complex analytical skills
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
Must have strong customer orientation
Good time management skills
Strong team player with positive attitude
Competencies
Candidate must have a pleasant personality, able to take initiatives on his/her own, a good attitude, clean working track record with high integrity should possess an integrative leadership style and have democratic approach including directional instruction when required and be a team player
Self-motivated& independent, be prepared to challenge the market and have a Can Do and Will Do attitude
Customer service oriented
Analytical & problem solver
Negotiation and cost optimization skills
Fast learner
Goals and results oriented
Communication and presentation skills
Excellent team player with positive attitude
Self-motivated
Business acumen
Able to work under pressure
Must have exceptional verbal and written communication skills with a professional presence
WE HAVE:
A dynamic global reach with diverse operations around the world that that will stretch your abilities, provide plentiful career opportunities, and allow you to make an impact every day
We are a $2.5 billion, high-performance electrical company with a dedicated team of 9,000 people, across more than 80 global locations
We have a robust portfolio of product brands dating back more than 100 years and including: nVent CADDY, ERICO, HOFFMAN, RAYCHEM, SCHROFF and TRACER
Commitmentto strengthen communities where our employees live and work
We encourage and support the philanthropic activities of our employees worldwide
Through our nVent in Action matching program, we provide funds to nonprofit and educational organizations where our employees volunteer or donate money
Core values that shape our culture and drive us to deliver the best for our employees and our customers. We’re known for being:
Innovative & adaptable
Dedicated to absolute integrity
Focused on the customer first
Respectful and team oriented
Optimistic and energizing
Accountable for performance
· Benefits to support the lives of our employees
reporting line
Head of Sales, Enclosures – SEA& ANZ
lOCATION
Singapore"
Influencer Specialist,"We Are Social is a global socially-led creative agency with unrivalled social media expertise. With more than 1000 people in 16 offices spanning four continents and over 80 people here in our Singapore office, we deliver world-class creative campaigns and strategies based on social insights, for forward-thinking brands. 

As an Influencer Specialist at We Are Social, you will be responsible for leading the regional influencer offering and driving top line business growth by developing and marketing our influencer proposition. 

It's an amazing role for someone who wants to be part of pioneering what influencer and social marketing looks like now and into the future.

As an Influencer Specialist, you will collaborate with teams across the agency to develop innovative creator and influencer strategies, while ensuring that we plan and implement efficient, authentic and targeted influencer campaigns for our customers.

Key Responsibilities

Market knowledge and expertise

Develop an in-depth knowledge of the influence marketing landscape and key trends across platforms, at a local and international level
Understand, research and share market trends and their evolutions. Being updated on the most relevant campaigns, significant projects and effective approaches is key for this role
Distribute this expertise and knowledge across internal teams and clients through training and workshops
Participates in pitching and client engagement initiatives to drive the agency's overall expertise in influencer
In collaboration with the network and R&I refines how influencer marketing is measured
Be interested in Web3 technologies and their potential to shape shift influencer marketing and creator economics
Helpful if you are a creator yourself, with a zeal for developing creative solutions and content



Strategy

Establish resources and educate clients and internal teams on best practices, develop customised strategies based on data, help solve technical issues, and optimise overall influencer performance across clients
Identify main KPIs of an influence marketing campaign and analyse results
Grow the influence marketing offering at We Are Social and develop processes to increase effectiveness, by leveraging our global tool set
Identify, recruit, and onboard potential creators and influencers to build our database of partnerships



Management

Conception and implementation of creative influencer campaigns, taking into account the relevant target group, marketing goals and budget planning
Oversee outreach, contracts and ongoing management of influence marketing campaigns
Identification and acquisition of suitable influencers for our customers and projects as well as maintenance and development of existing contacts


Requirements

Completed studies in the field of media/communication science, marketing, business administration or in a comparable field
At least 4 years of professional experience in influencer management/ marketing, ideally in an agency context
High affinity and passion for social media and experienced handling of social media channels
Intuition for current trends and developments
Strong hands-on mentality
Experience working with influencers and managing talent relationships
Culturally connected with an obsession of all things pop culture
Actively contributes to the creative process and builds on ideas
Experience in creating social media content and driving measurement efforts for social and/or influencer programs including calculating benchmarks and analysing performance
Experience working with influencers on new and/or emerging platforms (TikTok, Twitch etc)"
Data Platform Specialist,"The Data Platform Specialist will be given a unique opportunity to work on projects of high impact to our schools and students using cloud technologies and products. The person will be responsible for the design, build, maintenance, security and performance of the data and business intelligence platform as well as acting as a trusted consultant to IT management, making recommendations for how to build and scale the business intelligence data platform to serve both internal and external customers.

Responsibilities

Translate business needs to technical specifications.
Analyze business requirements, understand underlying data sources, transformation requirements, data mapping, data modelling and metadata for reporting solutions.
Design EDW data layer with appropriate enterprise considerations like scalability, performance, security, maintainability, automation etc.
Build infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources, applications and platforms.
Incrementally build IB's enterprise data warehouse.
Evaluate and improve existing BI systems.
Write code, conduct unit testing, documentation and troubleshooting.
Create visualizations and reports for various business units.
Participate in technical sharing and peer review sessions with team members.
Requirements

BSc/BA in Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field.
Building the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources, applications and platforms.
Able to integrate multiple data sources & user-end applications with databases into one system. (to store the data and its retrieval from the databases)
Solid experience in designing and implementing robust data pipelines and ETL framework.
Proven experience as a data warehouse architect & developer, including full implementation of data warehousing solution.
Good understanding of enterprise design concepts: re-usability, continuous integration, security, scheduling, monitoring, etc.
In-depth understanding of database management systems, online analytical processing (OLAP), SQL queries (Azure SQL DB).
Expertise with Azure Resource Management and templates is an added advantage.
Exposure to cloud technologies (MS Azure, AWS) & desire to learn and deliver new things on a needs-basis (big data, BI, data science, etc.).
Strong expertise in data warehouse design methodologies and technologies, data modelling(data vault experience is preferable), data quality and metadata.
Effective oral, written communication and presentation skills.
Strong interpersonal skills. Self-motivated with a keen attention to detail."
Application Engineer,"Key Responsibilities

Interacts with customers, company sales and /or service representatives to handle a variety of pre-sales support functions. Provides application and technical assistance and advice to sales force to support the sale and implementation of Applied Materials’ products and services. Application expert, capable of executing on site and in-house high-level application activities, specifically in wafer fab full automation and dispatching solution. Typically required to apply software, algorithms, and physics skills to support specialized and/or complex requirements during product implementation and consulting services. Provides the necessary support for product and system installation system Prepare a demo proposal / plan and execute demos and other in-house application tasks. Assists with product presentations and sales efforts with technical/application tasks as needed. Prepare an in depth technical analysis of Wafer Fab full automation and Dispatching Solution requirements Develops plans for post-sale support needs. Identifies opportunities for additional utilization of the systems in customer site in order to generate more business potential Develops, maintains and executes product’s strategy at a given customer in terms of application and technology Participates in product design, testing and documentation reviews as appropriate. Participate in user conferences.

Functional Knowledge

Demonstrates expanded conceptual knowledge in Factory Automation Software in the Full Automation and Dispatching discipline and broadens capabilities
General Software Programming experience and background is required
Experience with Windows, Unix & Linux OS (Operating System) is preferred

Business Expertise

Understands key business drivers; uses this understanding to accomplish own work
Prior knowledge & experience in Applied APF RTD® & Activity Manager™ products is required
Prior working experience with any Semiconductor Fab’s MES (Manufacturing Execution System) and EAP (Equipment Application Program) will be added advantage

Leadership

No supervisory responsibilities but provides informal guidance to new team members

Problem Solving

Solves problems in straightforward situations; analyzes possible solutions using technical experience and judgment and precedents

Impact

Impacts quality of own work and the work of others on the team; works within guidelines and policies

Interpersonal Skills

Explains complex information to others in straightforward situations

Education:

Bachelor's Degree or Diploma (with more years of relevant work experience)

Travel:

Regional travel is needed

Experience: 2 - 4 Years

Qualifications

Education:

Bachelor's Degree

Skills

Certifications:

Languages:

Years of Experience:

2 - 4 Years

Work Experience:

Additional Information

Travel:

Yes, 25% of the Time

Relocation Eligible:

No

Applied Materials is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law."
Application Infrastructure Engineer,"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) seeks to transform delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view. We put citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure, applications and facilitate work with our key beneficiaries to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation. A nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

We are constantly looking for Infrastructure Engineers with broad and deep technical expertise across multiple verticals and technologies. This role oversees the Application Infrastructure stack, looking at application centric infrastructure from OS, Middleware, Database, Storage/Back-up, Virtualization and Cloud technologies. You will work closely with the Applications team and adjacent members from Network, Security, End User Computing to execute new insights and improvements creatively in support of digital goals of different public service agencies.

What you will be working on:

Involved in supporting infrastructure architecture, resource planning, system performance and overall infrastructure operating environment for either on-premise infrastructure or cloud computing platforms, or both.
Support new application system initiatives and to drive development of infrastructure architecture, system integration, acceptance, performance management practice and performance testing
Run infrastructure services either on premise, hybrid or public cloud environment to support application systems by working closely with Applications Service counterparts
Understand systems operations environment and drive Architecture Review and Governance Process to ensure smooth and sustained operations (including resiliency requirements).

What we are looking for:

Degree in Computer Science, Computer or Electronics Engineering or Information Technology or equivalent
Minimum 5 years of relevant working experience, with validated records of having utilized architect design capabilities in infrastructure management for both on premise and Cloud workloads.
Certification in a Cloud Technology platform (either in Architecture, DevOps or System Administration/ SysOps track) preferred.
Successful candidate need to demonstrate either deep or broad (or both) level of technical expertise in the area of Infrastructure Services, with appreciation in one or more areas of Infrastructure Management, Cloud Computing and DevOps Engineering concepts.
Proactive and dedicated individual with good leadership and multi-tasking capabilities
Good interpersonal skills, oral and written skills, with the ability to present ideas and influence partners of different level
We believe in being Agile, Bold and Collaborative, and are looking for people who identify with these values

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
"Director, Sustainable Finance ASA","The Role Responsibilities

Work with the Region Head of Sustainable Finance to drive origination, develop strong client relationships and be seen as expert in SF by internal and external stakeholders.
The individual will need to be able to identify SF transactions, be a centre of excellence understanding financing structures and industry trends. The candidate will further have to support the regional head develop and roll out regional and global strategic initiatives.
Our Sustainable Finance team serves as a centre of expertise on a broad set of ESG topics, providing thought leadership, strategic advice and transaction support for SCB's clients. The group sits within the Commercial, Corporate and Institutional Bank and works with sales and coverage teams to identify and deliver on ESG-related advisory and product opportunities.
The Role described below is for an experienced and self-driven individual who will be responsible for the regional business growth and development.
Strategy

Work on the development and implementation of client strategies for Sustainable Finance products
Work closely with the Regional Head of Sustainable Finance to develop and execute a plan that would make SC the Bank best known for Sustainable Finance by our clients and other stakeholders. Works closely with the wider SF team, coverage and product leaders to develop and understanding of the competitive landscape and identify prospective partners who can address customer needs and accelerate growth.
Work closely with group corporate affairs to build a regional internal / external stake strategy promoting sustainability. Ensuring a consistent messaging to the internally and to the wider market.
Business

Drive new sustainable finance transactions and origination across all products, loans, bonds, trade derivatives and deposits.
Have a good understanding of the client base and proactively build pipeline, identifying core industries.
Be able to work with relationship teams to develop client transition plans that encourage decarbonisation.
Proactively keeping abreast of regional global, and industry developments, assess implications and align and develop Bank relevant initiatives across businesses in response to regulatory and industry development in sustainable finance.
ESG rating and benchmarking analysis for corporates.
Developing Sector thematic that describe sustainable finance structure alternatives.
Develop opportunities through attendance at key Industry events as necessary.
Processes

Proactively manage the designated Sustainable Finance client and product portfolio to ensure, risks are appropriately identified and managed.
Maintain Close ties exist with key stakeholders e.g., Financial Markets, Transaction Banking, Corporate Finance, Risk, Country CEOs, Service Delivery, etc.
People and Talent

Training and capacity building of the regional origination, and risk teams.
Risk Management

Build and maintain an understand on environmental and social risks across industry classes.
Safeguard the bank against reputation risk damage but proactively developing sustainable finance structures that are in line with global industry best practices.
Encourage good and proactive management environmental, social, regulatory, reputational and ethical risks governance across by all areas of the business.
Take the initiative regarding regulatory, reputational and ethical matters, taking the initiative for providing proactive advice to clients.
Governance

Ensure compliance with the sustainable finance governance structure and environmental and social risk management policies. Challenge improvement of these.
Awareness and understanding of the regulatory framework, in which the Group operates, and the regulatory requirements and expectations relevant to the role.
Regulatory & Business Conduct

Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group's Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Conduct Principles, Fair Outcomes for Clients, Effective Financial Markets, Financial Crime Compliance, The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Adhere to local and international regulator prescribed responsibilities and policies.
Key Stakeholders

Regional management, product, and client teams
Global and regional heads of Sustainable Finance
Global Head of Environmental Social Risk Management
Global Sustainable Finance Team
CCIB, GB, FM, TB, CF
External: The Bank's customers, competitors, regulators, investors and partners
Our Ideal Candidate

Degree (BA or equivalent)
7 + years plus banking experience.
4+ years of experience in Origination.
Knowledge and experience across multiple products (preferred).
Knowledge of environmental and socials risks and ESRM policies of the bank.
Ability to promote good teamwork, collaboration and management of conflict across stakeholders.
Ability to independently drive initiatives with minimum hands-on supervision.
Client focused with ability to establish and leveraging high impact relationships and presenting creative solutions.
Strong communication skills and stakeholder management skills.
Delivery and execution focused.
Ability to work with lots of moving parts and complexity.
Highly skilled in creation of briefing materials, report writing and preparation of presentations.
Role Specific Technical Competencies

Knowledge of environmental and socials risks.
Knowledge of sustainable finance.
Strong stakeholder management skills.
Drive new sustainable finance transactions and origination across all products.
About Standard Chartered

We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:

Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.

Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.

Visit our careers website"
Operations Operator,"Our team in Singapore currently has an opening for a Operations Operator

<<>>

YOUR ROLE & RESPONSIBILITIES
Operates production machines and production activities
Pick and pack items for delivery
Conduct regular and ad-hoc cycle count
Load items onto vehicle for delivery
Comply with safety regulations, effective warehousing operations, and perform 5S housekeeping
Perform any other duties as assigned by supervisor or superior


YOUR PROFILE
Minimum Secondary level
At least 1 year relevant experience
Have initiative and take ownership of responsibilities
Team player and ability to work safely and follow safe work procedures
Able to read, speak and write simple English in order to liaise with Stakeholders


OUR OFFER

<<>>

INTERESTED?

We look forward receiving your application."
Backend Engineer Intern (Trust & Safety Platform) - 2023,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2023. Internships at TikTok aim to offer students industry exposure and hands-on experience. Watch your ambitions become reality as your inspiration brings infinite opportunities at TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 08 May 2023 to 28 July 2023 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - Starting 09 January 2023 or 14 August 2023

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit in either internship period. Please state your availability clearly in your resume (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About the Team
Our Trust and Safety (TnS) Engineering team is responsible for protecting our users from harmful content and abusive behaviors. With the continuous efforts of our trust and safety team, TikTok can provide the best user experience and bring joy to everyone in the world.

Responsibilities
- Collaborate with Trust and Safety experts, machine learning engineers, and other cross-functional teams on delivering key results;
- Design technical solutions with team members;
- Implement technical solutions to support business requirements.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate or Postgraduate currently pursuing a Degree/Master/PhD in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline;
- Prior experience working with languages like Golang, Python, Java, C++ or C;
- Strong experience with Data Structures and Algorithms;
- Strong communication and teamwork skills.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Cloud Engineer/ Cloud Specialist (Devops),"Regional role
Exposure to latest technologies
About The Company

Our Client is a well-established company within their industry. With rapid expansion plans, they are now looking for an Cloud Specialist/Engineer (Devops) to join their team.

About The Job

Your role involves:
Build and operate cloud infrastructure using best industry practices in coordination with IT infrastructure and network teams
Manage and continue improving cloud product reliability, availability, maintainability & cost/benefit – incl. automating scale down/up of environments
Support data engineers / software engineers in setting up, optimizing and automating cloud engineering infrastructure (e.g. provisioning and deployment, etc)
Manage cloud infrastructure cost and plan for the forecast of the future investment
Build, operate and improve DevOps platform
Skills And Experience Required

As a successful applicant, you will have at least 3 to 5 years of experience in Microsoft Azure, Python and Shell scripting in an end-user environment. Experience in Devops platform is required for the role.

Whats on offer

This is an excellent opportunity to join a leading end user environment and also have the opportunity to have regional exposure.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you can reach me at https://www.linkedin.com/in/teohchinying/ or 6510 6320. (EA: 94C3609/ R1981920)

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM’s regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
Cloud Application Architect,"610019BR

Introduction

IBM Application Consultants work directly with our clients on key initiatives. You will have the opportunity to build an in-depth understanding of their business issues and implement organizational strategies that drive adoption of change. We are looking for experts who can build credibility and trust with our clients and provide knowledge that addresses individual and unique business needs.

Your Role and Responsibilities

About The Job

As a Tech Lead (Full Stack) in IBM, You will:

Lead project requirements with hands-on codes, tests, debugs, implements, and documents programs. Assists in the modification of products and systems to meet the needs of the client and/or end-user.
Contribute materially to a well-informed cloud strategy and manage our Cloud Adoption Model
Explore new technologies and drive innovation through experimentation
Build competency center and subject matter expertise that business and tech stakeholders can depend on
Performs advanced and complex programming, coding and documentation of systems and applications software.
Conduct, and guides others, in technical software development, testing and debug systems and software applications, as needed.
Compile and prioritize enhancements and defect resolutions to applications, implementing changes.
Analyze business requirements and prepare detailed technical specifications to write applications and programs.
Key contributor into the strategy and technical planning of system/application technology in accordance with internal and external software compliance standards
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Work with business stakeholders in defining the lifestyle app strategy and roadmap. Bring product thinking into all business requirements across countries. Interface with business, UX and technology teams to drive towards common requirements
Manage and lead Agile / Scrum development teams in design and development activities and guide them on technical direction.

About You

You are someone we are looking for if you have the following expertise:

Preferably have completed at least one (3) project using Scrum or equivalent as the Agile software development framework if participating in an Agile development project.
Ability to communicate ideas in both technical and user-friendly language.
Knowledge and experience with REST APIs, creating API centric microservices applications, working and connecting with API.
Proficiency in one or more API M platforms (WSO2 / Mulesoft / Azure/AWS API gateway/ Apigee).
Proficiency in one or more backend languages (Spring boot / NodeJS / Python).
Proficiency in one or more frontend framework (HTML5 / Angular / React).
Experience developing on both mobile and web platforms.
A proven track record of successful project/product implementation with Continuous Integration, Continuous Delivery, Pair programming, and Test-Driven Development.
Knowledge in Redis, Docker, Jenkins, Teamcity, SVN, GIT, and GIT LAB.
Knowledge in HTML5, CSS, Javascript, React, Redux, Angular, NodeJS, Java, Spring Boot, C#, Python AWS Cloud, J2ee
Full-stack development background especially in HTML/CSS/JavaScript, ReactJS frameworks, IOS Swift, Android Java, Java Spring Boot framework, JBoss/Tomcat, MariaDB, Redis, and Cloud Foundry
Working knowledge of the general Mobile App development landscape, architectures, trends, and emerging technologies.
Ability to build applications using distributed microservice architecture, and capacity to debug and optimize code and automate routine tasks
Understand API architectures; hands on experience with designing and deploying APIs through API gateways and portals, including API documentation using standards such as OpenAPI/Swagger
Familiarity with modern Public Cloud services on AWS and Azure; relevant certifications preferred

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

As shared above

Desired Background

Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise

Diploma/Degree in Computer Science, Computing, Electrical Engineering, IT or equivalent with Java training or certification with 
At least one (5) year experience in system analysis, design, and programming.
full stack development experience
Experienced in Cloud and Data application such as React.JS, Power BI, Kong, AWS
Excellent communication and articulation skills.

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
"Executive, Product Development - Research & Development","Main Job Duties & Responsibilities:
Support the product development work such as making beverage samples, checking product stability, conducting chemical analysis, etc.
Support the R&D projects such as formulation, sample preparation and sensory evaluation.
Conduct and monitor the preparation of prototype/ sample and determine the process specifications predetermined in the lab.
Processing samples, classifying results and recording findings.
Support sample making for testing.
Support Shelf Life Test.
Comply with the correct procedures, policies and health and safety regulations.
General lab maintenance, cleanliness and organization, including procuring and ordering of supplies, consumables and maintenance of inventory.
General administrative support.
Any ad-hoc project or task as required.
Job Requirements:
Diploma or Degree in Food Science or its equivalent.
Minimum two years’ working experience in food/beverage/flavor industry is highly preferred.
Experience in conducting scientific experiments and general chemical analysis (pH, etc.) is an added advantage.
Preferably to have experience of making beverage samples.
Able to handle general scientific instruments and perform general chemical analysis.
Proficiency in Microsoft Office applications, i.e. Powerpoint, Excel
Able to work independently as well as a team player;
Good interpersonal and communication skills;
Open mindset and positive attitude.
Capability to work tenaciously and good collaborating skill."
Full Stack Developer,"Our Company

We, at RegASK

RegASK is an international, diverse and rewarding place to work. If you are a builder, highly autonomous in your working style, and eager to problem solve, we would love to hear from you.

RegASK is part of Sprim Global Investments portfolio (

THE POSITION

Title: Full Stack Developer

 Reporting to : Head of Engineering

Responsibilities: 

Join the product development team to translate requirements and designs into web applications or services using Node.js, Express, React, Mongo and other tools/frameworks as required
Build scalable architectures to meet different use cases
Work with QA team to create unit and integration tests to ensure code quality
Weigh in on feasibility and timelines for feature development and development milestones
Take charge of existing code base and help refactoring to meet standards where required
Ensure proper and adequate documentation
Align to the company’s Culture and show great team work abilities

Requirements:

2-3 years of experience, building web applications and services
1-2 years of experience with MERN stack, Python a plus
Experience with production grade deployment a plus
Ability to work collaboratively
An eye for detail and the ability to develop adaptive code that can keep up with new requirements
Strong communication skills

Powered by JazzHR

nMULQgv6AR"
ALM Treasury IT Front Office Kondor Trade Processing Application Support,"In Asia Pacific, BNP Paribas is one of the best-positioned international financial institutions with an uninterrupted presence since 1860. Currently with over 18,000 employees* and a presence in 13 markets, BNP Paribas provides corporates, institutional and private investors with product and service solutions tailored to their specific needs. It offers a wide range of financial services covering corporate & institutional banking, wealth management, asset management, insurance, as well as retail banking and consumer financing through strategic partnerships.

Worldwide, BNP Paribas has a presence in 68 markets with more than 193,000 employees. It has key positions in its three main activities: Domestic Markets and International Financial Services (whose retail-banking networks and financial services are covered by Retail Banking & Services) and Corporate & Institutional Banking, which serves two client franchises: corporate clients and institutional investors. Asia Pacific is a key strategic region for BNP Paribas and it continues to develop its franchise in the region.
 excluding partnerships

At BNP Paribas, we passionately embrace diversity and are committed to fostering an inclusive workplace where all employees are valued, respected and can bring their authentic selves to work. We prohibit Discrimination and Harassment of any kind and our policies promote equal employment opportunity for all employees and applicants, irrespective of, but not limited to their gender, gender identity, sex, sexual orientation, ethnicity, race, colour, national origin, age, religion, social status, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status etc. As a global Bank, we truly believe that inclusion and diversity of our teams is key to our success in serving our clients and the communities we operate in.

https://careers.apac.bnpparibas/

Position Purpose

Be part of the Singapore GM APAC IT APS TP BOOKING Team, providing a well-managed, efficient, proactive IT Applications Production Support (APS) and maintenance to the ALM & Treasury, BP2S, Global Banking and Wealth Management Front offices.

Candidates with experience with KONDOR, trade processing and booking systems will be appreciated

Key Responsibilities

Team responsibilities and scope :
Supporting ALM & Treasury, BP2S, WM, GB Business and related functions on Kondor+Ecosystem application and infrastructure (position management system handling twelve different cash, FX and derivatives asset classes). 
Ensure the ongoing Level 1 & 2 technical and functional support of Kondor+ system including: 
 Understand Users request and provide a customer oriented support
 Inform users of relevant information
 Support for any production incidents and problem resolution. Gathering of incident symptoms, investigation of root cause and behavior, reproducing incident on test environment, recovery of incident or deployment of workaround, communication with Level 3 for long term fix.
 Coordinate with Central and Asian teams when required
 Support of multiple interfaces from/to upstream and downstream systems
 Support for Kondor APAC core components (Deal booking and schedules generations, Risk & PNL calculation, Reports generation, System configuration…)
 Ensure the ongoing maintenance of Kondor+ APAC system including: 
 Capturing Users requirements, performing gap and impact analysis, producing functional specifications, and escalate/follow them up with the relevant IT Teams
 Participate to the lifecycle of multiple ongoing projects as ALMT IT domain expert
 Adhering to defined best practices and GM standards for Change, Release, Incident, Problem and Request Management (ITIL followed)
 Participation in maintenance operation (BCP, DR, maintenance operations, go live, etc.)
 Coordinate with the other IT APS and system Teams supporting the system (ALMT Dev team, Market data, DBA, Unix/Windows …)
 Follow and ensure that the compliance, Operational risks and IT Security guidelines are followed and applied by the team

Competencies (Technical / Behavioral) 
2-5 years of experience in similar Front office application support 
Strong SQL and scripting languages (code analysis, debugging, monitoring development...) 
Strong UNIX command lines knowledge (Linux Red Hat used) 
Strong Time and Task management skills in a high multitasking environments 
Exposure to Sybase ASE or similar DB technology, Unix OS, Windows 2008/2012 servers 
Exposure to IT Production environment and standard methodologies (Change and Incident Management, Disaster Recovery process, ITIL and Agile processes) 
Exposure to Excel data manipulation (VLOOKUP, PivotTable, Array, Sumproduct, etc…) and scripting (VBA) 
Exposure to multi-cultural work environment. 
Knowledge of Financial Products such as Risk and Pricing of Derivatives and Cash products 
Knowledge of standard methodology: CMMI, ITIL and Agile 
Preferably advance development and scripting knowledge 
Preferably experience in developing or providing support on Kondor+3.0/3.4 applications 
Preferably experience with Business Object for reports developments 

Primary Location

SG-06-Singapore

Job Type

Standard / Permanent

Job

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY

Education Level

Master Degree or equivalent (> 4 years)

Experience Level

At least 3 years"
Jumpstart - Logistics Engineering and Analytics,"As a member of the Infineon Technologies Asia Pacific Corporate Supply Chain and Analytics team, the candidate will be managing some continuous improvement projects. He/she will also focus on assisting the team in defining the requirement for the digital twin of a finished goods future distribution center in Singapore.

In your new role you will:

Project management for Distribution Centre Asia (DCA) continuous improvement projects
Assisting Logistics Engineering team in defining the requirement for warehouse digital twin
Assisting in analytics and dashboarding projects within Logistics
Assisting in the study of DCA optimization

You are best equipped for this task if you have:

Bachelor's Degree in Engineering / Information Technology / Supply Chain & Logistics
Strong MS Excel and data analytics knowledge
Knowledge of Anylogics, AutoCAD and Industrial Engineering will be a bonus
Proficiency in project management
Good team player
Fresh graduates are welcome to apply

This is a 24-month contract with job rotation exposure.

Part of your life. Part of tomorrow.


Infineon is a world leader in semiconductor solutions that make life easier, safer, and greener. Our solutions for efficient energy management, smart mobility, and secure, seamless communications link the real and the digital world.

In accordance with the requirements set by the Singaporean Government, Infineon Technologies Asia Pacific Pte Ltd (“Infineon”) can only allow individuals who are (a) fully vaccinated, (b) certified to be medically ineligible for a vaccine or (c) have recovered from COVID-19 within a prescribed period, onto company premises. Therefore, Infineon requires all new employees, as well as contractors and business partners, to be fully vaccinated against COVID-19. “Fully vaccinated” means individuals have completed the full regime of an approved COVID-19 Vaccine as listed under the World Health Organization (WHO) Emergency Use Listing (EUL) including the respective post-vaccination period to ensure the vaccine has become full effective. Anyone who is unable to be vaccinated due to an approved and/or recognised exemption condition may apply for special consideration."
Workplace Experience Associate,"Receptionist

The Role

We are looking for a full-time Workplace Experience Associate for our Singapore office. This is a great opportunity to learn the business from the ground up. This position requires wearing multiple hats and the ideal candidate will have a “no task is too big or too small” mentality. You should expect to interface with our many teams and firm leadership to ensure that all employees and guests have an excellent experience at Schonfeld.

What You Do

What you’ll bring
Greet visitors
Maintain security by following procedures (including Health and Safety), monitor logs and issuing visitor badges
Stock kitchen and procure office supplies
Handle multiple phone lines and forward calls accordingly
Coordinate catering needs, order food for lunches, meetings, etc.
Receive and send mail & packages
Schedule meetings and manage conference room calendars
Provide support to various teams and departments within the firm
Communicate with external vendors to ensure day-to-day office activities run smoothly
What You’ll Need
Strong communication skills both written and oral
Team player and excellent interpersonal skills
Excellent organizational and time management skills
Ability to meet deadlines, prioritize assignments and multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Attention and focus on details
Familiarity with Microsoft Windows, Outlook, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
We’d Love If You Had
Proficiency in an additional Asian language will be highly preferred (e.g., Mandarin, Japanese, Korean etc.)
Experience with Concur
Experience in managing office relocation will be an advantage
Our Culture

The firm’s ethos is embedded in our people. ‘Talent is our strategy’ is our mantra and drives how we approach all initiatives at the firm. We believe our success is because of our people, so putting our talent above all else is our top priority.

Schonfeld strives to create an environment where our people can thrive. We foster a teamwork-oriented, collaborative environment where ideas at any level are encouraged and shared. The development and advancement of our talent is honed through interactions with each other, learning & educational offerings, and through opportunities to make impactful contributions.

At Schonfeld, we strive to cultivate a sense of belonging throughout all of our employees with Diversity, Equity and Inclusion at the forefront of this mission. As a firm we are committed to creating a hiring process which is not only fair, but also welcoming and supportive. On a daily basis, our employees welcome diversity across identity, thought, people and views which serves as the foundation of our culture and success. You can learn more about our DEI initiatives here - Belonging @ Schonfeld.

Who We Are

Schonfeld Strategic Advisors is a multi-manager platform that invests its capital with Internal and Partner portfolio managers, primarily on an exclusive or semi-exclusive basis, across four trading strategies; quantitative, fundamental equity, tactical trading and discretionary macro & fixed income. We have created a unique structure to provide global portfolio managers with autonomy, flexibility and support to best enable them to maximize the value of their businesses.

Over the last 30 years, Schonfeld has successfully capitalized on inefficiencies and opportunities within themarkets. We have developed and invested heavily in proprietary technology, infrastructure and risk analytics and continue to capitalize on new opportunities. In 2021 we launched our newest strategy, discretionary macro & fixed income as part of the continual growth of Schonfeld’s investible universe. Our portfolio exposure has expanded across the Americas, Europe and Asia as well as multiple asset classes and products .

LI-DC1"
Executive Assistant to CEO,"This position will be reporting to CEO directly

Responsibilities:
· Strive to be CEO's assistant. Able to form a connecting link between the preceding and the following and achieve all-round services
· Drafting of company’s work plan and responsible for the overall work of the company under the guidance of CEO
· Partner business and product functions to provide strategic inputs and advice on how business activities may be carried out within permissible regulatory requirements. Where necessary, to propose and pursue suitable licensing arrangements which allow delivery of the intended business activities or value proposition.
· Assist CEO to investigate and study, understand the company's operation and management, and put forward handling opinions or suggestions for CEO to make decisions.
· Drafting of company’s work plan and responsible for the overall work of the company under the guidance of CEO
· Responsible for all regulatory compliance matters locally and globally, including addressing inherent risk regulatory requirements, driving process improvement on the compliance program
· Assist CEO in business development tasks & follow-up closely
· Assist in group related matters locally & globally & follow-up closely
· Provide full administrative/secretarial support to CEO (including travel arrangement, managing daily calendar & schedules, appointment scheduling and drafting of correspondences, etc)
· Facilitate meetings including minutes taking
· Run errands for CEO
· Able to travel when necessary
· Any other duties and responsibilities that may be delegated from time to time

Requirements
· Bachelor Degree in any discipline, with at least 2 years of Secretarial experience to C-Suite level
· Ability to adapt to changes and working in a fast pace environment
· Excellent verbal & written communication skills
· Independent, meticulous and organized
· Proficiency in MS Office
· Exercise good judgement and ability to prioritize multiple tasks in a timely manner"
Security Data Analyst,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities

Monitor, diagnose, and dispose fraudulent activities, devices and transactions through the use of proprietary and open-source data tools
Work cross functionally with company stakeholders to develop rules in support of evolving fraud trends and business needs
Collect and use threat intelligence to detect, disrupt, and eradicate threat actors
Manage prioritization and balance trade-offs among user experience and security
Translate complex findings into simple visualizations

Requirements

A Bachelors Degree in an analytical field and 2+ years of experience is required. A Master's Degree is preferred
Experience leveraging data query languages (SQL) and scripting languages (Python, R or equivalent) for data analysis
Ability to implement analytics & data visualizations via Tableau, or equivalent software
Experience using data to guide and influence decisions
Experience researching, defining and measuring metrics based on quantitative and qualitative requirements
Experience being an effective contributor in cross-functional teams
Demonstrated effective written and verbal communication skills
Experience in security or risk management field
Demonstrable experience with cyber threat intelligence tools and services

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Data Scientist,"Responsibilities

Responsibilities

About The Team

The success of TikTok's data business model hinges on the supply of a large volume of high quality labeled data that will grow exponentially as our business scales up. However, the current cost of data labeling is excessively high. The Data Solutions team is built to understand data strategically at scale for all Global Business Solution (GBS) business needs. Data Solutions Team uses quantitative and qualitative data to guide and uncover insights, turning our findings into real products to power exponential growth. Data Solutions Team responsibility includes infrastructure construction, recognition capabilities management, global labeling delivery management.

About The Role

We are looking for a highly capable and independent Data Operations Specialist to manage our machine learning labeling pipelines, the success of which would lay a solid foundation and ensure high performance of our machine learning solutions. You will be following the end-to-end delivery of various labeling projects, understanding the machine learning context and clarifying the detailed requirements, collaborating with key stakeholders to solve different types of problems that might occur during the labeling process, and providing data support to drawing deeper insights when necessary.

Responsibility

What you will do

Work closely with stakeholders to capture requirements for data labeling projects

Support data product managers in prioritising the labeling project backlog

Track the progress of data labeling projects and manage resources to ensure timely completion

Enhance on the service and quality of labelled data delivery

Expose to various machine learning techniques and business use-cases

Experience the entire model pipeline from data gathering to model delivery and maintenance

What you will need

Solid foundations of maths and algorithms, and data project management is preferred

Outstanding skill of communication, collaboration, project management, excellent team player and strong ownership

Strong interest in process optimisation and improvement

Highly conscientious

Interest in machine learning/model training

Experience in BI tools, data visualizations, one general purpose programming language (e.g., Java, C/C++, Python) would be required

Experience and knowledge in artificial intelligence, computer vision, machine learning, large-scale distributed systems and other fields are highly preferred

Qualifications

Qualifications

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Business Analytics or equivalent practical experience"
Sales Development Representative,"Company Description

At ServiceNow, our technology makes the world work for everyone, and our people make it possible. We move fast because the world can’t wait, and we innovate in ways no one else can for our customers and communities. By joining ServiceNow, you are part of an ambitious team of change makers who have a restless curiosity and a drive for ingenuity. We know that your best work happens when you live your best life and share your unique talents, so we do everything we can to make that possible. We dream big together, supporting each other to make our individual and collective dreams come true. The future is ours, and it starts with you.

With more than 7,400+ customers, we serve approximately 80% of the Fortune 500, and we're proud to be one of FORTUNE's 100 Best Companies to Work For® and World's Most Admired Companies® 2022.

Learn more on Life at Now blog and hear from our employees about their experiences working at ServiceNow.

Unsure if you meet all the qualifications of a job description but are deeply excited about the role? We still encourage you to apply! At ServiceNow, we are committed to creating an inclusive environment where all voices are heard, valued, and respected. We welcome all candidates, including individuals from non-traditional, varied backgrounds, that might not come from a typical path connected to this role. We believe skills and experience are transferrable, and the desire to dream big makes for great candidates.

Job Description

The Sales Development Representative builds sales pipeline by identifying qualified opportunities:

Actively find, contact and prospect C-levels in some of the biggest organisations in the world
Establish new business relationships with influential contacts within target accounts
Understand an organization's goals and qualify for potential sales opportunities
Active and close collaboration with field sales and marketing teams
Partner with Field Sales to create regional territory plans
Use our technologies to prioritize, disposition and manage marketing leads to maintain service level agreements with Marketing

Qualifications

To be successful in this role you have:

1-2 years of relevant experience in a high-growth tech company
Understanding and experience in prospecting into enterprise businesses
Able to speak with key influencers and decision-markers
A creative and customer-focused mindset
Experience with lead generation, or cold calling, both inbound and outbound calls
A general understanding of Cloud Computing and SaaS offerings
Ability to differentiate yourself to customers
Travel for training or meetings may occasionally be required
Being able to speak, read and write Thai is a must as this role requires to work with our customers in Thailand

FD21

Additional Information

ServiceNow is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin or nationality, ancestry, age, disability, gender identity or expression, marital status, veteran status or any other category protected by law.

At ServiceNow, we lead with flexibility and trust in our distributed world of work. Click here to learn about our work personas: flexible, remote and required-in-office.

If you require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact us at talent.acquisition@servicenow.com for assistance.

For positions requiring access to technical data subject to export control regulations, including Export Administration Regulations (EAR), ServiceNow may have to obtain export licensing approval from the U.S. Government for certain individuals. All employment is contingent upon ServiceNow obtaining any export license or other approval that may be required by the U.S. Government.

Please Note: Fraudulent job postings/job scams are increasingly common. Click here to learn what to watch out for and how to protect yourself. All genuine ServiceNow job postings can be found through the ServiceNow Careers site."
SMB Sales Representative,"About Us:

SentinelOne is defining the future of cybersecurity through our XDR platform that automatically prevents, detects, and responds to threats in real-time. Singularity XDR ingests data and leverages our patented AI models to deliver autonomous protection. With SentinelOne, organizations gain full transparency into everything happening across the network at machine speed – to defeat every attack, at every stage of the threat lifecycle.

We are a values-driven team where names are known, results are rewarded, and friendships are formed. Trust, accountability, relentlessness, ingenuity, and OneSentinel define the pillars of our collaborative and unified global culture. We're looking for people that will drive team success and collaboration across SentinelOne. If you’re enthusiastic about innovative approaches to problem-solving, we would love to speak with you about joining our team!

What are we looking for?

As we enter our next phase of hyper-growth, we're looking for people who will go the extra mile and join us in our passion for building a bigger and better SentinelOne. We are now seeking a dynamic SMB Sales Representative focused on organizations up to 500 employees to join our team in Singapore. This role will focus on South East Asia, Hong Kong and Taiwan.

What Will You Do?

The principal responsibilities for this position are to generate revenue from multiple lead sources (Inbound, Outbound and Partner). Selected candidates will be expected to achieve their revenue sales targets and will be asked to provide weekly forecast updates and visibility into this growing business.

Understand your patch, build pipeline and close business to ensure target achievement
Run a sophisticated sales process from prospecting to closure
Field, qualify & close inbound inquiries from multiple sources
Partner with our channel team to drive both net-new and recurring revenue
Become an insider within the Cyber Security Industry and become an expert of SentinelOne products.
Consistently meet/exceed sales quotas; Achievement driven; Highly competitive
Prepare and provide accurate forecasts to management on a weekly basis.
Create great and lasting first impressions to prospects and customers by providing them with a friendly, exceptional experience
Stay well educated and informed as to the SentinelOne competitive landscape and how to sell the value of our solutions and services when compared to the relevant competitors in the Next Generation Endpoint market space.

What skills and experience should you bring?

High-tech sales experience (Cyber preferred).
Ability to prospect and manage relationships within target organizations
Team player
A proven track-record of driving continued sales growth within a defined territory
Motivated and focused self-starter with a strong work ethic who can work within a fast paced startup environment
Exceptional communication skills including listening, writing and public speaking.
A high degree of honesty, integrity and sound judgment.
Strong working knowledge of the cyber security space a definite advantage

Why us?

You will be joining a cutting-edge company, where you will tackle extraordinary challenges and work with the very best in the industry!

SentinelOne is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics.

SentinelOne participates in the E-Verify Program for all U.S. based roles."
Development Engineering (Avaloq) Specialist - Digital Business Services,"Some careers have more impact than others.

If you’re looking for a career where you can make a real impression, join HSBC and discover how valued you’ll be. Whether you want a career that could take you to the top, or simply take you in an exciting new direction, HSBC offers opportunities, support and rewards that will take you further.

HSBC Digital Business Services is a pivotal part of the Group, providing essential operational and technical support to our global businesses and helping improve customer service and efficiency. Digital Business Services combines global expertise and technology to help keep us ahead of the competition.

We are currently seeking a high calibre professional to join our team as a Development Engineering (Avaloq) Specialist.

Principal Responsibilities

This role contributes in the development of the component/system(s) owned by a single delivery line and is primarily accountable for the change and run activities associated with the delivery of the products and services, the development and operational lifecycles.
Primary accountability is to develop the most appropriate IT solutions in line with the solution design, to meet customer needs, ensuring continuous improvement with responsibility to write the unit & integration tests performed by Test Engineers
End to end accountable for a product or service, identifying and developing the most appropriate IT solutions to meet customer needs as part of the Customer Journey
Responsible for ensuring products and services maintain compliance with mandatory and regulatory requirements
Responsible for ensuring group controls are maintained within the pod activities and remediation activities are resolved swiftly
Accountable for the operational stability, integrity and availability of products and services supported by the pod
Accountable for the performance of the pod activities and maintaining performance in line with benchmark objectives (inc productivity, quality and effectiveness measures)
Support the solution architect to ensure that solutions and services are supported by the right architectures & systems

Desired Skills and Experience


Requirements
Strong Development Background
Good understanding of Private Banking Domain
Strong working experience of Avaloq platform
Strong knowledge in scripting languages such as PL SQL
Excellent communication skills
Understand user requirements and provide solutions using Avaloq Parameterization along with Unix and shell scripts
Develop the most appropriate IT solutions in line with the solution design, to meet customer needs, ensuring continuous improvement with responsibility to write the unit & integration tests performed by Test Engineers
Good Analysis, Design and Coding skill
Determine technical and business suitability of proposed requirements with architect, developers and other relevant team members and provide recommendations.
Good knowledge about Avaloq reporting as well as interfaces
Validate proposed solutions with business representatives and technical team to ensure solutions and restrictions are clearly understood
Experience on any functional domain
Debugging and Problem solving skills
Define and document solutions and changes producing comprehensive documents supported by structured analysis techniques and methodologies
Development, Testing of requests, execution of release
Good knowledge on Agile practices
Excellent written and verbal communication and presentation skills
Handling specific issues / queries from projects and POD members
Be able to work in Agile/DevOps environment


To be considered for this role, the relevant rights to work in Singapore is required.

You’ll achieve more when you join HSBC.
www.hsbc.com/careers

HSBC is committed to building a culture where all employees are valued, respected and opinions count. We take pride in providing a workplace that fosters continuous professional development, flexible working and opportunities to grow within an inclusive and diverse environment. Personal data held by the Bank relating to employment applications will be used in accordance with our Privacy Statement, which is available on our website.

Issued by The Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corporation Limited."
Product Safety Certifier II,"Employment Status

Regular

Time Type

Full time

BUILDING A WORLD CLASS TEAM STARTS WITH YOU

At the heart of CSA Group is a vision: making the world a better, safer, more sustainable place. It's been part of our mission for nearly one hundred years: from the first engineering standard for railway bridges developed in 1919, to more than 3,500 standards, codes & related products today.

Headquartered in Canada, with a global footprint of more than 30 labs and offices across Europe, Asia and North America, CSA Group tests, inspects and certifies a wide range of products - from every day househould items to leading edge technology-to meet exacting requirements for safety, performance and environmental impact.

Our employees take pride in making a difference in people's lives through the work that we do. We're looking for people like you to help make it happen.

Job Summary

PERFORMANCE

Independently manages certification projects concurrently ensuring compliance with all applicable safety requirements achieving completion within time frames and cost deadlines. Evaluates products against requirements of the national / international standards and precedent decisions.
Handles a wide spectrum of projects including those that are complex generating high revenue levels
Delivers assigned projects / tests within agreed timescales the majority of the time
Demonstrates the ability to accurately manage project costs within the agreed budget
Able to maintain good productivity in line with company expectations
Demonstrates technical competence to review the work of others per divisional quality documents
Demonstrates technical competence to perform witness testing per divisional quality documents.
Demonstrates technical competence in 2 or more product qualification competencies
Reviews test data and reports and authorizes application of the CSA Mark. Prepares and / or signs Certification Reports and Certificates of Compliance.
Provides client with assistance in solving problems / failures without divulging proprietary information.
Keeps the Product Group Manager or Team Leader or Assistant Operations Manager informed of project status as required, pointing out

major problems and non-compliance.

Performs other duties as assigned by the Product Group Manager or Team Leader or Assistant Operation Manager.
Evaluates and qualifies companies in the administration of Certification Programs. Reviews customer test methods and systems; reviews new / old product designs and all applicable documentation. Ensures all test equipment and quality procedures are within guidelines. Provides technical briefings on new and existing requirements. Authorizes application and / or removal of the CSA Mark.
The qualified Certifier is accountable for including the Technical Advisor or Certification Specialist in product / technical discussions that are unique to CSA or to the experience of the individual. This aids the Technical Advisor and Certification Specialist to further advance consistency of practices and to provide guidance at the front-end of the process.
Provides technical information service to external and internal customers including those forwarded by the Client Service Center. Liaises with customer in design stage to ensure requirements of national / international standards are met without compromising confidentiality. CUSTOMER
Works with sales to support current clients and develop new client opportunities to support growth
Prepares project quotations for cost and time. Classifies product by use, environment and function. Determines applicable requirements / test / standards. Determines sample requirements and method / location for testing / evaluation best suited to customers’ needs.
Provides client feedback to Managers, Team Leader or Sales representatives, as appropriate.
Explains the different product certifications programs available to clients and the requirements for control of production. TESTING
Performs within established DQD guidelines.
Prepares Test Lab Work Orders and Special Testing Documentation that includes details regarding applicable sections of relevant standards, test sample plan, data collection methods and tables, Job Hazard Analysis, and any other instructions.
Provides necessary guidance to Lab Technicians to ensure proper application of requirements and data collections methods are in line.
Able to demonstrate experience of performing common testing within CSA laboratories
Makes field trips and witnesses test work at manufacturer's facilities as required.
Has a good knowledge of the clauses and tests within the standards they support and can demonstrate application across multiple product types.
Demonstrates the ability to compile evaluation record, data and summary test results into forms, templates and checklists without the need for supervision.
Demonstrates the ability to correctly interpret the results from the tests with only minimal guidance and supervision SELF DEVELOPMENT
The Certifier II is subject to internal audits for compliance and competence.
Participates in CSA Group Continuous Improvement and Innovation projects.
Makes recommendations on new programs / equipment to expand core capabilities.
Generates ideas to improve laboratory safety.
Becomes fully knowledgeable in all national / international standards through research of standards, documentation, bulletins and technical articles in area of specialty. Recommends revisions to ensure technical consistency to resolve issues of pertinent practices, processes and precedents.
Can explain to others the standards they are competent in
Performs other duties as assigned by the PGM, Team Leader, or Manager.
Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering with likely 3 years of job related experience or
Certified Engineering Technologist, or equivalent industry experience with likely 3 years of related experience
Knowledge of CSA, UL and IEC Standards
Variety of testing procedures
Knowledge of CSA programs and services
Demonstrate the ability to confidently and clearly communicate, explain findings, test results and technical decisions to others, including customers and other engineers.
High level of interpersonal and communication skills; customer service skills
Strong problem-solving ability; detail oriented
Strong organizational, time and project management skills
Able to work unsupervised, in a team-based work environment
Computer proficiency (Microsoft Office)
Technical report writing
Use of various lab equipment, instruments and tools"
Executive Assistant to the Group CEO,"Responsibilities:
Provide full spectrum of secretarial support to the Group CEO.
Manage an active calendar of appointments, meetings, reports completion and submission.
Draft and review documents.
Prepare reports, minutes of meeting, presentation materials and other documents.
Maintain corporate records, filing, etc.
Arrange overseas travel, flight and hotel reservations, visa applications, expense claims, etc.
Handle phone calls/correspondences and assist in sales and investors enquiries.
Organize company events and activities if required.
Any other duties as assigned from time to time, including supporting other departments/executives if needed.

Qualifications/ Requirements:
A Diploma/Bachelor’s degree in related fields.
Prior experience in performing secretarial duties.
Excellent communication and writing skills.
Strong organizational skills, detail-oriented, able to work well in a fast-paced environment.
Proficient in MS Office."
AWS DEVELOPER,"Key Responsibilities
Understand the current application infrastructure and come up with recommendations or suggestions

to change or improve it
Work collaboratively with the Murex dev team to configure the AWS architecture as per requirements
Create reusable, effective, and scalable programs in Lambda and Python
Troubleshoot and provide support during SIT and UAT phases
Help implement the solution in Production

Key Requirements
At least 3 years of experience on AWS Development
Certified AWS Architect or AWS Developer
Strong technical skills such as programming knowledge, software development, and continuous

integration
Strong skills on Python development
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills
Good communication (oral and written) skills in English language"
Sales Development Representative,"Company Description

Imagine what we can do together. At LinkedIn, we believe amazing things can happen when we work together in an environment where everyone feels a true sense of belonging and their ideas are heard. Join us and help make a direct impact on the world’s workforce in ways no other company can.

Job Description

At LinkedIn, we trust each other to do our best work where it works best for us and our teams. This role offers a hybrid work option, meaning you can both work from home and commute to a LinkedIn office, depending on what’s best for you and when it is important for your team to be together.

LinkedIn is looking for an enthusiastic Sales Development Representative to join its Sales Development team. You will play a key role in driving new business for the teams by qualifying inbound leads and helping drive various outbound campaigns. This is a great opportunity for a sales professional to work at a forward-thinking company and advance their career.

You will report to the Sales Development Manager, however feedback and coordination of resource with the sales and direct marketing teams is vital to success in this area. The representative will also provide support to the Inside Sales and Account Management teams as needed.

What You’ll Do:
Qualify and develop inbound leads for LinkedIn’s business solutions and respond to product enquiries
Run email campaigns to generate new sales prospects
Complete, accurate tracking of communication with current and potential customers in SalesForce.com
Schedule demonstrations between Account Executives and potential customers

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Undergraduate university degree and 1+ year of experience in a metrics-driven sales or client-facing role
If no undergraduate university degree, 3+ years of experience in a metrics-driven sales or client-facing role

Preferred Qualifications

Experience working with Salesforce.com or other CRM platforms
Expert knowledge of MS Office (Outlook, Word, PowerPoint and Excel)
Ability to effectively manage time, prioritize tasks and work within deadlines with little supervision
Ability to analyze business opportunities and read situations well
Ability to gather and use data to inform decision making and persuade others
Ability to develop compelling strategies that deliver results with strong attention to detail
Ability to work in a fast-paced, startup environment

Suggested Skills:
Communication skills
Interpersonal skills
Stakeholder Management skills
Organizational skills

Additional Information

Global Data Privacy Notice for Job Candidates

Please follow this link to access the document that provides transparency around the way in which LinkedIn handles personal data of employees and job applicants: https://legal.linkedin.com/candidate-portal.

Global Data Privacy Notice for Job Candidates

Please follow this link to access the document that provides transparency around the way in which LinkedIn handles personal data of employees and job applicants: https://legal.linkedin.com/candidate-portal."
Senior Network Engineer (Maintenance),"Job description:

ST Engineering is a global technology, defence and engineering group with offices across Asia, Europe, the Middle East and the U.S., serving customers in more than 100 countries. The Group uses technology and innovation to solve real-world problems and improve lives through its diverse portfolio of businesses across the aerospace, smart city, defence and public security segments.



Cyber business area An industry leader in cybersecurity with over two decades of experience, we deliver a holistic suite of trusted cybersecurity solutions to empower cyber resilience for government and ministries, critical infrastructures, and commercial enterprises. Backed by our indigenous capabilities and deep domain expertise, we offer robust cyber-secure products and services in cryptography, cybersecurity engineering, digital authentication, SCADA protection, audit and compliance. We specialise in the design and build of security operations centres for cybersecurity professionals and provide managed security services to strengthen the cybersecurity posture of our government and enterprise customers. Committed to building up competencies of cybersecurity professionals to support the growing demand, our Cybersecurity Academy has certified and trained more than 2000 cybersecurity professionals in more than 150 organisations. We continue to innovate through our Research Lab, Strategic Technology Centre, and Engineering Centres and develop future-ready cybersecurity solutions that position us at the forefront of the dynamic digital economy.



Find out more: https://www.stengg.com/cybersecurity



Responsibilities:

Provide maintenance and support for Customers' Enterprise IT Network Services.
Hands-on experience in LAN/WAN/WLAN: Cisco/Alcatel Switches and Routers.
Experience working with any of WLC, Unified Communication (IPT & VC), Fortinet, Junipers and Checkpoints, Cisco IPS/IDS, ISE, ACS & ASA, ESA, WSA, SMA, SolarWinds, Cisco Prime Infras, Alcatel Omni-Vista, Infoblox DNS/DHCP, NTP Server, F5 LTM/GTM and A10 LTM.
Perform break-fix which include troubleshooting and problem identification for any network services.
Develop test cases and conduct proof of concept tests on new software and hardware prior to upgrade/deployment.
Able to perform as the role of Project Lead / Coordinator in project management for small to medium size projects or Service Requests.
Work closely with Project Manager / Service Delivery Manager to fulfil project deliverables and operational request.
Able to establish TAC cases with the principal vendor for complex problem until its resolved.
Able to work independently.
Able to work in 24 x 7 standby duties.


Requirements:

Diploma / Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Information Technology, Security or equivalent.
Required to have minimum 3 – 5 years of hands-on network technical support experience in SI Environment.
CCIE certification is essential.
Experience with LAN, WAN, WLAN, Data and Security networking in implementation, maintenance support and break-fix.
Fast-paced environment
Proven analytical and problem-solving abilities.
Highly self-motivated and directed, with keen attention to detail.
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.
Good communication and writing skills.
Strong customer service orientation."
Director of Finance,"What the role is
You will join AGD at the senior management level and be deployed to various agencies in the public sector to take on key roles in the provision of financial services.

You will oversee the allocation, utilisation and accounting of the agency’s voted funds across programmes and entities; translate and customise the agency’s broad budget into relevant policies and guidelines for the various entities the agency oversees. Your role is to ensure effective and efficient allocation and management of resources in way that best supports the agency’s mission and initiatives.

What you will be working on
Responsibilities
You will oversee the following:
Budgeting and Fund Management
Project and Funding Evaluation
Grant Disbursement
Financial Transformation
Operations Management
People Management and Development

What we are looking for
Requirements
Tertiary qualification in Accountancy, Business, Engineering or Information Technology; candidates with professional accountancy qualification will have an advantage
Strong finance foundation and in-depth understanding of internal controls
At least 8 years of relevant working experience with at least 5 years of supervisory experience, preferably with experience in Public Sector Finance
Willingness to be deployed to different Public Sector agencies as part of career development
Meticulous, analytical with good problem solving and project management skills
Proactive, results oriented and display strong multi-tasking skills to meet tight deadlines
Strong leadership who has the ability to foster strong relationships with stakeholders, communicate effectively and build trust in order to influence, facilitate and resolve conflicts
Strong analytical, written, communication and inter-personal skills.

About Accountant-General's Department
The Accountant-General’s Department (AGD) plays an important role in making Singapore a better place through Finance. Finance is a central function that cuts across the whole of government and it serves as an integral part of every agency’s management team in supporting decision-making and delivering value. It also plays a critical role in helping the Government achieve its fiscal and economic objectives through sound stewardship.

At AGD, we aim to be a future-ready leader in transforming Public Sector finance by putting finance at the heart of our decision-making. We do this through building a strong foundation in providing robust financial systems and processes that serve key stakeholders including our pensioners, vendors and the public sector. Our team of accounting professionals work at AGD and are deployed to the public agencies to deliver a wide range of financial and accounting-related services to the Public Service.

A career with AGD is diverse, challenging and enriching. If you are as passionate as we are in transforming the sector and breaking new ground, we welcome you to join us today!"
Executive Assistant,"Executive Assistant
We are looking for Executive Assistant to perform a variety of administrative tasks and support our company’s senior-level managers.
To be successful in this role, you should be well-organized, have great time management skills and be able to act without guidance.
Ultimately, you will contribute to the efficiency of our business by providing personalized and timely support to executive members.


Responsibilities:
As the point of contact among executives, employees, clients and other external partners (executive officers who spend much of their time focusing on business development).
Assist executive officers, who spend much of their time focusing on business development. Duties may include developing and implementing marketing strategies, interacting with customers, and planning and organizing activities and projects within the company.
Ideally the Executive Assistant is here to learn from as well as support senior executives, they may on occasion be asked their opinion on important business decisions and must be willing and ready to speak up with creative ideas.


Requirements:
Outstanding organizational and time management skills
Familiarity with office gadgets and applications
Tech Savvy
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Discretion and confidentiality"
Business Analyst,"About Us

Trip.com Group is a leading global travel service provider comprising of Trip.com, Ctrip, Skyscanner, and Qunar. Across its platforms, Trip.com Group helps travellers around the world make informed and cost-effective bookings for travel products and services, and enables partners to connect their offerings with users through the aggregation of comprehensive travel-related content and resources, and an advanced transaction platform consisting of apps, websites and 24/7 customer service centers. Founded in 1999 and listed on NASDAQ in 2003 and HKEX in 2021, Trip.com Group has become one of the best-known travel groups in the world, with the mission ""to pursue the perfect trip for a better world"".

Key Roles and Responsibilities：
* Understand fundamentals and dynamics of local travel market through aggregating data and information from both internal and external sources.
* Conduct comprehensive market, competitor and user research to identify opportunities and generate actionable insights from data-driven perspective.
* Leveraging knowledge of user demand, product supply, and the market landscape, define innovative go-to-market strategies.
* Actively think, plan, identify, build localized products and features with integrate usability studies.
* Define and monitor Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) and metrics associated with business processes to support achievement of sales objectives.
* Work closely with marketing team, product owner and business development team to assess business viability, provide in-depth market analysis, and influence global product and marketing direction.

Requirements:
* Bachelor’s degree or higher in Economics, Business Analytics, Computer Science, Statistics or related fields
* Minimum 3 years of relevant working experience
* Proficient in query languages such as SQL, and data visualization tools such as SAS, Tableau, Power BI, Python and Spark.
* Strong logical thinking capability and business sense: capable of collecting key insights and delivering key messages to related teams
* Highly dependable, self-initiated, fast learner: Capable of executing data research independently
* Online Travel Agency (OTA) or travel industry experience will be a plus

Why Trip.com Group

Trip.com Group never stops dreaming big and aiming high. By tackling challenges and pursuing excellence, you will keep growing and bettering yourselves simultaneously.

We believe in creating a safe space, where discussion is open, ideas flourish and the best solutions win. Together as a team, we offer each other respect and support.

Life is about much more than just work. Whether you want to raise a family, develop your own interests, or invest in different skills, we are here to support our team members in every aspect in and out of the workplace."
Sr. Data Engineer,"Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Job Description

We are developing and executing a shared strategic vision for Loyalty & Marketing Services platforms and products that enable Visa to be the world-leading data-driven payments company. As a Sr. Software Engineer, you will be part of world-class team of Engineers to define, drive and execute on this vision. We are looking for a self-motivated individual with software engineering skills and expertise with Java and Big Data technologies. The candidate will be extensively involved in hands-on activities including POCs, design, development, testing, and documentation. Candidate must be flexible and willing to switch tasks based on team's needs.

Primary Responsibilities Will Include

Design and develop mission-critical systems, delivering high-availability and performance
Work on development of new products and enhancements to existing systems iteratively by building quick POCs and converting ideas into real products
Work closely with architects, business, and technical stakeholders to develop high quality products and services that meet business requirements and expectations while applying the latest available tools and technology
Follow best practices for software development, and deliver high quality work on tight schedules
Identify opportunities for further enhancements and refinements to standards and processes
Mentor junior team members, develop departmental procedures and best practices standards
Help coordinate Continuous Integration activities, testing automation frameworks, and other related items in addition to contributing core product code
Present technical solutions, capabilities, considerations, and features in business terms. Effectively communicate status, issues, and risks in a precise and timely manner
Will delegate and review others engineers work on small projects

Most Important Qualities For The Candidate Are

Academics : Bachelor or Master's degree in Computer Science or related field
Leadership : Leading solutions and working with teams to achieve it.
Curiosity : A desire to seek clarity of requirements and why tasks are done a certain way
Creativity : The ability to take a list of needs and insights and come up with other innovative ideas.
Strategic focus: Skill to understand big picture and stay focused on task to achieve goals
Attention to detail: The capability to perform any research systematically and accurately
Strong work ethic: The innate drive to do work extremely well
Enthusiasm: A passion to understand people and deliver better products and services to them

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office two days a week, Tuesdays and Wednesdays with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% of the time based on business needs.

Basic Qualifications

Qualifications

3 or more years of software development experience with a Bachelor’s Degree or an Advanced Degree (e.g. Masters, MBA, JD, MD, or PhD) in a technical field such as computer science, computer engineering or related field required.

Preferred Qualifications

Java and Big Data technologies like Hive, Hadoop, and Spark
Understanding and working experience with shell scripting
Knowledge and working experience on Git/Stash, Ant, Maven, Jenkins and Jira
Experience with database technologies like DB2, Oracle, SQL Server
Knowledge of Unix/Linux
Strong foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in data structures, algorithms and software design optimized for building highly distributed and parallelized systems
Experience with Agile & DevOps methodologies
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with a strong automation mindset
Ability to handle multiple competing priorities in a fast-paced environment
Good written and verbal communication skills. Ability to effectively communicate the logic and implementation plan to team members & managers
Quick learner, self-starter, detailed and thorough

Please Note: Due to the COVID-19 pandemic and the evolving visa/travel restrictions in place, we are currently only able to extend offers to candidates with the right to work in Singapore. We are keeping the situation under close review and will adjust accordingly should the restrictive measures be lifted.

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
VIE Program_BUSINESS ANALYST (M/F)_SINGAPORE,"Job Description

Join our affiliate TotalEnergies EP Asia Pacific Pte. Ltd. in Singapore !

As a Business Analyst, Your Missions Will Be
Follow the day to day operations of TotalEnergies’ projects (production, shutdowns, others);
Provide support to Country Delegates/CEO in drafting proposal and execution of daily and weekly reports;
Propose and run studies on energy or environmental matters (context of change of market or new regulations);
Collect datas (volume/price) on LNG and Gas Asia Pacific market supplied by our LNG projects;
Monitor the activity of our Joint Venture Partners and some Competitors of interest in the region;
Prepare a comprehensive study of the elements, described above, with qualitative and financial assessments;
Provide assistance with cost analysis, price calculations, financial elements related to monthly performance committees;
Assist for internal Long-Term Plan and Budget preparation for TotalEnergies;
Assist in the preparation of reports related to the Company’s business and presentation of papers for conferences;
Support TotalEnergies EP’s business activities in Australia, Papua New guinea, Kazakhstan, Thailand, China, Brunei, Indonesia, Malaysia.
Apply #JT

Context and environment

The selected candidate will receive a VIE allowance according to the Business France rates and the affiliate will grant a rent allowance.

Please check the following website to make sure that your application complies with the criteria to carry out a VIE assignment: mon-vie-via.businessfrance.fr.

Candidate profile

Expected Qualifications

Master degree in Business & Strategy Development

Technical Skills

Economical evaluation skills

Strong interest in energy and gas industry

Computing Skills

Knowledge of Pack Office

Languages

English: C1

French: C1

Additional Information

Proposed start date: MAY 2023

Offer ID

67504BR

Metier

Strategy Economics

Region, department, area

Singapore

Employment type

VIE

Contract duration

18

Duration unit

Months

Experience Level Required

Less than 3 years

Branch

Exploration and Production

About Us / Company Profile

TotalEnergies is a broad energy company that produces and markets fuels, natural gas and electricity. Our 100,000 employees are committed to better energy that is more affordable, more reliable, cleaner and accessible to as many people as possible. Active in more than 130 countries, our ambition is to become the responsible energy major."
Sales Associate (Permanent Full-time) @ Westgate,"The primary purpose of the role of Sales Associate is to represent the PANDORA brand in a superior manner. This includes ensuring the PANDORA Way of Selling is adhered to consistently, customers are at all times on the receiving end of exceptional customer service and professionalism is to be maintained at all times within the store.

SALES
Follow the “PANDORA Way of Selling” at all times;
Ensure the store is always restocked;
Ensure all security procedures are strongly understood and followed with enormous attention to detail;
Ensure a high level of after sales service by proactively following up on sales orders, deliveries and claim handling;

CUSTOMER SERVICE
Ensure customers are acknowledged immediately when walking into the store;
Ensure a continuous level of product knowledge including target groups, the product range, customization and selling arguments;
To build relationship and actively communicate with the VIP customers of the store
To solicit feedback from customers and share this feedback with appropriate people

OPERATIONS
Ensure all directions from the Store Manager and Supervisor are adhered to;
Ensure the company history is understood and our vision, mission and values are consistently practised within the store;
Ensure all store operational procedures are strictly adhered to;
Ensure you are always proactive and that the store is always immaculately clean;
Ensure visual merchandising standards are consistent and in line with the Visual Merchandising guidelines

REQUIREMENTS:
Sales driven;
Positive, proactive and enthusiastic persona;
Professionalism and maturity demonstrated through experience and the way one holds themselves;
Outstanding interpersonal skills and strong communication skills.
Interest in a career in Retail.
Demonstrated confidence to cross sell;
Problem solving ability and conflict resolution skills demonstrated from previous experience;
Good communication skills with a pleasant personality."
Senior QA Engineer (KYC),"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

You will join a small and growing team, owning your work with being exposed to massive impact. Opportunity to stretch your QA and SRE skills developing testing strategies across UI, Backend, Security, Databases, Datasets and Software delivery

Responsibilities:

Work closely with KYC team members (developers, product manager, customer support and partners) to develop, test and deliver high quality products.
Create detailed, comprehensive and well-structured test plans and test cases.
Prevent, collect, analyze and track product defects.
Design, develop and execute automation scripts.
Hands-on manual investigation and reproduction of functional backend software issues.
Root cause analysis of existing test script failures.
Identification of current test script deficiencies and candidates for additional scripted coverage.
Investigatory testing of unreleased features including defining requirements, behavior and impact.
Documentation and design of candidate test scenarios for the above.

Requirements:

5 years+ of backend QA engineering experience, frontend and backend auto testing experience.
Full cycle testing from designing manual tests, developing scripts and execution.
Scripting ability using Java.
Experience automation testing backend services such as APIs, Databases, distributed services (non-monolithic).
Enjoys breaking things and solving problems - not just able to find out the 'what', but also the 'why'.
Fluent English and good communication skills.

Preferable Qualifications:

Ability to communicate in English, to liaise with clients across the region
Experience conducting end-to-end testing plans: self-test tooling, SIT, UAT, regression testing
Enjoys breaking things and solving problems
Find unknown unknowns before our users
Experience in data quality testing
Experience in performance testing
Experience in security testing

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
IT Infrastructure & Support Executive (Server and Network),"Exposure to wide range of technology
Concrete project timeline
About the company

Our Client is one of the most established end user within their industry. With rapid expansion plan, they are now looking for a new System Admin / IT Infrastructure Specialist APAC to join their team.


About the job

Your role involves:

Handling IT support for end users
Support Windows Servers (VMware and etc)
Administer and support Microsoft Office 365 (Microsoft Teams, Sharpoint online Exchange Online and etc)
Managing Active Directory (Print Servers, Backup and etc)
Handling networks (Routers, switches, firewall)
Providing technical support (Video Conference, Computer, printer, mobile device and etc) to users
Handling disaster recovery planning
Managing external vendors, ensuring external SLA has been met
Performing coordination and establishment of security structures and IT control that protect company's information networks
Skills and experience required
As a successful applicant, you will have at least 5 years of experience in supporting Windows Servers or or networks. Exposure to exchange / O365 is required for this role.

Whats on offer

You will get the opportunity to have exposure to latest technology.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you can reach me at https://www.linkedin.com/in/hoonteck-nologyrecruitment or 6510 3633. (EA: 94C3609/ R1219669).



Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.


Desired Skills and Experience

infrastructure, system, network"
IT Support Engineer Intern (Global Service Desk) - 2022,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below:
1. Summer Internship - 09 May 2022 to 29 July 2022 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the two above internship periods.
Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.

About our team：
We are Global Service Desk - APAC which provides corporate IT services in the region. Our team serves as the the primary IT focal point of contact (Business Partner) to corporate business users in the region which provide all end user computing related services accordingly.

Some of the services our team provides are not limited to below:
1. IT Assets, Policies and Processes
2. IT Security, End User Technology
3. KP and Service Management
4. IT Program, Service Improvement

Responsibilities:
- Support the IT team in installing, configuring and maintaining hardware, software and other systems
- Assist with troubleshooting issues and provide technical support
- Participate and contribute to different IT projects and assignments
- Act as the point of contact between end users and other cross function teams
- Maintain and update technical documentation based on latest procedures
- Ability to prioritize tasks and efficiently manage time

Qualifications

Qualifications:
- Currently pursuing Diploma/Degree/Masters in Information Technology or equivalent
- Basic knowledge of Windows / Mac OS, software installation and troubleshooting
- Basic knowledge of hardware troubleshooting and repairing
- Basic knowledge of networking
- Some Familiarity with common programming languages (java, python, C++)

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@tiktok.com."
Lead Logistics Solution Configuration Engineer (SCE),"As part of the LL Global and/or Regional product team, the Solution Configuration Engineer is responsible to:
For LL customer solutions develop and architect a detailed solution, including a Solution Configuration Document (SCD), which acts as the detailed aligned bridge between customer, the implementations & CX teams
The Solution Configuration Engineer’s detailed solution design will be implemented by the Customer, the Maersk LL CIM team and executed by the CX teams

We offer
Maersk is a global logistics industry leader, and working in the forefront with our large customer base gives a unique chance to make a significant difference on world trade & economy together with talented colleagues. We value diversity and values of our staff, and offer competitive compensation.

Key Responsibilities
As part of our Global Solutions team, you are working with and mentoring experienced colleagues to implement our solutions within customer projects, owning and managing the solution from initial design workshops until the customer signed off on the solution design
Understand and connect customers’ existing business processes, org design and technology landscape to craft the detailed Maersk solution to create measurable business value
Conduct and lead business and technical design workshops around our customers’ complex global Supply Chain processes to create highly scalable and sustainable solutions
Synthesize customer’s business requirements to create clear and comprehensive use cases, functional design requirements and technical system requirements
You are the key responsible to ensure that the customer is comfortable that the solution design addresses requirements
Defining the overall integration architecture between different customer systems and the Maersk platforms in terms of functional data flow (data choreography)
You Support Regional LL Product managers and Solution Engineers for Sales/Pre-Sales engagements for scoping and estimating solutions
You Provide Solution oversight, and be an SME
You support our implementation managers to manage scope against contract
Perform fit gap analysis between Maersk LL product functionality and the client’s requirements
Be a leader on a team of technical and business analysts and engineers, foster a productive team environment, leverage diverse views to encourage innovation, and mentor team members to ensure their success and growth
Capture and share best practice knowledge among Maersk LL community
Ensure the designed solution is translated and implemented.
Liaise with different Stakeholders in shaping the Product Roadmap
Effort analysis and estimate the implementation effort.

We are looking for
10+ years working in Supply Chain-related or SaaS-related field in increasingly responsible roles including implementing complex solutions in an enterprise customer environment as a Sr Solution Architect/ Sr Business Analyst / Sr Supply Chain consultant
Previous experience working with Procure to Pay processes, Vendor managed inventory, Transportation and logistics or related solutions
Understanding of Supply Chain Management practices and knowledge of Supply Chain strategies and industry best practices
Familiarity with SAP, Oracle and/or other ERP systems
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Bachelor’s degree in a technical or business field, Master’s degree a plus
Previous experience implementing software using a software development lifecycle (SDLC) implementation model
Excellent English communication (oral, written, presentation) and interpersonal skills.
Ability to travel up to 25%
Supply chain certification a plus"
Security Engineer,"GECO Asia is looking for an experienced and knowledgeable Security Engineer to join our team! As a Security Engineer, you will be providing services to safeguard information, infrastructures, applications, and business processes against cyber threats.

We offer superb career opportunity and compensation package. Apply now!

Job Requirements & Qualification
Must Have Skills:
AWS Security
Vulnerability Management
Governance and Risk Management
Security Operations Management
Good to have skill: Cybersecurity solution knowledge (DAM, Web Defacement, Container security

Job Roles & Responsibilities

Provide services to safeguard information, infrastructures, applications, and business processes against cyber threats.
Performance of vulnerability assessment on the project system as well as attending to security incident/alerts generated from security tools (AWS guard duty, Security Hub, AWS Config etc.)"
Educator | Full time | Marina Bay Sands,"Who We Are

Description & Requirements

lululemon is an innovative performance apparel company for yoga, running, training, and other athletic pursuits. Setting the bar in technical fabrics and functional design, we create transformational products and experiences that support people in moving, growing, connecting, and being well. We owe our success to our innovative product, emphasis on stores, commitment to our people, and the incredible connections we make in every community we're in. As a company, we focus on creating positive change to build a healthier, thriving future. In particular, that includes creating an equitable, inclusive and growth-focused environment for our people.

Job Summary

The Educator role is the foundation of our success as an organization. Educators are experts in creating world-class customer service, or guest experience, in our retail stores. They are responsible for engaging and connecting with our guests, sharing top-quality product education, and speaking authentically about our community and culture.

Core Responsibilities Of The Job

Guest (i.e., Customer) Experience
Interact with guests to ensure a great guest experience in a manner that values guests’ time.
Assess guests’ needs to provide customized, effective purchase and return solutions and support.
Provide technical product education by articulating the value and benefit of the product.
Facilitate a seamless end-to-end guest experience by conducting accurate and timely guest transactions and executing market-relevant omnichannel programs according to company standards.
Dynamically provide coverage on the floor to continuously engage with guests and attend to multiple guests or store needs.
Receive guest feedback and partner with store leadership to take appropriate action and “make it right” for guests.
Inform guests of local community programs. Plan and execute local, regional, and area driven Community projects and initiatives (e.g., local run club, international day of yoga).
Working With Others
Contribute to a respectful and inclusive team environment by welcoming and celebrating differences to ensure a supportive and engaging experience for all team members and guests.
Establish supportive and productive relationships with all team members.
Collaborate with team members to ensure optimal guest experience and support store operations.
Operations
Perform product presentation tasks (e.g., put items back in place, restock or add depleted items to the floor from inventory, destock or relocate items) according to company standards.
Use in-store technology to support store operations and provide positive guest experiences.
Perform cleaning tasks as needed throughout the shift to maintain the luxury environment of the store.
Understand and adhere to people safety policies and procedures to maintain a safe work environment.
Perform work in accordance with applicable policies, procedures, and laws or regulations.
What We Look For
Inclusion & Diversity: Creates/supports an inclusive environment that values/celebrates differences
Integrity/Honesty: Behaves in an honest, fair, and ethical manner
Guest Experience: Enjoys working and connecting with, understanding, and helping guests
Personal Responsibility: Accepts responsibility/accountability for actions; is dependable
Self-Awareness: Is aware of how words or actions may be perceived by or affect others
Collaboration and Teamwork: Works productively with others to achieve goals; seeks diverse perspectives
Enthusiasm: Is enthusiastic about one’s own work; looks for ways to make work fun and engaging
Job Requirements

Eligibility
Legally eligible to work in the jurisdiction of the store which you are assigned to.
Availability
Willing to work a flexible schedule.
Other Willingness Requirements
Willing to move through a store for most of a shift to help guests and accomplish work
Willing to work as part of a team and complete some work independently
Job Assets (i.e., nice to have; not required)
Education: High School or Secondary School diploma equivalent or above.
Applicants successful in progressing to interview will be contacted by a Manager or a member of the People & Culture team. Please note any applicant or employee who believes they need a reasonable accommodation to perform the essential duties of the job is welcome to discuss this with the Manager or People and Culture team member when arranging the interview.

Beyond The Paycheck (Benefits & Perks)

At lululemon, we care for and invest in the whole person – body, mind, spirit. Our total rewards program is designed to support you in achieving your goals and focus on the things you love. In addition to competitive base pay and a team-based bonus program, we also offer paid time off, generous employee discounts, fitness/yoga classes, parenthood top up program and personal and professional development programs.

Note: availability of these benefits and perks may be subject to your location & employment type and may have certain eligibility requirements. The Company reserves the right to alter these benefits and perks in whole or in part at any time without advance notice."
"Network Engineers - Architecture, Projects (Senior & Staff level)","Location: Singapore

We are hiring Network Engineers at Senior and Staff Level

About Kape
Since 2017, our team has developed cybersecurity solutions and apps for our customers; today we’ve grown to 6.5 million paying users and over 100 million readers worldwide. We believe in having the best products supported by top teams and developing world-class technology to deliver a superior experience to our rapidly growing audience.
To realize our vision, Kape develops, acquires, and distributes various leading digital security software products such as ExpressVPN, CyberGhost, Private Internet Access, and Intego, with close to 1,000 team members globally.

We’re a rapidly-expanding engineering organization actively designing and building a modernized approach to handling and optimizing our global network traffic and infrastructure. Our work will directly impact and influence the wider organization’s ability to deliver key features and provide industry-leading VPN performance, while also enabling and participating in exciting new capabilities to be developed in the future.

This role will play a major role in the architecting and implementation of our new transit network and infrastructure, while also working alongside extremely talented software engineering teams. You will have the opportunity to apply your experience and expertise, and be a critical influencer in the decision making processes.

What you’ll be doing
Designing and architecting a modern globally-distributed network infrastructure as the Subject Matter Expert to meet the needs of the business and its customers.
Designing and creating an observability methodology for the new globally-distributed network infrastructure.
Collaborating with Product Managers and Technical Owners, as well as business functions to continuously refine scope and deliverables related to ongoing initiatives.
Working with 3rd Party Providers on describing requirements, challenging their technical acumen, and performing due diligence on their offerings to ensure it meets our needs.
Working with other teams to understand their objectives, requirements, and challenges, which will be used to influence the approach and design of our solutions.
Modeling, implementing, and proving the proposed designs to ensure feasibility, alignment to objectives, and meeting expected outcomes.
Researching and defining performance indicators best positioned to provide the visibility required to measure current performance, key improvements, cost association, and alignment with industry-standards.
Articulating and documenting detailed information about plans, designs of network topologies, operational requirements, processes and other necessary data used to provide visibility and understanding within the business.
Enable operations teams to get onboarded and actively support associated projects through knowledge sharing and technical sessions.

Your success will be evaluated by:
Satisfaction of internal customers
Enabling of new VPN/privacy features and capabilities to be developed
Ease of operating and maintaining the infrastructure
Cost and energy efficiency of the infrastructure
Quality and detail of process and documentation
Meeting objectives around measurable performance gains for defined network-based indicators such as latency and packet loss over various distances
Quality of outcomes provided from partners and providers

3 best things about this role
Design and build the next generation network for the #1 VPN.
Greenfield project from POC to MVP to Go-Live.
Work in a highly visible and skilled Team.

What you'll need to succeed
Expert in-depth experience with TCP/IP (v4 and v6), BGP and MPLS technologies
Experience supporting large-scale peering/transit networks, with a sound knowledge of complex traffic engineering and Internet routing policies
Extensive experience with and deep understanding of at least one of the major network hardware platforms, such as Cisco, Juniper, Alcatel, Nokia and other mainstream vendors
Experience with designing and implementing colocation models for network and server stacks
Experience with and understanding of network design, architecture, and implementation to meet defined requirements
Strong ability to define and understand quality performance metrics for network infrastructure and traffic
Proficiency in Linux or Unix-based systems
Knowledge of tunneling technologies (i.e. IPSec, OpenVPN, GRE)

Nice skills to have, but not required
Experience with designing or architecting very large networks, high availability, or global backbones is a major plus
Previous industry experience at similar environments such as ISPs, IXPs, DCs, major IP carrier networks
Experience with or working knowledge of SDN / SD-WAN is a plus
Knowledge of modern observability stacks like Prometheus/Grafana
Strong automation/scripting skills in Python, Go, or others
Good understanding of best security practices:
Threat modeling
Network-based attack vectors (i.e. DDoS)
Experience using agile software development practices

Hiring process
It’s important that candidates have a clear understanding of the process and what we’re looking for. Learn more about the hiring process by visiting our careers page.
https://www.expressvpn.com/jobs/hiring-process
https://www.expressvpn.com/jobs

Employee Benefits
Health and happiness go hand in hand, and we make every effort to support our team members in all facets of their lives—both inside and outside the office. Learn more about our benefits.
https://www.expressvpn.com/jobs#benefits

About ExpressVPN
ExpressVPN is one of the world’s leading providers of online privacy and security services for consumers. Started in 2009, we’ve grown to have millions of active paying customers, a team of more than 700 people worldwide, and a brand recognized by hundreds of millions of people in 18 languages and more than a hundred countries. We see huge growth in our industry, and are gaining market share through strong execution. In September 2021, ExpressVPN joined the Kape Technologies family of leading privacy and security brands.

Before you apply
At the moment, we do not sponsor visas in the UK and the EU. For Hong Kong, we require at least two years of working experience and a university degree in a related field. For Singapore, visa sponsorship depends on the role and seniority—your recruiter will be able to share more information.
Please upload your resume as a PDF, and do not include any salary or compensation information in it.

ExpressVPN, a Kape Technologies company, is an equal opportunity employer. We promote equal recruitment and employment opportunities, and do not discriminate based on gender identity and/or expression, age, race, color, disability, culture, religion or belief, family and/or marital status, sexual orientation, or other characteristics protected by applicable law. We celebrate a diverse and inclusive work environment in which applicants and employees are treated with respect and dignity, and excel based on personal merit, qualifications, experience, and performance."
"Case Management Executive, Prestige Client Office","The Job
Responsible for case management (pre- and post-sale)
Pre-sales: Liaise with the sales reps, Business Development Managers, New Business, Underwriting and Compliance teams to assist with understanding and gathering of required financial and medical documents, underwriting requirements and other necessary documents for both prelim and formal submissions
Post-sales: Liaise with back-end office on inforce requests, including policy changes, illustrations, claims and transactions
Facilitate Premium Financing for plans sold through agency distribution channel
To track and maintain agreed upon inforce rates and turnaround time
Preparation of regular reports on submissions from various distribution channels
Participate in processes review with internal department and find resolutions to improve the current processes
Provide training to sales representatives
Any other tasks and duties assigned
Take accountability in considering business and regulatory compliance risks and take appropriate steps to mitigate the risks
Maintain awareness of industry trends on regulatory compliance, emerging threats and technologies in order to understand the risk and better safeguard the company
Highlight any potential concerns /risks and proactively share best risk management practices
Our Requirements
Diploma or Degree holder
Middle Office or High Net Worth operations experience is preferred
Proficient in computer software like Microsoft Excel
Self-motivated, committed and possess initiative & drive in the job
Meticulous and able to work independently
Strong team player with good interpersonal skills
Ability to work with multiple channels
High level of integrity, take accountability of work and good attitude over teamwork
Take initiative to improve current state of things and adaptable to embrace new changes
About Great Eastern

Established in 1908, Great Eastern places customers at the heart of everything we do. Our legacy extends beyond our products and services to our culture, which is defined by our core values and how we work. As champions of Integrity, Initiative and Involvement, our core values act as a compass, guiding and inspiring us to embrace the behaviours associated with each value, upholding our promise to our customers - to continue doing our best for them in a sustainable manner.

We work collaboratively with our stakeholders to look for candidates who exhibit or have the potential to embrace our core values and associated behaviours, as these are the key traits that we expect from our employees as they develop their careers with us.

We embrace inclusivity, giving all employees an equal opportunity to shine and play their role in exploring possibilities to deliver innovative insurance solutions.

Since 2018, Great Eastern has been a signatory to the United Nations (UN) Principles of Sustainable Insurance. Our sustainability approach around environmental, social, and governance (ESG) considerations play a key role in every business decision we make. We are committed to being a sustainability-driven company to achieve a low-carbon economy by managing the environmental footprint of our operations and incorporating ESG considerations in our investment portfolios; improving people’s lives by actively helping customers live healthier, better and longer; and drive responsible business practices through material ESG risk management.

To all recruitment agencies: Great Eastern does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our email or our employees. We will not be responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
Platform Architect,"Want to be a part of our team?

Provides technical expertise through sales presentations, product demonstrations, installation and maintenance of company products. Assists the sales staff in assessing potential application of company products to meet customer needs and preparing detailed product specifications for the development and implementation of customer applications/solutions. May build a mini-application based on customer requirements to demonstrate feasibility of the application, often requiring rapid prototyping and/or product demo for client. May provide software development and consultation to prospective users and/or product capability assessment and validation. Ensures that the product application/solution is functioning according to specifications. May provide follow-up support to company sales staff and customer personnel by disseminating technical information on specific applications.

Working at NTT

The Platform Architect is responsible for the creation of a platform and the corresponding business changes needed to help the platform become sustainable by the client. Acts as a trusted partner to our clients, driving organizational success while helping clients solve difficult technology and specifically platform related problems.

Key role and responsibilities:
Technical design and design integration and automation of Platforms elements in the solution, manage vendors, and support the transition to service delivery by providing technical architecture of applications and infrastructure (e.g., workload, network).
Drive solution technical design aligned with our platform capabilities.
Overall responsibility for mapping client systems, applications, connectivity, platform (API, data, process) integration across all solution areas and the approach to transition/transformation project data (consulting into management platforms).
Technical portfolio subject matter expert for applications and technical applications and infrastructure architecture, DevOps, platform integration, and platform reference architecture.
Responsible for technical design roadmap, client technical tooling, and providing input to the service and solution design to ensure such requirements are met.
Contribute to the knowledge base of NTT’s development and services by sharing best practices with internal platform teams and client engagements.
Create client experience layer platform design (portals, business mapping, integration, reporting, and automation).
Comprehend, capture and articulate the client's technical architectures, use cases and outcomes.
Design solutions that adhere to functional and non-functional requirements (including usability, reliability, performance, supportability, and security).
Promote and evangelize the business benefits of our platform to the client, partner and NTT stakeholders.
Act as the bridge platform integration gap between the client and NTT Service and Technical Architects (GTM, Dev, Delivery practices), whilst managing multiple technology stakeholder interests.
Translate client requirements and logical and / or conceptual designs into physical designs within the specifications and boundaries of an IT architecture.
Promote and maintain an environment of continual improvement within a development and delivery team.
Lead the structured analysis and diagnosis of complex issues (performance, code, system defects, networking/hardware etc.).

Knowledge, Skills And Attributes
Strong understanding of technical applications, infrastructure, integration architectures, cloud architectures, data and security integration practices, and devops
Understand technical architectures, Service Platform, cloud architectures, integration practices, and devops (e.g., applications, data center, cloud, network, collaboration)
Ability to lead technical design workshops with the client and NTT stakeholders
Ability to design, manage and close a technical proof of concept on a vendor product
Working knowledge as architect in technical architectures, Service Platform, cloud architectures, integration practices, and devops (e.g., applications, data center, cloud, network, collaboration)
Understanding of project management processes and methodologies

Academic qualifications and certifications:
Relevant qualification (Technical or Business)
Certification and working knowledge of Cloud Architect Azure, AWS, CGP
Certification and working knowledge in Microservices (Principle, Patterns both greenfield & brownfield), Service Oriented Architecture (SOA), Enterprise Access Integration (EAI) and Integration Patterns
Certification and working knowledge with Cloud, Data Center, Applications platform integrations, RESTful APIs, including JSON, XML and SOAP protocols
Certification and working knowledge with Software Development Lifecycle and tools, SAFe/Scrum/Agile methodology

Experience required:
Proven track record in the area of business analysis and platform architecture
Demonstrated experience with Service/Application/Infrastructure and Cloud Architectures, Microservice (Principle, Patterns both greenfield & brownfield), Service Oriented Architecture (SOA), Enterprise Access Integration (EAI) and Integration Patterns
Demonstrated experience with Cloud, Data Center, Applications platform integrations, RESTful APIs, including JSON, XML and SOAP protocols
Demonstrated experience with Software Development Lifecycle and tools, SAFe/Scrum/Agile methodology
Expertise and good knowledge on platform design best practice, including operation of platform
A background as a system administrator or developer would be advantageous
Good experience in and with all operational aspects of a Services business, preferably with a Systems Integrator
Understand of project management principles / 1-3 years’ experience working as part of a project team
Experience in the process of developing and implementing new services and systems

What will make you a good fit for the role?"
"Jumpstart - Application Marketing, Sensor System and IoT (SSI)","Sensor System and IoT (SSI) is at the heart of human-to-machine and machine-to-machine interaction. Our products work on bringing “human” senses to IoT devices so that they can react to their surroundings – through pressure and radar sensors, imagers, and microphones. These top-of-the-line products stand out from the rest. The microphones, for example, are equipped with cooler, smaller, and lighter audio amplifiers that enable customers to create better-sounding systems and deliver exceptional audio performance with HMI-enabled speakers and other audio products.

In your new role you will:

Analyse Market trends for Focus Applications such as IoT, Mobile device and Wireless Infrastructure.
Understand the usage of Sensors and RF communication products in Focus Applications.
Build a positive working relationship with internal regional teams, to support their product requirements and opportunities.
Reporting and tracking both direct and distribution customer engagement activities.

You are best equipped for this task if you have:

Bachelor's degree in Electrical/Electronic Engineering, and knowledge in Marketing will be preferred. Fresh graduates are welcome to apply.
Good communication and presentation skills.
Able to interact with cross-regional team members, in Asean, India, Korea Proficient in PowerPoint and Excel.
This is a 24-month contract with job rotation exposure.

Part of your life. Part of tomorrow.


Infineon is a world leader in semiconductor solutions that make life easier, safer, and greener. Our solutions for efficient energy management, smart mobility, and secure, seamless communications link the real and the digital world.

In accordance with the requirements set by the Singaporean Government, Infineon Technologies Asia Pacific Pte Ltd (“Infineon”) can only allow individuals who are (a) fully vaccinated, (b) certified to be medically ineligible for a vaccine or (c) have recovered from COVID-19 within a prescribed period, onto company premises. Therefore, Infineon requires all new employees, as well as contractors and business partners, to be fully vaccinated against COVID-19. “Fully vaccinated” means individuals have completed the full regime of an approved COVID-19 Vaccine as listed under the World Health Organization (WHO) Emergency Use Listing (EUL) including the respective post-vaccination period to ensure the vaccine has become full effective. Anyone who is unable to be vaccinated due to an approved and/or recognised exemption condition may apply for special consideration."
"Software Engineer (Graph Neural Network System), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.

The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.

Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!


Responsibilities
- Participate in the design and development of our self-developed distributed Graph Neural Network (GNN) training/inference systems over a large-scale graph dataset;
- Serving and applying Graph Embedding/GNN into real-world application scenarios, including but not limited to risk control, etc.

Qualifications

- Familiar with C++, Python development in Linux environment, familiar with multi-threading, network programming, cloud native K8S and other technologies;
- Familiar with Tensorflow, Pytorch, Ray framework;
- Possess good communication skills and ability to work well in a team.

Preferred Qualifications
- Familiar with existing industry open source GE/GNN systems (e.g., DGL, PYG, Euler, GraphLearn, BigGraph, etc)."
2023 Work Study Program - Technology (Singapore),"Our Global Technology Infrastructure group is a team of innovators who love technology as much as you do. Together, you'll use a disciplined, innovative and a business focused approach to develop a wide variety of high-quality products and solutions. You'll work in a stable, resilient and secure operating environment where you-and the products you deliver-will thrive.

Launch your career in Technology Operations and put your creative problem solving into action, delivering solutions that shape the future of global business. You'll work directly with clients to Build strong customer relationships and problem-solve technical issues to make businesses more productive. Alongside a motivated team of fellow analysts, supervisors and stakeholders, you'll develop innovative solutions to troubleshoot and resolve issues while accurately diagnosing problems and providing effective user support. Finally, your strong technology background will ensure that the security and standards of our commitment to excellence are met. And because professional development is a key component of our culture, you'll receive coaching, mentoring - and a host of other development opportunities - alongside your invaluable on-the-job experience.

What You Can Expect

As an integral part of a team, you are expected to make a personal impact right from the start of the program.

The program is designed to provide a realistic career experience working in the financial services and gain real work experience as part of our innovative and exciting teams across our lines of businesses. Learning & development opportunities will also be provided throughout the program duration as well as senior management networking opportunities.

As a Data Center Operations Engineer, your mission is to support the day-to-day technology operations of JPMorgan Chase mission critical data centers. The purpose of this role is to maintain operational stability and handle customer requests while working on shifts to support the 24x7 operation. You will be responsible for installing and configuring enterprise class technology hardware, troubleshooting hardware and network issues, maintain change control process in the data center, and support 3rd party vendor activities. You will be working with team members on a rotating shift providing coverage during daytime, overnight, weekend and holiday hours.

Key Qualifications

Desire to develop a working knowledge of change management, corporate IT audit processes, IT risk management, technical problem resolution, operations systems and data sources knowledge
Foundational knowledge of operating systems, Microsoft Office products, and network concepts
Understanding of information technology concepts in a working or academic environment and physical IT infrastructure
Strong attention to detail
Strong communication and interpersonal skills
Comfortable working in teams to deliver results
Highly motivated with a 'can-do' attitude
Ability to multi-task and work in a fast-paced environment

Application Deadline : 31 st December 2023 (2359 SGT)

What Next?

Join our world-class team by submitting your application through the careers website at jpmorgan.com/careers.

Complete the online application form, attach your resume and cover letter.

Once you submit your application, you will not be able to make changes to your application information.

We encourage early applications as screening will be conducted on a rolling basis. For enquiries, please email us at jpmorgan_asia_recruiting@jpmorgan.com .

Reasonable Adjustments

J.P. Morgan is an inclusive employer of choice. If you require any adjustments to enable you to perform the essential functions of your job, please do not hesitate to contact your recruiter.

If you would prefer to discuss this confidentially, please contact your respective recruiter.

©2021 JPMorgan Chase & Co. All rights reserved. JPMorgan Chase is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer Disability/Veteran.

This role is intended to be for an initial term of approximately 36 months only, however, subject to business needs, the contract may be extended or converted to permanent employment.

JPMorgan Chase & Co., one of the oldest financial institutions, offers innovative financial solutions to millions of consumers, small businesses and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under the J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Our history spans over 200 years and today we are a leader in investment banking, consumer and small business banking, commercial banking, financial transaction processing and asset management.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Application Consultant-DevOps,"612283BR

Introduction

As an Application Developer, you will lead IBM into the future by translating system requirements into the design and development of customized systems in an agile environment. The success of IBM is in your hands as you transform vital business needs into code and drive innovation. Your work will power IBM and its clients globally, collaborating and integrating code into enterprise systems. You will have access to the latest education, tools and technology, and a limitless career path with the world’s technology leader. Come to IBM and make a global impact!

Your Role and Responsibilities

Work along with the Project teams to onboard Projects onto the DevSecOps platform.
Guiding the continuous integration, continuous deployment, continuous testing & continuous monitoring
Work closely with the development team and operation team to ensure project delivery and maintain compliance standards
Setup, deploy and maintain scalable, high availability systems
Perform and automate provisioning and security hardening of systems
Setup and maintain CI/CD, automated testing, development and delivery environments
Writing scripts/programs for service monitoring and health check of systems
Day-to-day monitoring, backup, deployment and maintenance of systems

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

Experience with cloud orchestration, configuration management and auto-scaling techniques
Good understanding of network protocols
Good knowledge of cloud storage technologies (preferably AWS)
Experience with IAC tools such as Ansible/Terraform
Experience with load balancing setup for TCP/IP, HTTP(s), DNS, routings.
Knowledge of IT security standards, for instance from CIS or IM8.
Experience on building and developing CI/CD pipeline and workflow (Gitlab CI/CD preferred)
Good hands-on experience on using AWS Cloud
Overall knowledge on one or more of the following programming language (Java, Spring Boot, Node JS, Angular JS, React Native)
Knowledge on continuous integration, test automation, version control, and software configuration management.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

Diploma/Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Communications Engineering or equivalent
Minimum 3 years in software development industry or server infrastructure setup
At least 1-year experience working closely with infrastructure. Experience in Linux, Windows, network troubleshooting is a plus,
Good hands-on experience on using AWS Cloud
Experience with IAC & config management tools (Terraform, Ansible, Puppet, Chef etc.).
Good understanding of hardware infrastructure systems (network switches, firewalls, routers etc.) and Linux operating system.
Good understanding of DevOps principles and practices. Knowledge in DAST/SAST tools will be an added advantage.
Experience in working in an Agile environment. Knowledge in continuous integration, test automation, version control, and software configuration management
Excellent communication skills and self-motivated.

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Sales Associate,"Job Description

1 company – that is the journey Novartis is on in its quest to extend and improve people’s lives through reimagining medicine.

Bringing life-changing medicines to millions of people, Novartis sits at the intersection of cutting-edge medical science and innovative digital technology. As a global company, the resources and opportunities for growth and development are plentiful including global and local cross functional careers, a diverse learning suite of thousands of programs & an in-house marketplace for rotations & project work. With a strong medicines pipeline our current transformation will not just deliver growth for our business but continue to allow us to bring innovative medicines to patients quickly.

Be part of the leading Ophthalmology team and leverages on all available data sources to deliver high quality customer interactions as well as maximize patient outcomes.

Your Responsibilities:

Your responsibilities include, but not limited to:
Promotes Novartis portfolio and services by providing the latest, relevant and authorized data, key messages and disease information to the right customer at the right time, to support HCP decision making and optimize patient outcomes in an ethical way.
Leverages all available data sources to create, dynamically prioritize and adapt relevant territory and customer engagement plans.
Maintains a deep and current knowledge of industry, TA, competitor and buyer dynamics and focuses effort on priority customer opportunities.
Leverages advanced customer engagement skills to deliver high quality customer interactions and maximizing customer experience for the benefit of patients. Behave ethically, comply with regulatory requirements and adhere to Novartis values and behaviors.
Reporting of technical complaints / adverse events / special case scenarios related to Novartis products within 24 hours of receipt
Distribution of marketing samples (where applicable)


Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion:

Novartis is committed to building an outstanding, inclusive work environment and diverse team’s representative of the patients and communities we serve.

Minimum Requirements

What you’ll bring to the role:
Degree in any Science related discipline.
Minimum 2-3 years of sales experience in the pharmaceutical industry (hospital/ specialist experience) is preferred.
Open to candidates with no pharmaceutical sales experience.
Knowledge in pharmaceutical landscape and healthcare reimbursement is valuable.
Able to understand changing dynamics of Pharmaceutical industry


#transformingforgrowth

Why Novartis?

766 million lives were touched by Novartis medicines in 2021, and while we’re proud of this, we know there is so much more we could do to help improve and extend people’s lives.

We believe new insights, perspectives and ground-breaking solutions can be found at the intersection of medical science and digital innovation. That a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment inspires new ways of working.

We believe our potential can thrive and grow in an unbossed culture underpinned by integrity, curiosity and flexibility. And we can reinvent what's possible, when we collaborate with courage to aggressively and ambitiously tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges. Because the greatest risk in life, is the risk of never trying!

Imagine what you could do here at Novartis!

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

Join our Novartis Network: If this role is not suitable to your experience or career goals but you wish to stay connected to learn more about Novartis and our career opportunities, join the Novartis Network here: https://talentnetwork.novartis.com/network

Division

PHARMA

Business Unit

AMAC

Country

Singapore

Work Location

Singapore

Company/Legal Entity

NOV SINGAPORE

Functional Area

Sales

Job Type

Full Time

Employment Type

Regular

Shift Work

No

Early Talent

Yes"
"Executive, Ops Procurement Aerospace","Job description:

Job Description:

Purchase of Aircraft material for Aircraft MRO activities
Source for contractors/ vendors, analyse quotes, negotiate prices and generate purchase orders
Manage suppliers for on-time delivery and quality products
Evaluate supplier performance, competitiveness and quality standard
Work with internal departments to review material requirements and delivery lead time to meet the requirements of end users
Liaise with freight forwarders, vendors and warehouse personnel on delivery and receipt of items
Resolution of invoice discrepancies with Finance, Vendor and Warehouse personnel
Academic Qualification Required

Diploma in Supply Chain/ Logistics Management or equivalent preferably.
Fresh Degree or Diploma with the right learning attitude and positive minder are welcome to apply.
Knowledge / Skills / Competencies Required (If applicable)

Knowledge in SAP will be advantageous
Preferably with prior purchasing experience in an aerospace environment
Technical experience in an aerospace environment will be advantageous
Time management and organisation skill is important
Logistics/Supply Chain experience will be beneficial
People Skills

Able to converse reasonably well due to requirement to liaise with various parties.



Working location : 540 Airport Road 539938"
Technician,"ENABLE your future through light.

Excelitas is a global technology leader with more than 7,500 employees, focused on delivering market-driven solutions to fulfill the illumination, optical, detection and imaging needs of OEMs and end-users across the biomedical, semiconductor, industrial, consumer products, scientific, security, defense and aerospace sectors.

ENGAGE with us today and make your contribution to the future! Join the team that leading technology companies turn to for cutting-edge photonic innovation. At Excelitas Technologies you are how we EXCEL.

Main Responsibilities
To record daily output data and submit to leader;
To set up and operate machine according to the process requirement;
Producing good quality output as per requirement;
Troubleshoot any technical issue pertaining to production;
To report any scrap or technical issue to leader faced during processing;
To ensure respective in charge machine are fully utilized;
Work as a team with process engineer on product evaluation and other related technical issue.
Requirements
Secondary education;
Minimum 2 years of relevant experience in a manufacturing environment and able to perform simple machine setup;
Able to understand and communicate in English;
Able to work independently as well as a team player;
Able to carry heavy items (segments or tooling);
Willing to perform rotating shifts.
Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer

Minorities/Females/Disability/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation

Excelitas is seeking leaders and innovators to join our global team! Visit: www.excelitas.com/join-our-team

Requirements

To set up & operate machine according to the process requirement.
Company Compliance
Cybersecurity Compliance
ITAR Compliance
Privacy Policy
Regional Legislative Compliance
Site Terms & Conditions"
Big Data Engineer - Recommendation Architecture,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

About The Team

Our Recommendation Architecture Team is responsible for building up and optimizing the architecture for our recommendation system to provide the most stable and best experience for our TikTok users.

The team is responsible for system stability and high availability, online services and offline data flow performance optimization, solving system bottlenecks, reducing cost overhead, building data and service mid-platform, realizing flexible and scalable high-performance storage and computing systems.

Responsibilities - What You'll Do

Design and implement a reasonable offline data architecture for large-scale recommendation systems
Design and implement flexible, scalable, stable and high-performance storage and computing systems
Trouble-shooting of the production system, design and implement the necessary mechanisms and tools to ensure the stability of the overall operation of the production system
Build industry-leading distributed systems such as storage and computing to provide reliable infrastructure for massive data and large-scale business systems

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree or above in computer science, software engineering, or a related field
Familiar with many open source frameworks in the field of big data, e.g.Hadoop, Hive,Flink, FlinkSQL,Spark, Kafka, HBase, Redis, RocksDB, ElasticSearch etc.
Familiar with Java, C ++ and other programming languages
Strong coding and trouble shooting ability
Willing to challenge questions that have no obvious answers, and have a strong enthusiasm for learning new technologies
Experience of Peta Byte level data processing is a plus
At least 3 years of relevant experience

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace.

At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Accounts Executive,"An established corporate accounting firm in Singapore is currently hiring for an Accounts Executive to be part of their growing team. With businesses focusing in the areas of investment, retail, trading and technology, they are one of the leading firms in the industry and is still expanding. This position reports to the Senior Accountant.

About the Role:
In this role, you will be managing a portfolio of clients which comprise SMEs & MNCs. You would also be reviewing full sets of monthly/yearly bookkeeping quarterly GST returns as well as payment schedules, cheque, and bank data for cash disbursement.

Job Descriptions:
Review annual reports according to Singapore Financial Reporting Standard
Prepare and review annual reports and consolidation packages.
Review individual income tax, corporate income tax and withholding tax
Prepare/review other accounting admin related duties, including monthly payroll, CPF submission, IR8A and etc
Responsible for Corporate Tax, Individual Income Tax, GST and Withholding Tax advisory matters
Review XBRL financial statements
Job Requirements:
Possess 2 years of accounting experience with basic knowledge of full set of accounting
Experience with MYOB software would be an added advantage
Attention to details and ability to work in multi-cultural environment
Ability to work under pressure with flexibility to adapt to changes quickly

This organization has clients across various industries. The company offers a dynamic working environment where their focus is on employee welfare and people development.

If you are keen to further grow your career and is seeking for an exciting role, click “Apply Now”.

Please note that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Morgan McKinley Pte Ltd
EA Licence No: 11C5502
EAP Registration No: R1109889
EAP Name: Tan Soon Hock"
"Technical Officer/Senior Technical Officer, School of Science & Technology","Singapore University of Social Sciences is one of Singapore's six autonomous universities and its mission is to provide lifelong education that equips learners to serve society. Home to more than 15,000 students, SUSS provides an applied education that targets both fresh school leavers and adult learners, with a focus on the social sciences. It adopts a flexible and practice-focused learning approach and offers more than 70 degree programmes in various disciplines.

The SUSS School of Science and Technology (SST) overseas programmes from Computing and Electronics to Built Environment and Human Factors. We are looking for individuals who are able to support the the school's lab based programmes.

About Role

The Lab Support Officer reports directly to the school manager(s). The position manages, supports, and maintains the laboratories within the university which are mainly used by students for class sessions, experiments, and exams/tests as part of the students’ learning. The maintenance includes the computers, software, and applications that are installed on PCs that are used for lab sessions/classes/exams/training.

The Lab Support Officer is also responsible for providing reliable IT support solutions and services to the school's lab-based programmes in the university to ensure a positive learning experience.

Responsibilities include but not limited to the following:
Support students’ capstone projects, in particular AR/VR projects
Providing user and maintenance support which includes investigating, troubleshooting, and resolving errors for AR/VR systems
Setup and maintain VR labs
Configure and maintain VR lab hardware and software for use in academic programmes and applied research
Must be able to do basic AR/VR programming and must be willing to learn how to code.
Provide technical support on implemented systems/platforms

Job Requirements
Degree/Diploma in Computing/Immersive Media/Digital Media or related disciplines
Hands-on experience with 3D modelling and basic AR/VR content development. Familiar with Unity3D, Android Studio etc.
Have a firm grasp of programming languages such as C#, C/C++ and Python
Familiarity with Google Cardboard, HTC Vive, Vive Pro, Oculus Rift or Microsoft HoloLens hardware and software
Possess relevant certifications (or equivalent training/experience) preferred
Able to take challenges, work independently or as a team, and be self-driven to learn new technologies
Resourceful team player and possess good communications and interpersonal skills
Experience with cloud technologies/platform such as AWS, Azure is an added advantage
Experience in scripting and using automation tools is an added advantage
Shift work is required and shift allowance is provided"
"Business Development Engineer, Service","Date Posted:

2022-11-01-07:00

Country:

Singapore

Location:

8 Kallang Avenue #07-01/09 Aperia Tower 1, Singapore

Part of Otis Sigma 9G Service function, Business Development Lead, Service Engineers are tasked with new maintenance agreements with our strong customer base through effective sales and account management initiatives.

Key accountabilities:

Formulate and develop sales and product strategies, promotion and action plan to grow service business.
Understand service contracts in broad terms; possess, or be able to learn, broad product knowledge of all elevator/escalator lines;
Make effective sales presentations through a differentiated approach; Understand the customer and market conditions and present a positioned offer that meets those needs;
Qualifying leads through digital campaigns or other marketing initiatives.
Participate in tender/quotation preparation, submission and follow-up until project is secured or lost.
Market and industry data analysis and reporting.
Preparation of annual business plan.
Responsible for order values, market share improvement, booked margin and down payment collection for cash flow.

To succeed in this role, you should possess -

A degree in Mechanical Engineering.
Strong interest in technical sales with experience/an understanding of the elevators or construction related business.

Otis is An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status, age or any other federally protected class. To request an accommodation in completing an employment application due to a special need or a disability, please contact us at careers@otis.com.

Privacy Policy and Terms:

Click on this link to read the Policy and Terms"
Data Engineer,"Position Overview

The position will be the Lead BI Support for EDS/ODS data warehouse, he will be the primary datamart support for all issues related to OBIEE like PASS, TTSH HI, CDR, NHGP and others.

This person will also support NHG Analytics program and other future project that will entail usage of OBIEE/OAS

Role & Responsibilities

Work with stakeholders to understand needs for data structure, availability, scalability and accessibility
Support translation of data business needs into technical system requirements
Identify opportunities for improvements and optimisation
Translate concepts into user flows, wireframes, mockups and prototypes that lead to intuitive user experiences.
Design and deliver wireframes, user stories, user journeys, and mockups optimized for a wide range of devices and interfaces.
Develop tools to improve data flows between internal/external systems and the data lake/warehouse
Build robust and reproducible data ingest pipelines to collect, clean, harmonise, merge and consolidate data sources
Design and build API gateways to expose data to systems via secure means
Integrate and collate data sources with data systems, with compliance to data security and organisational governance standards
Implement critical data infrastructure on cloud including AWS EC2, S3, EMR, Redshift, Workspaces
Contribute to defining data retention policies

Requirements

Minimum 5 years of experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems; preferably experience with any of the BI Applications (OBIEE, Tableau, Power BI and others)
A thorough understanding of data warehouse principles and design guidelines is also expected with past implementation of a data warehouse of data mart application
Experience in OBIEE Admin and other publishing tools
Strong SQL skills using Oracle and/or SQL Server databases
Ability to diagnose and troubleshoot problems with reports and ETL processes
Experience in all phases of the BI project lifecycle
Strong analytical skills and ability to work independently
Experience in healthcare industry is an added advantage
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or equivalent

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Senior Java Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Responsible for the development of independent modules and the interface development of the system;
Able to design and give new solutions for the upcoming changes to the existing as well as new assets/applications within the Services division
Responsible for front & back end development
Perform quality Unit, Integration tests (Test & Business Driven Development is preferred)
Assist test team in performance & endurance testing. Write technical specifications
Propose technical solutions and improvements proactively, based on pros and cons after analysis of the various options
Prepare technical deliveries and support implementation by integration teams following the processes and tools of the company
Contribute to key and strategic projects
Perform quality reporting and controls in line with Company standards & security
Responsible for coding, unit testing, releasing, troubleshooting and communication with the internal teams to allow the system works smoothly
Keep up with modern technology, applying the best technologies to the application
Identifying and analyzing user requirements
Requirements
Full-time bachelor degree or above, major in computer software or related
At least 5 years of development experience
Skilled in JAVA virtual machine tuning, familiar with JAVA virtual machine memory management principles
Grasp the current mainstream Java framework (Spring, Spring MVC, a Spring cloud, dubbo, zookeeper, Mybatis, Struts, Hibernate, etc.) the basic principle of
Familiar with database systems such as Oracle, MySQL, Sybase and DB2, and have some experience in SQL optimization;
Proficient in using Tomcat, WebLogic and other Web application servers, and familiar with server configuration principle; Familiar with management and operation of an operating system (Linux)
Skilled in the application of HTML, CSS, jQuery, Bootstrap and other web development technologies; familiar with JSON, XML and other data protocols; familiar with related caching technologies such as Redis and Memcache
Experience in Internet finance is preferred

Desired Skills and Experience
MVC, Oracle, XML, Struts, HTML, Unit Testing, Application Servers, MySQL, Tuning, Tomcat, SQL, Java, Web Development, Linux, jQuery, Hibernate"
Software Engineer (Kubernetes Edge Platform) - Infrastructure Engineering,"Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

To support the content platform, ByteDance's infrastructure team is seeking experienced software engineers to build globally distributed edge platform for provisioning and deploying edge services. Our team operates a large network of POPs around the world that we use to accelerate site traffic and cache CDN content, on top of which we build the edge platform (PaaS) to allow edge services to be easily deployed around the world close to end users. We use Kubernetes to orchestrate various services with automatic deployment and scaling in order to maximize efficiency in daily management and operations. In addition, our team builds global and local load balancers, acceleration proxies, RPC frameworks, content delivery networks, and the automation machinery to operate an internet scale edge network and handle all of ByteDance's DNS and HTTP traffics.

Responsibilities

Build Kubernetes-based edge platform (PaaS) with cutting-edge Cloud Native Computing Foundation (CNCF) technologies.
Design pipelines and develop microservices for platform monitoring, alerting, logging, CI/CD, etc.
Improve Kubernetes system efficiency in networking, storage, scheduling domains.
Collaborate with open-source communities to advance edge computing technology.

Qualifications

Master’s degree (or Bachelor's degree with 3+ years of experience) in Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science or related major
Solid understanding in Kubernetes and Docker technology: production experience of creating and administrating Kubernetes based systems.
Experience with microservices, API design (REST and gRPC), and cloud-native application development.
3+ years experience with one or more programming languages including Go, Python, JavaScript, and C++.
3+ years experience working on Unix/Linux based platforms.

Preferred Qualifications

Experience in using and/or contributing to open-source projects in Kubernetes ecosystem, e.g. Kubespray, Helm, Istio, Prometheus, Envoy, OpenTracing, KubeEdge, etc.
Experience with Kubernetes networks (e.g. CNI deployment and troubleshooting).
Experience with Kubernetes API, Operator, and Custom Resource Definition (CRD) development.
Experience with Kubernetes cross-cluster federation.
Experience with CI/CD design and development.
Experience in adapting large-scale distributed systems such as CDN/DNS onto Kubernetes."
Data Engineer,"Position Overview

To support block funding initiatives

Role & Responsibilities

 Take charge of various stages of the systems development life cycle; adopting waterfall, agile or hybrid development methodology.
 Be involved in project planning and budgeting.
 Plan and lead project delivery.
 Be involved in procurement (e.g. Call RFP/ITQ, evaluate and award to selected vendor).
 Manage and work closely with various stakeholders (e.g. end users, senior management and external vendors).
 Lead user requirement gathering sessions for the development / implementation of new systems or enhancements to existing systems.
 Manage project implementation, application testing, supporting application patches and upgrades in accordance with project methodologies and policies.
 Manage project based on the project plan and timeline to meet identified business needs, within agreed parameters of cost, duration and quality.
 Mitigate project risks.
 Understand IT management policy, quality management policy and security guidelines to ensure the development processes, procedures and system are designed to comply with these policies and guidelines.
 Trial and evaluate potential solutions and technologies, and make recommendations to resolve business problems.
 Provide thought leadership to deliver creative and cost-efficient data-related technical solutions.
 Support strategic IT-, data management- and analytics initiatives as a technical advisor.
 Provide guidance and coaching to junior team members.
 Conduct end user training if required.

Requirements

 Degree/Master in Computer Science, Information Technology, Computer Engineering or equivalent.
 5+ years’ experience in building data warehouse or advanced analytics solutions.
 5+ years’ experience in project management.
 Ability to manage/influence users, senior management and vendors, and coordinate with multi-disciplinary teams.
 Strong analytical skills and ability to work both independently as well as in a team.
 Thorough understanding of big data frameworks and methodologies, database and data warehousing concepts, dimensional design, and advanced analytics techniques.
 Experience in one or more of the following: IT infrastructure, software engineering, technical security, data management, business intelligence or advanced analytics tools and products.
 Expose to biomedical research/hospital information/clinical systems is an added advantage.

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Machine Learning Engineer (MLE) - Data Solutions Center,"Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

About The Team

The success of data business model hinges on the supply of a large volume of high quality labeled data that will grow exponentially as our business scales up. However, the current cost of data labeling is excessively high. The Data Solutions team is built to understand data strategically at scale for all Global Business Solution (GBS) business needs. Data Solutions Team uses quantitative and qualitative data to guide and uncover insights, turning our findings into real products to power exponential growth. Data Solutions Team responsibility includes infrastructure construction, recognition capabilities management, global labeling delivery management.

About The Role

We are looking for a highly capable machine learning engineer to deploy and optimise our machine learning systems. You will be evaluating existing machine learning (ML) lifecycle, understanding and productionizing the model data pipeline, and enhancing and maintaining the performance of our AI model's predictive automation capabilities.

Responsibility

What you will do

Model optimisation: Collaborate with data scientists to improve existing machine learning model training and evaluation pipelines, updating/finetuning the models with different training resources such as GPU or distributed training
Model Deployment: Build continuous integration, testing, and scalable deployment pipelines in cloud computing environments for machine learning services
Data pipeline productionisation: Work with data scientists and data engineers to design and implement the data pipelines for machine learning models that will support the current and future needs of our business
Maintenance: Build scalable and reliable infrastructure that supports feature engineering, model training, deployment, inferencing, performance monitoring
Tracking: Build logging, tracking, analyzing, monitoring and reporting pipelines for both data and model tracking in cloud computing environments to ensure correct model output and stable model performance

What you will need

Ability to understand the business use case to optimise and implement scalable solution
Knowledge of machine learning concepts and fundamentals
Deep learning proficiency in at least one of CV and NLP, with solid experience in model finetuning and optimization
Solid programming skills with experience writing and maintaining high-quality production code
Experience in ML pipeline, model training orchestration; large-scale/distributed training experience is desirable
Ability to work independently and complete projects from beginning to end and in a timely manner
Great communication skills, both written and oral; comfortable presenting findings and recommendations to non-technical audiences

Qualifications

BS or above in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field
5+ years of industry experience building ML infrastructure at scale
At least 2 years of experience in developing and deploying large-scale systems, version control, scaling and monitoring
Experience in machine learning frameworks (scikit-learn, Tensorflow, Pytorch), big data frameworks (e.g., Spark/Hadoop/Flink) and experience in resource management and task scheduling for large scale distributed systems.
Proficient in Python/SQL and one of C/C++/Go, with deep knowledge of Linux and CD tools (e.g. git); Experience with any microservice framework is highly desirable
Knowledge of machine learning concepts and fundamentals
Good communication and teamwork skills to clearly communicate technical concepts with other teammates.

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Applications Support, Associate","As a JP Morgan Chase employee, you'll be part of a company that makes a real difference every day for our customers, our communities and ourselves. With a focus on customer service, you'll put others first, do what's right and create solutions that make lives better. We invite you to build your career on our strong foundation and help shape what's next - for you and for us.

Consumer & Community Banking (CCB) Production Management: is accountable for maintaining the production environment for all of our Chase businesses including Chase.com, mobile banking, retail branches, lending and customer service. Our Vision is to deliver an ""always available"" customer experience. We are made up of high-performing teams with business and technical expertise partnering across the organization to drive continuous availability and improvement, using ITIL-based processes and practices.

Responsibilities

As a Major Incident Manager you are responsible for the following:

Own and drive incident management bridge calls and chats with production management, application development, infrastructure teams, and senior leadership with the purpose of remediating impacting incidents.
Establishing strong command and control of an incident, establishing clear accountability/ownership and methodical evaluation of complex issue scenarios.
Adherence to critical process and procedure, and appropriate escalations in support of production incidents.
Applying technical/environmental knowledge and experience to develop and drive appropriate tasks, forming paths to resolution.
Distribution of clear and concise communications, summarizing incidents and the business/customer experience to a wide group of technical and non-technical audiences.
Ensure incident data is accurately captured and documented.
Priming appropriate materials and follow ups to hand-off to the Root Cause Analysis phase in the Problem Management process.
Working as part of a global follow-the-sun Team, providing 8 x 5 production support coverage and coverage on major weekend events

Qualifications

BA/BS degree
Minimum 4 years experience in the IT operations of a Banking and Finance or Service Delivery organization
Risk and Compliance experience, familiar with internal technology and operations audits.
Relevant production support experience through a Level 2/3 Service Desk role or Incident Management experience in an enterprise scale environment.
Technical familiarity on: Public and Private Cloud (AWS) Mainframe, HP Non-Stop or - Distributed platforms, Cisco Networks, Java, Oracle and DB2.
Possess critical thinking and has experience in technical troubleshooting as a technical resolver or process owner
Customer facing or has a keen focus on customer experience, with good verbal and written communication skills
Strong team player, able to partner closely with related functions (technology stakeholders Regional Governance, Compliance etc.)
Desire to work in an operational environment that is fast paced and involves contact with multiple technology and regulatory stakeholders across the firm
Sound business judgment, particularly the ability to proactively identify and address issues early, performing root cause analysis to develop long term solutions
Strong influencing skills and ability to drive change and deliver results.
Strategic thinker with strong analytical and project management skills with successful track record of completion.
Must be able to multitask utilizing multiple tools in a fast paced continuously evolving environment.

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Global Quality Assurance Specialist - Arabic,"Responsibilities

1. Responsible for monitoring international LIVE content quality to ensure community ecological security;
2. Thorough data analysis, summarize and feedback problems & handle necessary escalation and form a quality inspection report;
3. Work closely with other departments to respond immediately to relevant operation’s needs;
4. Participate in the development of quality inspection standards and continuously optimize the process and system platform.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor’s degree or above, livestream product user;
2. Excellent language skills, English, 1-2 local languages:
Japanese/Arabic/Turkish/Thai/Vietnamese/Russian/German/Portuguese/Spanish;
3. In-depth contact with local customs and culture, is highly sensitive to social news;
4. Possesses strong learning ability, cross-department communication and collaboration skills, overseas working/ training is a plus;
5. Able to work under minimal supervision and have strong logic/ common sense related to job nature;
6. Familiar with office software such as Excel, Word, etc. With data processing experience and other data analysis capabilities are preferred;
7. Good communication skills, able to abstract problems and find solutions proactively."
Lead Devops Engineer/SRE,"about the company
Our client is a well-established Securities firm, with a strong presence in multiple countries worldwide. They're currently looking for an experienced DevOps Engineer to join and lead their expanding team.

about the job

You will assist in leading the DevOps team
Oversee the production systems and provide effective solutions for any issues identified
Automation of routine tasks and be involved in the creation, debug and optimization of automation scripts
Handle deployments of any new business requirements and updates when required
Build Docker images and facilitate container deployments using Kubernetes or similar tools
skills and experience required

Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, Computer Science or equivalent
At least 6 years of experience in DevOps and automation processes
Well-versed in containerization tools such as Docker
Hands-on experience in implementation of new technologies and process improvements
Ability to communicate in Mandarin is required to liaise with Technology team situated in China
To apply online, please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may contact Peini Chung at 97637263

(EA: 94C3609/ R2095763)


Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
Educator | Singapore Takashimaya,"Who We Are

Description & Requirements

lululemon is an innovative performance apparel company for yoga, running, training, and other athletic pursuits. Setting the bar in technical fabrics and functional design, we create transformational products and experiences that support people in moving, growing, connecting, and being well. We owe our success to our innovative product, emphasis on stores, commitment to our people, and the incredible connections we make in every community we're in. As a company, we focus on creating positive change to build a healthier, thriving future. In particular, that includes creating an equitable, inclusive and growth-focused environment for our people.

Job Summary

The Educator role is the foundation of our success as an organization. Educators are experts in creating world-class customer service, or guest experience, in our retail stores. They are responsible for engaging and connecting with our guests, sharing top-quality product education, and speaking authentically about our community and culture.

Core Responsibilities Of The Job

Guest (i.e., Customer) Experience
Interact with guests to ensure a great guest experience in a manner that values guests’ time.
Assess guests’ needs to provide customized, effective purchase and return solutions and support.
Provide technical product education by articulating the value and benefit of the product.
Facilitate a seamless end-to-end guest experience by conducting accurate and timely guest transactions and executing market-relevant omnichannel programs according to company standards.
Dynamically provide coverage on the floor to continuously engage with guests and attend to multiple guests or store needs.
Receive guest feedback and partner with store leadership to take appropriate action and “make it right” for guests.
Inform guests of local community programs. Plan and execute local, regional, and area driven Community projects and initiatives (e.g., local run club, international day of yoga).
Working With Others
Contribute to a respectful and inclusive team environment by welcoming and celebrating differences to ensure a supportive and engaging experience for all team members and guests.
Establish supportive and productive relationships with all team members.
Collaborate with team members to ensure optimal guest experience and support store operations.
Operations
Perform product presentation tasks (e.g., put items back in place, restock or add depleted items to the floor from inventory, destock or relocate items) according to company standards.
Use in-store technology to support store operations and provide positive guest experiences.
Perform cleaning tasks as needed throughout the shift to maintain the luxury environment of the store.
Understand and adhere to people safety policies and procedures to maintain a safe work environment.
Perform work in accordance with applicable policies, procedures, and laws or regulations.
What We Look For
Inclusion & Diversity: Creates/supports an inclusive environment that values/celebrates differences
Integrity/Honesty: Behaves in an honest, fair, and ethical manner
Guest Experience: Enjoys working and connecting with, understanding, and helping guests
Personal Responsibility: Accepts responsibility/accountability for actions; is dependable
Self-Awareness: Is aware of how words or actions may be perceived by or affect others
Collaboration and Teamwork: Works productively with others to achieve goals; seeks diverse perspectives
Enthusiasm: Is enthusiastic about one’s own work; looks for ways to make work fun and engaging
Job Requirements

Eligibility
Legally eligible to work in the jurisdiction of the store which you are assigned to.
Availability
Willing to work a flexible schedule.
Other Willingness Requirements
Willing to move through a store for most of a shift to help guests and accomplish work
Willing to work as part of a team and complete some work independently
Job Assets (i.e., nice to have; not required)
Education: High School or Secondary School diploma equivalent or above.
Applicants successful in progressing to interview will be contacted by a Manager or a member of the People & Culture team. Please note any applicant or employee who believes they need a reasonable accommodation to perform the essential duties of the job is welcome to discuss this with the Manager or People and Culture team member when arranging the interview.

Beyond The Paycheck (Benefits & Perks)

At lululemon, we care for and invest in the whole person – body, mind, spirit. Our total rewards program is designed to support you in achieving your goals and focus on the things you love. In addition to competitive base pay and a team-based bonus program, we also offer paid time off, generous employee discounts, fitness/yoga classes, parenthood top up program and personal and professional development programs.

Note: availability of these benefits and perks may be subject to your location & employment type and may have certain eligibility requirements. The Company reserves the right to alter these benefits and perks in whole or in part at any time without advance notice."
Java Developer (Full Stack) (Senior),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
The Java Developer will be part of our development team that has strong experience in agile development and in-depth knowledge of digital solutions. You will work in a highly productive and collaborative team where your ideas will be listened to and put into action. This exciting opportunity would suit a Java Developer who is looking to move upwards and onwards and is eager to work closely with senior management on interesting and super cool ideas. You will be collaborating with the Product, Design and Business teams to develop and maintain digital solutions for our prestigious clients in public sector and large commercial enterprises.

Responsibilities
Join project teams to work on full life-cycle web/mobile application projects from requirement gathering to solutioning, development, releasing and post-launch maintenance
Work with agile cross functional, cross countries teams to design, develop, maintain web/app application base on specifications and ensure successful releases
Support Project Manager/Scrum Master to provide consultation and direction to stakeholders for managing and delivering their expectations
Be a self-starter, proactively recognise and solve issues as they arise
Be motivated in continuous learning and improvement to enhance your skills in an ever changing environment
Qualifications And Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or other relevant qualifications
We are hiring all levels of experiences with full-stack exposure (1-6 years). Salary will commemorate with experience
Proficient in Java development with excellent knowledge of Spring Boot framework
Solid understanding of object-oriented programming and fundamental design principles behind a scalable application on the clouds
Extensive experience and knowledge of Relational Database, SQL-query programming, microservice, ORM (JPA2, Hibernate) and various architectural and design patterns (MVC, concurrency pattern, singleton pattern, etc.)
Comprehensive experience and knowledge of modern development tools and technologies: Redis, Docker, Kubernetes, Infrastructure-as-code
Profound insights of JVM, memory optimisation, memory leak troubleshooting
Hands-on experience on server setup and maintenance, DevOps, and experience working with Cloud Infrastructure (AWS/Azure) will be an advantage
Hands-on experience with Java platforms (Adobe Experience Manager, IBM Mobile First Platform, Jahia, etc.) will be an advantage
Following certifications will be highly considered: Azure Developer (Associate), Azure Solutions Architect (Expert), Azure DevOps Engineer (Expert), AWS Developer (Associate), AWS Solutions Architect (Professional), AWS DevOps Engineer (Professional)
English-speaking with good communication and teamwork skills
Ability to work within a fast-paced agile development environment
Candidates with extensive experience, excellent communications skills and good certifications will be considered for Team Lead/Technical Architect role
Required Technology Stack
Front-ent: React JS, Angular, HTML/CSS
Middleware: Jetty, Tomcat, Nginx, JBoss, Oracle Weblogic
Database: PostgreSQL, MySQL, Azure Database for PostgreSQL, Azure Database for MySQL, Amazon RDS (PostgreSQL/MySQL), Amazon Aurora (PostgreSQL/MySQL), Oracle
OS: Red Hat Enterprise Linux, Amazon Linux
IDE/CLI: Eclipse, IntelliJ, Ant, Maven, Gradle, Npm
CI/CD: Bitbucket/Gitlab, Bamboo/Jenkins, SonarQube (code quality inspection), Robot Framework (test automation)
Cloud Infrastructure: AWS, Azure
Infrastructure as Code: Terraform
Platform: Adobe Experience Manager, Jahia, IBM MFP
NOTICE

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.

By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read and agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining, and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration.

Consequences of Not Providing Personal Data for Transaction/Service/Application

Please be noted that should you not consent and provide us with the relevant personal data to fulfil the “Purposes” of collection, use and disclosure of your personal data by Decision Science Agency Pte Ltd, it may hinder our ability to continue to interact with you. We may not be able to make a decision on your recruitment and employment or comply with the law and therefore, we may not be able to make an offer of employment.

You may refer to and access our website https://www.decision-science.com/#privacy-policy for more information.
Desired Skills and Experience
RDS, Kubernetes, Oracle, PostgreSQL, Design Patterns, Architect, Architectural, MySQL, Amazon Aurora, Tomcat, Maven, Angular, Docker, Java, Hibernate, Agile Development"
Snr EUC Engineer,"The Snr EUC Engineer manages the IT support function. Candidate provides management to a group of IT professional and support staff and focuses on setting goals and priorities. Candidate plans and directs the information processing activities of the organisation and coordinates the effective design, implementation and operation of management information systems and applications. Candidate oversees the maintenance and upgrading of support systems and conducts on-site training to promote efficient operations.
Candidate possesses strong leadership and communication abilities, and is able to set realistic goals and implement appropriate plans to guide the team toward achieving those goals. Candidate is able to address multi-faceted issues effectively and in a collaborative manner including across departments.

Role & Responsibilities
Implement IT Support Service Plans
Lead the implementation of support services across the organisation
Define best practices and Service Level Agreements for the support function
Establish performance and reporting measures to provide an effective and efficient level of service
Manage IT support Activities
Identify actions to maintain or improve levels of service
Advise the business on IT support metrics and capabilities
Oversee System Maintenance
Prioritise activities to ensure continuity of service and prompt issue resolution
Oversee the compiling of data for reporting purposes
Review trends and patterns
Plan installation of hardware equipment, software and maintenance agreements
Recommend acquisition of new technology and software
Provide Incident Resolution Guidance
Analyse enquiries to identify recurring user problems, recommend solutions, and to identify areas where service can be improved
Respond to more complex, escalated enquiries from team members
Evaluate results of investigation reviews
Develop problem solving guidelines, checklists, or other materials to assist staff to respond to user problems that are recurring or routine
Oversee disaster recovery planning and testing
Manage Teams
Oversee team management including budgets, forecasting, work allocations and staffing
Develop staff through ongoing coaching, mentoring and career discussions
Define common goals, direction and accountability among staff
Drive effective performance management practices within department in accordance with company policies and procedures

Requirements
Diploma/Degree in Computer Science of equivalent
At least 7 - 10 years’ experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems
Experience in mass EUC deployment for building relocation, renovation projects and new set-up implementation
Certification in ITIL, MCSE preferred
Self moltivated, good interpersonal skills, ability to write, communicate and present salient points and ideas to get buy-in
Strong vendor management skills & Team Leading experience

It only a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!!
#LI-IHIS39 #M-2022-0159"
Technical Support Engineer / SL3 Application Owner,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

We are looking for a talented Technical Support Engineer / SL3 Application Owner to join our TechOps team.

This is a pretty broad role that will involve investigating and resolving technical questions related to functioning of our ecosystem (Binance.com, Mobile Apps, etc), and other related duties.

It will include close cooperation with our Customer Support, internal Dev/Infra teams, as well as other parties.

Responsibilities:

Provide technical support and handling urgent escalation from external or internal customers or users in production environment with high-volume of transaction traffic
Strong collaboration, communication and interaction with all stakeholders including customers, product manager, developer and management team
Analyse service ticket data, identify incident root cause, draft Root Cause Analysis (RCA) report and follow possible maintenance for system-level improvement
Work closely with product and developer teams in global offices, participate and follow up in iteration, release and roadmap planning timely
Very flexible with capability to prioritize multiple incidents and deadlines to facilitate well in a fast-paced, rapidly evolving organization
High responsibility in continuous improvement in service quality and efficiency
Ability to provide coaching, training, identification, optimization and documentation of the customer or business support processes

Requirements:

4-8+ years of experience in similar roles - e.g. Technical Support Engineer, SL3 Engineer, Application Owner, etc
Must have strong capabilities to identify, analyze and resolve problems logically and systematically
3+ years Unix/Linux with shell scripting, etc
2+ years databases experience (Oracle, MySQL)
2+ years Web or App related project support experience with HTTP protocol, JavaScript, RESTful, Json, Web Service, TCP/IP, Linux/Unix
Understanding of software development methodologies and coding standards
Experience with software application debugging and troubleshooting
Familiar with technical support process and escalation management
Passionate with technical support to solve complicated customer issues
Ability to present or speak fluently to engineers, product manager and customers
BS/MS in Computer Science, Math or related scientific disciplines
Background in Software Development is a plus

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Sales Representative,"Hamburg Süd is a strong brand within the international logistics services industry. The expertise and commitment of its employees are what make Hamburg Süd a successful container shipping company which represents quality, excellent customer service, and personal contacts in over 250 offices in more than 100 countries globally. Our affiliation with Maersk—the global market leader in container line shipping—means that Hamburg Süd customers also have access to the world's biggest route network and largest shipping fleet.

Key Responsibilities:
To strategically plan and execute Sales Visits with the aim to canvass new business and to maintain and grow existing customer base in Singapore
To keep close contact and excellent relationship with the assigned (trusted) clients. Conflict Management whenever necessary to resolve any problems and ensure we deliver the promise to customers
Prompt handling of customer requests (Rates, Quotation, Filing, Performance reports) in close collaboration with CX team
Follow up with internal and external stakeholders to increase participation in the customer survey (NPS) and improve overall score in SEA
To meet/ exceed ROFO in Volume/Revenue/CM targets and continuously endeavor to improve the cargo-mix
Closely coordinate with ROM/CEN, CX and counterparts in the other Areas about situation and developments in the market that could impact customer satisfaction
Participation in Engagement Survey / GALLUP and actively contribute to improve the overall engagement score
Actively promote HSUD Ocean+++ Brand strategy in L&S, i.e. Intermodal, Customs Services and Value Protect
To support Key Account Manager with handling requests from Key Clients , in particular those affecting local

Qualification:
Preferably Degree, Diploma holder or equivalent
3 years of sales experience in Logistics & Services industry
Proficiency in MS Office application
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Excellent command of spoken and written English
Customer-oriented, self-motivated, able to work under pressure
Excellent service manner, patience and problem-solving skills"
UI UX Tester,"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 699,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities.

The Role:

Develop and maintain test automation scripts for UI UX

Prepare and maintain test data

Must have skills:

Tosca

UI UX Tools AxE

Google Lighthouse

Browser stack

Good to have skills

HPE ALM

Azure devops

SQL"
Associate Specialist Quality Control - 1 Year Contract,"Job Description

THE OPPORTUNITY
Be part of the team that ensures sustainable products meets standard quality and committed to deliver to customers worldwide!
Based in Singapore, the regional hub for Asia Pacific (AP) and top-ranked biopharmaceutical company on the Straits Times and Statista’s list of Best Employers in Singapore for two consecutive years (2020, 2021).
Join the premier biopharmaceutical company that has been in Singapore for more than 25 years and in AP for over 60 years.
Our Quality Assurance group ensures every single material inside our products is manufactured, processed, tested, packaged, stored and distributed aligned with our incredibly high standards of quality and meets all regulatory requirements. Partnering across our internal manufacturing facilities, external contract manufacturers and suppliers we create an interdependent global manufacturing network committed to deliver a compliant, reliable supply to customers and patients on time, every time, across

Reporting to Lab Manager, Quality Control, the Chemist is responsible for performing and reviewing laboratory testing of raw materials, in-process samples, intermediates, final drug substances and stability batches in API Laboratories.

What You Will Do

Critical responsibilities but not limited to
Ensure tests and other tasks assigned are performed in a timely manner in compliance to Standard Operating procedures, requirements specified in our company Quality and Safety Standards, regulatory dossiers and pharmacopoeia.
Perform calibration, maintenance and support qualification of laboratory equipment.
Participate in laboratory efficiency improvement tasks, analytical method transfer, development, validation and equipment qualifications activities.
Support Laboratory investigation on laboratory equipment failure, OOT and OOS and identify the root cause and its report writing.
Review Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) and laboratory test methods.
Perform and maintain good laboratory housekeeping (5S), inventory and in-house stock control, reference standards, chemical reagents, and consumables.
After one year on the position, you will be competent to perform most of the laboratory testing following cGMP, data integrity and GLP requirement. You will have been trained to use various laboratory equipment ranging from such as particle size analyzer, FTIR, UV-Vis spectrometer, microscope, Empower CDS, HPLC, etc.

What You Must Have
Bachelor Degree in Chemistry / Biochemistry with prior working experience preferred.
1 to 3 years’ experience in pharmaceutical analysis is preferred Experience in particle size analyser, HPLC, FTIR, Karl Fischer Titrator with technical competency is preferred.
Demonstrated knowledge and understanding of cGMP, GLP, and associated regulatory expectations related to Pharmaceutical Analytical testing is preferred
What You Can Expect
Limitless opportunities across various areas in Manufacturing; well-structured career path
A state-of-the-art facility that delivers solution to its customers world-wide
Our Manufacturing & Supply Division is committed to be the most trusted supplier of bio-pharmaceuticals worldwide. Our facilities, along with our external contractors, suppliers, and partners, create an interdependent global manufacturing network that’s committed to delivering a high quality, reliable supply to customers and patients on time, every time.

Who We Are…

We are known as Merck & Co., Inc., Rahway, New Jersey, USA in the United States and Canada and MSD everywhere else. For more than a century, we have been inventing for life, bringing forward medicines and vaccines for many of the world's most challenging diseases. Today, our company continues to be at the forefront of research to deliver innovative health solutions and advance the prevention and treatment of diseases that threaten people and animals around the world.

What We Look For…

Imagine getting up in the morning for a job as important as helping to save and improve lives around the world. Here, you have that opportunity. You can put your empathy, creativity, digital mastery, or scientific genius to work in collaboration with a diverse group of colleagues who pursue and bring hope to countless people who are battling some of the most challenging diseases of our time. Our team is constantly evolving, so if you are among the intellectually curious, join us—and start making your impact today.

We are proud to be a company that embraces the value of bringing diverse, talented, and committed people together. The fastest way to breakthrough innovation is when diverse ideas come together in an inclusive environment. We encourage our colleagues to respectfully challenge one another’s thinking and approach problems collectively. We are an equal opportunity employer, committed to fostering an inclusive and diverse workplace.

Current Employees apply HERE

Current Contingent Workers apply HERE

Search Firm Representatives Please Read Carefully

Merck & Co., Inc., Rahway, NJ, USA, also known as Merck Sharp & Dohme LLC, Rahway, NJ, USA, does not accept unsolicited assistance from search firms for employment opportunities. All CVs / resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at our company without a valid written search agreement in place for this position will be deemed the sole property of our company. No fee will be paid in the event a candidate is hired by our company as a result of an agency referral where no pre-existing agreement is in place. Where agency agreements are in place, introductions are position specific. Please, no phone calls or emails.

Employee Status

Temporary (Fixed Term)

Relocation

No relocation

VISA Sponsorship

Travel Requirements

Flexible Work Arrangements

Shift

Valid Driving License

Hazardous Material(s)

Number of Openings

1

Requisition ID R218804"
Data Engineer - TikTok,"Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the world's leading destination for short-form mobile videos. Our mission is to capture and present the world's creativity, knowledge, and moments that matter in everyday life. TikTok empowers everyone to be a creator directly from their smartphones and is committed to building a community by encouraging users to share their passion and creative expression through their videos. TikTok has offices in Beijing, Berlin, Jakarta, London, Los Angeles, Moscow, Mumbai, Sao Paulo, Seoul, Shanghai, Singapore, and Tokyo. In 2018, TikTok was one of the most downloaded apps in the world. TikTok is available worldwide for iOS and Android. Visit tiktok.com.

Team Introduction
The mission of the Data Platform Singapore Business Partnering (DPSG BP) team is to empower the TikTok Business with data. Our goal is to build a Data Warehouse that can cater to batch and streaming data, Data Products that provide useful information to build efficient data metrics & dashboards which will be used to make smarter business decisions to support business growth. If you're looking for a challenging ground to push your limits, this is the team for you!

- Translate business requirements & end to end designs into technical implementations and responsible for building batch and real-time data warehouse
- Manage data modeling design, writing, and optimizing ETL jobs
- Collaborate with the business team to building data metrics based on data warehouse
- Responsible for building and maintaining data products
- Involvement in rollouts, upgrades, implementation, and release of data system changes as required for streamlining of internal practices

Qualifications

- At least 5 years in software engineering and 2 years of relevant experience in data engineering
- Proficient in creating and maintaining complex ETL pipelines end-to-end while maintaining high reliability and security
- Familiar with data warehouse concept and have production experience in modeling design
- Familiar with at least 1 distributed computing engine (e.g. Hive, Spark, Flink)
- Familiar with at least 1 NoSQL database is a plus (e.g. HBase)
- Excellent interpersonal and communication skills with the ability to engage and manage internal and external stakeholders across all levels of seniority
- Strong collaboration skills with the ability to build rapport across teams and stakeholders"
Technical Team Lead,"> ABOUT US
XP Power is a global leader in providing essential power solutions to the Industrial Technology, Healthcare and Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment sectors. We design and manufacture power controllers, the essential hardware component in every piece of electrical equipment that converts power from the electricity grid into the right form for equipment to function. Listed as a FTSE 250 company on the London Stock Exchange we are a fast-growing business, serving our global blue-chip customer base from 29 locations across Europe, North America, and Asia. We are extremely proud and committed to our culture that values Customer Focus, Flexibility, Knowledge, Speed, and Integrity. Joining our team means you’ll work in a high performing global organisation where employees collaborate and strive to make XP Power the first-choice power solutions provider delivering the ultimate experience for our customers and our people.

> THE OPPORTUNITY
Lead a team of 5+ electronics engineers responsible for the full product lifecycle including product design, failure root cause analysis, components selection & qualification, production transfer support, engineering data management and documentation review.

> KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
· Strategize team development, communicate expectations, set goals, monitor and review performance.
· Perform daily team management – request prioritization, task delegation, progress monitor, stakeholder communication, problem solving, team motivation, etc.
· Liaise with various departments and stakeholders to create collaborative work relationships and solid rapports.
· Lead various electronics subjects – product design & test, failure analysis and engineering improvements, quality and reliability matters.
· Lead FMEA to identify critical and high-risk electronic design, plan and execute evaluation test and risk mitigation.
· Lead the development of electronics selection and qualification guidelines, standardize testing methods and test plates.
· Review products compliance to regulatory standards – energy efficiency, noises, safety, and material compliance.
· Standardize technical documentation with templates and improve engineering practices and processes.
· Exploit emerging technology and engineering advances to develop their application guidance.
· Coach engineering staffs on technical subjects – technical interpretation, alternative selection, application analysis, problem solving, etc.
· Review suppliers’ technical competency in support of supplier selection, evaluation and audit.

> KEY QUALIFICATIONS AND SKILLS
Degree or above in Electronics Engineering, Electrical Engineering or equivalents.
3+ years of experience in electronics product design with profound understanding of design lifecycle, engineering processes and methodologies.
7+ years of experience in electronics fields with good knowledge of switch mode power supply – topology, characterization, testing, simulation, safety regulations.
Experience in project management and team collaboration.
Excellent leadership and interpersonal skills, proficient in both English and Chinese.
Experience in resource management – recruitment, organization, motivation and performance review.
Good knowledge of electronics operating principles and models, electrical characteristics, practical applications and limits.
Experience in Microsoft 365 - Office tools, Teams, SharePoint is a strong plus.
Result-driven, detail-oriented, and passionate for continuous improvements
Good Technical writing capability and communication skills

> WHY WORK FOR US?
XP Power provides a safe and healthy working environment that is stimulating and collaborative, where employees are empowered to make a real difference. We place our people at the heart of everything we do. We understand that if we provide our people with the ultimate experience, they will provide the ultimate experience to our customers.
We also offer a comprehensive benefits package including:
Company healthcare
Term-life insurance coverage
Friendly work environment
Opportunity to learn and grow with the Company

> OUR PEOPLE – OUR POWER
XP Power is an equal opportunities employer. We are committed to creating an environment where people are valued, supported, and nurtured to deliver their best. Operating globally, we celebrate the cultural differences that exist in the countries in which we do business. Being a truly diverse and inclusive community helps us grow our business through innovation; attracting and retaining talent to engage the people who buy our power solutions. We know that by cultivating the ultimate experience for all our people, they will deliver the same to our customers"
Application Engineer,"STMicroelectronics is a world leader in providing the semiconductor solutions that make a positive contribution to people’s lives, both today and in the future. ST is one of the world’s largest semiconductor companies as a leading Integrated Device Manufacturer serving all electronics segments with key strengths in Sense and Power, Automotive, and Embedded Processing Solutions.

STMicroelectronics has the need for a Distribution Account Executive in Schaumburg, IL to generate sales in conjunction with distribution partners for customers in one or more territories by developing business relations through promoting ST image and product portfolio to customers and distributors.

Role Overview:
Work Location : Ang Mo Kio BHQ Site at 5A Serangoon North Avenue 5 Singapore 554574

As a Firmware engineer, you are at the center of many activities. You are the one making the bridge between the system requirements and the IC capabilities. You interface with architects and IC design teams. Software is a key element when it comes to get the quintessence and the ultimate performances from the IC.
In complex systems, some critical functions can also be implemented in software. You can have to deal with real time software, including real time operating system, communication protocols. You can have to deal with filtering and signal processing. You are responsible of all the project steps, from the specification, development, testing to the integration and validation on the IC.
From this software view, you are also involved in customer related activities like documentation (user manual, …) and customer support for complex cases.
In this role it is important to keep pace on the latest technical solutions and technologies, be innovative and creative, take initiative and be autonomous, and work as part of a team of technical experts.

Candidate Profile
Requirements:
You have graduated from an engineering or equivalent level.
You are looking for a first professional experience or have a first experience in Firmware Development and wish to extend your knowledge in this field.
You have good knowledge on software programming (C/C++, Python, …).
You may have basic or advanced skills on digital signal processing.
You are open minded with a good level of listening skills and enjoy working in a diversified team.
You are autonomous, analytical, motivated and desire to propose innovative and competitive ideas for the development of new successful products.
You have graduated from an engineering or equivalent level.
You are looking for a first professional experience or have a first experience in Firmware Development and wish to extend your knowledge in this field.
You have good knowledge on software programming (C/C++, Python, …)You may have basic skills on digital signal processing.
You are open minded with a good level of listening skills and enjoy working in a diversified team.
You are autonomous, analytical, motivated and desire to propose innovative and competitive ideas for the development of new successful products."
Jumpstart - Procurement Supplier Management Analytic and Controller,"Do you thrive when taking responsibility and enjoy using data analytics to achieve the best results? In your new job, you will support data analytics solution, supplier relationship management and foster optimal cooperation with stakeholders and business division.

In your new role you will:

Understand basic supply chain management concept, and volume planning.
Be familiar with basic semiconductor manufacturing and outsourcing process.
Assist with implementing data analytic techniques in creating short-term and mid-term suppliers costing and category strategy activities.
Undertake and support procurement projects and supplier management (supplier metrics, market research, pricing analysis, monthly reporting, and quarterly pricing updates).
Provide support in quotation process improvements and report automation.

You are best equipped for this task if you have:

Degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Manufacturing, or Business Administration with some technical focus.
Fresh graduates with similar fields who are interested in Procurement are welcome to apply.
Strong interest in data analytic with experience creating dashboards and data models.
Proactive team player with excellent communicate skills and willingness to learn.
Trustworthy and Integrity

This is a 24-month contract with job rotation exposure.

Part of your life. Part of tomorrow.


Infineon is a world leader in semiconductor solutions that make life easier, safer, and greener. Our solutions for efficient energy management, smart mobility, and secure, seamless communications link the real and the digital world.

In accordance with the requirements set by the Singaporean Government, Infineon Technologies Asia Pacific Pte Ltd (“Infineon”) can only allow individuals who are (a) fully vaccinated, (b) certified to be medically ineligible for a vaccine or (c) have recovered from COVID-19 within a prescribed period, onto company premises. Therefore, Infineon requires all new employees, as well as contractors and business partners, to be fully vaccinated against COVID-19. “Fully vaccinated” means individuals have completed the full regime of an approved COVID-19 Vaccine as listed under the World Health Organization (WHO) Emergency Use Listing (EUL) including the respective post-vaccination period to ensure the vaccine has become full effective. Anyone who is unable to be vaccinated due to an approved and/or recognised exemption condition may apply for special consideration."
SC Eng Assoc Engineer,"Overview

This role is primarily responsible for maintaining the plant automation Operational Technology (OT) systems including but not limited to engineering, troubleshooting, maintenance, projects, and vendor management. OT system consists of control system devices (PLC, HMI, SCADA, VFD, etc.), server application (PI, historian, SQL, etc.) and field instruments (maintenance and calibration).

Responsibilities

Manage and maintain plant automation, instrumentation, and controls OT infrastructure.
Troubleshoot and analyse automation related problems. Create permanent solution based on root cause analysis to eliminate plant downtime to a minimum.
Lead the site calibration programs as per global standard. Liaise with vendors and production team to maintain calibration schedules of all instruments to eliminate issues on safety, quality, production, and other risks due to calibration or instrumentation failure.
Develop a detailed understanding of automation systems in the plant including but not limited to Rockwell Logix PLCs (Compact Logix, Control Logix, etc.) PanelView, Wonderware ArchestrA & Intouch, Wonderware Historian, SQL database, ASI, EtherNet/IP, FTAC, Power Flex VFDs and any other control systems installed at site.
Ensure latest backups and crash recovery procedures are updated and tested to recover any OT assets (PLCs, HMIs, SCADA, VFDs, Controllers etc) in case of a crash or machine failure.
Support any projects (OpEx/CaPex/global/etc.) as automation point of contact during design engineering, development, and commissioning to ensure smooth transaction after project handover.
Create and maintain all OT related documentation. Making sure good housekeeping is achieved.
Propose & implement minor modifications to systems, equipment, processes, and operations to improve safety, increase efficiency and achieve company goals.
Ensure that changes carried out on the automation systems that went through the change control process shall not compromise the safety, environmental or quality aspect.
Ensure automation systems comply with regulatory guidelines. Maintain the validated status of production equipment and associated control systems in accordance with company standard, departmental procedures, and SOPs.
Ensure automation related critical spares and parts are available for all PLC systems, VFDs and instruments.
Work closely with the Global Automation team to deliver compliance with Global Automation Standards.
Any other ad hoc tasks / assignment / projects related to OT / Automation as assigned.

Qualifications

Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical/Electronics/Mechatronics/related Engineering.
Minimum 5 years of experience as an Automation / Control System Engineer. Preferably in manufacturing plant.
Experience in Allen-Bradley PLC & HMI, Wonderware InTouch / System Platform, communication protocols (Ethernet, ASI, Profibus, ControlNet, DeviceNet, Modbus, etc.).
Familiarity with SQL, PI Server, Historian, OPC and other server application.
Familiarity with general field instruments (pressure, temperature, flow transmitter, etc.).
Familiarity with ATEX / Explosion proof standard.
Additional qualification / trainings in automation OT would be preferred.
Knowledge of safety system is preferred.
Ability to work under pressure as individual and as part of the team to achieve numerous targets.
Ability to manage internal and external stakeholder from multiple countries.
Strong written and verbal communication and computer skills required"
Cloud Security Specialist,"Our team in Singapore currently has an opening for a Cloud Security Specialist

<<>>

YOUR ROLE & RESPONSIBILITIES

The Cloud Security Specialist will plan, design, implement and maintain system applications in a hybrid cloud environment. The role revolves around accountability for the development of Cloud Security Design framework in the SaaS, PaaS, IaaS environments. The mandate is to prevent all known digital threats targeting Brenntag digital landscape
Responsible for embedding best practice security through evaluation of SaaS providers
Responsible for establishing security requirements needed to provide services securely
Primarily working with Cloud architects, and DevSecOps team to ensure security by design and communication security for the protection of the organization’s services and assets in the cloud
Ensure proper configuration of firewalls, Network devices, and application security
Network Security management
Cryptography (Confidentiality, Integrity, and availability of digital assets)
Web application Security configuration and management
Secure SaaS, IaaS, PaaS configuration
Client and Endpoint Security (EDR/EPP)
Managing enterprise identity and privileges
AD, O365, and Azure security
Vulnerability Management
Cloud Orchestrations, Integration
Implement and support the delivery of services with respect to security offerings related to cloud security
Work with technical and business units across the organization as a security reference point, offering advice, support, and guidance on a wide range of security issues
Provide technical guidance to the infrastructure and systems team to enforce cloud security controls
Deploying, migration to and maintaining cloud solutions in accordance with company security policies and best practices in cloud security
Identifying, analyzing, and resolving infrastructure vulnerabilities and application security issues


YOUR PROFILE
Masters or Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Systems or equivalent experience in Information Systems preferred.
3+ Years developing and implementing security operations and technology in large, complex enterprises in multiple industry verticals, across a wide range of technology platforms.
3+ Years on any Cloud Platform (AWS, Azure, Google, others).
Deep hands-on experience leading the design, development, and deployment of business software at scale in SaaS, PaaS, and IaaS environment
Experience with service-oriented architectures, private and public clouds, and web services security.
Strong skills in security principles such as least privilege access, defense in depth, preventative vs. detective controls, Infrastructure and Network Security, Data protection, and Incident response.
Professional experience and good technical knowledge of application security, system security, network security, authentication/authorization protocols, and cryptography.
Experience in industry standards such as PCI DSS, ISO 27xxx, SOC, HIPAA, GDPR, and NIST/DoD frameworks and benchmarks
Good understanding of Enterprise Networks, Security, and Identity Access Management.
Configuration management using CloudFormation and/or Chef/Puppet.
Experience with agile approaches and Experience in DevOps or DevSecOps and how they impact risk management and compliance.
Hands-on technical expertise in technology automation, implementation, integration, and/or deployment using scripting and/or IaaC.
AWS/Google Solutions Architect Certified.
AWS/Google Security Specialty Certified.
CISSP, CCSP, CISM, and/or other comparable certifications
Information security certificates such as; CEH, CISSP, CCSP (Certified Cloud Security Professional) Etc.


OUR OFFER

<<>>

INTERESTED?

We look forward receiving your application."
Big Data Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Unison Consulting is loooking to hire Big Data for their Software Product development and implementation team in Singapore.
Primary Skills : Java or Hadoop (Spark)/Pyspark experience - MUST
Banking experience would be preferred.
Spark Programming / SQL, Hadoop Framework/Angular JS/Node JS/REACT
Kafka
Map Reduce
Excellent Communication Skills

Desired Skills and Experience
Excellent Communication Skills, Scala, Big Data, Pipelines, Hadoop, ETL, Data Engineering, SQL, Python, Banking, Docker, Consulting, Product Development, Java, Data Analytics, Databases"
IT Support Executive,"About the role
As an IT Support Executive at The Great Room, you will be responsible for day-to-day operational IT related issues. You will handle first-level support requests from our members and team. You will be the first touchpoint for helpdesk requests, and make sure that the issues are handled quickly whilst informing the requester of what to expect at every step of the way.

A successful IT Support Executive will be responsible for providing technical support, installing and configuring hardware and software, as well as solving technical issues as they arise.

The IT Support Executive will report to the Director of IT and will be working closely with our location teams across our locations.


What you’ll do
Be the IT Expert
Provide day-to-day basic IT support and services to our members for various IT requests, such as those related to internet connection, printer, phone, CCTV, AV, security, door lock etc.
Support MROs (Member Relations Officer team) on day-to-day IT setbacks/defects rectification
Perform end-to-end level 1 troubleshooting between various sites across the region
Communicate to requesters the status of their ticket at every step of the way; notify them of any changes or outages related to their issue.
Be able to prioritise IT requests, direct them to their respective person-in-charge and coordinate between various departments when required
Order The Great Room laptops as requested by HR/Corporate Operations
Be responsible for driving the IT on/off-boarding process
Assist new user onboarding process (Create Office365, email, WIFI and printers)
Implement proper technical documentation, configuration procedures and best practices
Attend building management power maintenance checks; ensure our servers and systems are functioning after the maintenance
Manage DNS entries and updates

Maintain & Track IT Requests
Manage and record work though our Request Tracking System
Ensure that Client Documentation is well maintained
Ensure that tickets do not go “stale” throughout the process
Provide training as necessary to existing and new location teams on IT softwares/systems

IT SOP
Manage the effectiveness and efficiency of the IT system infrastructure in TGR
Control and monitor TGR’s IT and internet performance for continuous improvement
Maintain quality service by establishing and enforcing The Great Room’s standards
Send equipment for repair or replacement as necessary
Account, tag and track for all IT equipment
Conduct quarterly audit to account for all IT equipment
Follow Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) for daily/weekly recurring tasks
Follow all our Security Procedures and keep a vigilant eye for security issues

Audio Visual (AV)
Manage and support all AV systems in our in-house studio
Operate and troubleshoot for audio and video equipment
Act as the main AV support for any events and meetings at our in-house studio


Who you are
Requirements
Have a qualification in Computer Science, Computing, Information technology or the equivalent
With minimum of 1 year of experience in IT related fields
More experienced candidates may be considered for a more senior position
Knowledgeable in various firewall and access switch setup
Hands-on experience in various network infrastructure is an advantage
Have basic knowledge of VoIP solutions
Proficient in Microsoft Word, Excel, and PowerPoint

Qualities
Able to meet tight deadlines in a fast-paced environment
Have strong organisational and planning skills
Good verbal and written communication skills; confident interacting with vendors, speakers and cross-company teams at all different levels of seniority
Self-starter with a good attitude towards learning


What’s in it for you
Competitive remuneration
Career progression
5-day hybrid work week
Annual Leave
Birthday Leave
Monthly mobile allowance
Flexible benefits for medical and other approved wellness, healthcare activities etc.
Beautiful workplace that fosters collaboration and interactions with others from a diverse background of cultures
Opportunity to work with various teams across regional locations

Does this sound like you?
Connect with us at singapore.careers@thegreatroom.co, with your recent CV.

* Note to our talent acquisition partners: Unfortunately, The Great Room cannot accept candidate submissions from partners who we do not have an existing agreement with. We will not be responsible for introduction or placement fees for hiring of candidates whose profiles were submitted to The Great Room team members or offices without The Great Room's prior knowledge or permission"
IT System Analyst (Business Application Systems/Sharepoint),"Job Highlights

Learning & Development opportunities 
Great employee welfare benefits 
Experience in MS SharePoint, Nintex forms and workflows preferred 

Job Description

Reporting to Manager, Information Technology, this role will be responsible for IT business applications and related systems of Mitsui Chemicals Group of Singapore companies, as well as respective regional affiliates in Asia Pacific. This position will support IT division's plans to leverage on IT applications, automations and other business systems to improve all areas of business operations internally and with our business partners.

Responsibilities:

Plan and execute IT applications roadmap
Manage projects for implementation of IT application system
Analyze and develop application systems to support business operations
Provide first level system support and helpdesk service for application users
Administer and ensure IT Business Application Systems are functioning at optimal level
Perform periodic system maintenance and propose and plan for Application upgrades

Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or related discipline
At least 3 years of experience in designing, development and implementation of IT systems, such as on MS SharePoint platform, as well as administration of MS SQL Database
At least 3 years of development and application support experience in MS SharePoint, Nintex forms and workflows
Experienced in BI tools such as Qliksense and Power BI and familiar with SDLC methodologies
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Resourceful and ability to work independently
Possess good communication skills
Able to work overtime if required

Additional Information

Career Level

Junior Executive

Qualification

Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma, Professional Degree

Years of Experience

3 years

Job Type

Full-Time

Job Specializations

Computer/Information Technology , IT-Software

Reporting to Manager, Information Technology, this role will be responsible for IT business applications and related systems of Mitsui Chemicals Group of Singapore companies, as well as respective regional affiliates in Asia Pacific. This position will support IT division's plans to leverage on IT applications, automations and other business systems to improve all areas of business operations internally and with our business partners.

Responsibilities:

Plan and execute IT applications roadmap
Manage projects for implementation of IT application system
Analyze and develop application systems to support business operations
Provide first level system support and helpdesk service for application users
Administer and ensure IT Business Application Systems are functioning at optimal level
Perform periodic system maintenance and propose and plan for Application upgrades

Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or related discipline
At least 3 years of experience in designing, development and implementation of IT systems, such as on MS SharePoint platform, as well as administration of MS SQL Database
At least 3 years of development and application support experience in MS SharePoint, Nintex forms and workflows
Experienced in BI tools such as Qliksense and Power BI and familiar with SDLC methodologies
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Resourceful and ability to work independently
Possess good communication skills
Able to work overtime if required"
Hybrid Account Executive,"Company Description

Imagine what we can do together. At LinkedIn, we believe amazing things can happen when we work together in an environment where everyone feels a true sense of belonging and their ideas are heard. Join us and help make a direct impact on the world’s workforce in ways no other company can.

Job Description

We are looking for an Hybrid Account Executive to join our team in tapping into potential client opportunities in APAC and generating new business. You will be responsible for responding to inbound inquiries as well as blanketing your region with outbound activity. You will strategically approach target companies and teams in the SMB space, identify the best technology options and sell corporate solutions for recruitment and learning solutions. Although you strive to meet and exceed quota, you will always act in the best interest of the client.

Responsibilities:
Prospect relentlessly to build pipeline and build strong personal relationships with prospects
Create reliable forecasts and be completely transparent with management on the pipeline status
Close new business consistently at or above quota level
Develop and execute on a strategic plan for the territory and document and distribute competitive information
Invest in colleagues and give coaching and advice when you see an opportunity for improvement
Work to develop and circulate the set of best practices that will be the foundation of this team
Listen to the needs of the market and share insights with product and marketing teams
Be proactive about solving problems even if it’s outside of your area and be ready to take on additional initiatives and responsibilities as they emerge
Seek out opportunities to be a leader and do everything you can to help the company achieve its larger objectives

Qualifications

Basic Qualification:
2+ years of experience in sales experience

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with recruiting, recruitment media and HR software
Experience with SaaS opportunities and Salesforce.com platform
Experience selling IT or recruiting solutions
Knowledge of software contract terms and conditions with the ability to create fair transactions
Demonstrated ability to find, manage and close high-level business in an evangelist sales environment
Ability to assess business opportunities and use data to inform decision making and persuade others
Ability to manage a large number of prospect situations simultaneously while positioning company products against direct and indirect competition

Suggested Skills

Excellent negotiation, communication and accurate forecasting skills

At LinkedIn, we trust each other to do our best work where it works best for us and our teams. This role offers a hybrid work option, meaning you can both work from home and commute to a LinkedIn office, depending on what’s best for you and when it is important for your team to be together.

Additional Information

Global Data Privacy Notice for Job Candidates

Please follow this link to access the document that provides transparency around the way in which LinkedIn handles personal data of employees and job applicants: https://legal.linkedin.com/candidate-portal.

Global Data Privacy Notice for Job Candidates

Please follow this link to access the document that provides transparency around the way in which LinkedIn handles personal data of employees and job applicants: https://legal.linkedin.com/candidate-portal."
"Analyst, Operations Excellence, Consumer Banking Ops, Technology & Operations","Business Function

Group Technology and Operations (T&O) enables and empowers the bank with an efficient, nimble and resilient infrastructure through a strategic focus on productivity, quality & control, technology, people capability and innovation. In Group T&O, we manage the majority of the Bank's operational processes and inspire to delight our business partners through our multiple banking delivery channels.

Responsibilities
Ensure high level of forecasting accuracy of ATM, ATM+ and BTM+
Support day to day BAU, timely communication with stakeholders and external vendors on any discrepancies
Support Self Service Banking (SSB) budget, accruals, risk and control processes
Coordinate and prepare annual operation budget with thorough consideration of cost saving strategies
Drive monthly strategic cost management (SCM) initiatives and report associated cost benefits
Provide monthly financial update on vendor expenses to key stakeholders
Responsible for cost re-allocation, asset and budget transfer on regular basis
Perform data analytics on machine faults and identify actionable insights to improve machine uptime
Deep dive and query root causes and suggest solutions to resolve
Work within the SSB team to identify productivity initiatives and implement them within the team
Be able to automate manual processes and suggest process improvements for the department
Work closely with system owners and technical leads for writing, reviewing Business Requirement document, reviewing Functional Specification, producing and executing UAT test plan for Project-related tasks
Manage ad-hoc analysis such as statistical and predictive modelling to solve / respond to business questions
Participate & lead team activities within the unit and department
Additional scope may be included depending on business needs

Requirements
A Bachelor’s degree with at least 5 years of experience in Business Transformation/ Operational Excellence/ Run Operations within Financial Services industry
A certification in PMP will be an advantage
Familiarity with Consumer Banking Operations and SSB terminals and its operations will be an advantage
Excellent communication skills and ability to engage various stakeholders
Self-starter and ability to multi-task
Good analytical and writing skills
Ability to work independently, with strong planning and organization skills
Advanced skills in MS Office Products and BI tools e.g. Qlikview, Tableau, etc
Familiar with DBS internal systems e.g. ADA
Strong technical and applicable experience in analytics languages e.g. Python, SQL would be an advantage
Proficient in SQL and query optimization on e.g. Alluxio, S3, CDSW, Sparkola, Superset, Hadoop, etc, would be an advantage
Prior experience in Business Analytics

Apply Now

We offer a competitive salary and benefits package and the professional advantages of a dynamic environment that supports your development and recognises your achievements.

Primary Location

Singapore-DBS Asia Hub

Job

Operations

Schedule

Regular

Job Type

Full-time

Job Posting

Jan 4, 2023, 11:55:06 AM"
"Business Financial Analyst, Global Logistic","Description

Job-specific intro paragraph

What You Will Do In Your Role

Jointly responsible and be the SC Finance representative for the global freight accrual team, to deliver the expectation and modify the process for better accuracy and efficiency

Provide analysis on Logistic, include building/develop model on forecasting and analysis, interpreting data, analyze variance and evaluating opportunities.

Lead and collaborate with various project lead and business stakeholders to implement projects and program enhancements

Understand the Finance reporting and account management to make the necessary monthly analysis and reviews with the stake owners.

Knowledge of SAP dataset and BWP reports that supports the Finance operations on global logistics

Support key projects of Global Supply Chain, like data validation for savings projects, TMS, GS&OP and Network Modelling. Follow up on any new analytical or required tools, like 5Ys, MOS application in GLO.

Manage, build and consolidate management reports for management review and decision making.

The Experience You Will Bring

Requirements

> 5 years working in manufacturing industry, with full phased ERP system like SAP

Bachelor’s degree in Accounting, Finance or Business

What Will Put You Ahead

Experience with SAP, BPC, BW, One Stream"
Senior Backend Software Engineer - TikTok Live (Fundamental Business) - Singapore,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build up and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming at TikTok. We will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features, and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for live streamers and viewers.

Why Join Us:
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About TikTok Live - Fundamental Business Team
TikTok Live - Fundamental Business engineering team is the mission critical team which is responsible for laying and enhancing the solid foundation for Live business and its affiliated iteration & development. It's also the very key team which takes responsibility for the stability and high performance of our Live service that joys billions of users around the globe. We currently ship and build large-scale livestreaming core services which includes broadcast, watch LIVE, feed distribution and eco-system governance.

You can provide comprehensive technical solutions for live broadcast business scenes, optimize various business indicators and create good user experience. Every line of your code affects hundreds of millions of users. Every feature you build will be used by hundreds of millions of people.

You will:
- Play a critical role in planning and leading large-scale technical projects to lay the foundation for the iterative development and scale of early products
- Participate in developing robust, efficient technology products that serve 1 billion users
- Be an initiator in improving architecture to ensure high stability and performance
- Be Involved in researching and applying cutting-edge domain and technical knowledge into products which could benefit world wide TikTok users.

Qualifications

- BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major.
- 5+ years of experience in high scalable, highly available, distributed and mission-critical systems.
- Large scale client-facing industry project development experience.
- Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
- Deep understanding of computer architecture, data structures and algorithms in depth knowledge of common databases and messaging frameworks like MySQL/Redis/Kafka
- Able to work closely with diverse stakeholders and have good communication skills
- Self-driven, positive, cooperative and willing to keep learning enthusiasm at all times
- Live-streaming related knowledge is a plus but not mandatory

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Network Engineer (Entry level),"What The Role Is
As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.
Information Technology
IT systems form the backbone of our operations. We are looking for individuals with passion and IT expertise, to help us improve the delivery of our systems and services. The Board’s IT systems support a high daily volume of financial transactions for CPF members. In addition to keeping the lights on, the Board also keeps pace with the external environment through innovation in its IT systems.
What You Will Be Working On
You will be involved for day-to-day operations like organizing, installing, supporting and securing local area networks (LANs), wide area networks (WANs), network segments including design, implementation and maintenance to facilitate an uninterrupted flow of information by keeping our computer network running efficiently and effectively.
What We Are Looking For
Passionate about delivering mission-critical network infrastructure with an eye toward maintenance, optimization, and security
Academic or working knowledge with focus in network engineering, network infrastructure and networking concepts
Good understanding of infrastructure devices, including switches, routers, wireless access points, controllers, and firewalls
Enjoys problem solving where you will identify needs, monitoring performance, and troubleshoot, diagnose, and resolve issues with network and systems
Ability to perform routine/ scheduled network activities including upgrades, new implementations, migrations, and user support as needed
What you can expect
A challenging and rewarding career
A variety of formal and informal training where you can hone your skills in the evolving technology landscape
Promotion opportunities through your capability and on the job performance
A friendly work environment with like-minded colleagues to co-create and collaborate together
A hybrid work model where you can work remotely up to 50% of the time
A productive yet growth-oriented workplace with flexible dress code where you are empowered to decide your appropriate outfit for the day
Comprehensive rewards package
Annual leave and pro-family leave
Medical and dental benefits
Access to recreational activities
Position is on 2-year full time contract directly under the payroll of CPF Board with potential for emplacement into permanent position"
Trainee Teacher,"Trainee Teacher (Professional Conversion Programme)

ABOUT THE ROLE
A career with us at NTUC First Campus is an opportunity to excel at one of Singapore’s largest early childhood educators. One that brings together diverse disciplines, knowledge and skillsets to foster an inclusive culture. So you grow with an organisation that constantly innovates. And an industry leader that offers so much more.

Under Trainee Teacher (English Language), you will assume the role of Trainee Teacher position focus on looking after children from 18 months to 6 years old.

You will be attached at a My First Skool centres and be trained and mentored to equip you with practical teaching skills. You will also be sponsored to pursue the Diploma in Early Childhood Teaching (Conversion) and be provided with a competitive salary while you are on place and train scheme. Upon successful completion of course, you will be re-designated as English Childcare Teacher and serve a year bond.


ABOUT YOU:
· Minimum Diploma in any discipline from a local polytechnic
· Minimum C6 in GCE O level English
· Passion in equipping and inspiring young lives
· Have prior experience in taking care or babysitting children"
Backend Engineer Intern (NLP eCommerce) - 2022,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 09 May 2022 to 29 July 2022 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the two above internship periods.
Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.


About the NLP eCommerce team
The team is responsible for the research and development of NLP algorithms in our overseas e-commerce business, mainly including intelligent customer service and machine translation.
The team provides solutions such as intelligent dialogue, active service, intelligent marketing to continuously improve the efficiency of customer service staff and customers' experience. The algorithm capacities include the identification of a customer's incoming line, the intention understanding, and the solutions to various kinds of questions, etc.
The team is also responsible for the language quality of our overseas e-commerce platform (e.g., TikTok shopping, Fanno), including improving machine translation quality of products' information, IM of buyers and sellers, and supporting scenario of cross-lingual searching.


Responsibilities
- Responsible for NLP-related research and development, which mainly includes:
- Language understanding, including intention recognition, emotion recognition, FAQ, etc.;
- Building an intelligent dialogue system, including mining questions and answers;
- Multilingual text generation such as products' copy, dialogue summary, email reply, etc.;
- Machine translation, including the translation of product titles and details, IM and other scenarios;
- Cross-lingual search, including cross language matching, cross-lingual vector retrieval, etc.

Qualifications

- Undergraduate, or Postgraduate who is currently pursuing a degree/master in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline;
- Familiar with at least one computer programming language, including but not limited to C, C++, Java, Go, Python;
- Candidates who demonstrated research experience in published papers including but not limited to: ACL, EMNLP, NAACL, NIPS, ICML would be advantageous.


By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@tiktok.com."
UAT Tester,"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Technology and Operations services and Accenture Song—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 721,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

Responsibilities include but are not limited to:

Day to Day Onsite Support UAT (regarding Functionality, JIRA, Defects)

Daily UAT Preparation (Daily Deck, Status, Weekly Schedule, Reporting, JIRA monitoring, Test Script Uploading)

UAT Wave 1 Test Scenario Review

Support functional on functional shakedown in UAT environment

Critical Success Factors

Mandatory

Experience in Testing, or UAT support

Ability to understand business process and pick up system skills

JIRA / Excel Skill

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law.

The Organization

Accenture is an Irish-domiciled multinational professional services company that provides services in:

Technology

Strategy & Consulting

Interactive

Operations

As a Fortune Global 500 company, it has been incorporated in Dublin, Ireland since September 1, 2009.

With more than 500,000 employees worldwide—in 200 cities across 51 countries—Accenture also operates more than 100 “innovation hubs,” developing solutions for cloud, finance, and other industries.

The Pillar

Accenture Technology combines business and industry insights with innovative technology services to transform your business. Join one of the world’s largest independent providers of technology services to grow your expertise and help clients worldwide to innovate at scale and transform their businesses. Help change how the world works and lives

through technology innovation.

The Group

Accenture Cloud First is a new multi-service group of 70,000 cloud professionals that brings together the full power and breadth of Accenture’s industry and technology capabilities, ecosystem partnerships, and deep commitment to learning and upskilling clients’ employees and to responsible business, with the singular focus of enabling organizations to move to the cloud with greater speed and achieve greater value for all their stakeholders at this critical time. Specifically, this new group integrates the company’s wide-ranging cloud expertise, including:

Software Development, Cloud migration, infrastructure, and application services and ecosystem partnerships; deep industry and cross-industry insights, data and Applied Intelligence capabilities"
Application Support,"Application Support

ITCS Group is an IT Managed Services, Outsourcing and Talent-Sourcing company. We provide customised IT Consulting Solutions, Project Management, IT resourcing and on/off-shore Application Development Services across the Asia Pacific region. With offices strategically located in Hong Kong, Tokyo, Singapore, Sydney, and Mumbai. ITCS Group is the preferred technology partner for leading MNCs, including Global Investment Banks, Fortune 500 companies, across Asia Pacific.
 We are currently looking for an Application Support to join our banking and financial team in Singapore to support banking applications and improve its reliability and quality.

Responsibilities:
- Analyzing transaction failures and making recommendations to improve application reliability and quality, support processes, practices and procedures
- Making strong technical decisions and completing tasks & assignments under limited supervision
- Recognizing problems that need further investigations, seeking assistance when needed, and demonstrating initiative and self-motivation
- Ensuring documentation of production incidents and collaborating with different support and development teams and resolving issues.
- Assisting the team in devising new support processes and ensuring their implementation as per company policy.

Requirements:
- Experienced in incident management and / or application support
- Splunk and Blade Logic knowledge will be an added advantage

Additional Information:
- Location: 4-day Work From Home, 1-day office (HarbourFront)
- Working hours: 12-hour shift work; 8.30 am to 8.30 pm; 3- or 4-day workweek rotating.
- Training will be provided (In-office)
- VDI Environment; Bring Your Own Device (BYOD)"
Quality Assurance Engineer,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities

Work closely with team members (developers, product manager, customer support and partners) to develop, test and deliver high quality products
Prevent, collect, analyze and track product defects
Create detailed, comprehensive and well-structured test plans and test cases
Manage project dependencies and risk mitigation

Requirements

3 years+ of backend QA engineering experience, frontend manual/auto testing experience is great bonus.
Full cycle testing from designing manual tests, developing scripts and execution
Strong experience with UNIX/Linux
Scripting ability using Python, Bash or Java
Experience testing backend services such as APIs, Databases, distributed services (non-monolithic)
Enjoys breaking things and solving problems - not just able to find out the 'what', but also the 'why'
Fluent English and good communication skills

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Senior SDET - TikTok - Singapore,"Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

Team Intro
The TikTok QA team has been focusing on the high quality and the best user experience of TikTok products. Our team uses advanced auto-testing tools and comprehensive quality assurance methods to continuously control the delivery of products. We are looking for passionate software development engineers in test to join this fast growing industry.

You will
1. Design, develop, and implement functionality testing for mobile applications (iOS/Android) and the service of mobile applications;
2. Design test plans for new features and regression test cases;
3. Work on project management, risk management, and process management tasks;
4. Help implement test tools and collaborate with automation/performance test teams to build up internal tools/frameworks/platforms to make the team more productive;
5. Track defects manage bugs during the whole software development cycle.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor or above degree in Computer Science or related majors;
2. At least 5 years experience of testing, familiar with performance testing tools, iOS/Android automation, and/or test platform development;
3. Proficient in one or more coding languages, such as Python, Golang, PHP, Java, etc;
4. Deeply understand distributed application and iOS/Android fundamental knowledge;
5. Good at communication, able to push forward objectives in cross-region and cross-team collaboration;
6. Passionate about the mobile internet vertical and building next generation mobile application;
7. Experience in end-to-end quality assurance lifecycle.

Preferred Qualifications:
1. Familiar with common tech components, such as Redis, NSQ, Zero-MQ, Kafka, Docker, K8s, Hive, Spark;
2. Experience in project management or team leading.

D&I Statement
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Project Operation Technology Engineer,"Work with Digital & Analytics department on new Technologies
Working on billion-dollar scale projects within different business units across the organization

about the company
a leading provider of solutions to the Floating Offshore Oil & Gas market for more than 50 years already.

about the job

You will be focusing on connecting a previously isolated Systems and Equipment within OT network to the Enterprise IT environment and coordinating the data and information use into Advanced Analytics, AI, Automation, and other application to improve Business and Operational processes.

Digital innovation requires Operational Technology (OT) systems, to interact and connect with Enterprise Information Technology systems. With OT-IT integration, the data collected by physical equipment, vendor systems and devices can be used to identify problems or increase efficiencies.

about the manager/team


Report to Operation Technology Lead in Digital & Analytics department to support global initiatives across projects and phases.
Interact with Tech Team in Digital & Analytics department to support building digital infrastructure and solutions in-house and with 3rd party

Responsibilities:

Advocate, integrate and improve on existing technology change management process.
Develop, implement, and troubleshoot interfaces between the Business Systems and OT Networks.
Assist with Scoping, Development and Management of OT projects.
Assist with Hardware Lifecycle planning and standardization.
Liaising with key stakeholders
Participates in project design reviews to ensure consistency with required business outcomes.
Analyse Operation Technology (OT) and Information Technology (IT) networks for opportunities to improve integration, network architecture and security.
Provide architectural advice and oversight and input into selected Operational Application implementation projects
Design, document and deliver technical solutions to integrate FPSO OT Technology within company and client enterprise architectures.
Communicate effectively with, and between the immediate team, business subject matter experts, developers, analysts, engineers, end users of systems and management.
Skillsets
More than 3 years' experience of control system ""hands-on"" design in oil & gas industry.
Broad understanding of Technology Infrastructure and Applications to support FPSO Operations.
Understanding of Industrial Communications protocols.
Understanding of Network design and infrastructure used in both OT and IT realms.
Excellent communication skills with a strong technology focus.
Ability to understand complex and detailed business processes.
Having awareness of problems for conventional control system design and/or rooms for the improvement with Digital techniques.


To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may contact Neha Singh at 98387737.
(EA: 94C3609/R1324990)

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.




Desired Skills and Experience

Operation Technology, FPSO, client enterprise architectures, Control system, Network design, Cyber Security standards"
"Sr. Engineer, IT Infra Services, ROA","JOB PURPOSE
Lead and manage a team of technical specialists and outsourced service contractors in order to securely deliver IT infrastructure services in Rest of Asia, according to the specifications agreed with business/function, manufacturing and IT organizations.
Provide 24x7 reliable and responsive IT infrastructure services across the global landscape of SABIC's business operations to service its' customer in over 12 countries.
Accommodate future growth by making infrastructure a facilitating asset when integrating the infrastructure of acquired companies.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES
As a member of the Regional IT Services team, participate and contribute to the execution of the overall IT strategy to ensure Global IT maximizes its short, medium and long term value to its customers. Closely work with L4 and formulate and implement plans and budget in line with regional IT strategy for his/her location and befitting the department and needs and objectives of SBUs in Rest of Asia.
Create and manage robust operations review processes under ITIL/ISO standardized procedures across infrastructure solutions and services. Maintain understanding of critical business process and manufacturing operations.
Establish and lead an effective operational team, integrating key infrastructure related contacts with appropriate supplier representatives.
Track and communicate operational metrics (including trending over time) and identify process improvement opportunities.
Participate in teams supporting transformation projects with the businesses, such as refresh and consolidation strategies and infrastructure technology rollouts.
Work with business and service providers to identify and resolve systemic process and/or service delivery issues. Ensure that infrastructure (networks, data centers, servers, collaboration systems, backup and storage) incidents and problems are resolved in a timely and effective manner, and reduced by analyzing root cause, minimizing disruption to business operations and adhering to SLAs on availability and resolution response times.
Ensure businesses are aligned with infrastructure processes and are utilizing appropriate support and infrastructure management tools (service desk, virus protection, etc.).
Participate in, and provide critical input into, core corporate infrastructure planning activities, including strategic planning and annual operating plan.
Optimize the delivery of existing and new services and support the continuous improvement of the infrastructure architecture and design. Perform infrastructure asset (hardware, software and related infrastructure technology) assessments to determine their applicability and value for the enterprise.
Ensure execution of firm enterprise and IT policies across the Rest of Asia infrastructure team. Facilitate collaboration with application architects, infrastructure and IT security engineers, systems administrators, and other technology specialists in project and strategy implementation.
Influence and assist with the design, when appropriate, of new alternatives. Ensure 24x7x365 support of systems. Align with global counterparts in order to achieve standardized operations and leverage subject matter expertise.
Set administrative management priorities across the team based on business requirements. Direct day-to-day operations, providing expertise and encouraging teamwork, to achieve high performance standards and meet targets. Secure knowledge level of workforce is up to standard. Adhere to and promote relevant infrastructure policies and procedures.
Exercise financial authority within established limits and control departmental/project budget expenditure in the region. Provide L4 manager with information related to department performance including cost allocation (input for service bundles). Plan and develop department annual/project budget and control expenditures aligned with it. Manage the financial operational performance. Manage costs allocation process integrity and completeness.
Plan staffing in accordance with knowledge and experience needs. Conduct appraisals for all internal direct reports and external service contractors to the position. Proactively coach and mentor less senior staff.
Maintain regular contact with the regional IT L4 managers and relevant regional peers to ensure services are aligned to their needs. Ensure involvement of right stakeholders for major incidents communications and resolution on root cause fixes. Ensure involvement of right stakeholders in pro-active communications regarding scheduled maintenance efforts, planned upgrades and system outages. Align horizontally about the feasibility of the service levels to provide SME input to the stakeholders. Recognize and acknowledge complaints and concerns.
Analyze recurring incidents and performance of existing systems, processes, people and ensure corrective actions are taken. Continuously look for opportunities to make the functions' processes more efficient.

EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS
University of Bachelor's Degree in IT or Electrical or Electronic Engineering
10 years’ experience in Information Technology environment, preferably in IT or petrochemical industry
5 years management experience in different business or IT functions or programs
ITIL Foundations certification


SABIC is committed to creating a diverse work environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and as such will not discriminate in its employment practices, including recruiting and hiring practices, based on a person’s race, color, religion, national origin, citizenship, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation and pregnancy), age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, or other characteristics protected by law."
Technical Lead,"609039BR

Introduction

As an IBM Application Architect, you directly help clients transform their business and solve complex problems. You will define the scope and vision for projects that deliver customized solutions using your knowledge of IBM platforms. You are a technical leader, serving as a liaison among business partners, technical resources, and project stakeholders.

Your Role and Responsibilities

About The Job

As a Business Analyst in IBM, you will:

Analyse business needs, gaps and issues using Agile methodology
Recommend best possible solutions to address the problem
Stakeholder management and engagement for both internal, client and industry stakeholders
Overall accountability to ensure high quality and timely solution delivery
Understand and translate customer needs into business and technology solutions, providing consultation on the customer digital journey and digital transformation
Provide implementation of design services through a range of digital methodologies
Analyze as-is and to-be processes to define system/technology/business requirements
Support user requirements capture and translation of requirements into business and digitally enabled solutions
Support the delivery of quality functional/application digital designs
Support development and implementation of quality business digital solutions for the client

About you:

You are someone we are looking for if you have the following expertise:

Query data to understand user adoption and usage of SG Tech Stack products.
Design, build, launch and maintain efficient, reliable and basic data pipelines to support understanding of users’ adoption and usage of the SG Tech Stack
Support data cleansing and standardization to manage end-to-end data collection and analysis
Integrate and collate data silos in a manner which is both scalable and compliant
Develop new data extraction, transformation and loading processes in production
Provide data visualization as needed to aid in understanding the data
Assist with the interpretation of insights from the data to support decision making
Facilitation, negotiation and conflict resolution skills, and demonstrated success at building teams and relationships with key people in local and remote sites.
Demonstrated sound interpersonal and communications skills.
Understanding of the business processes and ability to detail them as needed by the project.
Skilled in analysing and reengineering business processes and recommending solutions.
Experience in facilitating workshops and brainstorming sessions to gather business requirements.

Desired Background

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or have equivalent professional experience
Minimum 3 to 5 years’ experience in business analyst role or equivalent management consulting experience.
Experience with query languages such as SQL, and Unix query tools such as awk or grep.
Experience implementing batch and streaming data pipelines
Some understanding of DevOps tools such as BitBucket, Gitlab, and Bamboo
Knowledge of Stack Technologies would be a plus, such as map-reduce.
Exhibit a data-driven mindset and able to communicate well with data
Demonstrate resourcefulness and creativity when working on data manipulation with common and basic tools likes excel, text editors, google sheets
Meticulous, strong analytical ability, documentation and project management skills.
Good interpersonal, communication, decision-making skills and a responsible attitude.
Ability to multi-task and work well under pressure.
Any prior experience in Business Process Management projects and/or Agile Methodology will be beneficial.
Knowledge and working experience with Cloud, AI Automation, Big Data technologies would be advantageous.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

As shared above.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

As shared above.

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

About IBM

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
SOC Engineer-DDos,"At F5, we strive to bring a better digital world to life. Our teams empower organizations across the globe to create, secure, and run applications that enhance how we experience our evolving digital world. We are passionate about cybersecurity, from protecting consumers from fraud to enabling companies to focus on innovation.

Everything we do centers around people. That means we obsess over how to make the lives of our customers, and their customers, better. And it means we prioritize a diverse F5 community where each individual can thrive.

Our Security as a Service (SaaS) Security Operations Center (SOC) is the epicenter of dynamic security events; clients under siege daily, with new attacks and attack vectors evolving continuously. You will partner collaboratively with seasoned engineers to keep our customers safe and stop attackers cold, around the clock. As part of a Global SOC team, you will be responsible for managing cloud-based security systems on behalf of F5 clients, providing real time protection, detection, mitigation, and resolution of security events. The SOC DDoS Analyst is a master of identifying DDoS attacks and is a skilled security defender.

Sounds interesting? Read on!

What You’ll Do

Take proactive and reactive steps to mitigate Layer 4-7 security threats against F5 clients
Interact directly with F5 clients who are under attack via phone, chat, email and/or ticketing systems
Provide proactive and real-time guidance to customers on network configuration, security protocols, and defensive security response
Document activities taken in incident management systems, knowledge base, or ticketing systems, as required
Establish yourself as a trusted security advisor internally and externally
Assist F5 clients with onboarding and provisioning
Engage and support cross-functional teams
Investigate new attacks and vulnerabilities
Appropriately manage time and customer issues based on issue severity and business needs
Collaborate with Product Management and Development on requirements and product release activities
Identify, define, and implement process and procedure improvements
Ensures documented processes and procedures are relevant and up to date

What You’ll Bring

B.S. in Information System Security or Computer Science or equivalent job experience
2+ years’ experience in the Information Security or network security field, Network Security, SOC, or NOC experience is a plus.
Must be able to communicate technical and operational details fluently in English (written and oral)
Excellent customer service skills, robust troubleshooting and problem-solving ability including analytical thinking and a strong attention to detail
Experience with global routing and networking technologies (GRE, BGP, ASN routing), skilled understanding of HTTP
Technical knowledge of, and experience, troubleshooting TCP/IP networks
Fundamental Linux skills
Knowledge of Layer 7 DDoS attack mitigation
Familiarity with a programming or scripting language is a plus
Ability to perform log file analysis
Ability to develop creative, efficient solutions to complex problems

What You’ll Get

Hybrid working mode
Career growth and development opportunities
Recognitions and Rewards
Employee Assistance Program
Competitive pay, comprehensive benefits, and cool perks
Culture of Giving Back
Dynamic Diversity & Inclusion interest groups

Apply if you believe your own unique capabilities can contribute to the success of this role and our organization!

The Job Description is intended to be a general representation of the responsibilities and requirements of the job. However, the description may not be all-inclusive, and responsibilities and requirements are subject to change.

Please note that F5 only contacts candidates through F5 email address (ending with @f5.com) or auto email notification from Yello/Workday (ending with f5.com or @myworkday.com).

Equal Employment Opportunity

It is the policy of F5 to provide equal employment opportunities to all employees and employment applicants without regard to unlawful considerations of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, sensory, physical, or mental disability, marital status, veteran or military status, genetic information, or any other classification protected by applicable local, state, or federal laws. This policy applies to all aspects of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, job assignment, compensation, promotion, benefits, training, discipline, and termination. F5 offers a variety of reasonable accommodations for candidates. Requesting an accommodation is completely voluntary. F5 will assess the need for accommodations in the application process separately from those that may be needed to perform the job. Request by contacting accommodations@f5.com."
Associate Technical Product Manager,"Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Job Description

This is a go to role for technology team for product requirements, business analysis, system use cases and impact assessment due to changes in other VISA systems, for VISA’s global dispute management system known as Visa Resolve Online.

Visa Resolve Online (VROL) is a web-based application that enforces the rules and workflow of disputes. VROL is a mandated service that is crucial to the Visa brand promise of providing secure and reliable payment services by ensuring that cardholders, merchants, and issuing/acquiring financial institutions have a clear dispute process and enabling technology, making resolution of disputed transactions fast and easy. The Associate Systems Analyst will be part of VROL analyst team responsible for managing requirements, working with business partners to define the scope of product enhancements, and translate those requirements into written detailed use case documentation and functional requirements specifications. This position reports to a Sr. Director of Global Dispute Processing organization and is based in Singapore.

Responsibilities

The primary responsibility will be to work with product office & technology teams to review and understand business requirements and to translate those requirements into detailed uses cases
Effectively use planning tools such as Jira to develop documents and to provide clear vision for scope, use cases, workflows, wire-frames, product requirements, acceptance criteria and other materials as needed to support technical design, development and QA activities
Ensure requirements issues are identified, tracked, reported on and resolved in a timely manner
Work very closely with development team, participate in high level solution of the product
Work closely with QA team to validate and ensure the high quality product releases
Effectively communicate plan, status, issues, and risks in a precise and timely manner
Contribute to development integration testing process to assure that developed solutions meet business requirements and use case scenarios
Engage closely with Product office and other groups to document non-functional requirements

Qualifications

Pursuing a Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering or a related discipline
Graduation date within 18 months to the start date, and less than 2 years of fulltime work experience

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
"Salesforce Developer (one year, renewable)","An exciting Salesforce Developer (one year, renewable) job has opened up at a broadcast and media company in Singapore.

About The Salesforce Developer (one Year, Renewable) Role

The company is seeking a talented Salesforce Developer who is experienced in custom development with Salesforce Lightning Components, Salesforce Lightning Web Components, Apex, Visualforce and force.dom platform. You will propose the technical solution design for enhancement of our Salesforce Service, Sales and Marketing clouds.

Key Responsibilities
Responsible for solution and design reviews, integration and data approach, release management methodology, fit/gap analysis of product capabilities, adoption approach, and best practices related to use of the Salesforce.com platform and guidance around adoption of Salesforce functionality
Responsible for designing, coding, developing, integrating and implementing enhancement to Salesforce systems
Responsible for new development along with providing oversight of support for existing developed functionalities by supporting developers
Responsible for heavy configuration within service, sales and marketing clouds
Provide ongoing application expertise and guidance to roll out releases and features faster based on business priorities
To succeed in this Salesforce Developer (one year, renewable) role, you must have a minimum of three years' experience with Apex.

Key Requirements
IT or equivalent degree from a reputable university
Salesforce certifications
A proven technical background, with at least three years’ experience of implementation and support of secure, stable and flexible tenant designs for Salesforce cloud product solutions
Extensive experience implementing and supporting custom development and configuration for Salesforce
Advanced experience creating and supporting custom web services
Demonstrated proficiency in infrastructure architecture design, including optimisation, administration and security for Salesforce cloud product solutions
Demonstrated proficiency with more than three years’ experience in the following programming languages: Apex, JavaScript and CSS. Experience in shell script and Java is an advantage
Two to three years' experience in Lightning Components and experience in Lightning Web Components development
Advanced experience writing configuration documents, preparing technical and functional specification documents, and delivering documentation to be used for future reference
Extensive experience preparing landscape designs, creating diagrams, writing technical specifications and delivering documentation to be used for future reference
Strong understanding and application of Salesforce Best Practices
Skill in analysing and resolving issues, including the ability to conduct related research and work with the end users to raise Salesforce Customer incidents as needed
Excellent communication skills (written and verbal)
Team player with strong facilitation skill and ability to plan and organise work
This is an excellent opportunity to advance your career with a broadcast and media company.

If you are seeking the opportunity to work in a team that spearheads cutting edge technology that will surely challenge a developer's career, this Salesforce Developer (one year, renewable) role is right for you. Due to the urgency of the role, they encourage only Singapore-based applicants to apply.

Apply today or contact me to learn more.

Do note that we will only be in touch if your application is shortlisted.

Robert Walters (Singapore) Pte Ltd

ROC No.: 199706961E | EA Licence No.: 03C5451

EA Registration No.: R1768414 Stephanie Tan"
Regional Lead Logistics Solution Engineer,"The Regional Lead Logistics Solution Engineer Work closely with pursuit leaders to diagnose customer’s supply chain needs and design world class solutions, from the LL portfolio, that are competitive and compelling, while driving clear value for the client and Maersk, resulting in industry leading win rates.

We offer
Maersk is a global logistics industry leader, and working in the forefront with our large customer base gives a unique chance to make a significant difference on world trade & economy together with talented colleagues. We value diversity and values of our staff, and offer competitive compensation.

Key Responsibilities
Orchestrate solution strategy cradle to grave
Provide pre sales support, in collaboration with Sales and/or SCD, to map supply chain flows and document issues or requirements while identifying potential solutions and, where appropriate, calculating customer value; confirming understanding and need for change
Identify strategic scenarios and drive alignment on most compelling strategy that positions Maersk to win
Provide input towards, and secure sign off and support for, all pursuits through the relevant OMEB stage gates and relevant functions
Provide necessary support to the pursuit process for defining, articulating, presenting and selling the solution towards the customer
Ensure assumptions and statement of work is documented with the offer and included in the customer contract to mitigate scope creep
Comprehensive hand over to implementation team, with stage gate sign off by engineer to ensure full scope is implemented as promised

Detailed Solution design, costing & pricing
Capture core data and assumptions that are required to design, cost and price the solution for the customer, including the establishment of a process for capturing all customer insights that might be relevant for this pursuit or future upselling opportunities
Develop detailed designs for the solution incorporating the scope of services, operating model, resource models, operating cost estimates, recommended selling price, estimated value for the client and draft P&L for Maersk
In collaboration with the implementation team, define likely implementation strategy, timelines and cost estimates.
Establish and highlight future potential up selling journey for Maersk with the customer
Coordinate across products and functions to ensure full solution can be presented to support the pitch, including HSSE, BCP, etc

Be an active participant within the Global Lead Logistics Community
Capture and share knowledge / best practices throughout the organization to support short and long term success
Speak up and share both supportive and critical views in a way that fosters a dynamic and engaging pursuit of continuous improvement

We are looking for
Strategic analytical & modelling capability, ability to translate complex requirements into tangible solutions
Extensive Supply Chain and logistics network knowledge, Digital / IT understanding
Expertise within key verticals
Well developed stakeholder management and influencing skills.
Strong understanding of commercial solution sales process and consultative sales techniques"
Product Manager,"Job Reference #

268185BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Are you the product manager we’re looking for?


An established product manager
You know how to defi ne a purpose, vision and strategy that fosters the buy-in and input of your teamand key stakeholders
You focus on defi ning and executing an outcomes-focused roadmap
You are familiar with an OKR based approach to measuring and tracking success
You’re passionate about clients
You understand the critical importance of client feedback at the fi rst mile
You’re deeply passionate about helping our clients achieve their objectives
You’re familiar with Design Thinking
A problem solver
Have an engineering and / or technical background
You’re comfortable with tackling technical issues – applying a logical and structured approach
Focus on the ‘why’, understanding the end objective and creatively fi nding solutions
Data-fi rst approach
You take accountability for using metrics to drive performance
You have an experimentation mindset – objectively delivering solutions using data-driven insights
You recognise the inherent role of data in the end to end delivery of digital experiences

Share


You’re a team player
You understand the importance of a ‘one team’ mindset
You make time to understand and address the needs and challenges of your teammates
You’re transparent, empathetic and respectful
You’re passionate about platforms and digital transformation
You understand the role of platform orchestration
You’re excited to take on the challenge of transformation amid complexity across regions, asset classesand group divisions
Strong understanding of on-going technology trends and know how to practically apply

Your team


UBS Neo is a global, cross-asset and cross-divisional platform that empowers UBS clients and staff tocreate, discover and consume investment capabilities across digital channels at UBS. UBS Neo has 2m+users on-boarded, 100+ apps and 700+ developer community!
The UBS Neo platform team is a group of dynamic, talented and diverse engineers, designers andproduct management professionals, specialising in client centric design and exciting web basedtechnologies
UBS Neo is part of the Digital Platforms unit of UBS Investment Bank

Diversity helps us grow, together. That’s why we are committed to fostering and advancing diversity, equity, and inclusion. It strengthens our business and brings value to our clients.

Your expertise

Min 3+ years of professional experience in a product management role(s)


Experience of Investment Banking industry is favourable
Engineering and / or technical background is favourable
Experience of working with clients and / or sales is favourable
Experience of working for platform company is favourable
Excellent stakeholder and relationship management skills
Ability to adapt and network across a global organization
Strong communicator to eff ectively engage internal colleagues across the fi rm and external partners
Ability to analyze key themes and trends using data, to identify opportunities and measure your impact
Entrepreneurial mindset, intellectual curiosity, and a collaborative spirit
Demonstrable ability and experience in defi ning and executing on strategic and commercial vision
Proactive and persistent approach to ensure end-product is commercially impactful

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Application Engineer,"STMicroelectronics is a world leader in providing the semiconductor solutions that make a positive contribution to people’s lives, both today and in the future. ST is one of the world’s largest semiconductor companies as a leading Integrated Device Manufacturer serving all electronics segments with key strengths in Sense and Power, Automotive, and Embedded Processing Solutions.

STMicroelectronics has the need for a Distribution Account Executive in Schaumburg, IL to generate sales in conjunction with distribution partners for customers in one or more territories by developing business relations through promoting ST image and product portfolio to customers and distributors.

Role Overview:
Work Location : Ang Mo Kio BHQ Site at 5A Serangoon North Avenue 5 Singapore 554574

As a Firmware engineer, you are at the center of many activities. You are the one making the bridge between the system requirements and the IC capabilities. You interface with architects and IC design teams. Software is a key element when it comes to get the quintessence and the ultimate performances from the IC.
In complex systems, some critical functions can also be implemented in software. You can have to deal with real time software, including real time operating system, communication protocols. You can have to deal with filtering and signal processing. You are responsible of all the project steps, from the specification, development, testing to the integration and validation on the IC.
From this software view, you are also involved in customer related activities like documentation (user manual, …) and customer support for complex cases.
In this role it is important to keep pace on the latest technical solutions and technologies, be innovative and creative, take initiative and be autonomous, and work as part of a team of technical experts.

Candidate Profile
Requirements:
You have graduated from an engineering or equivalent level.
You are looking for a first professional experience or have a first experience in Firmware Development and wish to extend your knowledge in this field.
You have good knowledge on software programming (C/C++, Python, …).
You may have basic or advanced skills on digital signal processing.
You are open minded with a good level of listening skills and enjoy working in a diversified team.
You are autonomous, analytical, motivated and desire to propose innovative and competitive ideas for the development of new successful products.
You have graduated from an engineering or equivalent level.
You are looking for a first professional experience or have a first experience in Firmware Development and wish to extend your knowledge in this field.
You have good knowledge on software programming (C/C++, Python, …)You may have basic skills on digital signal processing.
You are open minded with a good level of listening skills and enjoy working in a diversified team.
You are autonomous, analytical, motivated and desire to propose innovative and competitive ideas for the development of new successful products."
Programme Management Associate,"Site Name: Singapore - Quality Road

Posted Date: Jan 3 2023

Interested in a unique opportunity to help manage the career transition for employees? Then this is the role for you!

Quality Road will be exiting the supply chain end 2024. This presents a rare opportunity for you to be involved in the planning, development and execution of various capability building activities to power up the employees for their next career phase, be it internal redeployment, external opportunities or retirement. You will be working closely with various key stakeholders across Singapore GSK sites to tailor programmes suitable for each group of employees. Through effective communications means, you will be creating the communications strategy and media for employees to be engaged throughout the journey.

Being a part of the site exit team, you will also get the opportunity to assist and learn how various functions plan and work towards decommissioning. This provides you a very good foundation of the pharmaceutical manufacturing business.

Key Responsibilities Area

Develop and implement capability building framework and roadmap for exit employees for transition into their next career phase
Design and implement site exit communications strategy with change management principles to ensure business transparency and projects updates communications
Engage employees through organisation and management of site activities, engagement and teambuilding events to ensure alignment with Quality Road vision strategy of Purpose with Passion, PowerUp for future and Pride in our legacy
Lead, develop and implement culture programmes in alignment with new GSK culture to ensure high staff morale and staff continues to be motivated, energized, and engaged
Liaison and management of external service providers engaged to support communications and capability building programmes
Support programme lead / manager in coordination and engagement of the various workstreams (HR, Productions, Quality, Engineering, Logistics, Finance, EHS, IT) teams to ensure completion of key deliverables for site exit
Development of new and timely internal (and as required external) communications and event materials including videos, slide packs, to support Quality Road site exit vision
Monitor effectiveness of internal (and/or external) communications activities

Basic requirements:

Good Degree in related studies
1-3 years relevant experience in communications/ events management / project management. Fresh graduates are welcomed.
Good knowledge or interest on pharmaceutical manufacturing
Excellent knowledge of communications channels, publication and short video production & editing process
Excellent interpersonal skills, to be able to relate to all levels of staff
Ability to conceptualise and communicate ideasAbility to work independently
Excellent coordination and management skills
Understanding of working with internal and external stakeholders and service providers
Able to take initiative and display resourcefulness at work.
Leadership skills to facilitate and drive discussions to fruition
Excellent spoken and written English
Good computer knowledge in MS Office

This role will be a contractual role ending in 2024. There will be opportunities for movement across GSK sites.

To learn more about Singapore GSK and our people, please click on this link: https://www.linkedin.com/company/glaxosmithkline/life/gsksingapore

Why GSK

Uniting science, talent, and technology to get ahead of disease together

GSK is a global biopharma company with a special purpose – to unite science, technology and talent to get ahead of disease together – so we can positively impact the health of billions of people and deliver stronger, more sustainable shareholder returns – as an organisation where people can thrive. Getting ahead means preventing disease as well as treating it, and we aim to impact the health of 2.5 billion people around the world in the next 10 years.

Our success absolutely depends on our people. While getting ahead of disease together is about our ambition for patients and shareholders, it’s also about making GSK a place where people can thrive. We want GSK to be a place where people feel inspired, encouraged and challenged to be the best they can be. A place where they can be themselves – feeling welcome, valued and included. Where they can keep growing and look after their wellbeing. So, if you share our ambition, join us at this exciting moment in our journey to get Ahead Together.

Important notice to Employment businesses/ Agencies

GSK does not accept referrals from employment businesses and/or employment agencies in respect of the vacancies posted on this site. All employment businesses/agencies are required to contact GSK's commercial and general procurement/human resources department to obtain prior written authorization before referring any candidates to GSK. The obtaining of prior written authorization is a condition precedent to any agreement (verbal or written) between the employment business/ agency and GSK. In the absence of such written authorization being obtained any actions undertaken by the employment business/agency shall be deemed to have been performed without the consent or contractual agreement of GSK. GSK shall therefore not be liable for any fees arising from such actions or any fees arising from any referrals by employment businesses/agencies in respect of the vacancies posted on this site."
Recruitment Management Program,"Gravitas is an International recruitment company focusing on Financial services and Technology niches with offices in the Hong Kong, Singapore, London, Leeds, Manchester, Netherland, Munich and Shenzhen

Regarded as one of the fastest growing global recruitment brands we have grown internationally from our inception in 2010 to over 350 employees. Internally we place emphasis on training and development at all levels, fairness and living our values of Respect, Integrity, Passion and Excellence. Gravitas has been a true success story of 2020 to 2022 – with our highest number of placements, multiple records broken, multiple promotions, expanding into bigger offices & brand-new teams.

Due to this unprecedented growth we are hiring Recruitment Consultants for our specialized teams in Banking, Insurance, Technology & Contracting for the Singapore office. Fresh Grads are welcome!

We are currently recruiting for the following teams:
· Banking
· Insurance
· Technology
· Contracting

About the Opportunity:
· Competitive base salary plus a rare no threshold, uncapped commission scheme and other company benefits
· Work with wide range of MNC and Fortune 500 companies.
· Meritocratic career path – unlimited potential for career progression
· Award winning training programs designed to guide you through every step of your career.
· Dynamic and fun environment with culture that recognizes and rewards high performers.
· International career progression and opportunities to work within Asia and UK offices.

About you:
· Bachelor’s degree or above in Business Management/ Economics/ Marketing/ Communications or any related disciplines
· Fresh Graduates are welcome to apply!
· Strong interpersonal skills with good business acumen.
· Driven and motivated individual who can embrace challenges with a positive mindset and celebrate success.
· Fluent English, Cantonese & Mandarin

What will you be doing?
· Sourcing and screening candidates across different channels. Utilizing various recruitment tools and headhunting/ cold calling to build your own candidate base.
· Provide market insight, knowledge and updates to candidates and build long term relationships.
· Preparing your candidates for interviews, managing expectations, pre-closing, closing, and offering candidates
· Delivering quality recruitment services to new and existing clients
· Identify, develop, and build relationship with potential clients and building your own portfolio.
· Provide market information and knowledge with clients.
· Contract negotiations
· End to end recruitment process. Catching up with candidates and clients on a regular basis, managing your own candidate/ client pool.

Are you up for the challenge? Click on Apply Now or contact +852 3896 2537 for a private and confidential discussion. Please note that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. All information collected will be for recruitment purposes ONLY."
DevOps Engineer (Junior),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
DevOps Engineer is a specialist role in Decision Science as part of the Technology & Business consulting department to support primary activities in our Application Delivery services. A DevOps Engineer shall work closely with the Solution Architect, Technical Consultant, Security Manager, and Scrum Master (or Project Manager) to support the Agile Development team in designing, planning, delivering, and securing client applications in both on-prem and on-cloud environments.

Responsibilities
Work closely with an agile build and run team to deliver the application software, using Continuous Integration (CI) and Continuous Deployment (CD) practices and its related toolsets.
Work closely with the client’s platform/infra engineering team to deliver the infrastructure and operating environment for container-based microservices that meet the agreed high availability, performance, and security requirements.
Work closely with other internal teams within the organization to ensure that solutions are designed with customer user experience, scale/performance, security and operability in mind.
Ensure that the software releases are aligned and follow the application release and deployment process for the various projects.
Facilitate and support the troubleshooting or root cause analysis of platform issues or incidents.
Proactively identify opportunities for automation, process improvement and architecture simplification for the platforms/services/products.
In charge of project planning and management activities such as cloud services estimation, delivery schedules, internal enablement, security auditing…
Work closely with the solution team to gather requirements and prioritizes the requirements for the various teams to deliver
Research and suggest the latest, most relevant technologies and trends for continuous improvement of the platforms/services/products.
Qualifications And Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or other relevant qualifications
Minimum 6 years of working experience in software delivery for sizable transformational or digitalization projects
Proficiency in CI/CD tool chains such as Gitlab, Bitbucket, Jenkins, Bamboo, SonarQube, Fortify SCA, Fortify WebInspect, Sonatype Nexus, JFrog Artifactory, and etc.
Comprehensive experience and knowledge of containerization technologies such as Dockers, Kubernetes (K8s), and et.
Solid understanding and experience on Terraform and Infrastructure-as-code
Hands-on experience on AWS/Azure Cloud will be an advantage
Certifications for AWS/Azure Solutions Architect and DevOps Engineer will be highly considered
English-speaking with good communication and teamwork skills
Ability to work within fast-paced agile development environment
Candidates with extensive experience, excellent communication skills and good certifications will be considered for Senior and Lead positions.
NOTICE

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.

By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read and agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining, and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration.

Consequences of Not Providing Personal Data for Transaction/Service/Application

Please be noted that should you not consent and provide us with the relevant personal data to fulfil the “Purposes” of collection, use and disclosure of your personal data by Decision Science Agency Pte Ltd, it may hinder our ability to continue to interact with you. We may not be able to make a decision on your recruitment and employment or comply with the law and therefore, we may not be able to make an offer of employment.

You may refer to and access our website https://www.decision-science.com/ for more information.
Desired Skills and Experience
Troubleshooting, Application Security, Kubernetes, Architect, Scrum, High Availability, Agile, Root Cause Analysis, Artifactory, Information Technology, Project Planning, Scratch, Continuous Integration, Ansible, Teamwork Skills, Agile Development"
Senior Network Engineer,"Who We’re Looking For

As the Senior Network Engineer at Schroders, you'll be part of the Singapore GT Infrastructure team that is responsible for providing high quality support and project/change capability for all infrastructure components both in Singapore and across the Asia-Pacific region, as well as working closely with your global counterparts

About Schroders

We’re a global investment manager. We help institutions, intermediaries and individuals around the world invest money to meet their goals, fulfil their ambitions, and prepare for the future. We have around 4,000 people on six continents. And we’ve been around for over 200 years, but keep adapting as society and technology changes. What doesn’t change is our commitment to helping our clients, and society, prosper.

The base

This role will be based in Singapore

What You’ll Do
Providing level 3 support of LAN, WAN and firewall environments, including problem isolation and resolution, performances troubleshooting and monitoring, change management, incident management
Support network engineering changes including infrastructure and business projects. Some out of hours activities to support projects and level 3 escalation for operation issues.
Maintain network documentation, including inventory management
Contribute to the active management of device life cycles.
Operate in a global team to support the global networks estate
Engage with the broader Schroders teams in the management and resolution of major incidents and problems
Troubleshoot, perform root cause analysis.
The Knowledge, Experience, And Qualifications You’ll Need
CCNP certified with minimum 8 years of level 2/3 network support experience in an MNC environment
Experience working on routing & switching (BGP, EIGRP, ISIS)
Experience working on firewalls (Palo Alto and Checkpoint)
Experience supporting voice such as Microsoft Teams or Cisco Unified Communications
Experience on Network appliances like McAfee Web Gateway, Infoblox DDI/NetMRI, Citrix Netscaler, Forescout NAC or Cisco DNAC/WLC
Experience creating high quality documentation
Experience working with managed service providers and outsourcers
Knowledgeable in multiple system platforms and technology disciplines
Knowledgeable in ManageEngine and Ansible
The knowledge, experience and qualifications that will be good to have
Knowledge in Video conferencing solutions such as Cisco CMS/CUCM/Express-C and Express-E.
Knowledge of Azure and AWS cloud
What You’ll Be Like
Enjoys solving problems and adopting proactive approach through use of technology.
Positive attitude and capable of remaining positive when under pressure
Ability to work collaboratively with regional and global counterparts across time zones and to share information with the wider team
Able to challenge the status quo and improve the overall user experience
Strong organisational and time management skills
An inquisitive thinker, with attention to detail.
We’re Looking For The Best, Whoever They Are

Schroders is an equal opportunities employer. You’re welcome here whatever your sex, marital status, ethnic origin, sexual orientation, religious belief or age.

(SIN01891)"
"Product Manager (AVP), Equity Derivatives","This is an opportunity to join a leading global exchange which is recognized again by Asia Risk and FOW as the “Derivatives Exchange of the Year” and “Exchange of Year” in 2022.
Singapore Exchange’s Equities Derivatives Unit is seeking to hire an experienced Product Manager. This is a front office role with PNL responsibility to formulate product strategy and execute plans to grow volumes, revenues, and market share.
We are looking for a business person with market knowledge of exchange-listed products and equity indices. The ideal candidate should be able to function most of the time as a generalist, while retaining the flexibility to dive deep into the various aspects of exchange-listed products such as index methodology, derivatives product design, legal, regulatory, risk management, technological, and operational as required from time to time.

You will be part of a dynamic and experienced team supported by various units in the organization to help you become successful.

You need to be curious, positive, and ready to deal with challenges, including learning about new pillars of development such as Sustainability and Digital Assets.

Key Accountabilities and Deliverables
· Manage the PNL of exchange-listed equity derivatives products in a fast-growing but also hyper-competitive global equity derivatives market.
· Develop and implement product strategy in alignment with corporate goals to achieve growth in product volumes, revenues, as well as breadth and depth of ecosystem.
· Work with the sales team to identify areas of customer growth and acquisition, create and deliver product pitches
· Develop positive relationships with global sales team to engage the institutional investor ecosystem through different channels.
· Be the leader of the end-to-end launch process for new products and services, which includes working with index partners, consulting market participants, ensuring technological readiness, designing operational workflows, and obtaining the necessary regulatory, legal and risk approvals.

Requirements
· A Bachelor's degree or equivalent professional qualification in Finance, Business, Economics.
· Minimum of 5 years of relevant working experience in the financial industry, including experience in index management, research or product development with an index provider, asset manager or investment bank.
· Reasonable knowledge of capital markets and derivatives products, as well as a deep understanding of financial services industry dynamics across major institutional segments.
· Comfortable with data analysis
· Existing professional network and industry contacts.
· Demonstrated track record in delivery and results.
· Bonus points for quantitative modelling and coding skills.
· Bonus points for working knowledge of index strategies and corporate actions, as well as industry trends such as ESG, multi-factor, smart beta indices and digital assets

Essential Attributes
· Curious, positive, forward-looking, organized, and ready to deal with challenges.
· Strong problem-solving, negotiation, analytical, project management, written and verbal communication skills.
· Excellent communicator with strong interpersonal and influencing kills
· Track record in dealing diverse and international group of stakeholders
· Resourceful and adaptable; ability to work well under pressure and service a variety of stakeholder needs
· Self-starter and highly motivated; ability to work independently
Collaborative working approach and a team player"
Account Support Executive (6-months Contract),"Want to be a part of our team?

Working at NTT

Responsibilities
Service Level Agreements
Assist with delivery of an agreed level of IT service as agreed with the client
Define service improvement initiatives and communicate these to relevant Service Delivery Manager
Conduct service analysis
Analytically access the environment (people, process, calls) to determine trends and problem areas
Take responsibility for resolution of client issues through problem and trend analysis
Assist with documentation of training material to be used to educate Service Improvement Team in the production and publication of reports
Produce and use reports
Use information contained in the schedules to identify and document mechanisms which must be used to request, produce and deliver adhoc reports
Assist with identification of sources of data for existing and new reports
Work closely with Service Level Analyst and internal clients in defining what would add value to existing reports and discuss the structure required

Requirements
Can commit to a 6-months full time position
Open to Singaporeans & PRs only
Able to start work on short notice is preferred
At least a Diploma
At least 1 year experience in similar coordination or administrative support roles with hands-on MS Excel reporting
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications e.g. Excel, Words
Presentable, proactive and able to work with a variety of stakeholders
Possess good interpersonal communication skills
Meticulous in handling figures with good eye for details
Candidates with minimal work experience but relevant internships/co-curricular experience are welcomed to apply

Preferred Requirements
Exposure in MNC environment preferably in a client-facing or account servicing role

What will make you a good fit for the role?"
Seasoning Technician,"Join us and celebrate the beauty of human experience. Create for happier, healthier lives, with love for nature. Together, with our customers, we deliver food innovations, craft inspired fragrances and develop beauty and wellbeing solutions. There’s much to learn and many to learn from, with more than 16,800 employees around the world to explore ideas and ambitions with.

In Singapore, you’ll be at the centre of every innovation, creation and solution available to the entire Asia-pacific region. Working with our research, creation and production units, as well as our renowned perfumery school, you’ll make us a greater force for good. Every day, your passion, your creativity, and your expertise will shape our future, making a positive difference on billions of people. Every essence of you enriches our world. We are Givaudan. Human by nature.

Seasoning Technician - Your future position?

In this exciting role as Seasoning Technician, you will support the Creation & Application team in relevant areas such as:
Prepare seasoning samples as requested for customer briefs, applications needs, technology performance assessment, QC standards, physical testing, etc.
Act as the main point of contact to provide timely seasoning samples for other labs and functions within Givaudan
Maintain all required formula records and brief documentation in company database software (Athena, Atlas, Lot Number records, etc.)
Maintain organized and updated stock of raw materials in the laboratory
Maintain organized collection of seasonings in the lab for immediate response to briefs and applications requests
Maintain a clean and orderly laboratory environment in accordance with EH&S policies and good laboratory practices
Assist in applying seasonings to food products when assigned
Participate in the evaluation of seasonings in food products and provide seasoning performance feedback

Technical Competencies

Expert understanding of research documentation protocol
Expert knowledge of lab equipment and handling chemicals used to perform lab functions
Complete knowledge of Givaudan safety, hygiene, and environmental guidelines/requirements
Demonstrates tasting skills and is able to effectively describe the flavour profile of a seasoning or ingredient
Ability to participate in meetings during customer visits

Primary Qualifications

Minimum 1 year experience working in a food applications lab, production or related area
Polytechnic or Bachelors Degree in Food Science, Chemistry, Biology
At Givaudan, you contribute to delightful taste and scent experiences that touch people’s lives.

You work within an inspiring teamwork culture – where you can thrive, collaborate and learn from other talented and passionate people across disciplines, regions and divisions.

Every essence of you enriches our world.

Diversity drives innovation and creates closer connections with our employees, customers and partners.

Givaudan embraces diversity and is committed to building an inclusive environment where everyone impacts our world."
"Practitioner, FIX Engineer","Role Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities

Collaborates effectively with cross-functional business partners on business growth, product design, release rollouts, EOL/migration, incident escalation, retention initiatives and strategic plans including but not limited to Product Management, Content Management, Sales and Account Team, Business Leadership, and Technology.
Partners with People Leader to continually evolve Specialist capabilities to reflect best-in-class customer-centric processes through relevant documentation, tools, & technical delivery methodologies.
Coaches staff to ensure accurate delivery of services & solutions and applies advanced project leadership skills to drive and execute high priority initiatives around tools, processes and working practices to be a best-in-class service.
Is responsible for best practices around best usage, extraction and utility of our solutions for our clients and advises solution sets for bespoke clients.
Provides expert troubleshooting and applies subject matter mastery to resolve customer issues. Effectively collaborates with stakeholders to ensure successful and properly communicated outcomes.
Leads project teams and key projects to achieve the respective service level targets and departmental objectives.
Is a Business Critical Communicator

Qualifications & Experience

Recommended Degree: Finance, Business, Information Science, Computer Science, or Economics
Significant experience in client-facing role in relevant financial or data modelling industry
Advanced understanding of the business area, customer profile, and products supported

At LSEG, we believe that creating a diverse and inclusive organisation is fundamental to the way we deliver on our promise of creating essential partnerships and open opportunities. Our open culture is central to how we deliver our purpose – driving financial stability, empowering economies and enabling customers to create sustainable growth – in everything we do.

Working with us means that you will be part of a dynamic organisation of 25,000 people across 70 countries. However, we will value your individuality and enable you to bring your true self to work so you can help enrich our diverse workforce. You will be part of a collaborative and creative culture where we encourage new ideas and are committed to sustainability across our global business. You will experience the critical role we have in helping to re-engineer the financial ecosystem to support and drive sustainable economic growth. Together, we are aiming to achieve this growth by accelerating the just transition to net zero, enabling growth of the green economy and creating inclusive economic opportunity.

LSEG offers a range of tailored benefits and support, including healthcare, retirement planning, paid volunteering days and wellbeing initiatives.

We are proud to be an equal opportunities employer. This means that we do not discriminate on the basis of anyone’s race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital status, veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. Conforming with applicable law, we can reasonably accommodate applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.

Please take a moment to read this privacy notice carefully, as it describes what personal information London Stock Exchange Group (LSEG) (we) may hold about you, what it’s used for, and how it’s obtained, your rights and how to contact us as a data subject.

If you are submitting as a Recruitment Agency Partner, it is essential and your responsibility to ensure that candidates applying to LSEG are aware of this privacy notice."
Application Developer (SiteFinity) #64408,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Industry/ Organization Type: IT/ Consultancy Firm
Position Title: Application Developer (SiteFinity)/ SiteFinity Developer
Working Location: Tai Seng
Working Hours: Monday to Friday, 9.30 am – 7 pm
Salary Package: Basic + Bonus + Allowances
Duration: Permanent Role
Key Responsibilities
Analyse requirements and develop, maintain and enhance custom-developed application software and scripts to meet the requirements.
Develop application software or scripts as and when required.
Design, develop and deploy SharePoint/ SiteFinity Customized applications.
Maintain, support and enhance existing applications.
Prepare documentation e.g. Design specifications, User Acceptance Test documents and participate in reviews.
Software design and optimization.
Development of custom software or scripts to meet the new functionalities required by the business.
Deliver projects via installation on Company’s Hosting Servers or Client’s Hosting Environment.
APPLY NOW!!!
Minimum Diploma in Computer Science/ IT or related discipline
At least 1-year experience in using Sitefinity CMS platform
Strong development experience with Object Oriented Programming
Intensive experience building web-based applications using C# & ASP.NET MVC
Strong development experience working with REST APIs for integration
Database development experience using MS SQL Server
Extensive experience working with IIS
Exposure to any of the latest 3 versions of Sitefinity is a huge plus
Experience in Angular.js is a plus
Kindly Apply Through ANY Of The Following Methods
Submit your application by clicking the APPLY button;
Email your resume to Job(at)anradus.com.sg. Please indicate #64408 on the email subject.
Anradus Policy: This clarifies Anradus' working procedures, from receiving the applicant's resume, screening to shortlisting. We assure you our consultants will go through every resume we receive but we regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Anradus Pte Ltd | EA License No. 20C0161 | Adelin Chong | EA Reg No.: R1875641
Desired Skills and Experience
Staff responsibility, MVC, Discipline, REST, AngularJS, IIS, Social Responsibility, SQL, SharePoint, SQL Server, Software Design, CMS, C#, Screening, Aspnet MVC"
Educator | Singapore Duxton Road,"Who We Are

Description & Requirements

lululemon is an innovative performance apparel company for yoga, running, training, and other athletic pursuits. Setting the bar in technical fabrics and functional design, we create transformational products and experiences that support people in moving, growing, connecting, and being well. We owe our success to our innovative product, emphasis on stores, commitment to our people, and the incredible connections we make in every community we're in. As a company, we focus on creating positive change to build a healthier, thriving future. In particular, that includes creating an equitable, inclusive and growth-focused environment for our people.

Job Summary

The Educator role is the foundation of our success as an organization. Educators are experts in creating world-class customer service, or guest experience, in our retail stores. They are responsible for engaging and connecting with our guests, sharing top-quality product education, and speaking authentically about our community and culture.

Core Responsibilities Of The Job

Guest (i.e., Customer) Experience
Interact with guests to ensure a great guest experience in a manner that values guests’ time.
Assess guests’ needs to provide customized, effective purchase and return solutions and support.
Provide technical product education by articulating the value and benefit of the product.
Facilitate a seamless end-to-end guest experience by conducting accurate and timely guest transactions and executing market-relevant omnichannel programs according to company standards.
Dynamically provide coverage on the floor to continuously engage with guests and attend to multiple guests or store needs.
Receive guest feedback and partner with store leadership to take appropriate action and “make it right” for guests.
Inform guests of local community programs. Plan and execute local, regional, and area driven Community projects and initiatives (e.g., local run club, international day of yoga).
Working With Others
Contribute to a respectful and inclusive team environment by welcoming and celebrating differences to ensure a supportive and engaging experience for all team members and guests.
Establish supportive and productive relationships with all team members.
Collaborate with team members to ensure optimal guest experience and support store operations.
Operations
Perform product presentation tasks (e.g., put items back in place, restock or add depleted items to the floor from inventory, destock or relocate items) according to company standards.
Use in-store technology to support store operations and provide positive guest experiences.
Perform cleaning tasks as needed throughout the shift to maintain the luxury environment of the store.
Understand and adhere to people safety policies and procedures to maintain a safe work environment.
Perform work in accordance with applicable policies, procedures, and laws or regulations.
What We Look For
Inclusion & Diversity: Creates/supports an inclusive environment that values/celebrates differences
Integrity/Honesty: Behaves in an honest, fair, and ethical manner
Guest Experience: Enjoys working and connecting with, understanding, and helping guests
Personal Responsibility: Accepts responsibility/accountability for actions; is dependable
Self-Awareness: Is aware of how words or actions may be perceived by or affect others
Collaboration and Teamwork: Works productively with others to achieve goals; seeks diverse perspectives
Enthusiasm: Is enthusiastic about one’s own work; looks for ways to make work fun and engaging
Job Requirements

Eligibility
Legally eligible to work in the jurisdiction of the store which you are assigned to.
Availability
Willing to work a flexible schedule.
Other Willingness Requirements
Willing to move through a store for most of a shift to help guests and accomplish work
Willing to work as part of a team and complete some work independently
Job Assets (i.e., nice to have; not required)
Education: High School or Secondary School diploma equivalent or above.
Applicants successful in progressing to interview will be contacted by a Manager or a member of the People & Culture team. Please note any applicant or employee who believes they need a reasonable accommodation to perform the essential duties of the job is welcome to discuss this with the Manager or People and Culture team member when arranging the interview.

Beyond The Paycheck (Benefits & Perks)

At lululemon, we care for and invest in the whole person – body, mind, spirit. Our total rewards program is designed to support you in achieving your goals and focus on the things you love. In addition to competitive base pay and a team-based bonus program, we also offer paid time off, generous employee discounts, fitness/yoga classes, parenthood top up program and personal and professional development programs.

Note: availability of these benefits and perks may be subject to your location & employment type and may have certain eligibility requirements. The Company reserves the right to alter these benefits and perks in whole or in part at any time without advance notice."
Turnaround Block / Team Lead,"What’s the role?

You will deliver Turnaround premises via planning and execution of turnaround activities safely, efficiently and in accordance with applicable premises, AMS TA work processes, and applicable standards.

You accountabilities include the following:

Develop in-depth familiarity with Shell Asset Management System TA Work Processes, and Recommended Practices and assist Event Manager in driving assigned associated deliverables.
Participate in TA Contracting Management.
Drive schedule reviews for critical operations and maintenance tasks.
To ensure Shell Jurong Island (SJI)’s assets operate safely & reliably, without suffering any process safety incident or causing life-changing events to person(s), the staff is accountable to ensure compliance to those Critical Activities assigned.
Ensures environmental plan (waste disposal, frac tanks, vac trucks, etc) is developed.
Coordinate risk assessments and mitigation implementation for high-risk activities. Communicates key issues and risks to the TA Event Manager.
Support MOC process for TA activities, including necessary temporary facilities, as required.
Act as Focal point in TA plan-the-plan tracking. Function as a Block Leader for high complexity event, or act as Night Shift Lead during TA execution, or lead a Low complexity TA. Perform deputy roles for Leads during the absence of the Leads or when assigned, as part of development and business expectations.
Organize and facilitate TA related workshops such as readiness reviews, scope challenge, cost/ financial reviews, team alignment, lookbacks etc.
Provides a critique of turnaround activities after completion of project, facilitate Continuous Improvement (CI) programs in TA, starting to development of initiatives to alignment throughout the event team to execution.
Organise review of TA related plans such as HSSE, Flawless Quality, Logistics, Pre-TA works etc.
Assesses job to understand the optimal plan to achieve turnaround premises including low cost and safety performance. Understand interfaces between TA Planning and other functions and facilitates communication between all work groups as appropriate.
Works with Master Scheduler to optimize the master schedule & perform field verification of work described in approved work scope submissions and develops detailed Primavera work scope activities, with craft type and estimated hours, coding requirements etc.
Management of turnaround files and records. Participate in drafting of investment paper for submission.
Participate in development of event organization with Event Manager. Assembles work packages with detailed information for planning and execution.
Able to perform detail planning for mechanical discipline including piping & static equipment & identify resources for execution. Able to identify & purchase materials required during planning phase.
Work with Contractor to develop Workpacks for execution. Assigned as Contract Holders for Medium and Low risk contract specific to the Production Unit.

What We Need From You

Educated in technical or engineering discipline at tertiary level, preferably in Mechanical Engineering
6-8 years of proven experience within an Oil and Gas or Process environment, or relevant industries
Ability to work cohesively as part of a multi-disciplinary operations team
Strong verbal, and written communication skills
Demonstrated competency to provide a high standard of services to internal customers
Awareness of environmental health and safety legislation as applicable to the operation and maintenance of facilities, commitment to safety, strong safety culture/leadership

Company Description

Shell is one the largest foreign investors in Singapore and began operations in 1891. Today, we have more than 3,200 employees in Singapore alone. The Pulau Bukom Manufacturing Site today is the largest Shell refinery in the world in terms of crude distillation capacity, which makes Singapore a key regional supply and trading centre for Shell in the East. Singapore is the largest petrochemical production and export centre in the Asia Pacific region. Shell Jurong Island (SJI) manufactures petrochemicals to meet the fast-growing demand for these products in the region. We also have one of the largest single-branded retail networks in Singapore, providing customers with a wide range of quality products and services. When you join Shell in Singapore, you can count on our commitment to help you thrive and propel your career by means of our industry-leading development programme and our available and unrivalled pool of local and global experts. Our numerous global and local skill pools as well as our diversity are key to our success and continuing innovation.

An innovative place to work

There’s never been a more exciting time to work at Shell.

Join us and you’ll be adding your talent and imagination to a business with the ambition to shape the future – whether by investing in oil, gas and renewable energy to meet demand, exploring new ways to store energy, or developing technology that helps the world to use energy more efficiently, everyone at Shell does their part.

An inclusive place to work

To power progress, we need to attract and develop the brightest minds and make sure every voice is heard. Here are just some of the ways we are nurturing an inclusive environment – one where you can express your ideas, extend your skills, and reach your potential.

We’re creating a space where people with disabilities can excel through transparent recruitment process, workplace adjustments and ongoing support in their roles. Feel free to let us know about your circumstances when you apply, and we’ll take it from there.
We’re closing the gender gap – whether that’s through action on equal pay or by enabling more women to reach senior roles in engineering and technology.
We’re striving to be a pioneer of an inclusive and diverse workplace, promoting equality for employees regardless of sexual orientation or gender identity.
We consider ourselves a flexible employer and want to support you finding the right balance. We encourage you to discuss this with us in your application.

A rewarding place to work

Combine our creative, collaborative environment and global operations with an impressive range of benefits and joining Shell becomes an inspired career choice.

We’re huge advocates for career development. We’ll encourage you to try new roles and experience new settings. By pushing people to reach their potential, we frequently help them find skills they never knew they had, or make career moves they never thought possible."
Software Engineering New Associate,"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Technology and Operations services and Accenture Song—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 710,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

At the heart of every great change is a great human.

Come work at the heart of change.

Take the first step to a fulfilling tech career at Accenture. You will be exposed to the exciting work within the Public Sector, helping Singapore achieve its Smart Nation vision as you develop your career. Enhance your skills through continuous learning and development opportunities to build and strengthen your expertise in the ever-growing technology space.

You can also expect to receive professional training, mentorship and career coaching to help empower, drive, and guide you in your career aspirations and decisions.

As a software engineering associate, you will:

Be involved in the development, coding, testing, deployment, and software maintenance of the applications and products.

Team up with others, like yourself, to develop and deliver solutions with continuous innovation and bring new ideas to our clients, improving the way operations is run.

Operate IT production services according to management protocols and Service Level Agreements (SLAs).

Together with your team, support various phases of the Software Development Lifecycle, ensuring client satisfaction and delivery excellence.

Provide operational support, ensuring production systems and devices are online and available.

Opportunity to use some of the most advanced technology around such as cloud engineering and operations, automation, RPA and SRE, intelligent call centre technologies.

Your role assignment will be based on business needs and your personal strengths.

We would love to speak with you if you have:

A Diploma / Higher Nitec / Nitec in Information Technology

A willingness to learn and an interest in technology

Good communication and interpersonal skills

Flexibility and willingness to work on different projects, if required

It would be advantageous if you are versed in the following tech stacks:

Java / J2EE / .Net / Fullstack development

DevSecOps

Data engineering / R / Python

Low code development platforms

Documents And Information Required

Resume (in PDF format)

Latest education transcript

Indicate your availability (start and end date) and expected graduation date in your resume

Please note that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."
Staff SDET,"Why apply to Circles.Life?

Circles.Life is not just your digital telco provider. Since our launch, we revolutionised the telco industry by seamlessly integrating both telco and digital lifestyle services on our Circles-X platform. Over the past years, we have captured more than 5% market share in Singapore, launched in Australia and Taiwan while attaining record breaking CSAT and NPS (+50). We were voted the Top Employer in Digital Telco and also became an accredited winner in showcasing excellence in workplace culture in 2019.

About This Role

Circles.Life is looking for candidates with a passion for Quality & Excellence, who possess superior analytical skills, energy, drive, and attention to detail, to drive the development of automation frameworks and high test automation coverage for our backend systems.

Do you want to continually make code quality go up and raise the bar for everybody! Do you believe in and enforce Test Driven Development, get to define testing strategies, and get a kick out of uncovering those hard-to-find bugs. If you are up to the challenge, then this is for you.

As a key member of our team, your responsibilities include:
Understand the use cases / User journeys for products and the technical solution and develop test scope using test design techniques and documentation.
Understand the test scope and make the relevant changes to the automation framework and platform APIs that will help us automate relevant scenarios faster and more reliably.
Enhancing and maintaining automation frameworks for scalability, stability, and performance.
Be obsessed with automated test coverage for backend APIs & workflows and strive to incorporate various functional and end-to-end scenarios into automated test suites.
Interacting and collaborating with the product team and QA teams to identify and understand testing requirements to automate.
Partner with CI/CD team and SRE teams to ensure that automated tests contribute effectively to the deployment pipeline and site availability needs.
Perform manual functional testing for the identified test scope when required.
What’s On Offer

Circles.Life provides a great environment and platform for employees to build their careers. In this role, you can expect:
Unique opportunity to be a part of the digital disruption in telecommunication (Circles.Life is the only company of its kind in all of Asia!)
Autonomy in the role and in managing your portfolio
Exposure to the fast-paced world of high-tech start-ups
Attractive experience and compensation
Working with passionate, smart, and driven colleagues in a vibrant environment
Requirements
10+ years of experience in a quality engineering role with a focus on test automation.
Hands-on experience with Java and related technologies. Having knowledge of languages like Golang, NodeJS will be an added advantage
Knowledge of tools, concepts, and methodologies of testing (Unit, Functional Testing, Component Testing, Integration Testing) and where each one applies.
Experience in automation scripting using tools such as Selenium, REST assured, Appium, and TestNG. In addition, having experience in test framework development and platforms is a plus.
Must understand the fundamentals of Automation frameworks and how they fit into the quality infrastructure and deployment pipelines.
Have working experience on CI\CD related technologies like Jenkins, Maven, etc.
Experience in defining test strategies and test plans.
Work experience and knowledge of architectures involving databases (SQL, NoSQL), Message Queues, and Caching technologies.
Familiar with SDLC/STLC or Agile processes.
Aptitude for functional testing and ensuring a high-quality user experience for products.
Aptitude for understanding and reviewing the system design & architecture to come up with adequate test coverage.
Must be able to debug and perform RCA for identified issues by analyzing server-side logs and interacting with different teams like SRE and DevOps.
Experience with multi-environment structured Test Data setup and management.
Passion for identifying test coverage gaps in an automated suite and improving.
Be a Go-To person in the team and be able to guide and develop/mentor junior SDETs
Hands-on experience in mobile app automation is a plus
Nice to Have
Having experience in Telco domain.
Exposure to Continuous Deployment pipelines.
Knowledge of docker and implementing the automation tests in dockerized containers in a Kubernetes environment.
Hands on experience and exposure to performance testing.
Interested to know more about us?
LinkedIn | Facebook | Instagram | Twitter
“Telco start-up Circles.Life snags funding from Warburg Pincus”
“A deep-dive into how Circles.Life can become Singapore's unicorn”
Circles.Life is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, disability or age.

To all recruitment agencies: Circles.Life will only acknowledge resumes from agencies specifically retained for the role.

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted for interviews."
Software Development Test Engineer Intern (Trust and Safety Platform) - 2022,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are now looking for talented individuals to join us for an internship in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with TikTok.

Successful candidates must be able to commit to one of the following internship cycles below: -
1. Summer Internship - 09 May 2022 to 29 July 2022 (12 weeks)
2. Off-cycle Internship - 01 August 2022 to 16 December 2022 (20 weeks)

We will prioritize candidates who are able to commit to the two above internship periods.
Please state your availability clearly in the comments section (Start date, End date).

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is firm and includes all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and we encourage you to apply early.


About the Trust and Safety Engineering team
Our Trust and Safety (TnS) Engineering team is responsible for protecting our users from harmful content and abusive behaviors. With the continuous efforts of our trust and safety team, TikTok can provide the best user experience and bring joy to everyone in the world.


Responsibilities
- Manage the quality assurance of Trust and Safety products;
- Actively involve in the product development process and coordinate with various roles to continuously deliver high-quality products;
- Improve product quality and efficiency through technical means such as tool platform development, automated testing and performance testing;
- Prospective technology research and application, applying appropriate technology to improve business quality.

Qualifications

- Penultimate year undergraduate students with a background in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or a related technical major;
- Passion for computer science and internet technology, strong interest in software quality assurance
- Solid data structure and algorithm foundation
- Good computing foundation, highly proficient in at least one of the programming languages: Python, Java, Go, C/C++
- Good logical thinking and team communication skills


By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at sg.campus.recruitment@tiktok.com."
Senior Data Scientist (Recommender System),"As a Senior Data Scientist, you will be responsible for building the recommender system and other Machine learning related algorithm. You will also be involved in MLOps side of duties, such as software deployment and maintenance.

Client Details

Our client, a leading global entertainment streaming site with millions users across the globe. They are currently looking for a Senior Data Scientist in Singapore to address the business's growing data needs.

Description

As a Senior Data Scientist, you are responsible for:

Work closely with cross-functional stakeholders across business, product, and engineering teams.
Handling advanced analytics initiatives aligned with the data roadmap.
Grow the data science capabilities within the team and potentially building up Data Science capabilities within the organisation.
Help design and implement experiments to support business use cases and feature improvements
Work closely with Data Engineering to optimise data infrastructure, and driving projects such as building ML pipelines, designing and building data marts, or implementation of new tools to help analysts be more efficient.




Profile

As a qualified applicant, you shall have at least a B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Data Science or a related discipline. At least 4 years of total experience in building recommender system as well as possess experience in data analysis and/or data science.

Job Offer

Great career exposure in data engineering team
Be the subject matter expert for the newly created team
Enjoy the good working culture with flexibility
To apply online please click the 'Apply' button below. For a confidential discussion about this role please contact Wilson Tay on +65 6416 9838"
Embedded Developer,"Job Responsibilities
Assessing Problems
Providing software application support and performing analyses on software application functionality and suggesting improvements.
Monitoring effective front-end and back-end functionality of applications based on automated tools for performance metrics adherence.
Work with cross-functional teams in Infrastructure, Security and other teams to assess the problem effectively.
Identifying and Assessing Technological Solutions
Collaborate with the software development team, internal users, and clients to improve application performance.
Establishing the root causes of application errors, and escalating serious concerns to the Senior Engineer.
Propose workaround solutions until the permanent fixes are deployed.
Maintaining Records and Writing Reports
Keeping a record of configuration changes and scheduling application updates.
Documenting processes and developing reports for customers across the business.
Support Role o Providing front-end support to clients and colleagues in other departments.
Develop knowledge articles for frequently occurring issues.
Software Enhancement
Perform L3 support including Software development and maintenance in terms of implementing enhancements and defect fixes.
Maintain and improve the performance of existing software for production environment
General Skills o Clearly and regularly communicate with management and technical support colleagues
Ability to own tasks and think critical during crisis
Willing to learn and collaborate with various stakeholders.
Requirements
Recognized Degree in Electrical/Electronics Engineering/Computer Science or a relevant discipline.
At least 2 years’ experience in embedded software development and support with good working knowledge in object-oriented software development using C/C++/Java in Windows, QNX, Unix or Linux platform.
Experience in software development involving
web application development in Java, using Spring framework and interfacing with database using JDBC and SQL.
Object-oriented software design and UML modeling.
Good knowledge in Windows Server and proficient scripting skill in PowerShell is highly desirable.
Experience in Incident Management and ITIL process.
Conduct trend analysis and provide appropriate support and input to product teams.
Aggressively monitor and respond to incidents generated by stakeholders.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Resourceful and self-motivated team player.
Data Analytics and Data Visualization skills will be an added advantage.
Added advantage if candidate is familiar with one or more of the following technologies:
JSON
Angular
JSP
Javascript
HTML"
Solution Architect (Banking Domain),"General Description

The primary objective of the solution architect is to work with the client's architecture team to provide architecture, design and technical guidelines to enable the bank’s digital transformation. Candidates need to have a strong grasp of banking & banking processes.

KEY FEATURES OF THE POSITION

General
Define architecture roadmap and landscape in line with the Digital Strategy of the bank
Consider local adaptions of global standards to meet regulatory and cultural differences
Participate in IT Projects by providing architecture and solution blueprints
Manage and drive proof of concepts on new technologies and tools that may be required for supporting the bank’s business
Manage software and system’s lifecycle to minimize technology risks coming out of unsupported or obsolete software/systems
Conduct design and high level code reviews
Client Management (internal & external)
Participate and contribute to enterprise architecture strategy of the bank by working together with the global architecture team based in Europe
Provide technical guidance to project teams along the entire software development lifecycle
Skills Requirements Of The Position

Personal and Social
Able to handle verbal and written communication where the main language used for internal and external communication is English
Able to explain designs and solutions to developers and business users alike
Strong leadership skills in matrix organizational setup, ability to lead, mentor and coach team members and developers.
Passionate and efficient self-learner in order to adopt new technologies and methodologies to create business value
Professional and Technical
Bachelor/Master degree in Engineering or Computer science
7+ years of experience in design and implementation of enterprise systems in banking domain, preferably wealth management
Strong collaboration skills across hierarchy levels and organizational boundaries
Very good knowledge and experience in modern web technologies
Proficiency in enterprise technologies such as Java EE, spring boot, databases like Oracle and MySQL, integration technologies like IBM MQ, IBM Integration Bus etc.
Experience in implementing DevOps principles in the organisation
Knowledge of architecture frameworks like TOGAF or Zachmann
Employee Status : Full Time Employee

Shift : Day Job

Travel : No

Job Posting : Dec 30 2022

About Cognizant

Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 185 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @Cognizant."
Network Engineer,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsible for the daily operation and maintenance of the company's network, as well as the construction of network related projects.Ensure stable and reliable network. Act as a L2 engineer to help identity and troubleshoot problems. Participate in the daily duty work of the network.

Requirements

More than 5 years of working experience as a Network Engineer
Familiar with Cisco routing and switching product, PaloAlto/Fortigate firewall, management and maintenance of Aruba/Meraki wireless device
Strong knowledge of network protocols, such as BGP,OSPF,ECMP,DNS,HTTP/HTTPS
Plan network management, experience in network monitor and traffic analysis
Familiar with load balancing, such as DNS/GSLB
Familiar with public cloud, such as network services in AWS/GCP public cloud

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
"Associate/AVP, Application Support Engineer, Technology Group 14941","Technology Group

Technology Group (TG) constantly leverages on data and the latest technologies to enable GIC to be the leading global long-term investment firm. We aim to provide users with empowering and transformational capabilities, and to create an inclusive, innovative and integrated work environment.

We are seeking technology talent with a passion in Application Support to join our team.

Power our Growth

You will be part of an application team, building and managing platforms for areas such as portfolio management, trading and treasury front office, investment operations, risk management, enterprise solutions and corporate services. Our teams are motivated and passionate about understanding business requirements and improving the status quo. They are familiar with the current technology landscape and work closely with business departments to build modern and scalable platforms, and customize and integrate solutions into GIC’s technology ecosystem.

Build Meaningful Connections

Connect with our technology community of like-minded developers, business analysts, data engineers, solution architects, and work towards common goals. Collaborate with our business users and build strategic and purposeful solutions that drive our mission forward.

Be Agile and Keep Learning

Besides experiencing challenging work and projects, you will gain access to a wide variety of inhouse developed and external programs curated by GIC School, and a generous training budget to keep your skills and knowledge updated. In addition, resources such as the Technology Career Pathway Framework and Technology Group Mentorship Program will empower you to chart your career and personal development path that is aligned with your aspirations and capabilities.

Join us if you have/are

1 to 7 years of relevant working experience in production support and/or application development
Hands-on technical skills and competency in any programming/scripting languages, software frameworks and database technologies
Equipped with strong troubleshooting skills and high urgency to ensure our critical systems operate at the highest level
Passionate in leveraging technical know-how to detect and resolve problems early to minimize disruption to our business
Good team player who is keen to learn, independent, and with strong analytical, problem solving, communication and interpersonal skills
Bachelor’s or equivalent degree in Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) related discipline is advantageous

Our PRIME Values
GIC is a values driven organization. GIC’s PRIME Values act as our compass, enabling us to fulfil our fundamental purpose and objectives. It is the foundational bedrock which governs our behaviors, our decision making, and our focus. It informs both our long-term strategy as a firm, and the way we relate to our Client, business partners and employees. PRIME stands for Prudence, Respect, Integrity, Merit and Excellence."
Lead Data Scientist,"Job description:

Job Purpose
The Lead Data Scientist will work with stakeholders to leverage data analytics and identify patterns based on aggregate data to find risks or opportunities, as well as to make performance change recommendations. S/he will create forecasts using analytics information and results, compare sets of data to optimize resource allocation and support business development through the use of data.

Responsibilities
Chart out the Group’s long-term technology development resources, masterplan and formulate strategies to achieve the desired outcomes.
Lead the team in the development and implementation of strategic plans which leverages on technology as a force multiplier.
Identify the potential areas for investments and collaborate with external stakeholders to enhance and/or expand current businesses through innovative use of technological solutions.
Establish network with institutions, universities and innovation centers etc., to ensure information flow of novel technologies.
Promote synergies in technology development efforts across the different Business Units, ranging from enhancing operational/engineering capabilities to investing in new areas of growth or inventions, e.g., generating intellectual property to enhance the organisation’s competitive edge.
Grow and sustain data analytics capabilities to drive and support business decisions.
Working with data analytics team in selected analytics projects
Engage partners across business lines to understand business problems, analytical opportunities and constraints
Drive new data collection and refine existing data sources
Design, develop and evaluate analytical approaches and techniques as required
Derive insights, actionable recommendations and communicate these to business users and management
Conceptualising and implement initiatives to build analytical capabilities and culture across SMRT corporation.
Qualifications & Work Experience
Master or PhD preferably in Engineering, Computer Science, Information Technology, Mathematics, or Statistics
8+ years of relevant experience as a data scientist or in a similar role
Data engineering certification is a plus
Skills
Technical skills include:

Proficient and experienced in scripting languages and have rapid prototyping skills such as Python, MS SQL, R, MS Excel, etc.
Knowledge of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence Framework ecosystems and languages, such as Keras, TensorFlow, etc.
Knowledge of statistical principles and practical applications
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, clean, organise, analyse, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Experience with data visualisation tools such as Power BI, Tableau, Qliksense etc. would be an advantage
Experience with data engineering and architecture (e.g. data pipeline, IoT and real time data streaming, applications of cloud computing) will be an advantage
Experience in transportation analytics and applications of machine learning and deep learning in transportation area such us operations and maintenance would be a huge plus
Ability to understand and explain complex data and effective working as a liaison between technical and non-technical groups
Generic skills include:

Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, meticulous and resourceful
Self-starter, deals well with ambiguity, and able to work successfully across varied stakeholders
Agility to embrace and drive change"
Communications Specialist – Northeast/Southeast Asia Defense Programs,"Job Description

At Boeing, we innovate and collaborate to make the world a better place. From the seabed to outer space, you can contribute to work that matters with a company where diversity, equity and inclusion are shared values. We’re committed to fostering an environment for every teammate that’s welcoming, respectful and inclusive, with great opportunity for professional growth. Find your future with us.

Boeing Singapore is seeking for a Communications Specialist – Northeast/Southeast Asia Defense Programs. This position is based in Singapore.

Position Responsibilities:

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Summary of Accountabilities:

Optimize The Boeing Company’s reputation in Southeast Asia (SEA) in support of business and policy objectives, working across all stakeholder constituencies including traditional and digital media, customers, supplier-partners, government and industry leaders, academia, influencers, and employees.
Support in-market business objectives for Boeing’s defense and government services businesses: market shaping, sales campaigns, keep it sold, customer activities, employee engagements. Also support when appropriate reputation-enhancing activities in key SEA countries by developing and executing communications plans aligned with local leaders and US teams.
Serves as primary Boeing Defense, Space & Security/Boeing Government Services communications focal for NE/SE Asia working with U.S. and in-country Asia communicators as well as BDS Business Development and program leaders to lead the design, development and deployment of communication strategies that support business unit goals and objectives
As the lead defense communications focal for NE/SE Asia, this position is responsible for understanding geopolitical landscapes and defense requirements/sensitivities across the region to provide sound guidance to business and communications colleagues.
Maintain close understanding of all key defense campaigns across the NE/SE Asia region as well as defense programs sold into the region. In close coordination with other communicators and local/US business leaders, lead or support communications for key campaigns, announcements, tradeshows, program updates, media/employee engagements.
Develop, coordinate and execute integrated marketing communications plans when appropriate to support the sale or introduction of new products in the region.
Establish, maintain and strengthen professional relationships with customer public affairs representatives from across the region.
Effectively represent the company before the media, customers, government organizations, opinion leaders and supplier-partners and act as a spokesperson for the company
When needed, support the Global Sales & Marketing team with on-the-ground customer coordination in Singapore, liaising directly with defence/government customers and ensuring proper alignment internally on the outcomes of those engagements.

Basic Qualifications (Skill/Experience):

At least 7 years’ experience in communications
Significant experience working across all stakeholder constituencies, not just media. Prior defense/government experience an asset
Able to convey clearly, based on market/customer/product knowledge, what a proper course of action is and gain necessary internal alignment on the strategy.
Must be able to prioritize concurrent tasks, focus on the details and help ensure successful outcomes.
A proven team player who can work effectively across geographies, timezones, cultures and languages and is adept at navigating a complex environment.
Strong strategic counselling skills
Can be strategic and tactical in their communications approach.
High ethical standards
Flexible working hours in order to coordinate with the US as needed.
Excellent media relations skills with knowledge of Asian defense/trade/business media a plus
Proven experience with digital communications
Superior communication, writing and presentation skills

Typical Education/Experience:

University degree, with relevant work experience in journalism and/or public relations.

Other Job-related Information

Defense/government communications experience preferred.

Candidates must have authorization to work in Singapore. The Company will not be sponsoring Employment Visas.
This position requires the individual to travel to international locations up to 30%, subject to business requirements. Travel may extend up to 1-2 weeks at a time to meet project objectives.
Benefits and pay are determined in line with Singapore labor market practices. This is not an expat assignment.
Relocation assistance is not a negotiable benefit for this position. Candidates must live in the immediate area or relocate at their own expense.

Export Control Requirements: Not an export control position

Equal Opportunity Employer:

We are an equal opportunity employer. We do not accept unlawful discrimination in our recruitment or employment practices on any grounds including but not limited to; color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, genetic factors, military and veteran status, or other characteristics covered by applicable law.

We have teams in more than 65 countries, and each person plays a role in helping us become one of the world’s most innovative, diverse and inclusive companies. Applicants are encouraged to share with our recruitment team any accommodations required during the recruitment process."
"System Engineer, Linux","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
esponsible for planning the server or rack, arranging the server mounting or rack installation, and following up the installation of the server operating system
Responsible for the daily maintenance, troubleshooting, repair and follow-up break-fix of the server and other hardware
Maintain data on internal systems including Asset Management, Ticketing, & rack elevations
Work with remote vendors to solve hardware batch failures and problems
Oncall on duty, responsible for dealing with the problems raised by the business side
Collect and check online asset data
Submit and track the part RMA or media destruction process
Server network troubleshooting
Server lifecycle management
Job Requirements
Bachelor's Degree in Computer science, Electrical engineering or any other relevant fields
Strong ability to work under pressure; Strong learning ability, broad technical interest; Strong sense of responsibility, full of enthusiasm for work
Have to communicate with mandarin speaking counterparts
good team work spirit; Ability to work independently
Knowledge of the interdependencies of data center functions and technologies
Experience with massive remote OS installation such as PXE boot
Can understand and run Shell or Python scripts
Familiar with simple automation tool, such as Ansible
Familiar with Linux system, able to locate hardware faults; Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Basic TCP/IP knowledge concepts - Subnetting, VLANs, DNS, IPv6; Ability to perform general troubleshooting
Knowledge of out-of-band/lights-out server communication methods, such as IPMI and NCSI
Strong documentation skills and habits
Kindly understand that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

EnviroDynamics Solutions Pte Ltd

Poon Wai Soon, Bernard

Reg. No: R2197713

EA License No.: 12C6285
Desired Skills and Experience
Remote Infrastructure Management, MASSIVE, Troubleshooting, Hardware, Ability To Work Independently, Ticketing, Data Center, Arranging, Remote Access, Documentation Skills, Remote Troubleshooting, Python, Ansible, Electrical Engineering, DNS, Linux"
IT Infrastructure Project Manager (AVP/VP)- 10k (Jap speaking),"about the role



Project Planning and Management for IT infrastructure and networking project
Development Executing for IT infrastructure and networking projects
Management of team for maintenance of IT infrastructure and network


skills and experience required

Proficiency in project management for an infrastructure building project.
Proficiency in management of system maintenance.
Proficiency in IT infrastructure (at least Remote Access Platform) and network technologies.
Proficiency in Japanese language is required to liaise with the head office based in Japan


To apply online please use the apply function, alternatively you may contact Chloe Chen at chloe.chen(@)randstad.com.sg. (EA: 94C3609 /R1768253)


Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
Credit Operations Data Analyst (SPU) - Hybrid,"Job Id: 22600187

Job Description:

Provide MIS & analytics to Credit Operations in the area of client onboarding, collections strategy and fraud management
Ensure timely delivery and accuracy of key Credit Ops MIS such as, MOR, Credit Ops review with O&T head, RCO deck, performance and productivity reports.
Work with Risk Management in developing and implementing TRIAD strategies. Provide strong control and close monitoring of collections performance during champion/challenger testing
Conduct analyses and assist in continuous improvement of existing collections strategies across buckets through introduction and modification of Champion Challenger strategies. Participate in development and implementation of the best-of-breed analytical tools and methodologies including Collections Scorecard, Bureau Overlay, Enterprise Segmentation tool to assist overall improvement in the Collections Management
Provide Credit Operations with required data, conduct analytics in managing risk, growing profits and reducing costs
Work with Regional Collections Team, Digital Banking & GCT/technology teams in the evaluation and roll-out of new/upcoming tools to increase digital offloading and automation in the collections function Qualifications:
Desirably 3 years of collections, analytics of project management experience
Project Management skills
Strategic and Analytical Thinking and Input
Background/experience on numerical and data analysis

Experience in SAS programming is an advantage

-------------------------------------------------

Job Family Group:

Operations - Services

-------------------------------------------------

Job Family:

Credit Maintenance

------------------------------------------------------

Time Type:

Full time

------------------------------------------------------

Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.

Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi.

View the ""EEO is the Law"" poster. View the EEO is the Law Supplement.

View the EEO Policy Statement.

View the Pay Transparency Posting"
"Intern, IT Support","About Klook

Klook is the go-to travel and leisure e-commerce platform for experiences and services anytime, anywhere. Founded in Hong Kong in 2014 out of passion for discovery, our purpose today is to inspire and enable more moments of JOY. Even when the COVID-19 pandemic hit, we held on to our conviction and successfully unlocked the domestic travel business. To date, we are already offering over 490,000 activities in over 1,000 destinations. With cross-border travel resuming, we have made it our mission to reshape the world of travel. Isn’t this exciting?!

It certainly is for our international community of over 1,200 employees, based in over 20 locations globally! Joymakers at heart, Klookers are not only curating joyful experiences for others, but also co-creating our world of joy in the Klookiverse. We are on a journey to foster a strong company culture that supports a high-performing and successful business, and we are guided by our core beliefs - Push boundaries, Ask for and give feedback, Take ownership, and Help each other - in everything we do. We are excited about building and realizing endless possibilities in the new era of travel. Care to be a part of this revolution?

About This Role

Our IT Intern helps to ensure smooth communication and prompt resolution of day-to-day IT issues & requests globally. This role reports into our Senior IT Officer and will be based in our SG office. Our ideal candidate should possess strong communication, problem-solving and analytical skills to succeed in the role.

What you'll do

Support the IT team in installing, configuring and maintaining hardware, software and other systems
Assist with troubleshooting issues and provide technical support
Participate and contribute to different IT projects and assignments
Involved in all the internal processes of IT asset deploying and tracking, ensuring IT asset accuracy is kept at a high rate.
Act as the point of contact between end users and other cross function teams
Maintain and update technical documentation based on latest procedures
Ability to prioritize tasks and efficiently manage time

What you'll need

Currently pursuing Diploma/Degree in Information Technology or equivalent
Fluent in English is a MUST, Mandarin is preferred but not required
Young energetic with self-confident personality
A start-up, roll-up-sleeves attitude
No experience is required

Klook is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We hire talented and passionate people of all backgrounds. We believe that a joyful workplace is an inclusive workplace, one where employees from all walks of life have an equal opportunity to thrive. We’re dedicated to creating a welcoming and supportive culture where everyone belongs.

Klook does not accept unsolicited resumes from any temporary staffing agency, placement service or professional recruiter (“Agency”). Klook will not be responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions or other payments related to such unsolicited resumes.

An Agency must obtain advance written approval from Klook’s Talent Acquisition Team to submit resumes, and then only in conjunction with a valid fully-executed agreement for service and in response to a specific job opening for which the Agency has been requested to submit resumes for. Klook will not be responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions or other payments to any Agency that does not have such agreement in place or does not comply with the foregoing."
Data Center Selection,"About Us

At Cloudflare, we have our eyes set on an ambitious goal: to help build a better Internet. Today the company runs one of the world’s largest networks that powers approximately 25 million Internet properties, for customers ranging from individual bloggers to SMBs to Fortune 500 companies. Cloudflare protects and accelerates any Internet application online without adding hardware, installing software, or changing a line of code. Internet properties powered by Cloudflare all have web traffic routed through its intelligent global network, which gets smarter with every request. As a result, they see significant improvement in performance and a decrease in spam and other attacks. Cloudflare was named to Entrepreneur Magazine’s Top Company Cultures list and ranked among the World’s Most Innovative Companies by Fast Company.

We realize people do not fit into neat boxes. We are looking for curious and empathetic individuals who are committed to developing themselves and learning new skills, and we are ready to help you do that. We cannot complete our mission without building a diverse and inclusive team. We hire the best people based on an evaluation of their potential and support them throughout their time at Cloudflare. Come join us!

We are seeking a new Data Center Selection team member to improve the quality and unit cost and grow the size and number of our colocation sites/PoPs, and help us understand where on the map Cloudflare’s infrastructure needs to go next. You possess a broad set of contacts across the data center industry and are able to navigate local and international businesses in various markets to drive the best possible deal parameters. You will unlock efficiency within our vendor partner portfolio by understanding how to structure contracts to follow demand, keeping abreast of unique market dynamics and insights that help us negotiate, and managing vendor partner relationships to know where to invest and partner further with existing or new partners. We are looking for someone who excels at progressing many projects in parallel, managing dynamic day to day priorities with many stakeholders, and has experience implementing and refining sourcing best practices in a high growth environment. Getting stuff done is a must!

The Data Center Strategy team is part of Cloudflare’s global Infrastructure (INF) team. The INF team grows and manages Cloudflare’s global data center/PoP footprint, enabling Cloudflare’s tremendous growth with compute, network, and data center infrastructure, utilizing an extensive range of global partner vendors.

What you get to do in this role:

 Define regional vendor strategy for data centers 
 Own deals end to end involving new and existing data center vendors and sites to support Cloudflare’s infrastructure growth including planning, RFP, commercial negotiation and execution 
 Work cross-functionally with legal, operations, capacity planning, network strategy and security teams to understand requirements and project timelines 
 Establish and conduct scheduled QBR and other vendor management activities with top category partners 
 Represent Cloudflare credibly to external partner C-level senior management and at public conferences/events 
 Expert point of contact for internal business customers & external colocation partner vendors as needed 
 Contribute information to annual data center budget for effective tracking and benchmarking of infrastructure costs 
 Review colocation spend & invoices for management approval 
 Other duties as assigned 

Skills/Experience:

 10+ years in planning and managing data center footprints within a fast moving enterprise technology organization or cloud services, software or colocation company 
 Ability to multi-task and manage complex projects across multiple teams and geographies within set deadlines 
 Ability to navigate, solve problems and answer questions with minimal supervision 
 Relationship management experience and excellent communication skills 
 Demonstrated experience in commercial negotiation 
 Experience with rack, site power and white space planning (data center sales engineering) a plus 
 Experience with or understanding of network concepts a plus 
 Experience in budget planning, financial analysis, or other analytical role a plus 
 Experience with Jira a plus 
 Multilingual and/or experience living/working/conducting business in another country a plus 
 Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience required 

Compensation

Compensation may be adjusted depending on work location. For Colorado-based hires: Estimated annual salary of $ 96,000 - $ 118,000 .

Equity

This role is eligible to participate in Cloudflare’s equity plan.

Benefits

Cloudflare offers a complete package of benefits and programs to support you and your family. Our benefits programs can help you pay health care expenses, support caregiving, build capital for the future and make life a little easier and fun! The below is a description of our benefits for employees in the United States, and benefits may vary for employees based outside the U.S.

Health & Welfare Benefits

 Medical/Rx Insurance 
 Dental Insurance 
 Vision Insurance 
 Flexible Spending Accounts 
 Commuter Spending Accounts 
 Fertility & Family Forming Benefits 
 On-demand mental health support and Employee Assistance Program 
 Global Travel Medical Insurance 

Financial Benefits

 Short and Long Term Disability Insurance 
 Life & Accident Insurance 
 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan 
 Employee Stock Participation Plan 

Time Off

 Flexible paid time off covering vacation and sick leave 
 Leave programs, including parental, pregnancy health, medical, and bereavement leave 

What Makes Cloudflare Special?

We’re not just a highly ambitious, large-scale technology company. We’re a highly ambitious, large-scale technology company with a soul. Fundamental to our mission to help build a better Internet is protecting the free and open Internet.

Project Galileo : We equip politically and artistically important organizations and journalists with powerful tools to defend themselves against attacks that would otherwise censor their work, technology already used by Cloudflare’s enterprise customers--at no cost.

 Athenian Project  : We created Athenian Project to ensure that state and local governments have the highest level of protection and reliability for free, so that their constituents have access to election information and voter registration.

Path Forward Partnership : Since 2016, we have partnered with Path Forward, a nonprofit organization, to create 16-week positions for mid-career professionals who want to get back to the workplace after taking time off to care for a child, parent, or loved one.

1.1.1.1 : We released 1.1.1.1 to help fix the foundation of the Internet by building a faster, more secure and privacy-centric public DNS resolver. This is available publicly for everyone to use - it is the first consumer-focused service Cloudflare has ever released. Here’s the deal - we don’t store client IP addresses never, ever. We will continue to abide by our privacy commitment and ensure that no user data is sold to advertisers or used to target consumers.

Sound like something you’d like to be a part of? We’d love to hear from you!

This position may require access to information protected under U.S. export control laws, including the U.S. Export Administration Regulations. Please note that any offer of employment may be conditioned on your authorization to receive software or technology controlled under these U.S. export laws without sponsorship for an export license.

Cloudflare is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunity for all people and place great value in both diversity and inclusiveness. All qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to their, or any other person's, perceived or actual race, color, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, family care status, or any other basis protected by law. We are an AA/Veterans/Disabled Employer.

Cloudflare provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. Please tell us if you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job. Examples of reasonable accommodations include, but are not limited to, changing the application process, providing documents in an alternate format, using a sign language interpreter, or using specialized equipment. If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job, please contact us via e-mail at hr@cloudflare.com or via mail at 101 Townsend St. San Francisco, CA 94107."
"Analyst, Fintech Deals","Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Job Description

What the Fintech Deal Analyst, Fintech Business Development does at Visa:

Based in Singapore, the Fintech Deal Analyst, will be part of the Fintech Business Development Team that is responsible for qualifying and signing deals between Fintech clients and Visa.

This role is responsible for driving Visa’s digital, innovation and business agenda by identifying, developing and managing deal opportunities within the digital payments’ ecosystems. Visa is focused to partner with leading players in the sector that connect consumers to information via devices, search, advertising, or social networks. The role requires a close working relationship with Digital Partnerships lead in markets assigned as well as working on regional / global partnership opportunities.

The Fintech Deals Analyst will work closely with Visa’s Core Product and Digital Solutions teams as well as other stakeholders such as Processing, CyberSource, Risk, Finance, and Marketing, focused on signing and closing partnership agreements and related deliverables that are typically highly complex, strategic and cross-functional in nature.

He or she will closely work with Fintech Partner Enablement Team and Client Services Team to onboard Visa’s Strategic Digital Partners and make sure there is smooth transition going into implementation, go live and account management.

Why this is important to Visa

Our digital partners and enablers are at the forefront of the way in which we make the future of payments a reality. These partners are some of the most well-known, highest growth digital brands in the world and the Fintech Deals Analyst will be working closely with them to support their growth and innovation agenda.

The Fintech Deal Analyst’s key responsibilities are as follows:

Deal Prospecting and Qualifying: Identify new, emerging players in specified segments, verticals that could complement Visa’s offer. Manage a pipeline of opportunities that the team is pursuing
Deal Structuring, Proposal and Signing: Lead client opportunity development and drive new client sales opportunities by working with cluster teams, and the product functions to design and refine a value proposition. Structure and execute deals and engage senior leadership. Report and interact with senior management to indicate the status of the deal partnership progress. Bringing a commercial lens to the performance of our digital partners in the region.
Deal Pipeline Analysis and Reporting: Report generation and dashboard development to track deal opportunity and sales progress against committed targets

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office two days a week, Tuesdays and Wednesdays with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% of the time based on business needs.

Qualifications

Tertiary qualification in a business, commercial or technology discipline.
Minimum 3-5 years in either financial services, technology platform or a startup
Excellent analytical and communication skills
An ability to juggle multiple priorities, providing high quality deliverables in a fast-paced environment
Able to engage effectively with senior stakeholders internally & externally, strong communication and presentation skills
A high level of comfort working in a complex and often ambiguous environment
A willingness to learn and the ability to partner, communicate and manage/navigate through multiple

disciplines and organizational groups

Results driven and highly passionate to deliver committed KPIs
Above all, you will need to be a highly motivated self-starter, with a can-do attitude and ability to collaborate

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
Senior Full Stack Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
The ideal candidate will be a seasoned web applications developer masterful in HTML5,CSS3, Javascript, jQuery, C#, Visual Basic, SQL, and other related server technologies used to implement .NET applications.

Job Description & Requirements,
Should have experience in Delivering/Implementing the projects in IT
Ensure the timely completion of the tasks assigned
Ensure to follow the Technology and Process Standards set for the project
Produce high quality technical documentation for customer
Decompose technical tasks and provide accurate estimate
Coach less experienced members of the team
Contribute in high level design
Undertake development tasks without supervision, including programming and testing
To monitor progress and provide timely updates to Lead
Over 3 years of development experience using Java/J2EE related technologies
Hands on experience in designing and developing applications using Java J2EE platforms
Object oriented analysis and design using common design patterns.
Profound insight of Java and JEE internals (Class loading, Memory Management, Transaction management etc)
Experience in developing web applications using Struts, Spring MVC and EJB
Excellent knowledge of Relational Databases, PL/SQL.
Experience In Oracle Preferred.
Should possess good communication and problem solving skills
Should have Aptitude and Attitude of learning and mastering new technologies and tools
Working in Agile Methodology is a plus
Interacts with the Technical Lead, BAs and testers for the project during the project lifecycle
Interacts with the Client managers for status review meetings
Ability to work on multiple tasks concurrently
3+ years of frontend and backend software development experience
Strong development/programming experience in JavaScript, jQuery and Angular/ AngularJS
Strong development/programming experience in HTML5 and CSS3
Experience with Java and Spring
Familiarity with RESTful APIs

Desired Skills and Experience
MVC, CSS3, .NET, Design Patterns, AngularJS, JavaScript, HTML5, Agile Methodology, SQL, Angular, Web Applications, Java, C#, Databases, J2EE, Software Development"
"Platform Services, Technical Solutions Engineer, Associate","JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.6 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, asset management and private equity. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com

Global Technology (GT) is the technology organization for the Firm, delivering a wide range of information technology products and services, and collaborating with all lines of business to provide high quality service delivery, exceptional project execution and financially disciplined approaches and processes in the most cost-effective manner. Platform Services team architects, designs and implements the next-generation, on-demand cloud platform for transforming our business applications into scalable, elastic systems that are resilient, secure and cost-effective.

What You'll Do

As a Technical Solutions Engineer (TSE), you will be combine software development, networking, and systems administration expertise with an aptitude for technical advising, troubleshooting and analysis.

As a part of the TSE team, you will provide technical assistance, troubleshoot, and resolve customer problems, interface with engineering on various product issues, and contribute to projects revolving around support tools and knowledge management.

You will be the first line of contact, serving our clients users, solving their technical problems, and helping them get the most out of technology.

What Skills You'll Need

Strong inter-personal and communication skills
A willingness to do client support and interact with clients - aiming to deliver an outstanding client experience
Good understanding of a Linux operating system
Understanding of concepts like memory management (including JVM), IPC, filesystem concepts
Familiarity with fundamental networking/distributed computing environment concepts including Load Balancing
Understanding of basic routing concepts
Knowledge of cloud computing concepts
Knowledge of Python, Java
Ability to troubleshoot issues
Hands-on experience with cloud monitoring and ops analysis tools such as Prometheus, Elasticsearch, Grafana, Kibana, Splunk, etc.
A drive to introduce Automation where suitable
Familiarity with working in a large distributed system across a range of technologies - Databases - Messages - Telemetry - Platforms
Ability to articulate and share clear, concise complex technical findings in understandable terms
Ability to execute with understanding of best practices and JPMC policies top of mind
Ability to build influence with engineering teams and clients, establishing relationships and developing empathy
Ability to work independently and handle multiple concurrent initiatives.

Requirements

Minimum 5 years of relevant work experience
Bachelor's degree in computer science or a related field
Someworking experience on Linux/Unix system
Ability to troubleshoot complex and dynamic customer environments while balancing the communications needs of each case
A strong analytical mind and the ability to triage
As we are continually releasing new features and products, a high aptitude for both learning and teaching are required
Excellent written and verbal communication skills are a must, as is a collaborative approach

Desirable

AWS / Kubernetes certifications
Experience with one or more cloud platforms like Cloud Foundry, Kubernetes, AWS, and Azure
Significant programming background in any applicable language

JPMorgan Chase & Co., one of the oldest financial institutions, offers innovative financial solutions to millions of consumers, small businesses and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under the J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Our history spans over 200 years and today we are a leader in investment banking, consumer and small business banking, commercial banking, financial transaction processing and asset management.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Sales Development Representative,"Why Deliveroo?

When you first think about Deliveroo, you probably think of getting great food to your house in less than half an hour. Awesome right? But behind the scenes is the real story. This story is one of high growth, huge challenges and an enormous opportunity ahead of us.

We want to be the definitive food company - the app you go to any time you have a hunger pang. We are transforming the way people think about food. We’re a technology driven company at the forefront of the most rapidly expanding industry in the world, so come and join us for the ride.

About The Role

You’ll be using your sales and communication skills to get restaurants across Singapore signed on to the Deliveroo platform. You will help hunt down the most popular local restaurants, seek to understand their business, and use your negotiation and selling skills, both on the phone and in-person, to convince them why they need to join us in our mission to change the landscape of the food industry.

What You'll Be Doing

High levels of daily cold call activity contacting restaurant leads, presenting opportunities to partner with Deliveroo
Owning and maintaining a consistent pipeline, to exceed monthly sales targets
Utilising business templates and proposals to convert pipeline to sales
Maintaining records to provide transparency on all sales activities via the CRM
Passionately representing Deliveroo and resolving customer objections
Negotiating partnership pricing to ensure business objectives are achieved

Skills you’ll need:

You’ll be comfortable on the phone and walking into restaurants, talking to people and building rapport with them quickly
Comfort with high levels of activity and a fast-paced environment
Closing sales: getting buy in and agreement from potential customers
Experience and confidence pitching things you’re passionate about
Experience with technology and capturing your activity in a CRM
You’ll have an interest in all things food and restaurants. Deliveroo is a company of people unapologetically passionate about what they do – if you’re not into food, you soon will be.
Perseverance and grit – you’re a hustler, and you’re not afraid of rejection
Top notch people skills – you have bags of emotional intelligence and can persuade even the toughest of prospects

Benefits:

Commission based incentive scheme
Open, respectful and fun company culture
Health and Wellbeing: weekly exercise classes plus regular yoga and meditation classes
Have a real impact on the company's growth and evolution
Work with people who love what they do every day

Diversity:

We believe a great workplace is one that represents the world we live in and how beautifully diverse it can be. That means we have no judgement when it comes to any one of the things that make you who you are - your gender, race, sexuality, religion or a secret aversion to coriander. All you need is a passion for (most) food and a desire to be part of one of the fastest growing startups around."
Database Administrator (SQL & MongoDB),"What The Role Is
As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.
Information Technology
IT systems form the backbone of our operations. We are looking for individuals with passion and IT expertise, to help us improve the delivery of our systems and services. The Board’s IT systems support a high daily volume of financial transactions for CPF members. In addition to keeping the lights on, the Board also keeps pace with the external environment through innovation in its IT systems.
What You Will Be Working On
You will be responsible for the implementation, configuration and maintenance of MS SQL Server RDBMS systems. In this ‘hands-on’ role, you will be required to execute plans to continuously improve the security of our digital database platforms and ensure the health and resiliency of the databases under your care.
Your broad responsibilities will include the following
Maintain high availability and reliability of databases
Perform daily database maintenance and database security self-assessment.
Perform database creation, configuration and migration, apply patches and technology upgrade to keep the databases at supported level
Ensure that the database assets and systems are managed in accordance with the security policies and standards
Responsible for documenting database related policy, architecture and design artefact
Provide technical expertise and solutions based on user requirements for database-related project
Create program (scripts, python etc) required for automating daily task
What We Are Looking For
Minimally 4 years of MS SQL Server Administration experience and operation management
Good experience in database design, maintenance and security
Good experience in implementation of High Availability and Disaster Recovery options for MS SQL Server
Experience with Oracle DB or MongoDB a plus
Good knowledge of application and infrastructure architecture including storage, virtualisation, backup and restore management system
Ability to respond to emergency situations promptly and be able to perform system upgrades after office hour/ weekends where necessary
Seniority of the role will commensurate with relevant work experiences
What You Can Expect
A challenging and rewarding career
A variety of formal and informal training where you can hone your skills in the evolving technology landscape
Promotion opportunities through your capability and on the job performance
A friendly work environment with like-minded colleagues to co-create and collaborate together
A hybrid work model where you can work remotely up to 50% of the time
A productive yet growth-oriented workplace with flexible dress code where you are empowered to decide your appropriate outfit for the day
Comprehensive rewards package
Annual leave and pro-family leave
Medical and dental benefits
Access to recreational activities
Position is on 2-year full time contract directly under the payroll of CPF Board with potential for emplacement into permanent position"
Account Executive,"Mission
To grow depth and breadth of accounts through increasing client spend, optimized pricing, and launching profitable campaigns
To grow the marketplace vertical by increasing the number of partners and launching profitable campaigns.
To nurture and manage working relationships with existing and new onboarded partners.

Responsibilities
Operate as the lead point of contact for any and all matters specific to your partners
Build and maintain strong, long-lasting customer relationships
Secure and launch marketplace campaigns, price increases, and initiatives that drive profitability of the product vertical
Analyze data with P&L approach and report key insights to key customer stakeholders
Ensure the timely and successful delivery of our solutions according to customer needs and objectives
Communicate clearly the progress of monthly/quarterly initiatives to internal and external stakeholders
Responsible for revenue targets for your vertical
Forecast, track account metrics and assist in all partner operations
Identify and grow opportunities within territory and collaborate with internal teams to ensure growth attainment

This job is great for you if
You’re driven, meticulous, and hungry for success
You have a flair to grow new/existing accounts and partnerships
You’re interested in digital marketing and e-commerce
You’re able to think in a systematic and methodological way
You’re a self-starter and take ownership of your own learning
You’re a good communicator and want to succeed

Requirements
Demonstrated success in exceeding targets using a consultative, solutions-focused approach
Prior experience in sales or account management role, preferably in the eCommerce, retail technology, or software industries
Ability to communicate, present and influence credibly and effectively at all levels of the organization, including executive and C-level
Experience in delivering client-focused solutions based on customer needs
Proven ability to manage multiple projects/campaigns at a time while paying strict attention to detail
Excellent listener, verbal and written communicator
Effective negotiation and presentation skills
Hungry to learn and hardworking
Bachelor's degree or equivalent
Minimum 1 to 3 years of experience in sales/account management role

Here are some of the skills you’ll learn about:
Digital Marketing
Search Engine Optimization
Search Engine Marketing
Facebook Marketing
Google Analytics
Business Presentations
How an Internet business is run
How to manage budgets and OKRs

Competencies
Strategic Thinking / Visioning
Organized and Meticulous
Persistence
Proactive
Good communication skills (written and verbal)
Creative
Persuasive

Cultural Competencies
Be a Positive Team Player
Take Ownership
Bias for Action
Take Charge of your Professional Development
Being Customer Centric

MoneySmart Group is an equal opportunity employer. Please include only relevant details and avoid unnecessary information (e.g., photos, age) in your job application to assist us in ensuring that the interview process is devoid of bias."
APAC Solution Architect - Workday,"As a leading provider of human capital solutions, we help our clients and their people navigate the complexity of health, wealth and HR. We combine data-driven, consumer-centered technology with personalized care and service to deliver a superior customer experience. Our dedicated colleagues across 28 global centers help 23 million people and their 11 million family members simplify work and life, both now and in the future. At Alight, we are reimagining how people and organizations thrive.

As An Cloud Deployment Solution Architect, a typical day to include the following:
Act as point of contact/coordination for CDS project estimates
Support Sales Executives in requirement gathering/project scoping including attending sales meetings to provide Workday knowledge/expertise to complete due diligence and proposal presentation
Provide detailed system estimates (data conversion + technical integrations + functional configuration) for Workday solutions and projects
Coordinate with Delivery Team SME for deep dive on complex or unique technical solutions to approve the system estimates and assumptions can be met
Author system design scope proposal development including timeline, estimates and scope assumptions. Review final proposal for validity and consistency with approach/scope
Understand the competitive landscape and customer needs to position the Delivery organization effectively
Support Sales Executives in review of Statement of Work
Support Sales Executives on Workday models
Assist Solution Analyst and Sales Executives with completion of RFPs/RFIs
Participate in new solution/offer discussions
Articulate the client/project needs and utilize modeling tools to ensure an accurate estimate and assumptions
Hit the ground running in understanding and advancing the controls around our delivery models/offers and accelerating others’ understanding and experience to the same level
Navigate the discussions with business, sales, and clients to ensure an accurate and appropriate solution is achieved in a cost-effective manner
Document concisely and clear throughout, ensuring maximum transparency and knowledge transfer across Delivery

Knowledge and Expertise of:
3 plus years of experience in a Workday implementation role
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Proven ability to thrive and excel in a lean, fast-paced, dynamic environment with high performance expectations
Able to multi- task, work under pressure and meet deadlines
Focused on attention to detail and accuracy and have strong analytic/diagnostic skills
Flexible within the role and displays a willingness to get involved in appropriate tasks as requested from time to time
Able to demonstrate customer management / service skills
Self-driven and resourceful to achieve goals independently as well as work well in groups
Must be able to travel up to 50%

Education:

Bachelor’s Degree in Business, technical, finance or relevant field of study

By applying for a position with Alight, you understand that, should you be made an offer, it will be contingent on your undergoing and successfully completing a background check consistent with Alight’s employment policies. Background checks may include some or all of the following based on the nature of the position: SSN/SIN validation, education verification, employment verification, and criminal check, search against global sanctions and government watch lists, fingerprint verification, credit check, and/or drug test. You will be notified during the hiring process which checks are required by the position.

At Alight, we believe that diversity should be visible, valued, and sustained throughout the organization. Alight provides equal treatment and employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to any protected status or other protected characteristic.

Alight does not discriminate against anyone based on sex, race, color, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, pregnancy, marital or domestic partner status, citizenship, military or veteran status, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, genetic information, or any other legally protected characteristics or conduct covered by federal, state or local law. In addition, we take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified minorities, women, disabled persons, disabled veterans and other covered veterans.

Alight provides reasonable accommodations to the known limitations of otherwise qualified employees and applicants for employment with disabilities, sincerely held religious beliefs, practices and observances, unless doing so would result in an undue hardship. Applicants for employment may request a reasonable accommodation/modification by contacting his/her recruiter.

We offer you a competitive total rewards package, continuing education & training, and tremendous potential with a growing worldwide organization.

DISCLAIMER:

Nothing in this job description restricts management's right to assign or reassign duties and responsibilities of this job to other entities; including but not limited to subsidiaries, partners, or purchasers of Alight business units."
Data Scientist,"At Silent Eight, we develop our own AI-based product that combats Money Laundering and Terrorism Financing. We are a RegTech Firm working with large international banks such as Standard Chartered Bank, HSBC and financial institutions.
Join us and help us make the world safer.

🕵️ Short Job description:
Competitive salary
Employee Stock Options
Work focus: Develop AML (Anti-Money Laundering) solution using various data science techniques
Location: Fully remote forever (with a possibility to work from a coworking office)
Career growth: Promotion and great development opportunities within the organization

👨‍💻 Modern technology stack:
Work methodology: Scrum
Main technologies: Python 3, SQL,
Tools used: Flask, Pandas, PySpark, nltk, gRPC, Jupyter Notebooks, Docker
Build server: Jenkins, GitLab
Database: PostgreSQL
Code reviews: GitLab
Issue tracking tool: Jira
Knowledge repository: Confluence, Google Drive
Operating system: Linux
Freedom to choose tools: Yes

📝Requirements:
Python, Pyspark, Pandas; NLP Libraries
SQL
Statistics and machine learning.
Translate complex, technical concepts into actionable, high-level business ideas
Linux environment (Bash) and continuous integration will get you extra points
Minimum 2 years' working experience in Data Science
✔️ Your daily tasks on the job:
Learn from Subject Matter Experts (financial crime, machine learning, software architecture and more)
Work with technologically fluent management, who understand the hardships of data science and software development from experience
Maintain strong autonomy with no micromanagement
Set worldwide standards for identifying money laundering and terrorism financing events
Approach the problem with any solution that works, be it machine learning or otherwise
Hone your NLP and text analysis skills to a master level
Communicate the business value of your work

🙌 Our culture
You will be co-creating our business solutions
We believe that your feedback allows us to create the best solutions as well as adjusted work culture. You will have a real impact on the growth of the company and the product we develop.

Experienced team
We are not another young, dynamic team. At Silent Eight, everyone is a leader in their own field with perspective and experience shared across teams and departments.

Development Day
Because learning never ends, we encourage each of our employees to take a day to learn or try something new. Take a Development Day, on us!

In-house training
We are passionate about technology and continuous development. Our colleagues are happy to share their knowledge during internal training sessions.

Team building events
We know that our success is only possible if we work together as a team. We are a group of enthusiasts who share common passions and goals. Therefore we like to meet together.

Tea time
If you join our team, you will regularly meet us for tea talks, during which we can get to know each other better.

100% remote work forever
We are not new to remote work-life. In fact, we’ve been doing it since 2013 and we know how to make you feel supported and connected with your team.do that and bond with our team. Therefore, you can be sure that your role will not move to the office.


Don't wait and join our team!

Silent Eight is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or other classification protected by applicable federal, state or local law.
* Please include the following statement in your application:
“I hereby give consent for my personal data included in my application to be processed by Silent Eight Pte. Ltd. whose registered office is 3 Church Street, Samsung Hub #25-01, Singapore 049712
for purposes of the recruitment process for the position of Data Scientist under the Regulation (EU) 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 27 April 2016 on the protection of natural persons with regard to the processing of personal data and the free movement of such data, and repealing Directive 95/46/WE (General Data Protection Regulation).”
We kindly inform you that the above consents can be withdrawn at any time by sending an e-mail to dp@silenteight.com from the e-mail address provided in your application.
We will continue to hold and process your data for as long as necessary to consider you for employment and for a reasonable period of time as is necessary for document compliance with local laws in the country where the opportunity is located. You can withdraw your consent at any time and we will delete your data unless continued retention is required for compliance documentation. You have the right to access, correct, modify, update, rectify, request for the transfer or deletion of data, withdrawal of consent or objection."
Fluid Dynamics Engineer,"About Us

The Technology System Department encompasses three key groups – Performance Test, Analysis, and Systems Engineering. This role resides within the Analysis group, which provides technical leadership in the fields of flow, thermal management, acoustic and vibration, structural dynamics and mechanics of materials.

This position has developed a higher level of knowledge & skill within own discipline, and is recognized as a valued team player. Working effectively in a team, this individual is expected to provide original assessment and options to technical challenges within a project. To be successful in this role, it is critical to be able to think and act independently while demonstrating the ability to escalate any issues.

About The Role

Holds responsibility to deliver the best use of Fluid Dynamics and Thermodynamics Technology to assigned projects.
May own performance specifications within projects and expected to ensure that the product performance satisfy the requirements. Deliverables include analytical study, experimental testing, as well as simulation (via CFD).
Manage related technical risk actively and provide mitigations as needed. Ensure timely closure of risk items.
Resolve FRACAS (Problem Report) through systematic technical analysis in timely manner.
Plan and manage progress of actions, both self and cross-team, in order to deliver on time.
Support departmental goals and long term technology road map.
Take ownership of personal career development by setting out immediate and long term plan together with line manager.
Proactively communicate progress to line manager via 1-1 reporting.
Proactively identify areas of improvement and to propose improvements actions.
Actively contributes to lessons learnt database to ensure sharing of past learnings.
About you

A Bachelor degree in aeronautical/mechanical engineering or equivalent, applicants with a Master degree is preferred.
Two years of experience in mechanical product design & development, preferably in the consumer electrical appliance industry. Candidates with no experience will be considered for entry-level position.
Both theoretical and applicative knowledge of Fluid Dynamics, Thermodynamics, and experimental testing.
Both theoretical and applicative knowledge of the principles and application of computational fluid dynamics. Competent user in ANSYS Fluent or relevant CFD software.
Experience in measurement devices and their accurate usage (e.g. Manometer, Venturi Meter, Bellmouth, Thermocouple, Thermal camera)
Experience in data acquisition/processing software and hardware (e.g. B&K Pulse, National Instruments modules, MATLAB, and Labview)
Ability to analyse and solve problem using systematic root-cause analysis approach.
Able to identify technical risks within projects. Expected to suggest specific actions to mitigate risks. Able to contribute in FMEA sessions.
Demonstrate strong written and verbal communication skills in English.
Ability to receive constructive feedback and coaching, and respond appropriately.
Able to communicate ideas and concepts clearly.
Benefits

Dyson Singapore monitors the market to ensure we offer competitive salaries, management bonuses and pension contributions. Beyond that, you’ll enjoy generous leave and medical care and insurance. But financial benefits are only the start of a career at Dyson. Leadership support and new opportunities abound, driven by regular dialogue and international training. And with a vibrant culture, the latest devices and a relaxed dress code reflecting our engineering spirit, it’s an exciting team environment geared to progress, innovation and realising ambition.

Dyson is an equal opportunity employer. We know that great minds don’t think alike, and it takes all kinds of minds to make our technology so unique. We welcome applications from all backgrounds and employment decisions are made without regard to race, colour, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other any other dimension of diversity."
2023 Electrical Engineer Campus Hire of Engineering Rotation Program (Fresh Grads),"2023 Electrical Engineer Campus Hire of Engineering Rotation Program

Our Electrical Engineering team puts the spark into the full hardware development lifecycle, from concept to production. It takes experts in system architecture definition, design, prototyping, sourcing & the debugging and validation of layouts or routes to deliver state-of-the-art products for a changing world. We work closely with designers, cross-functional teams within Dell Technologies and suppliers to make sure electronic designs meet a range of requirements, including schedule, feature set, functionality and quality, as well as industry standards.

Join us as an Electrical Engineer as part of our Client Solutions Group (CSG) Engineering Rotation Program in Singapore to do the best work of your career and make a profound social impact.

What You’ll Achieve

The Engineering Rotation Program provides you a fast-paced, dynamic organization in a supportive environment that encourages learning and growth. The program consists of 3 rotations, each 12-months long, to offer you the ability to learn across different projects, solutions, and technical deliverables needed to bring our products to market. Built into the program are key opportunities for networking, knowledge sharing, and career progression.

As an Electrical Engineer, you will design, modify and evaluate electronic parts, components or integrated circuitry to build electronic equipment and other hardware systems regarding our desktop/ laptop/ peripheral products.

You will:
Be supported by technical subject matter experts, mentors and peer advisors that will provide day-to-day support, grow your Dell network, and assimilate you into the Dell and CSG culture
Complete the rotation program with a deeper understanding of the CSG Engineering portfolio, accelerated technical expertise, and the ability to align your passions to your future career at Dell
Confirm design approaches and parameters, contribute ideas to drive the innovative design solutions for commercial notebook PC, education chrome book PC and mobile workstation systems
Prepare equipment and test plan requirements to perform verification; conducts experimental tests and evaluates results. Debug and solve developing/validation issues.
Reviews ODM and sub-tier vendor capability to support product development and production

Take the first step towards your dream career

Every Dell Technologies team member brings something unique to the table. Here’s what we are looking for with this role:

Essential Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Technology or Computer Science related fields and expect to graduate by July 2023
Strong interpersonal and communication skills that will make you a great collaborator in a global team environment
Electrical schematic design and layout knowledge based on X86 architecture
Good analytical and problem-solving skills

Desirable Requirements
Internship experience in a technology related field
Participation in roles outside of the classroom

Here’s our story; now tell us yours

Dell Technologies helps organizations and individuals build a brighter digital tomorrow. Our company is made up of more than 150,000 people, located in over 180 locations around the world. We’re proud to be a diverse and inclusive team and have an endless passion for our mission to drive human progress.

What’s most important to us is that you are respected, feel like you can be yourself and have the opportunity to do the best work of your life — while still having a life. We offer excellent benefits, bonus programs, flexible work arrangements, a variety of career development opportunities, employee resource groups, and much more.

We started with computers, but we didn’t stop there. We are helping customers move into the future with multi-cloud, AI and machine learning through the most innovative technology and services portfolio for the data era. Join us and become a part of what’s next in technology, starting today.

You can also learn more about us by reading our latest Diversity and Inclusion Report and our plan to make the world a better place by 2030 here.

Dell is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Dell are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV Status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Dell will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Dell encourages applicants of all ages. Read the full Employment Opportunity Policy here.

""SGUR""

Job Id: R199681"
Senior Solution Designer (DevOps),"The key purpose of this role is to have DevOps mode of operation, blended with TMF Agile Ops & DevOps studies.

Candidate has to have a good functional and analytical understanding to deliver solutions that are flexible, extensible and meets functionality, operational and scalability requirements. The candidate is required to be independent, resourceful and self motivated.

The role requires the candidate to work in collaboration with other teams to deliver initiatives align with the Singtel strategic journey.

The candidate must be able to work in a large, complex and dynamic environment, have skills and ability to drive delivery of complex business initiatives.

Stakeholder Management

The candidate must be able to present and influence stakeholders and vendors.

A high level of focus is placed upon providing outstanding Customer Experience as well as building trust and working relationships across the entire Singtel Group IT organization.

Technical Skills

The role requires a minimum of 3 years’ experience in ASP Dot Net, MVC, MSSQL Server, MS IIS, Web API, Web Services, Angular JS, jQuery, Java Script, Oracle DB, MySQL DB, HTML/JavaScript, Webservice SOAP/REST.

Candidate must have hands on expertise working in an agile/SCRUM/DevOps environment and is familiar with CI/CD processes and tools.

CI/CD: Bamboo, Bitbucket, Nexus, Maven, Gradle

Testing: SoapUI, Selenium, SonarQube, JMeter

Process: JIRA, Confluence, SNOW

Core attributes required of the role include a thorough understanding of Applications Development and Delivery lifecycle as well as the enablement and convergence of Telecommunication Services.

Requirements
Tertiary education with Degree in Computer Science, IT, software or computer engineering fields or equivalent
Minimum 3 years of work experience as Software Engineer (Developer), preferably with Telco experience
Experience in managing multiple business stakeholders and vendors
Strong understanding of architectural principles and industry standards
Experience in delivery in a complex and high-pressure environment
Strong customer focus with a commitment to delivery of quality services
Knowledge of telecommunication systems, technical and engineering concepts as well as business operations and processes.
Ability to keep abreast of the new technologies with a view of implementing them to increase productivity and efficiency of the organization.
Demonstrable background in the design, implementation, measurement and tracking of operational key performance indicators
Detailed understanding of the end-to-end software life cycle, operational and support procedures, and processes
Strong technical background with interest and motivation to self-learn to keep abreast to technology trend and tools."
"Staff Engineer, iOS","Why apply to Circles.Life?

Circles.Life is not just your digital telco provider. Since our launch, we revolutionised the telco industry by seamlessly integrating both telco and digital lifestyle services on our Circles-X platform. Over the past years, we have captured more than 5% market share in Singapore, launched in Australia and Taiwan while attaining record breaking CSAT and NPS (+50). We were voted the Top Employer in Digital Telco and also became an accredited winner in showcasing excellence in workplace culture in 2019.

About Circles.life

Circles.Life is Asia's first and most successful digital telco and we are on a mission to re-imagine the customer experience for the digital consumer and disrupt the multi-trillion dollar industry. We launched our services in Singapore in 2016, and have since expanded to Australia, Taiwan, Indonesia and Japan. We are leading the market in innovation, customer satisfaction and growth.

Circles.Life was founded by Rameez Ansar (ex-Temasek, BCG), Abhishek Gupta (ex-McKinsey, Bain Capital, StanChart PE) & Adeel Najam (ex- Nokia, Huawei, Starhub), who are supported by an all-star leadership team including C-suite executives from Tata Docomo, Paypal, Vodafone, Bharti Airtel, Hooq/ Singtel, and Flipkart (to name a few)

It now employs 400+ people over 5 APAC offices. It is the portfolio company of Warburg Pincus and Sequoia

Notable accolades from past years include: Top 5 most loved Singapore brands (2nd year running)- YouGov Customer's Choice; Top Telco for Customer Service- Seedly; and Top Employer- Influential Brands (2019)

About This Role

Circles.Life is looking for a Staff Engineer - iOS who possesses superior iOS development and analytical skills. The ideal candidate will be a team player with a customer-centric mindset to give attention to details and take full ownership of products. You will get a unique opportunity to work on high-impact projects and interact directly with senior leadership.

As a critical member of our team, your responsibilities include:
Designing, implementing and extending new and existing product features and platforms.
Collaborating with product, designer, and backend development teams.
Challenging the status quo to define future visions.
Leading a team of mobile developers in delivering high-quality App builds through code reviews and mentoring.
Helping enhance the reusable mobile development framework and its components to speed up feature releases.
Collaborating across teams on a continuous integration and delivery (CI/CD) process for app delivery
Taking end to end ownership of feature delivery and releases
Planning for engineering backlogs, code cleanup, maintenance to keep updated with latest technology
Requirements
Bachelor's degree in computer science, computer engineering or information systems.
Knowledge of CS fundamental, object-oriented, and functional reactive programming concepts.
Deep technical knowledge of Swift, ObjC, RxSwift, Cocoa Touch framework, CI/CD, and Unit testing.
Expected 10 years experience in iOS app development, with at least two years of leading experience.
Strong leadership skills with the ability to convey technical requirements to non-technical stakeholders (Product Managers, Marketing, etc.)
Nice To Have
Experience in Backend Development (Go, Node, Java)
Experience in Android Development (Kotlin)
Experience in Hybrid Frameworks (Google Flitter, IONIC)
Interested to know more about us?
LinkedIn | Facebook | Instagram | Twitter
“Telco start-up Circles.Life snags funding from Warburg Pincus”
“A deep-dive into how Circles.Life can become Singapore's unicorn”
Circles.Life is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, disability or age.

To all recruitment agencies: Circles.Life will only acknowledge resumes from agencies specifically retained for the role.

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted for interviews."
System IT Analyst,"LF Logistics is part of A.P. Moller – Maersk, an integrated container logistics company working to connect and simplify its customers’ supply chains. As the logistics partner of choice for major local and multinational companies, LF Logistics offers a suite of integrated logistics and supply chain management services in the Fast Moving Consumer Goods, Food & Beverage, Footwear & Apparel and Retail sectors. Through its comprehensive distribution network in Asia, LF Logistics collaborates closely with over 400 brand owners and retailers to provide tailor-made warehousing and transport management solutions. LF Logistics connects origins and destinations with flexibility, timeliness and responsiveness. Today, with the increasing importance of e-commerce and cross border trades, LF Logistics provides a total omnichannel-fulfilment solution and operates major regional hubs and consolidation centres to optimise inventory flow and ensure quick response.
We are committed to put our customers’ needs first. Global Markets are evolving fast, and we aim to connect, protect, and simplify our customers’ supply chain in response to these changes. We are on an exciting journey to transform the flow of goods, data and materials that sustain people, businesses and economies the world over – driving our vision as a true global integrator.
Want to be part of our exciting growth journey? Join us in our Omnichannel-Fulfilment team as a System IT Analyst! You’ll play a vital part in our success, developing, designing, and implementing innovative warehouse solutions, which bring standardisation, visibility, and actionability to our customer’s supply chains.

Responsibilities:
Responsible for gathering operations requirements, and relating and working closely with Warehouse Management System (WMS) team for solutions
Key link between Operations and WMS team in deployment and integrations across customers
Manage Warehouse Management System (WMS) change requirements and projects
Assist project teams and sub-teams in implementing new WMS applications for multiple customers and process improvements
Ensure that multiple projects meet specified timelines and deliver expected results
Maintain, adjust and update project plans as needed. Consolidates, communicates and ensures resolution of all operational & IT issues. Develop and collect performance metrics
Working across functional areas to develop effective business solutions that align with company and business unit/department objectives

Requirements:
BSc in Logistics/Supply Chain/Engineering/Computer Science/Information Technology or related disciplines equivalent
Minimum 3 years of experience in related working experience
Experience in using MS SQL tools will be an advantage
Strong problem-solving, requirements gathering, and analytical skills
Resourceful, dynamic, customer-focused, business and result-oriented
Operational knowledge of warehousing & transportation, department or functional area's processes and systems are added advantage
Ability to communicate operation/IT challenges & opportunities effectively to all levels, including management
Ability to manage multiple concurrent projects, tasks, and changing priorities"
Cybersecurity Engineer (Security Operations),"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

You will be part of Government Infrastructure Group which supports Whole-Of-Government services for Agencies/ public officers, and hosting infrastructure services for Agency applications on-premises and in commercial cloud providers. Building cybersecurity into the design, build and operate phases in central services, you will be exposed to a wide array of cybersecurity technology and practices. These real world experiences will challenge and hone the cybersecurity skills and capabilities of individuals willing to step up to the challenge.

What you will be working on:

Lead implementation of enterprise security infrastructures which includes Contractor management, design validation and test acceptance.
Perform maintenance on the enterprise security infrastructures that covers service and security posture upkeep.
Develop correlation rules in Security Information Event Management (SIEM) system to detect anomalies or security threats through monitoring.
Escalate security incident alert to respective system owner and assist in containment and recovery from the security incident.
Perform vulnerability assessment using automated tools and recommend actionable follow up to remediate the vulnerabilities and/or threats uncovered
Plan and participate in areas of security operations to ensure that processes meet defined information security policies and standards, and evolving security threats.
Lead and manage security assessments of system that include configuration review, vulnerability scanning and penetration testing.
Provide security consultancy in area of threat and risk assessment throughout the system lifecycle from implementation to maintenance.

What we are looking for:

Experience in management, deployment and maintenance of security infrastructure
Experience in enterprise data centre operations, information security office, security consultancy and security operation an advantage
Experience in effectively managing contractors and work in cross functional teams
Up-to-date knowledge on the various security technologies
Bachelor's degree computer science, information systems or related field.
Security Certifications like CISA, GSEC, CISSP an advantage
Experience in public sector technical writing and procurement processes an advantage
Good interpersonal and presentation skills, collaborative and self-directed

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
"Principal Data Engineer, Data Engineering","The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

As a Principal Data Engineer in the Data Engineering team of GovTech’s Data Science and Artificial Intelligence Division, you are responsible for helping to shape the direction of the data engineering domain in GovTech; working with other domain experts, the delivery teams, vendors, and partners to influence technology roadmaps and the adoption of suitable data solutions across government. In addition, you will teach, mentor, and proactively grow fellow data engineers within the organization.

You will be leading multiple teams of data engineers to drive impact at scale, by building whole-of-government data infrastructure to power the insights needed for evidence-based decision-making and enhancing agencies’ service-delivery. You will architect, design and build next-generation central data infrastructure to galvanise digitalisation in the public sector. Taking a more integrated approach to lay the foundation infrastructure and driving pervasive adoption of advanced data technologies throughout the economy and society, you will architect solutions that enable public agencies and sectoral partners to better integrate, exploit and understand their data to improve operations and decision-making, and deliver high-quality digital services to citizens and businesses in Singapore.

Join us on this journey to make a difference for the nation and our future generations, if you are:

Experienced leading data pipeline building and data wrangling and enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up as part of multiple cross-functional teams,
Have strong project management and organizational skills, self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs across multiple teams, systems and products,
Excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing central and agencies’ data architecture to support next generation of government products and data initiatives, and
Recognized expert with proven technical leadership, experienced working in a agile team to build systems from architecture to deployment for cloud and on-prem infrastructure, and
Have the desire to serve the public good through the use of technology.

What you will be working on:
Take the driving seat and lead our data engineers in complex technical projects to:
Expand and optimize our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimize data flow systems for cross functional teams in a secured and scalable manner.
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements, transforming data into formats that are easy to consume and analyse.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements, e.g., automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infra for greater scalability.
Build the infra required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a variety of data sources using SQL and industry standard Infra-as-Code tools.
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into key performance metrics and support our next gen of products and data initiatives.
Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to support their data and data pipelining use cases, and ensure optimal and secured data delivery architecture is consistent across projects, products and platforms.
Drive innovative initiatives that uplift data capability across the government sector:
Develop a strategic sense of key organisations, software and hardware tools, methodologies, and best practices in the data engineering landscape.
Be the bridge between engineering and product line management and translate market requirements into product definitions and architecture designs.
Analyse and solve complex data engineering problems, and translate architecture designs into implementations that satisfy the market requirements.
Educate the team on new technological advances and work alongside them in proof-of-concept research projects and subsequent agile product delivery.
Provide expert perspective to help shape data-related strategy and initiatives, and be our technical ambassador by writing internal blogs or publishing white papers.

What we are looking for:
Candidate with 8+ years of experience in a Lead Data Engineer role, who has attained a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or other relevant engineering degree.
In-depth working knowledge across a variety of relational SQL and NoSQL databases, including efficient query authoring, performance optimisation and troubleshooting.
Experience building and optimizing data, data pipelines, and architectures, with processes to support transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for further improvement.
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and scalable data stores.
A successful history of processing and extracting value from large datasets from different sources and systems, with strong analytics skills related to working with unstructured data.
You should also have experience using the following software/tools:
Big data and stream-processing tools: Hadoop, Spark, Beam, Flink, Kafka, etc.
Data pipelining and workflow management tools: Luigi, Airflow, etc
Cloud computing environments and services: AWS, GCP, Azure
DevSecOps tools: Git, Kubernetes, Docker, Terraform etc
Programming languages: Python, Java, C++, Scala, etc

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours”"
Sales Development Representative,"Join us as we pursue our ground-breaking new vision to make machine data accessible, usable, and valuable to everyone. We are a company filled with people who are passionate about our product and seek to deliver the best experience for our customers. At Splunk, we’re committed to our work, customers, having fun, and most importantly, to each other’s success. Learn more about Splunk careers and how you can become a part of our journey!

Role

We are seeking exceptional ambitious individuals to join our team and help us bring Splunk to the next level. In this role you will help our sales team break into businesses that have never used Splunk. This individual will play a key role in qualifying opportunities, build customer interest and success by being proactive and upbeat to help carve the path for this dynamic team.

Responsibilities I want to and can do that!
Qualify and develop inbound leads and build business opportunities through outbound prospecting
Develop qualified sales opportunities and cultivate for future pipeline potential
Handle accounts by building intelligence and encouraging client relationships through personalized contact, understanding of client’s needs, and ability to communicate solution values of products and services
Schedule qualified discovery meetings/product demos for Field reps to lead
Support attendance to all field marketing events to include, but not limited to Splunk Live events, events run by Splunk partners and any other related trade shows.
Meet monthly strategic objectives sought at growing revenue in accounts through developing consistent sales pipeline
Work closely both with sales and marketing to provide better insight into the success of the marketing activities that are being run at the same time as generating new pipeline.
Requirements I’ve already done that or have that!
Have a curiosity about technology and developing a career in sales
Strong organizational and follow-up skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Good command of English and Mandarin
Continuously strive to improve sales efficiency and business acumen
Strong work ethic, self-motivated and driven and keen to work in a team environment
Have strong communication skills and the ability to lead by example
With an appetite for and motivated to grow, learn and work your way up through a sales organization"
"Officer, Quantitative Services Analyst","Job Description:

Your background

Required Skills: (Must have these skills to be minimally qualified)
At least 1-2 years of financial markets experience working in a quantitative risk, middle office, or front office role.
Excellent communication skills & analytical skills.
Knowledge of Financial Risk Management, OTC derivative products including futures, options, swaps, credit default swaps, forward rate agreements and swaptions.
Strong technical skills including experience using Excel, VBA and SQL and minimum of 1 year of Python programming experience.
Experience working with OTC derivatives/Fixed Income.
Desired Skills:
Minimum undergraduate in Mathematics, Finance or Quantitative field.
Knowledge of uncleared margin rules, the ISDA SIMM model, and the BCBS-IOSCO framework is a plus.
Other Qualifications

∙ Strives to bring new thoughts and ideas to teams in order to drive innovation and unique solutions

∙ Excels in working among diverse viewpoints to determine the best path forward

∙ Experience in connecting with a diverse set of clients to understand future business needs – is a continuous learner

∙ Commitment to challenging the status quo and promoting positive change.

∙ Participate in and drive collaborative efforts to advance tools, technology, and ways of working to better serve an evolving client base

∙ Believes in value of diversity so we can reflect, connect and meet the diverse needs of our clients and employees around the world

What You Can Expect

The Quantitative Services Uncleared Margin Rule (UMR) Analyst is a member of the team responsible for maintaining the stability of business processes and controls needed to ensure the firm’s initial margin (“IM”) calculations are accurate and consistent with Dodd-Frank’s Uncleared Margin Rules (UMR) in support of our internal stakeholder, the Counterparty Portfolio Management group.

What You Will Do
Review and verify the model inputs feeding the IM calculations.
Identify, document, and escalate production errors detected during pre- and post-calculation routines.
Perform periodic controls which exist to prevent and mitigate erroneous IM calculations.
Work directly with the front office and technology teams on issues discovered through technology testing and daily control procedures.
Assist with the testing and validation of IM results through each technology release.
Identify and establish control processes that will mitigate future IM calculation errors.
Perform daily and ad-hoc reporting to measure and monitor key metrics for the UMR BAU space.
Provide enhanced analysis and IM explains to front office and collateral operations teams when counterparty disputes arise for IM calculations.
Communicate effectively with all levels of management, across business units as well as externally to customers of the firm.
About Bank Of America

Our purpose as a firm is to make financial lives better, through the power of every connection. Across the world, we partner with leading corporate and institutional investors through our offices in more than 35 countries. In the U.S. alone, we serve almost all of the Fortune 500 companies and approximately 67 million consumer and small-business clients. We provide a full suite of financial products and services, from banking and investments to asset and risk management. We cover a broad range of asset classes, making us a global leader in corporate and investment banking, sales and trading.

Connecting Asia Pacific to the world

Our Asia Pacific team is spread across 19 cities in 12 markets. We are focused on connecting Asia to the world and the world to Asia, using our global expertise to ensure success is shared between us, our clients and our communities. Our regional footprint covers 12 currencies, more than a dozen languages and five time zones, placing us firmly among the region’s leading financial services companies."
Site Reliability Engineer (Stability Assurance) - Server Architecture,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

This position is with TikTok's Stability Assurance Team. The team is responsible for ensuring that the services provided by TikTok are highly reliable with low-latency. Reliability assurance is complex and systematic for any massive application system and the team focuses on optimizing the application architecture from end to end; driven by data analysis, with automatic and intelligent failure recovery.

1. Ensure the online stability of the core system such as TikTok, quickly respond to online accidents and build mechanisms and platforms to improve processing efficiency.
2. Participate in the construction of operation and maintenance tools and platforms, and promote the automation of operation and maintenance.
3. Find system weaknesses and improve projects on the ground through continuous and comprehensive data operations (including availability indicators, historical accidents, resource utilization, etc.),
4. Accumulate best practices in operation and maintenance, provide guidance for business architecture design and component selection, and output operation and maintenance technical documents;
5. Promote the improvement of service reliability, scalability and performance optimization to ensure system SLA.

Qualifications

- Bachelor's Degree or above, Major in Computer Science;
- Solid basic knowledge of computer software; understand the relevant principles of Linux operating system, storage, network IO, etc.;
- Familiar with one or more programming languages, such as Python/Go/Java/PHP/C/C++;
- Have the ability to solve problems systematically, good communication skills, and a strong sense of responsibility

Preferred Qualification
Minimum 3-5 years relevant work experience from a large-scale internet business

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too"
Sales Development Representative,"We’re at the forefront of the data revolution, committed to building the world’s greatest data and applications platform. Our ‘get it done’ culture allows everyone at Snowflake to have an equal opportunity to innovate on new ideas, create work with a lasting impact, and excel in a culture of collaboration.

We are looking for a motivated and enthusiastic Sales Development Representative to come aboard! Our SDRs will work hand in hand with Inside Sales to generate leads and build customer pipelines. This is an entry-level role with a dedicated growth path and the training to be a great technical sales professional. We are looking for self-starters with a passion for technology and people.

AS A SALES DEVELOPMENT REPRESENTATIVE AT SNOWFLAKE YOU WILL:
Generate appointments by means of proactive outbound prospecting and lead activity management in an effort to qualify and market our solutions to potential customers.
Work directly with marketing to discover opportunities from leads, and set appointments from those leads.
Use of strong selling and influencing skills to set up qualified appointments.
Understand the Snowflake Database enough to provide a high level introduction.
Leverage taught sales techniques to maximize customer interactions.
Log, track, and maintain outbound activity.
Work closely with Sales Directors and attend customer meetings as required.
Attend sales meetings, vendor training, and local trade shows to keep current with technology.

OUR iDEAL SALES DEVELOPMENT REPRESENTATIVE WILL HAVE:
2-5 years of relevant experience.
Fluent English language skills.
Strong in-person, phone, and written customer communication skills.
Must be able to interact and communicate with individuals at all levels of the organization.
Understanding of workflow systems and their application to customer business process improvement.
Ability to make formal and informal presentations to staff and clients.
Ability to prioritize work assignments and shift work efforts based on the needs of the department or business goals.
Strong PC skills required; knowledge of Salesforce.com a plus.
Ability to manage time effectively, work independently, and be self-motivated.
Prior track record of achievement in positions with significant accountability.Interested in pursuing a career in technology.
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced startup environment.
Four year college degree from an accredited institution preferred.
Proactive, independent thinker with high energy/positive attitude.
Excellent verbal and written communication, presentation, and relationship management skills."
"Desktop Support Engineer - Elite FinTech - $100,000-$150,000 CAD","Job title: Desktop Support Engineer
Client: Elite FinTech / HFT Firm
Salary: $100,000-$150,000 SGD
Location: Singapore
Skills: Windows 10/11, Windows Server, Office365, Azure, PowerShell

The role: My client are seeking a versatile Desktop Support Engineer to join their internal IT Support team. You will be working at one of the world’s most Elite FinTech HFT firms, with a large focus on automation and cutting-edge technology.

Essential skills:
· Experience working within a similar environment, Finance or equivalent
· Broad 1st / 2nd Line Support experience
· Strong Microsoft orientated skillset – Windows 10/11, AD, Office365 etc.
· Ability to communicate at all levels
· Some experience with PowerShell"
Senior Software Engineer (Linux),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Candidate Profile

Creative and responsive developer, with excellent skills, knowledge and experience in USB domain, including device drivers implementation in Linux, mac, winCE

Key Responsibilities

Software Development
Perform USB2.0 / USB3.0 device driver development, test, optimisation and maintenance
Participate in all phases of SDLC and prepare corresponding documentation
Undertake porting and maintenance of existing drivers to new frameworks and OSes
Resolve defects reported by internal and external customers
Work closely with USB host & device firmware development teams

Knowledge And Skill Requirements
Degree/Master in Computer Science/Engineering
5-10 years or above experience in the area of USB device drivers development
Working experience from specification to delivery of certified products
Good knowledge of USB2.0 and USB3.0 protocols and USBCV is required
Understanding of USB Device Classes (HID, MSC, CDC, UVC, UAC, DFU, Custom) is a plus.
D2XX knowledge is a definite plus.
Knowledgeable in WinUSB and libusb
Embedded development experience in WinCE, MacOS, Android and Linux is a definite plus
Experience working with hardware boards, scope and USB analysers
Experience in USB device pre-testing and USB certification
Professional attitude to work and meticulous in coding and testing
Must have participated and experienced in SQA processes
Desired Skills and Experience
MacOS, Mac, Hardware, Software Engineering, MySQL, Agile, JavaScript, SDLC, Device Drivers, SQL, Python, Firmware, Java, Databases, Linux, Software Development"
Communications and Social Account Executive,"COMPANY OVERVIEW:

Royal Caribbean International has been delivering innovation at sea for more than 50 years. Each successive class of ships is an architectural marvel that features the latest technology and guest experiences for today’s adventurous traveler. The cruise line continues to revolutionize vacations with itineraries to 240 destinations in 61 countries on six continents, including Royal Caribbean’s private island destination in The Bahamas, Perfect Day at CocoCay, the first in the Perfect Day Island Collection. Royal Caribbean has also been voted “Best Cruise Line Overall” for 19 consecutive years in the Travel Weekly Readers’ Choice Awards.

We're most proud that in the past month we are on the Forbes World's Best Employers list!

JOB SUMMARY:

This is an important, strategic role in the implementation of public relations programs designed to create and maintain favorable public image for the organization. This team member should be a communications and public relations professional, capable of assisting in projects and project teams, and producing content of the highest caliber. The position may focus on any of several professional areas, including media and influencer relations, storytelling, press tours, PR agency relations and event support and staffing.

Some of your duties include:
Assists in executing strategies to secure impactful media coverage for Royal Caribbean International, subject matter experts, products & services, and events, including pitching and engaging reporters, facilitating media interviews and support for executives.
Builds and maintains key professional relationships with significant media outlets.
Helps to direct the activities of external agencies and internal teams as needed.
Coordinates significant communications programs, which may include promotions, press trips, press conferences, executive briefing.
Handles incoming media inquiries.
Coordinates innovative approaches to generating coverage in the media, draft press releases, talking points and statements.
Coordinates events and activities such as ship tours and families.
Tracks press coverage, writes coverage reports and creates and maintain clips and media lists.
Coordinates individual press trip requests and liaises with appropriate personnel on requests.
Stays abreast of latest industry developments, trends, and shifts in the travel industry.
Occasional travel.

QUALIFICATION, KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS:

Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent, directly related experience required
3-5 years of PR agency, public relations, journalism, or corporate communications experience.
Experience with media relations, ideally within the APAC Region
Flexibility to work outside normal hours and travel as appropriate (domestic & international).
Strong ability to interact with senior leaders and build effective relationships within the company, public, guests and media
Strong planning capabilities to identify and prioritize communication strategies and activities as well as to meet the deadlines required to support media and business needs
Excellent research, written, verbal and presentation skills
Strong skills in pitching and comfortable reaching out to top tier media
Ability to assist in coordinating projects or participate in cross-functional teams
Effortlessly organized self-motivator with a wealth of creative ideas
Understanding of social media, influencers, and emerging media

WHY WORK FOR US:

Royal Caribbean Group has been recognized by Ethisphere, a global leader in defining and advancing the standards of ethical business practices, as one of the 2021 World's Most Ethical Companies for the sixth consecutive year. The experience of travelling to exciting places; the chance to work with a fantastic group of people from all over the world; the recognition and support provided by the company; the opportunity to grow your career to the next level and the ability to explore new paths on the open seas are just a few fantastic reasons.

APPLICATION PROCESS:

Please click APPLY now and fill out the required information. We thank you for your interest, due to the number of applications we ask all candidates to provide their base salary expectation when completing their profile to help us with our screening process.
It is the policy of the Company to ensure equal employment and promotion opportunity to qualified candidates without discrimination or harassment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, sexuality, gender identity or expression, marital status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Royal Caribbean Group and each of its subsidiaries prohibit and will not tolerate discrimination or harassment."
Internship - Digital Aviation Solutions,"Job Description

At Boeing, we innovate and collaborate to make the world a better place. From the seabed to outer space, you can contribute to work that matters with a company where diversity, equity and inclusion are shared values. We’re committed to fostering an environment for every teammate that’s welcoming, respectful and inclusive, with great opportunity for professional growth. Find your future with us.

Boeing Global Services Digital Aviation Solutions (Jeppesen APAC) is hiring interns with our Product Research and Incubation (PR&I) team based in Singapore Office (Odeon Towers, 331 North Bridge Road). The intern will support the PR&I team to research on cutting edge innovations in the aviation domain including but not limited to sustainability, data science, algorithm development, market research etc. They will also support the team on their collaborations with local universities. During the internship, the student will gain knowledge in different aspects of aviation industry. Meanwhile, the related trainings will be provided to the intern.

Daily responsibilities include but are not limited to:

Research on different aspects of aviation domain including but not limited to sustainability, data science, algorithm development etc.
Literature Review
Support the team to liaise with local universities
Other tasks and duties requested by management.

Competencies:

Currently enrolled in a graduate or post-graduate study (Bachelors, Masters or PhD) Engineering, Entrepreneurship or Business background
Motivated by an international and fast-paced work environment with a strong team spirit and motivational character
Good communication skills
Good analytical skills

Education and /or Experience:

University students majoring in Engineering, Entrepreneurship or Business

Other job related information:

This requisition is for a locally hired internship. Candidates must have current legal authorization to work in Singapore. Boeing will not seek immigration and labor sponsorship for any applicants.
Benefits and pay are determined at the local level and are not part of Boeing U.S.-based payroll.
The completion of this internship does not guarantee a full time employment with Boeing Singapore / Jeppesen

Export Control Requirements: Not an export control position

Equal Opportunity Employer:

We are an equal opportunity employer. We do not accept unlawful discrimination in our recruitment or employment practices on any grounds including but not limited to; color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, genetic factors, military and veteran status, or other characteristics covered by applicable law.

We have teams in more than 65 countries, and each person plays a role in helping us become one of the world’s most innovative, diverse and inclusive companies. Applicants are encouraged to share with our recruitment team any accommodations required during the recruitment process.

Qualifications

Posting for Master and Bachelor Thesis student hiring in Singapore"
Executive Assistant - Admin Support / Singapore Office,"Responsibilities
Direct Report to Operations Director and to assist on general office administration
Secretarial support to 3-4 Consultants duties including but not limited to data-entry; CV formatting; client documents preparation; diary management; coordination of interviews
Assist with daily maintenance of in-house database
Coordinate with the internal and external parties for meeting arrangements
Be a key liaison with IT support provider
Organizing schedules, maintaining diaries and making appointments
Assist in preparation of presentation materials and management reports
Deal with confidential matters with a high degree of professionalism, discretion and confidentiality
Manage business expenses, invoices, and insurance reimbursements
Assist in any other administrative tasks and ad hoc projects as assigned


Qualifications
University graduate with 2-3 years experience in secretarial and administrative support
Excellent spoken and written English, fluency in Mandarin is highly preferred
Strong computer skill in MS office is a must. Familiar with IT network in workplace is essential.
Exceptional typing skill
Good communication and telephone manners
Proactive, team working and strong sense of responsibility
Self-motivated , willing to learn & well organized individual with a strong focus on details
Be smartly presented with a pleasant easy going personality"
Manufacturing Engineer,"Key Responsibilities

Develops, implements, and maintains methods, operation sequence and processes in the fabrication of parts, components, sub-assemblies and final assemblies.

Interfaces with other engineering functions to coordinate the release of product improvements and/or new products. Launches, releases, approves and implements or issues engineering change requests as required to support design engineering and Operations with new and existing products.

Estimates manufacturing costs, determines time standards and makes recommendations for tooling and process requirements. Uses DFx principles to reduce manufacturing and/or product costs, and improve delivered product quality.

Develops and uses test procedures, including assisting with the definition of test specifications with design / software engineering. May work with test engineering on the design and development of test fixtures. May assist in the coordination of test fixture sourcing activities.

Gathers operational and test data and evaluates results; may takes corrective/continuous improvement actions.

Evaluates work methods, procedures and policies. Participates in the development and maintenance of new and existing business processes; updates as necessary to ensure current practices are documented.

Determines root cause and corrective action analysis for issues that arise during assembly and/or test of systems; provides failure analysis report as required.

Performs Process Failure Mode, Effects and Criticality Analysis when working with New Product Development.

Functional Knowledge

Demonstrates expanded conceptual knowledge in own discipline and broadens capabilities

Business Expertise

Understands key business drivers; uses this understanding to accomplish own work

Leadership

No supervisory responsibilities but provides informal guidance to new team members

Problem Solving

Solves problems in straightforward situations; analyzes possible solutions using technical experience and judgment and precedents

Impact

Impacts quality of own work and the work of others on the team; works within guidelines and policies

Interpersonal Skills

Explains complex information to others in straightforward situations
Experience or interest in working with and using / mining data from existing databases to identify high value problems, develop solutions and track effectiveness.
Coding experience with demonstrated proficiency in Python / PySpark / SQL will be an added advantage.

Qualifications

Education:

Bachelor's Degree

Skills

Certifications:

Languages:

Years of Experience:

2 - 4 Years

Work Experience:

Additional Information

Travel:

Yes, 10% of the Time

Relocation Eligible:

No

Applied Materials is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law."
"Metro Network Deployment Engineer, Product Edge Field Deployment","Google will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require Google's sponsorship of a visa.

Minimum qualifications:

Bachelor's degree in Network Deployment, a related technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
Experience working with Local Exchange Carrier (LEC), telecommunication service providers, landlords, electricians, and construction operators.
Experience with telecommunications, OSP, ISP, AC/DC power systems, and relay rack/cabinet/cage construction.

Preferred qualifications:

Experience in collaborating across multiple levels and functions.
Experience in directing field operation technicians, engineers, contractors, and/or vendors in a telecommunications working environment.
Ability to engage/influence tactical and strategic decision-making.

About The Job

Google is proud to boast a network that provides service to millions of Internet users around the world. The Network Engineering team is responsible for operating that network reliably and at scale. As a member of the team, you have a direct impact on design and feature enhancements to keep our systems running smoothly. You also ensure that network operations are safe and efficient by monitoring network performance, coordinating planned maintenance, adjusting hardware components and responding to network connectivity issues. Google's complex network generates a constant stream of challenges which require you to continually be innovative with an evolving set of technologies. Keeping the network reliable ensures that our users stay connected with our suite of applications, products and services.

Behind everything our users see online is the architecture built by the Technical Infrastructure team to keep it running. From developing and maintaining our data centers to building the next generation of Google platforms, we make Google's product portfolio possible. We're proud to be our engineers' engineers and love voiding warranties by taking things apart so we can rebuild them. We keep our networks up and running, ensuring our users have the best and fastest experience possible.

Responsibilities

Manage oversight and Quality Assurance (QA) of installation technicians for rack, stack and installation of networking equipment.
Test and commission routers, optical transport equipment, and other network devices in new and existing network nodes across Google's global network.
Generate implementation plans and provide technical leadership and guidance during deployment activities.
Work closely with project management, network engineering, and rest of the Engineering team to identify in advance potential problems in network installations, including in the areas of facility power (AC/DC), cooling, security/access, rack layout, and cable management.
Own network documentation, updating, and maintaining network drawings and plans.

Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. See also Google's EEO Policy and EEO is the Law. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing our Accommodations for Applicants form ."
Python Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Extensive experience in implementing scalable Data pipeline using Python or R/Scala, SQL.
Strong experience in Database system (SQL/No-SQL), Big data (Hadoop, HDFS, HIVE, Kafka) technologies
Solid hands on experience in writing Python scripts for data processing and analytics use cases
Experience in writing Python scripts for data processing and analytics use cases Should have experience on building batch and streaming data pipelines
Should have experience on Performance Tuning by identifying and resolving performance bottlenecks
Good understanding of Data Warehouse data model and implementation Understand system and functional requirements and translate them into technical implementations.
Translate business requirements to FSD documentation.
Experience in delivering in AGILE, TDD.
Ensure adherence to standards (incl. code, security and performance)

Desired Skills and Experience
Big Data, Pipelines, REST, Hadoop, Agile, JavaScript, SQL, Flask, Python, Writing, Performance Tuning, Java, Databases, Django, Software Development, Business Requirements"
Digital Mobility Specialist (Transportation),"ComfortDelGro’s Private Mobility Group (PMG) aims to synergise and leverage on its core strengths in land transport solutions, whilst making it easier for customers to gain access to the various services in the ComfortDelGro Group. PMG is part of ComfortDelGro Corporation Limited, which is one of the largest land transport companies in the world with a global workforce, a global shareholder base and a global outlook.

A transforming company that is committed to improve commuters’ experience. The candidate will develop/improve mobility solutions to address consumers’ needs and pain-points. Identify customer segments for better engagement and thus create stickiness to PMG’s mobility services.

We are looking for someone who understands travel behavior, knowledge in transport planning and knowledge in future mobility areas such as, Product Specialist (Digital Mobility). Most importantly, desire to work in the field of future mobility.

As Digital Mobility Specialist you will
Develop and expand new mobility service offerings focusing on improving mobility service utilization.
Conceptualization, management and monitoring of mobility service products.
Understand consumer needs and business objectives to develop single/multi-modal mobility and adjacent services with value proposition for the consumers.
Work closely with different teams/stakeholders from conceptualization to fruition of the new service.
Utilize data analytics, real-time information, online tools, etc., in the development of new services, enhancement of existing services and monitoring of the performance of the different services.
Design measurable indictors on the success of new / existing services
Develop insights through data analytics to engage different segments of consumers and to improve stickiness to the mobility services
Build productive and strategic collaborative relationship with internal and external stakeholders.

Requirements:
Bachelor Degree in Business, Industrial Engineering & Operations Research or equivalent fields
Minimum 3 years of relevant working experience from LTA / ride-hailing companies / MaaS companies
Up-to-date on mobility and logistic trends and the various mobility service apps in the market
High analytical skills and comfortable working with data
Good verbal, written, presentation and interpersonal communication skills
Ability to work with different stakeholders for end-to-end in app product development
Highly organized, self-motivated, pro-active, and desire to learn new technology
Motivated to improve product utilization and revenue growth"
Lead – Business Development Strategy and Analytics (Bangkok based),"About Agoda

Agoda is an online travel booking platform for accommodations, flights, and more. We build and deploy cutting-edge technology that connects travelers with more than 2.5 million accommodations globally. Based in Asia and part of Booking Holdings, our 6,000+ employees representing 90+ nationalities foster a work environment rich in diversity, creativity, and collaboration. We innovate through a culture of experimentation and ownership, enhancing the ability for our customers to experience the world.

Get to Know our Team:

Partner Development is a team of creative entrepreneurs that develop solutions for Agoda’s accommodation partners and promote Agoda’s top and bottom-line growth. We design tailored business and product solutions with our partners and help them generate measurable value. Members of our team are empowered and supported to grow their market(s) or accounts. We develop win-win relationships and leverage Agoda’s unique accommodations portfolio and tech solutions to bring our partners the advantages they seek. Utilizing our strong brand and resources, we roll out new product to increase the visibility of Agoda, introduce more travelers to our great products and service and deliver significant revenues to the overall business.

The Opportunity:

Partner Development – Central team is designed to lead growth opportunity identification, experiment execution and data tracking within Partner Development team for the global teams. They work with regional teams to design and put in place global experimentation and initiatives to drive tangible impact in each market.

A Strategy Lead will be tasked to develop a deep understanding of a vertical or region to identify growth opportunities for Partner Development and Agoda.

The successful candidate must be analytical, and data driven to support identifying, presenting, and ultimately implementing go to market strategies as part of commercializing recommendations. They should also understand various ecommerce and business metrics and concepts i.e. – conversion, ROI, etc.

In summary, you can expect to work on the cutting edge of technology, data, digital marketing, algorithmic decision-making, and consumer psychology – all at a scale that very few ecommerce companies in the world today can offer.

Key Areas of Focus:

Partner Growth:  Work with key stakeholders to identify supply coverage & quality and leverage outbound teams and platforms to improve

Project Delivery:  Coordinate end-to-end project leveraging local resources and engaging key stakeholders

Experimentation:  Identify opportunities for experimentation and design data-driven experiment to test any strategic changes

Resourcing:  Identify and forecast the resource requirements for each market based on coverage and growth indicators

What you’ll Need to Succeed:

Proven ability to leverage analytics and quantitative methods to break down problems and come up with recommendations
Entrepreneurial and not afraid to be hands-on on the work
Experience working in a fast-paced and high growth environment
Enthusiasm to develop engineered processes and technologies and to apply innovative solutions to make organizational improvements while encouraging creative thinking and innovation
Excellent communication skills (both verbal and written in English) with ability to work well across multiple stakeholders
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics a plus

It’s Great if you have:

Ability to write in SQL a plus, or willingness to learn

#bangkok #singapore

Equal Opportunity Employer

At Agoda, we pride ourselves on being a company represented by people of all different backgrounds and orientations. We prioritize attracting diverse talent and cultivating an inclusive environment that encourages collaboration and innovation. Employment at Agoda is based solely on a person’s merit and qualifications. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunity regardless of sex, age, race, color, national origin, religion, marital status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, citizenship, veteran or military status, and other legally protected characteristics.

We will keep your application on file so that we can consider you for future vacancies and you can always ask to have your details removed from the file. For more details please read our privacy policy .

To all recruitment agencies: Agoda does not accept third party resumes. Please do not send resumes to our jobs alias, Agoda employees or any other organization location. Agoda is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
Digital Solution Leader,"Customer Services Digital Solution (SD) is responsible for the delivery of Digital Solutions on Maintenance and Engineering perimeter, internally for Customer Services and externally to airlines, MROs and lessors. Example of solutions are Airman Web and Skywise Health Monitoring for aircraft diagnostic, PRM and Skywise Predictive Maintenance for predictive maintenance Maintenance Operation Optimizer (MOO) for heavy maintenance optimisation, aircraft ground connectivity solutions for A320 & A330 with FOMAX and A350, A380 as well as airline IT connectivity, e-Doc Browser and Airnav suite for documentation, Skywise Reliability Services for airlines to compare themselves to the rest of the fleet.

Digital Operation (SDO) is in charge of delivering software solutions in collaboration with IM and other involved domains, from experimentation to industrialization, including evolutive and corrective maintenance. Methodology is evolving from a traditional V cycle and single agile teams to the SAFe (Scaled Agile Framework) methodology to be able to scale up to large development teams.

The Digital Solution Leader manages and leads development works on the big data collected from the aircrafts per flight from various Airlines and other sources (including new technologies for new data acquisition). Using the data exploration / manipulation, clustering, predictive, machine learning and visualization techniques, the Digital Solution Leader provides deep insights into the data, by developing algorithms utilized by various innovation projects.

Job Responsibilities
Managing and Leading all development works providing technical guidance to the development team
Define MVP development vision and strategy
Create strategies to leverage on or adapt technology to meet innovation initiatives needs and drive buy/build decisions.
Oversee the development and alignment of the development strategy to align development activities with Innovation Initiatives
Anticipate the impacts of internal and external business challenges and market conditions and incorporate risk management to development activities
Spearhead research and analyses on latest technologies and development methodology to continuously evolve and enhance development capabilities and efficiency
Managing and assessing sub-contractors proposals and deliveries. Fully responsible for ensuring performance of sub-contractors
Manage procurement needs and interface with Airbus procurement business unit
Design and implement performance measurements to track and monitor performance of development team
Ensure development activities are in full compliance with Airbus ethics and compliance, data governance and cybersecurity policies
Define regional MVC/Proof-of-Concept/Fast-Prototyping strategy
Conceptualizing, Designing and workload allocation to development team and contractors
Planning, monitoring and reporting of progress for all development projects undertaken by the APD team in the region
Develop strategies for development resource planning and utilisation
Provides technical leadership to the development team and constantly challenging inputs from development team to deliver best in class software modules that are modular, reusable and highly customisable on time and on quality
Coaching, mentoring and enabling other developers
Oversee the motivation, learning and development of development team members
Establish performance indicators to benchmark team’s performance

This job requires the constant awareness of the compliance risks we face in day-to-day responsibilities. Continuous commitment to act with integrity with each other, with your communities, business partners and suppliers is the foundation of your success and sustainable growth.

The commitment to integrity is supported by your adherence to all internal policies and procedures that govern business activities. Compliance with these policies will also protect Airbus reputation and brand, some of our most strategic and important assets.

Success Metrics
Success will be measured in a variety of areas, including but not limited to
Consistently ensuring the on-time delivery and quality (first-time-right) of the projects
Bringing innovative cost effective solutions
Achieving validated value streams and customer satisfaction
Ability to handle a subject from demand management, to development and support
Ability to understand the business potential of applications and provide insight to Innovation Team
Ability to scale the team, assess the needs and manage big sized teams
Ability to challenge the needs of the clients and provide appropriate solutions

The role will have the following key outputs:
Strong link with the Airbus Customer Services Digital organization
Strong link with Aircraft systems
Proactive in providing guidance & inputs for the roadmap
Business advocacy measures

Secondary Responsibilities
Support the business teams to ensure that their needs are met with the most optimal and compliant infrastructure
Works closely with the local teams to get clear alignment and defined and approved development that can be used globally.
Be a part of Agile development team as a development team lead.
Participate and contribute to the team objectives in Agile development process (more specifically, Scaled Agile Framework).
Independently develop code / solutions (Algorithms etc.) on the Skywise platform.
Collaborate with peers from other teams to deliver best in class solutions.
Strong airline domain / data knowledge to understand the underlying importance of the data, such as: Data Formats (ARINC), Aircraft Systems knowledge in general and A/C Conditioning and Monitoring Systems in specific

Job Requirements
Bachelor/ Master Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Technology, or relevant field with 8-10 years of development experience with at least 20% in team lead role
Strong coding abilities using JAVA, Python and related frameworks
Experience in rich web application development with React, Javascript, HTML5.
Experience of server-side development, database design (SQL and NoSQL)
Proven track record as software development lead across the entire development lifecycle
Experience in designing and implementing APIs, RESTful Web-services and SOAP-based Web-services
Strong experience in test automation and test-driven development methods
Working experience in Agile Scrum, SAFe and/or Kanban projects
DevOps orientation, knowledge of continuous integration frameworks and some of the following products/tools: Docker, Nexus, Artifactory, GitHub, Jenkins, Maven, VersionOne, Splunk, ElasticSearch, Ansible, etc.
Knowledge with Cloud platforms (AWS, Azure, Google) is a plus: building and deploying cloud solutions (AWS preferred)
Knowledge of Aircraft systems would be a plus
Test automation knowledge (XUnit, Jira Xray, Postman, Cucumber, Selenium)
Proficiency in developing, deploying, and debugging cloud-based data-objects, and data transformation pipelines.
Strong knowledge on Python, PySpark, PySQL, Java Script.
Expert knowledge of Integration concepts, patterns and design.
Expertise in data analysis methodologies and processes and their linkages to other processes e.g. dimensional modeling.
Expert SQL Skills.
Experience with integration efforts (packaged and customized applications) from a data analysis perspective
Strong business analyst skills, able to work with many different stakeholders to elicit and document requirements
Proficient with Skywise platform and tools e.g. Contour, Code-Workbook, Code-Authoring, Slate and Ontology definitions preferred
Knowledge of airline and MRO operations."
Software Engineering Associate (Fresh Diploma Graduates Program),"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centres. Our 506,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

At the heart of every great change is a great human.

Come work at the heart of change.

Take the first step to a fulfilling tech career at Accenture. You will be exposed to the exciting work within the Public Sector, helping Singapore achieve its Smart Nation vision as you develop your career. Enhance your skills through continuous learning and development opportunities to build and strengthen your expertise in the ever-growing technology space.

You can also expect to receive professional training, mentorship and career coaching to help empower, drive, and guide you in your career aspirations and decisions.

As a software engineering associate, you will:

Be involved in the development, coding, testing, deployment, and software maintenance of the applications and products.

Team up with others, like yourself, to develop and deliver solutions with continuous innovation and bring new ideas to our clients, improving the way operations is run.

Operate IT production services according to management protocols and Service Level Agreements (SLAs).

Together with your team, support various phases of the Software Development Lifecycle, ensuring client satisfaction and delivery excellence.

Provide operational support, ensuring production systems and devices are online and available.

Opportunity to use some of the most advanced technology around such as cloud engineering and operations, automation, RPA and SRE, intelligent call centre technologies.

Your role assignment will be based on business needs and your personal strengths.

We would love to speak with you if you have:

A Diploma / Higher Nitec / Nitec in Information Technology

A willingness to learn and an interest in technology

Good communication and interpersonal skills

Flexibility and willingness to work on different projects, if required

It would be advantageous if you are versed in the following tech stacks:

Java / J2EE / .Net / Fullstack development

DevSecOps

Data engineering / R / Python

Low code development platforms

Documents And Information Required

Resume (in PDF format)

Latest education transcript

Indicate your availability (start and end date) and expected graduation date in your resume

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."
Business Development Manager (Selling Market Intelligence to FMCG Clients),"Euromonitor International is the leading independent provider of consumer market research providing strategic intelligence on industries, companies, economies and consumers around the world. We are currently looking for a Regional Business Development Manager to join our Corporates sales team in our Singapore Office. This is a great opportunity for someone wishing to further a career in a commercial, sales-driven role within B2B FMCG industry.

Work for a global and diverse company with unique international environment
Entrepreneurial approach and structured progression with possibility to quickly develop throughout the business including opportunities for international transfer
Competitive salary, uncapped commission, enhanced healthcare, generous holiday allowances
Work-life balance with flexible working hours
Extensive Corporate Social Responsibility Programme with 2 two paid volunteering days a year
If you are a motivated self-driven sales hunter who enjoys winning the sale through problem solving, relationship-building, creative solutions, deeper client partnerships, and consultative selling then this role is for you!

Brief overview of the role
As part of Euromonitor's expansion plan in SEA, this Business Development role is part of the corporate sales team based in the Singapore regional office. You will be responsible for targeting new organization's within your territory, across South East Asia. You will be a highly self-motivated sales professional with a proven track record for selling in the business-to-business arena. You'll have the tenacity, drive, commercial awareness and persuasiveness to find the right contact, understand the client's issues, and match and apply the benefits in your solution. You will often need to involve several stakeholders, both internally and externally, in different locations across the world so strong networking and organization skills as well as an understanding of corporate purchasing dynamics are a must. Additional Asian languages would therefore be an added advantage although not essential.

Key Responsibilities
Generate sales with new clients in your designated territory (FMCG, Food packaging, Food Ingredients, Drinks, Beauty & Personal Care, tourism - Corporates).
This role targets large, multinational companies and companies who need consumer data to help them make strategic decisions
Identify key sponsors, influencers and decision makers at target companies and ensure that you understand their roles and objectives, and that they understand the benefits and applications of using data.
Create a sales plan on how to reach sales targets and ensure implementation of the plan
Research a strong prospect list
Take ownership of your personal sales targets
Develop your new clients so they know how to use their online service to ensure renewal contracts and opportunities to increase contract values

Requirements
An outstanding personal sales track record
Proven experience of selling to large FMCG multi-national organisations
Familiarity and comfortable with cold calling
Excellent negotiation and communication skills
Intelligent, able to solve problems, and react positively to change
Tenacity, drive, resilience and commercial awareness
A targets-driven approach to work
Experience in strategic market information sales
Self-motivated and organised
Fluency in English with additional Southeast Asia Languages being an advantage

Benefits
Why work for Euromonitor?
Our values:
We act with integrity
We are curious about the world
We are stronger together
We seek to empower
We find strength in diversity

International: Not only do we have a very multinational workforce in each office but we are all dealing with our 16 offices worldwide on a daily basis. With 16 offices globally there are regular opportunities for international transfer.

Hardworking but sociable: Our staff know how to work hard but also how to enjoy themselves! We pride ourselves on creating an appropriate work-life balance, with flexible hours and regular socialising including frequent after work meet ups, summer and Christmas parties and a whole range of sports and other groups to be involved with.

Committed to making a difference: We think that people are looking for something worthwhile in a company beyond the workplace. Our extensive Corporate Social Responsibility Programme gives each member of staff two volunteering days a year in addition to holidays. It sees us reaching out into the local community with our mentoring, group volunteering, and fundraising initiatives as well as supporting international charities through our website sales, matching staff sponsorship fundraising, and carbon offsetting all our flights, amongst many other activities.

Opportunities to grow: We offer extensive training and development opportunities at all levels. The vast majority of our managers and directors have been promoted from within and many have moved across departments as well as upwards. We pride ourselves on identifying and rewarding talent.

Equal Employment Opportunity Statement: Euromonitor International does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, colour, religion, sex, national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, disability and genetic information, age, membership in an employee organization, or other non-merit factor.

Desired Skills and Experience
Business Development
Sales
consultative selling"
TA Engineer,"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Technology and Operations services and Accenture Song—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 721,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

Top 3 Must have skills / Primary skills

Windows Server Administration

Virtualization / VMWare Administration

Cloud Technology (AWS)

Infrastructure (Server OS, SAN Storage, Network)

Databases (MS SQL and DB2)

Good to have skills (Optional)

Server Monitoring

Detailed Job Description

Work with Technical Architects and Application Architects in defining software/hardware requirements and in planning and delivering architecture

Ensure that application technological design remains within project scope

Manage / maintain automated builds and code migrations.

Perform regular application codes deployment to development environment.

Communicate and resolve application interface issues

Participate in migrating various applications from on prem to AWS, setup new environment when necessary

Participate in project internal Quality and Audit Reviews

Build strong internal or external customer relationships and manage expectations at all levels, including customers/end users, and Account Delivery Team(s)

Facilitate sharing of best practices; identify and drive productivity improvements; sponsor technology knowledge management; contribute to and foster knowledge-sharing across teams

Maintain awareness of new technological developments in industry and processes; implement concepts appropriately

All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.

Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.

Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.

Diploma and above

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."
Database Administrator,"As a member of the Database Operations team, you will be responsible for technical support for the production environment for all technologies managed by the team. Specific focus will be around the distributed Database Management Systems administrations, primarily Microsoft SQL Server, managing availability, data integrity, and security of the production environment.

Requirements:
DBA working experience in building, deploying and administering SQL Server database management system
Sound knowledge of database auditing, audit logging and creating benchmark for audit points
Experience managing database services in Cloud environments
Proven experience managing and deploying database services in Microsoft Azure
Demonstrated experience with Powershell, Transact SQL, Python, SSIS amongst others
Experience in supporting SQL Server in a clustered environment
Experience in Database backup and recovery strategies such as TSM, CommVault and/or Netbackup and backup/restore via native backup utilities and Litespeed.
Experience automating ETL processes as well as security and encryption of databases
Sound knowledge of users accesses and database privileges
Experience with installation, configuration and maintenance for different versions of SQL Server (2000, 2008, 2012 and 2016)
Experience working with the SQL Server’s architecture, administration, and security
Understanding of High Availability and Disaster Recovery requirements and solutions
Expert experience in troubleshooting and resolving urgent/critical incidents on production systems


Only shortlisted candidates will be responded to, therefore if you do not receive a response within 14 days please accept this as notification that you have not been shortlisted.

EA Licence No: 11C5502 | EAP Registration No.: R22104910"
"AVP, Usage & Partnerships - Payments & Platforms, Consumer Banking Group","Business Function

As the leading bank in Asia, DBS Consumer Banking Group is in a unique position to help our customers realise their dreams and ambitions. As a market leader in the consumer banking business, DBS has a full spectrum of products and services, including deposits, investments, insurance, mortgages, credit cards and personal loans, to help our customers realise their dreams and aspirations at every life stage. Our financial solutions are not only the best in the business – they were made just right for you.

Our team works with partners across industries to give our customers a compelling reason to use our payment methods in Singapore. The P2 Usage & Partnerships team is made up of curious, tough, quick-witted and entrepreneurial people who enjoys working in a fun-loving, fast-paced and dynamic environment.

We’re looking for someone who networks, makes connections, builds relationships, and pursues opportunities. The ideal candidate is a motivated, focused, well-organized individual who has a deep understanding of prospecting and developing strong relationships with customers with the ability to think strategically.

Responsibilities
Drive the business value forecast, analysis and partnerships negotiations
Define and execute activities according to our business priorities
Collaborate with other teams to promote bank’s offerings (i.e. Product, Acquisition, Portfolio, Paylah!, Merchant Business, Corporate Banking, Banca, Rewards etc)
Partner with other stakeholder teams across business units (i.e., Marketing, Customer Experience Call Centre, Platform Management, Digital engagement) to achieve business & customer outcomes effectively & efficiently
Coach the team, track staff performance and report metrics
Work with Line Manager to develop long-term strategic initiatives
Maintain and share professional knowledge through education, networking, events, and presentations

Requirements
Manage both our existing partners and develop new business opportunities in key merchant categories, projects & initiatives
Drive usage through partnerships, instalment growth, develop value proposition with customer & business outcomes in mind
Identify trends and customer needs, building an appropriate sales pipeline in accordance with targets
Take a lead role in the assessment, development of proposals and presentations & negotiations for new business materials to create and nurture business opportunities and partnerships
Guide a team of high performers to achieve business & customer outcomes

Skills And Qualifications
Strong communication and collaboration skills, and ability to work effectively in a complex multiple stakeholders’ organization
Strong analytical skills and ability to collect and analyze data, establish facts, and make recommendations or decisions using data
Outstanding poise in a fast-paced business environment
Proficiency with data analysis, forecasting, and budgeting
Proven ability to plan and manage resources
Bachelor’s degree in business or management
Apply Now

We offer a competitive salary and benefits package and the professional advantages of a dynamic environment that supports your development and recognises your achievements.

Primary Location

Singapore-DBS Asia Central

Job

Product Management

Schedule

Regular

Job Type

Full-time

Job Posting

Jan 4, 2023, 2:59:56 PM"
SAP Tech Arch- Basis,"About Accenture

Accenture is a leading global professional services company, providing a broad range of services in strategy and consulting, interactive, technology and operations, with digital capabilities across all of these services. We combine unmatched experience and specialized capabilities across more than 40 industries – powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. With 505,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries, Accenture brings continuous innovation to help clients improve their performance and create lasting value across their enterprises. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

Description:

Extensive hands on experience as SAP Basis and BOBJ administrator, providing support of SAP and associated installations including ECC, BW, BPC, PI, EP, MII, GRC, NW Gateway,NWDI, CS, Solution Manager, BOBJ DS, BOBJ BI, Lexmark Invoicing, ARIS

Experience of working with associated Oracle / MS SQL / MaxDB / Sybase Databases and using relevant transport management system (CTS+)

Experience of Linux and Windows Server based SAP systems

Single Sign-On setup and Configuration for SAP BOBJ, BW , SOH etc.

Must possess Basis Setup and configuration knowledge of SAP products including Netweaver, ECC, BI, PO, Track & Trace, BOBJ, MDM, and Enterprise Portal

System Refresh in distributed environment.

User and Roles Administrations.

Client Administration: Local Client Copy Remote Client Copy and Client Export-Import

Transport Management System Configuration (STMS).

Applying Support Package Java stacks SPAM and Kernel upgrades.

Configuring SAP HANA,BW and BOBJ System with HA, Replication, DR

Backup and Recovery of the SAP HANA & Other Databases

Working with the SAP HANA Studio and RDS

SAP Solution Manager Integration for SAP HANA

Managing SAP HANA Users, Licenses, Revisions and Maintenance

SAP HANA Administration

SAP HANA SLT configurations

Qualification-SAP BASIS experience of 8-10 yrs

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."
Microsoft 365 Specialist,"Our team in Singapore currently has an opening for a Microsoft 365 Specialist

<<>>

YOUR ROLE & RESPONSIBILITIES
Create a strategy for establishing a secure and well-managed enterprise environment in Microsoft 365
Configure and manage Brenntag's Microsoft 365 tenant, maintain core services
Utilize native Microsoft 365 services to meet Brenntag's technology and resiliency requirements
Automation by nature
Drive Identity, access and configuration management in Microsoft 365
Implement security measures as requested by Brenntag's security team


YOUR PROFILE
Bachelor's degree (in Computer Science, Math or Engineering)
10+ years of experience as a full time IT professional
3+ years of experience designing and supporting large Microsoft 365 tenants
Microsoft 365 admin certification (MS-900, MS-100, MS-101)
Microsoft 365 role-based certifications (MS-500,600,700,…)
Good understanding of Azure AD, policies, CDA and Intune
Security embedded by nature


OUR OFFER

<<>>

INTERESTED?

We look forward receiving your application."
IT APPLICATION SUPPORT OFFICER,"About US (GEMS)

Description

ENGIE Global Energy Management & Sales (GEMS) provides energy supply solutions and risk management services to support its clients through their decarbonization journey, while optimizing ENGIE’s assets and contributing to value creation.

ENGIE is a global reference in low-carbon energy and services with a leading energy management business, piloted by its entity ""Global Energy Management & Sales"" who built its savoir-faire managing the Group’s large and diverse asset portfolio over 20+ years.

3,300 employees around the world develop our solutions, through +20 international business platforms. We cover the full energy mix: renewable and thermal power, natural gas & LNG, biomass, environmental products. Our experts provide tailor made solutions based on a wide range of savoir-faire in energy management with a strong focus on decarbonation and decentralization.

Our +120,000 clients span the entire value chain: producers, asset developers, financial players, utilities, distributors and industrials. Our global reach and strong local presence enable us to offer these diverse clients tailor-made services and respond to rapid changes in mature or emerging markets alike.

Our 4 expertise:


Asset management
Energy transition services
Energy supply & global commodities
Risk management & market access

At GEMS we encourage breakthrough results, team spirit, curiosity and innovation while preserving the right work/life balance for you.

More info on GEM Hub (https://gems.engie.com) or LinkedIn (https://www.linkedin.com/company/engie-global-energy-management-solutions).

Organization

ENGIE is a global energy company, a leading provider of electricity, natural gas, and energy services. With 153,090 employees in more than 70 countries worldwide, ENGIE achieved revenue of €66.6 billion in 2016. ENGIE is committed to being a leader in the energy transition.

We are looking for talented and motivated people to create the future of energy. Join a rewarding and flexible work environment that encourages innovation and creativity, and help us meet the energy challenges of today and tomorrow.

YOUR contribution

Context

Global Energy Management & Sales (GEMS) is one of ENGIE’s Business Units. On February 1st, the GEM BU becomes GEMS, Global Energy Management & Sales. This Business Entity, bringing together the B2B Supply and energy management activities, aims to develop new geographies for GEMS, in order to accelerate the supply and management of low-carbon energy for our customers, thus creating value for the Group.

We deliver services in supply and logistics management, asset management, risk management, market access management, while contributing to the market understanding, design and efficiency and developing market solutions to accelerate the energy transition.

GEMS manages one of the largest and most diversified energy portfolios in Europe, including electricity, natural gas, LNG, bulk commodities and environmental products.

Role

Within the GEM Business Unit the Business Platform APAC& Business Platform Global LNG & Biomassis managing and developing the group’s trading activities for the APAC region as well as the LNG business worldwide.

In order to pursue its development, GEMS is developing and rolling out various transformation projects such as Algo Trading, Gemstone (Front to Accounting trading chain) using Orchestrade, eBusiness development …

GEMS APAC is looking for a IT APPLICATION SUPPORT Officer, to improve the reliability of the existing systems, and support the development of the new systems. The role is based in Singapore and reporting to Team Lead GEMS APAC IS Functional . It requires many interactions with the teams in Europe. Business trips to Europe may be required from time to time

As a member of the IT team in Singapore, the IT application support officer is also expected to contribute to the cohesion of the IT team.

Key missions

The main missions are :


Ensure system stability and run continuity for the full system (services, batches, etc… running in Europe or Singapore)
Administrating vendor-based trading platform (Accesses, Order Routing, Limits, Broker connections, etc.)
Provide support to the users on the application perimeter: Pre-trade/Pricing – Trade Life Cycle – Post Trade/Greeks/V@r/Valo.
Share relevant information with support and development teams in Paris & Brussels

The main responsibilities are:
Production monitoring
Monitor the global IT platform and execute the associated action when alerts are raised.
Process (analyze, solve, document) incidents.
Coordinate incidents resolution with Paris teams when necessary (for instance with infrastructure teams or on-duty people)
Maintain monitoring systems and continuously share ideas to improve its effectiveness.
Actively participate in the writing or enhancement of operational procedures (in link with the monitoring alerts)
Engage in FTS (Follow-the-Sun) model with Europe, including information sharing and tasks handover
Follow up on the evolution of the IT platform (release) and adapt monitoring tools and procedures

Support to users
Process local user support requests (configurations, assistance,…)
Collect regularly user feed-backs on system Run Quality and share it with development teams

Transversal
Enrich the backlog of problems (source of recurring incidents), including description, impact/recurrence/priority,…
Self-organize continuous learning on the IS systems and landscape
Manage the IT part of the Singapore Business Continuity Plan
Share improvement ideas with Business Analyst

About YOU

Qualifications

Hard Skills

Technical and functional skills


Understanding of trading environment.
First experience in live monitoring and application support of large IT systems
Good technical knowledge on Windows environment
SQL skill
Good Scripting skills

Soft Skills

Behavioral and social skills


Interactive behavior : Active Listening and communication skills
Problem solving : Issues perception, analyzing, practical thinking, creativity, innovation
Personal effectiveness : Facilitation skills, pragmatism and pro-activity, resilience to stress, taking initiative, learning ability

Education and professional background


University degree in IT Engineering or Mathematics.
2-6 years relevant experience in IT trading environment
Experience and knowledge about Trading and/or portfolio management processes. Derivatives Commodities is a plus.

Languages


English

About ENGIE

Our group is a global reference in low-carbon energy and services. Our purpose (“raison d’être”) is to act to accelerate the transition towards a carbon-neutral world, through reduced energy consumption and more environmentally-friendly solutions, reconciling economic performance with a positive impact on people and the planet. We rely on our key businesses (gas, renewable energy, services) to offer competitive solutions to our customers. With our 170,000 employees, our customers, partners and stakeholders, we are a community of Imaginative Builders, committed every day to more harmonious progress."
Senior Staff Specialist - Solution Design Architect Manufacturing Execution System (MES),"Part of your life. Part of tomorrow.

Infineon is a world leader in semiconductor solutions that make life easier, safer, and greener. Our solutions for efficient energy management, smart mobility, and secure, seamless communications link the real and the digital world.

In accordance with the requirements set by the Singaporean Government, Infineon Technologies Asia Pacific Pte Ltd (""Infineon"") can only allow individuals who are (a) fully vaccinated, (b) certified to be medically ineligible for a vaccine or (c) have recovered from COVID-19 within a prescribed period, onto company premises. Therefore, Infineon requires all new employees, as well as contractors and business partners, to be fully vaccinated against COVID-19. ""Fully vaccinated"" means individuals have completed the full regime of an approved COVID-19 Vaccine as listed under the World Health Organization (WHO) Emergency Use Listing (EUL) including the respective post-vaccination period to ensure the vaccine has become full effective. Anyone who is unable to be vaccinated due to an approved and/or recognised exemption condition may apply for special consideration.


In your new role you will:

As a Manufacturing Execution (MES) Lead Business Solution Analyst, you will be one of the key interfaces between our Business Stakeholders, various Factory Integration Departments including our System Architects
Leading and managing the creation and realisation of complex Factory Automation requirement technical specifications
Lead technical and department overarching analysis with a focus on factory Automation and the Execution Solutions landscape.
Contribute to the Execution of Solution Application Roadmap planning
Manage and supports various project initiatives related to Industry4.0, Digitalization and Workflow Automation inside the semiconductor industry
Leading projects as part of a global team with internal and external staff
Interface function between local stakeholders, global Core Team, Development Department, and external Vendors

You are best equipped for this task if you have:

A recognized Degree in IT, Computer Science, or equivalent with at least more than 5 years of working experience
Strong solution or technical knowledge in Manufacturing Execution Systems (example: Camstar), Shopfloor Workflow or equivalent would be beneficial
Experience in Semiconductor and Electronic industry manufacturing processes would be beneficial
Project Management, Agile development and ITIL certification would be added advantage
Leading and hands-on in SDLC processes and best practice sharing
Work as a Business Analyst role to understand requirement engineering and define solution specifications on various projects related to I4.0, Digitalization, high Automation initiative"
Java Developer (Junior),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Participates as a member of the development team.
Completes development of units with designs prepared by more senior developers.
Participates in code reviews. Prepares and executes unit tests.
Applies growing technical knowledge to maintain a technology area (e.g. Web- site Development).
May perform unit design.
Applies company and 3rd party technologies to software solutions of moderate complexity.
Configures end-user or enterprise systems designed by more senior technologists.
Requirements
Min 1 year of Java experience and knowledge or skills in : code writing using languages such as J2EE, Java, PL/SQL, Java Struts, Spring, Hibernate Enterprise framework, Agile Development environments and/or Application Servers like WebSphere.
Good understanding of modern software development and testing methodologies, scripting and tools. Familiarity with RDBMS databases such as Oracle will definitely be helpful.
The ideal candidate must be a Singapore citizen or Permanent Resident with a Bachelor’s degree or Diploma in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or relevant fields in order to meet the project requirements of the client.

Desired Skills and Experience
Oracle, Strong Attention To Detail, Struts, Application Servers, Scripting, JavaScript, SQL, Adaptability, Writing, Java, Databases, J2EE, Software Development, Hibernate, Agile Development"
"Account Executive, Employee Benefits","Aon is in the business of better decisions

At Aon, we shape decisions for the better to protect and enrich the lives of people around the world.

As an organization, we are united through trust as one inclusive, diverse team, and we are passionate about helping our colleagues and clients succeed.

What The Day Will Look Like

Renewal and remarketing

Review of renewal terms
Review of Renewal Proposal
Claims Analysis
Meeting with clients on pre-renewal and/or renewals
Preparation of Service Level Agreement
Presentation of the benefits programme to employees

Day-to-Day Operations

Getting updates on the employee movements from clients
Following up of underwriting requirements with clients
Handling the enquiries from both HR and employees
Follow up with clients on outstanding invoices
Act as escalation point for all client’s queries/feedback.

Others

Preparation of Helpline FAQs
Ensure prompt payment by clients/accounts that are assigned
Taking on any ad-hoc assignments

Skills And Experience That Will Lead To Success

Fresh grad or minimum 1 year of experience as a consultant or account manager in the Health & Benefits Industry, working with multinational clients across sector
Minimum regulatory requirements (BCP, PGI. CommGI, HI, M5, M9) for registration as Broking and FA rep with MAS
Client management experience, analytical, critical thinking, problem solving skills required
Ability to manage and influence key stakeholders internally and externally
Self-disciplined and organised
Inter-personal skill and focus on service excellence
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications including Word, Excel, PowerPoint

How We Support Our Colleagues

In addition to our comprehensive benefits package, we encourage a diverse workforce. Plus, our agile, inclusive environment allows you to manage your wellbeing and work/life balance, ensuring you can be your best self at Aon. Furthermore, all colleagues enjoy two “Global Wellbeing Days” each year, encouraging you to take time to focus on yourself. We offer a variety of working style solutions, but we also recognise that flexibility goes beyond just the place of work... and we are all for it. We call this Smart Working!

Our continuous learning culture inspires and equips you to learn, share and grow, helping you achieve your fullest potential. As a result, at Aon, you are more connected, more relevant, and more valued.

We provide individuals with disabilities reasonable accommodations to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment in accordance with applicable law. Please contact us to request an accommodation on ReasonableAdjustments@Aon.com

Aon values an innovative, diverse workplace where all colleagues feel empowered to be their authentic selves. Aon is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.

#aon #healthsolutions #employeebenefits

2022-55898"
Advisor Application Architect,"Job Description

Essential Job Functions
Minimum 10+ years of Experience
The architect will provide architecture leadership & subject matter expertise to digital engagements focusing on complex & innovative products and reusable assets
Extensive knowledge of Java, Spring, Spring Boot, Spring MVC
Expertise in design SpringBoot and Nodejs based highly scalable micro-service architecture
Experience in DevOps, Kubernetes administration, designing CI/CD solution for geographically distributed teams
Experience in development: REST API, Messaging, API Catalog, Security 9. Managing and Maintaining AWS Cloud Infrastructure ( VPC, RDS, ELB, Auto-scaling, Cloudwatch, ElastiCache)
Insurance Domain experience will be an added advantage
Conducts technical research, testing, evaluation and documentation of moderately complex hosting/configuration tools and methodologies to ensure that tools are current and functional
Creates application architectures and populates an application host/configuration matrices with appropriate strategies, timelines, and cost information to increase cost efficiency and effectiveness
Coordinates with application developers, managers and customer application experts to ensure that required features and modifications are included in the appropriates releases to support cross-product features and to communicate architectural designs and standards
Designs application modules that work together to produce desired product. Ensures that completed modules provide functionality described by application experts and to ensure that performance guidelines are met
Plans technical support infrastructure through the creation of service level agreements; leads the transition from application development to support to ensure that appropriate support is available to clients in a timely and efficient manner
Provides high-level analysis and design reviews to other department members to avoid duplication of effort in solving the same application problems with different products
Works with third party vendors to develop and/or integrate their applications into company products; ensures that applications are in accordance with company product standards and guidelines
Works with product development teams and senior designers to develop architectural requirements to ensure client satisfaction with product
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or equivalent combination of education and experience
Bachelor's degree in business, software engineering, computer science or related field preferred
Nine or more years of application architecture and/or product development experience
Experience working with software systems, applications and network markets
Experience working with technical products, vendors, and families of technologies and company software and hardware products
Experience working with application design principles and product configurations
Experience working with appropriate programming languages, operating systems, hardware and software
Experience working with mainframes, scheduling software, and other related technologies
Experience working with software development life cycle
Other Qualifications
Personal computer and business solutions software skills
Good communication skills to communicate with customers, vendors, business unit personnel, support personnel, application development personnel and management
Good analytical and problem solving skills for design, coordination and testing of applications
Good skills in application administration, design and architecture
Ability to work in a team environment
Ability to create and maintain formal and informal networks
Ability to work with relational databases
Work Environment
Office environment"
JPM Payments - Trade Finance Digital Platforms (Trade Client Access) Associate,"This is a critical role within the Trade & Working Capital Client Service Organization to enhance and improve the overall client experience in the APAC region. The ability to understand the needs of our clients and recommend bespoke/customized digital solutions. The individual will also provide feedbacks to Product Owners to ensure our digital solutions remain first class and relevant in the ever evolving banking landscape in APAC.

The ideal candidate will have a good mix of functional and technical experience preferably with Trade Finance and Supply Chain applications to help drive the expansion of client support for the business and thus playing a key role in the success of our strategic initiatives.

Key Roles And Responsibilities

Be(become) a subject-matter expert on Trade Finance's web-based software applications in APAC
Build and maintain strong relationships with clients to ensure high satisfaction utilizing the applications
Functional implementation of Trade Finance's web-based software applications:
Standard configuration-based setups and access administration for client users
Provide access administration support to internal stakeholders using the applications for operations
Coordinate with Implementations team to ensure clients' expectations are met during the implementation stage
Technical implementation of Trade Finance's web-based software applications:
Customized setups for bespoke clients
Conduct client trainings and refreshers to drive more volumes through these channels
Post-Implementation client support on system issues
Coordinate with internal stakeholders to address issues
Identify opportunities for enhancements through clients' feedbacks
Maintain robust documentation of setup requests completion, clients enquiries, production and enhancement logs
BAU administrative duties

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree or equivalent
Minimum of 4 years' experience working with Front End/Web-Based systems
Good working knowledge of Trade Finance products and services preferred
Excellent communication, presentation and written skills
Strong focus on client and stakeholders satisfaction
Ability to operate in a collaborative environment and must possess strong interpersonal skills to work effectively with colleagues (Business/Sales/Product/Technology) at various levels of the organization
Proven leadership skills and capable of delivering exceptional performance under pressure
Comfortable working within tight deadlines
Ability to effectively use and manage multiple systems
Well organized, details-oriented and meticulous nature
Strong documentation skills
Business-level spoken Mandarin will be a plus to support and interact with the firm's clients and digital platform.

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Solution Consultant (Data Management),"Local Unit & Position Description

Do you enjoy using software to solve complex technical challenges? Are you interested in applying your technical knowledge to help solve real-world challenges? Do you feel rewarded when you help people with their problems? Then this may be the position for you!

DNV – Digital Solution’s Ship Product Line is seeking a Solution Consultant (Data Management) to join our Consulting team. This team of subject matter experts is responsible for supporting and training clients of our Ship Management software around APAC.

What You’ll Do

Manage data management projects as per established quality and timeline
Responsible for providing timely and thorough responses to solution inquiries from end-user clients arriving via phone or email
Develop and maintain client relationships
Support onboard vessel implementation as required
Educate users on how to optimize their experience with the software by conducting multi-day classroom training in our offices, online/virtual, or at client sites as required

What Is Required

Position Qualifications

Bachelor of Science degree in Computer Science/Marine Engineering required
Experience in managing ship management applications like Planned Maintenance or similar shipping industry solutions would be an advantage
Excellent ability to prioritize work while juggling multiple tasks & client request
Strong interpersonal skills and genuine desire to help customers solve their software questions
Proficiency with Microsoft Office suite
Strong written and verbal in English & Chinese communication skills
Excellent time management and organization skills
Willing to work weekends (if required)
Willingness and ability to travel (if required)

OPTIONAL KNOWLEDGE:

Sybase, MS SQL-Server
Remote Installation, deployment and support.
Knowledge with database administration (SQL Language)

Company & Business Area Description

DNV is the independent expert in assurance and risk management, operating in more than 100 countries. Through our broad experience and deep expertise we advance safety and sustainable performance, set industry benchmarks, and inspire and invent solutions.

We are a world-leading provider of digital solutions and software applications with focus on the energy, maritime and healthcare markets. Our solutions are used worldwide to manage risk and performance for wind turbines, electric grids, pipelines, processing plants, offshore structures, ships, and more. Supported by our domain knowledge and Veracity assurance platform, we enable companies to digitize and manage business critical activities in a sustainable, cost-efficient, safe and secure way.

Equal Opportunity Statement

DNV is an Equal Opportunity Employer and gives consideration for employment to qualified applicants without regard to gender, religion, race, national or ethnic origin, cultural background, social group, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, age or political opinion. Diversity is fundamental to our culture and we invite you to be part of this diversity!"
SEA game content operation（MLBB）- Nuverse,"About ByteDance

Responsibilities

Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with ByteDance.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all ByteDance and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About The Team

Nuverse is a game development and publishing brand for players and developers around the world. We are dedicated to serving gamers worldwide by offering top-tier games, building a global community, and providing fun and inspiring experiences for every gamer.

Responsibilities

Support the content platform product content operation of the gaming business in the Southeast Asia region
Communicate with local gamers and content creators, identify pain points, plan and implement content operation plan;
According to business needs, analyze gaming trends in content platform product, including but not limited to analyzing gameplay, user experience, communication actions, data performance, etc., to extract valuable information;
Monitor daily data fluctuation of gaming videos on content platform product, support key gaming accounts day to day account growth operation.

Qualifications

Bachelor degree or above in 2023, STEM degree is preferred;
Strong language skills, English can be used as a working language, minimum mastery of 2 languages with business profeciency (writing report, conducting verbal meetings);
Have good problem analysis and solving skills, have good logical thinking ability, familiar with basic research methods and data analysis methods, and be able to use Excel and other tools for quantitative analysis;
game enthusiasts, familiar with content platform product and mobile legends, frequent users of content platform product/Mobile Legends are preferred;
internship experience in similar industry is preferred, and those with foreign study and living experience are preferred.

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Developer (ASP.NET/ VB.Net, Logistics MNC, Jurong)","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Details
Perm role with comprehensive benefits (14 days Annual leaves, AWS,Bonus, birthday voucher, medical, dental optical etc)
Monday to Friday,Office hours
5-7 min walking distance from the MRT station / Transport provided from MRT
Listed Company
Reporting to Senior IT Manager
Responsibilities
Daily Support for company in-house system
Develop new application using Microsoft platform (vb.net or c#) for WMS(Warehouse Management System) and TMS(Transportation Management System)
EDI Development between Customer System and in-house System
Provide daily support for in-house system
Implement and delivery SCM project development with Open Source
Transforming legacy system from .Net to Java technologies
Liaise with business analysts for clarification and understanding of requirements
Requirements
Min 2-3 years of working experience in .NET technology (ASP.NET, C#, C#.Net, MVC, VB.NET, ASP, IIS, web service etc.)
Diploma/Degree in Computer Science/ Information Technology or equivalent
Experience in Microsoft SQL Server, hands on experience in writing Stored Procedures, Functions, etc.
Knowledge of HTML / CSS / AJAX / JQuery and other client or server-based web tools
Good working knowledge of MSSQL (Store Procedure, Complex reporting Query)
Experienced in full software development lifecycle; requirements analysis, design, development, testing, implementation
How To Apply

Interested candidates, please submit your updated resume in MSWORD format by using Apply Now button or email to melissa alignrecruitment.com.sg (input alias symbol after melissa)

Align Recruitment Pte Ltd (20C0253)

Tee Siew Mei (Reg No: R1219651)
Desired Skills and Experience
MVC, ASPNet, CSS, .NET, HTML, EDI, IIS, Information Technology, Open Source, SQL, Writing, Vbnet, Java, C#, Software Development, jQuery"
Competitive Pricing Architect,"About Accenture
Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Technology and Operations services and Accenture Song—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 721,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.

Job Summary:
Accenture Pricing Architects are a highly visible group with a mission to develop and implement strategies and tactics that enable Accenture deal teams to maximize profitability and achieve desired outcomes for our clients through compelling, market-based pricing and commercial propositions. This role drives key strategic and tactical decisions related to pricing and profitability for a given geography, working across industries and services groups with a focus on building relationships, knowledge, and insights about each commercial environment. Market, Services, and Market Unit (MU) leads are trusted advisors within their respective Leadership teams.
Primary responsibilities include:

Core Service Execution
Market Pricing Strategy and Execution: Support senior leadership in defining Accenture’s pricing approach to maximize profitable growth across Client Groups.
Deal Pricing Strategy and Execution: S&C Pricing Architects design and implement commercial strategies to enhance profitability, overseeing price positioning and client optics, deal shaping, deal qualification activities and financial structuring.
Competitive Positioning: Competitive Pricing Architects build a point of view about competitor pricing and capabilities, derive deal-specific Accenture price target based on differentiation, and work with stakeholders to achieve target.
Rate Card Strategy and Development: Rate Card Pricing Architects design and develop client rate cards for account teams.

Drive and Manage Programs that Improve Sales
Identify and drive sales & pricing performance improvements by developing and implementing best practices, process and reporting.
Support sales professionals/leaders in understanding client requirements, constraints, buyer values and high-level acceptability criteria for any solution.
Work with Solution Delivery and Sales teams in identification, analysis, solution, business case development, proposal preparation and presentation to clients.
Manage sales materials and credentials and coordinate the RFI/RFP/proposal response completion with sales teams, Solution Architects, delivery managers, and Sales Support teams.
Define, monitor and analyze program metrics, targets and strategic imperatives based on fiscal year plans as well as structure and/or review the cost models to achieve the most competitive price.

Operational Execution
With MU and Service Leadership, proactively manage the pipeline to ensure accuracy, identify trends (including but not limited to deal sizes, MD time, ADR / CCI, pyramids, commercial constructs etc.), and provide insight on opportunities for optimization both overall and across priority deals.
Guide Pricing Support team in developing pricing and commercial propositions for bids and proposals, demonstrating the greatest value to clients and driving market-based pricing.
Build and maintain strong relationships both internally within the practice and externally with clients.

Other Service Offerings
Education: Support upskilling of client-facing practitioners and internal teams involved in sales & pricing, equipping them with the context and confidence to defend market-based pricing.
Negotiations: Provide coaching on negotiation tactics and walk-away points and directly participate in client and/or procurement negotiations on a limited basis.
Deal Profitability Triage: For specific opportunities identified by the Market and/or opportunities below deal level targets, identify avenues to increase price and/or margin on the opportunity across all aspects (e.g., solution, costing, commercials).
TPA Benchmark Defense: Lead/support client/account teams through a Third Party Advisor (TPA) benchmark of an existing contract or a sole source pursuit on a limited basis.

Support Sales
Build credible relationships and manage interface with Sales Lead(s), Legal, Finance, Contracting, Human Resources, Recruiting, Marketing, and other internal organizations, as well as clients, as appropriate.
Understand Accenture assets, offerings and methodologies to match to client business needs effectively.

Knowledge & Skill Requirements:
Competitive Analysis
Deal Shaping
Executive Presence
Market Intelligence
Negotiation
Pricing & Commercial Strategy Development
Pricing & Profitability Optimization

Educational Qualification
Undergraduate degree, Business Management education desirable
English language fluency (oral and written)

Skills & Work Experience
A minimum of 6 years of experience
Deep understanding of Accenture Sales processes and tools preferred
Familiarity with Finance processes desirable

Other Requirements
Must support/mirror working hours for the supported Market Unit or other business area
Must be flexible with work hours according to shifting business needs
Must have good internet connectivity and distraction-free environment for working at home, in accordance with local guidelines
May be required to travel on rare occasions

Nothing in this job description restricts management's right to assign or reassign duties and responsibilities at any time.

You will also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Accenture is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law.

Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.

Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.

Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women."
MCN/Tiktok Shop Partner Intern (E-Commerce) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About E-commerce Team: Global e-commerce is content e-commerce business mainly based on diversified and tailored livestreaming and short videos. It is committed to enriching life with engaging and entertaining shopping experiences and to making global commerce efficient and accessible for all. Global e-commerce business team hopes to provide users with more tailored, active and efficient consumption experience, enabling merchants to receive stable and reliable platform services in different scenarios, so as to make more affordable and high-quality products sell easily and bring a better life within reach.

Job Description:
- Responsible for the construction and management of the MCN platform, and formulate the short-term and long-term operation plan of the MCN
- Responsible for the operation of the MCN sector, familiar with the platform operation rules, maintaining a good cooperative relationship with MCNs, and being able to carry out various businesses efficiently
- Has Singaporean MCN industry insight, be able to grasp industry trends in time and implement into MCN management practices
- Responsible for planning and execution of TikTok Shop Partners (TSPs) recruitment and development
- Formulate management and supporting policies for TSPs
- Coordinate internal and external teams to select, identify and secure resources for the growth of potential TSPs
- Provide ongoing support and training to TSPs to improve performance, and evaluate TSPs

Qualifications

- Actively enrolled university student who is able to work full time from January to May/June
- Excellent stakeholder and project management skills. Strong ability to manage expectations, drive for performance and collaborate with internal stakeholders under tight timelines and pressure.
- Independent and self-motivated, with good end-to-end ownership of projects. Open to taking on new and ambiguous projects.
- Able to multi-task and prioritise under pressure.
- An analytical and structured thinker, strong with understanding and deriving insights from data.
- Strong communication and writing skills. Good command of English.
- Prior internships in marketing, e-commerce platforms will be a bonus.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Analyst, Fintech Partner Enablement","Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.

When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.

Join Visa: A Network Working for Everyone.

Job Description

What the Analyst, Fintech Partner Enablement does at Visa:

Based in Singapore, the Analyst, Fintech Partner Enablement is part of the team that is responsible for enabling new Fintechs partners go live with Visa and managing enabler partners across the AP region.

This role is responsible for managing and/or supporting the relationships with key third-party issuer processors and BIN sponsors across the region, with the aim of driving Visa preference amongst their client set and ensuring that all priority markets across AP has adequate coverage of enablers to support Fintechs everywhere to launch in Visa.

He or she shall implement and execute signed Fintech partners with key enablers to adapt as well as promote Visa capabilities that are typically highly complex, strategic and cross-functional in nature. The individual will be required to work collaboratively across Visa’s Core Product and Digital Solutions teams as well as other stakeholders such as Processing, CyberSource, Risk, Finance, Legal and Marketing.

The analyst will be responsible for Client Go To Market Program Management and would work with Fintech Business Development and Account Managers together with the Client Services Team to onboard Visa’s Strategic Digital Partners. He or she would drive the execution and implementation of deals with key clients and would be measured against number of activations and/or client go live versus committed timeline and project plan.

Why this is important to Visa

Our Fintech and digital partners and enablers are at the forefront of the way in which we make the future of payments a reality. These partners are some of the most well-known, highest growth digital brands in the world and the Analyst will be working closely with them to support their growth and innovation agenda.

The Analyst Will Be Primarily Measured On Two Fronts

Closely engage enabler partners to help drive preference to Visa and promote adaption of Visa capabilities with digital partners, making this one of the most critical sales and partnerships roles in the region. Seamless onboarding of Visa’s new Visa clients, establishing them on the Visa network so they can make and take payments

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office two days a week, Tuesdays and Wednesdays with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% of the time based on business needs.

Qualifications

Tertiary qualification in a business, commercial or technology discipline.
Minimum 3 to 5 years in either financial services, technology platform or a startup
Excellent analytical and communication skills
An ability to juggle multiple priorities, providing high quality deliverables in a fast-paced environment
A high level of comfort working in a complex and often ambiguous environment
A willingness to learn and the ability to partner, communicate and manage/navigate through multiple

disciplines and organizational groups

A quality leader or people, supporting and nurturing a team of 2 high performing individuals to exceed
Above all, you will need to be a highly motivated self-starter, with a can-do attitude and ability to collaborate

Additional Information

Visa has adopted a COVID-19 vaccination policy. As a condition of employment, all employees based in Singapore are required to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19, unless a reasonable accommodation is approved or as otherwise required by law."
Ashurst ADTLaw Summer Internship 2023,"Description

About Ashurst:

Ashurst is a leading global law firm with a history spanning 200 years and clear strategy for future growth. Our in-depth understanding of our clients and our commitment to providing exceptional standards of service have seen us become a trusted adviser to local and global corporates, financial institutions and governments in all areas of commercial law. To find out more please visit here .

In order to comply with regulatory and client requirements, Ashurst will undertake appropriate vetting of staff. When applicants accept a job offer, Ashurst, alongside a specialist provider, will undertake professional verification and background checks. These checks are only undertaken with consent, and in accordance with our legal and regulatory obligations.

About ADTLaw:

Ashurst ADTLaw is the Formal Law Alliance (""FLA"") between Ashurst, a leading international law firm, with ADTLaw LLC. Through Ashurst ADTLaw, we are able to provide the full breadth of international and Singapore law advice from one integrated platform, with Singapore disputes, corporate, investment fund and banking and finance representation provided by ADTLaw LLC.

Internship Programme:

Our four-weeks internship is opened for rising 2nd and 3rd year law students who are eligible for 2025/2026 Training Contract. The internship programme is designed to provide you with some legal work experiences and have a realistic taste of life as a trainee solicitor. You will have the opportunity to work with different practices and will be supervised by a qualified solicitor.

As part of the programme, we will arrange a series of training sessions to enhance your legal skills and industry knowledge. You will gain an in-depth understanding of our practice areas from sharing sessions and legal training workshops. There will also be some social events for you to interact with our colleagues.

The internship will form part of the assessment for training contract consideration.

Internship dates:
Monday, 5 June - Friday, 30 June 2023
Monday, 3 July - Friday, 28 July 2023

Practice Training Contract / Training Programme

Our training programme is 24 months in duration. Law students who have completed the summer internship programme may be considered for a 12 months Practice Training Contract with ADTLaw and following the admission to the Singapore Bar, the trainee will then embark on a 12 months Post-Qualification Training Programme with Ashurst that may consist of seat rotations.

During the internship, you will be asked to complete a written assignment and based on your performance, you may be invited for an interview for training contract consideration.

What We Look For:

Excellent academic record and a passion to develop a career in a top law firm
Outstanding communication skills
Analytical ability, motivation, determination, drive and tenacity
Commercial sensitivity
Good teamwork and interpersonal skills
Those who wish to be considered for a 2025/2026 Practice Training Contract are encouraged to apply

How to Apply:

We are accepting application for our 2023 summer internship programme until 10 February 2023.

Please click on the ""Apply"" button to submit an application. You should prepare a cover letter, a copy of your CV and most recent academic transcript."
Data Scientist,"The Opportunity

The customer is the focus of everything we do, and millions of end users rely on our products daily. We believe in the value of empowering our employees with the resources to solve critical problems for the future of our business, which is why we need you.

The candidate will be a part of the Advanced Analytics team and will be tasked with assisting in the development and execution of robust analytical solutions to various parts of the Singapore business. The candidate must have a passion for how data can be leveraged and used to drive deeper, meaningful insights that enhance the customer experience, grow our businesses, minimize risk and engage our employees.

What motivates you?

You obsess about customers, listen, engage and act for their benefit
You think big, with curiosity to discover ways to use your agile mindset and enable business outcomes
You thrive in teams, and enjoy getting things done together
You take ownership and build solutions, focusing on what matters
You do what is right, work with integrity and speak up
You share your humanity, helping us build a diverse and inclusive work environment for everyone

We are looking for someone with:

University degree with a quantitative degree, such as Statistics, Quantitative Analysis for Business, Economics or Mathematics.
At least 3 to 5 years’ experience in the application of Data Science / Advanced Analytics
Passionate about achieving positive results in the business.
Strong in numerical and analytical skills.
Ability to think and work creatively around the constraints of the existing business to devise valuable experiments
A team player with the ability to successfully manage interaction with internal clients and work independently and within a team environment with professionalism and collaboration.
Hands-on experience of multivariate analysis, modeling, segmentation and customer analytics using statistical techniques.
Proficient in data mining tools with a deep knowledge of at least one statistical and/or simulation package (e.g. Python, STATA, R, SAS Base, Matlab) and understand databases (e.g. SQL) and have working knowledge in one procedural computer language (e.g. C, VB, Python, Real Studio)
Strong communication and presentation skills with the ability to present data reports/analyses and statistics in a simple and clear way. Evidence of ability to persuade a wide range of colleagues

Nice to Have:

Experience in campaign management including targeting, test and control development, response tracking and analysis.
Experience in analytics project management.
Experience in Web Analytics such as Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics is an advantage

On the job you will:

Develop advanced predictive / prescriptive models to support analytics initiatives across key themes such as:
CRM / Lead management
Campaign Design & Monitoring
Operational efficiency
Assist with the development and implementation of a robust data analytics infrastructure to enable the delivery of analytical based solutions into the business.
Work with regional and BU teams to identify business use cases and develop solutions to meet these needs using analytical approaches such as:
Segmentation models
Propensity models
Cluster analysis
Text mining
Participate in initiatives including campaign tracking, contact and response management, test-and-learn recommendations to improve performance of solutions delivered to the business.
Participate in regionally led peer-review process to validate model develop rigor.
Participate in digital analytics initiatives to establish measures of success of our digital programs for both internal and external digital solutions.
Work with internal stakeholders and external vendors / partners on the enrichment of customer database and augmentation via 3rd party data providers.
Manage regular reporting and ad-hoc data extract from other departments.
Our commitment to you

Our mission; to be a part of making Decisions Easier and Lives Better
A leadership team dedicated to your growth and success
A bold ambition and set of goals to be a leader in driving transformation in our industry
Our best. Every day.
Learn more about opportunities with us at jobs.manulife.com"
Site Reliability Engineer - Video Infrastructure,"Responsibilities

Video Infrastructure is a world-leading video platform that provides multi-media storage, delivery, transcoding, and streaming services. We are building the next generation video processing platform and the largest live streaming network, which provides excellent experiences for billions of users around the world. Popular video products of TikTok and its affiliates are all empowered by our cutting-edge cloud technologies. Working in this team, you will have the opportunity to tackle challenges of large-scale networks all over the world, while leveraging your expertise in coding, algorithms, complexity analysis, and large-scale system design.

Responsibilities
1. Build global infrastructure for multi-media transport, storage and process, to serve billions of users all over the world.
2. Engage in global production system management such as monitoring, emergency response, capacity planning and optimization.
3. Build tools, automations, visualizations and monitors to facilitate the operation and optimization of the global infrastructure.
4. Engage in and improve the whole service lifecycle, from inception and design, through deployment, operation and refinement.
5. Scale up systems sustainably through mechanisms like automation, and initiate changes that improve system reliability and processing speed.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical background involving software/system engineering, or equivalent working experience.
2. Good programming experience with at least one of the following languages: C, C++, Java, Python, or Go.
3. Extensive knowledge of networking, operation system, database system and container technology.
4. Good understanding of every aspect of microservice architecture, and hands on experience in troubleshooting in large scale distributed systems.
5. Hands on experience in common open-source system such as Linux, MySQL, MongoDB, Redis and ELK.
6. Experience in building solutions with AWS, Google, Azures and other cloud services is a plus.
7. Passionate, self-motivated and good teamwork skills."
Payment Product Manager,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Binance Pay is a contactless, borderless and secure cryptocurrency payment technology designed by Binance. As a Product Manager for this team, you will design market leading features that allow our users to shop with crypto or send crypto to friends and family worldwide.

Responsibilities:

Explore opportunities for new product development within our Pay product, driving improvement & optimisation based on data, research and user feedbacks
Lead cross-functional projects that help evolve our platform capabilities and break through operating constraints to support a constantly evolving payment ecosystem
Conceptualise and drive projects globally with opposing priorities, multiple partners, and quick timelines
Work with engineers and designers to design and implement architecturally sound solutions in an agile fashion, communicating constantly, iterating quickly and frequently
Support product planning and prioritisation of critical initiatives

Requirements:

At least 4 years of product management experience, in an e-commerce or digital payment area
Ability to make product recommendations based on data analytics
Experienced in user research and competitor analysis is a plus
Excellent critical thinking, stakeholder management and communication skills
English proficiency is mandatory

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
"Team Leader, Lead Development, APAC","AVEVA is a global leader in industrial software. Our cutting-edge solutions are used by thousands of enterprises to deliver the essentials of life – such as energy, infrastructure, chemicals and minerals – safely, efficiently and more sustainably.

We’re the first software business in the world to have our sustainability targets validated by the SBTi, and we’ve been recognized for the transparency and ambition of our commitment to diversity, equity, and inclusion. We’ve also recently been named as one of the world’s most innovative companies.

If you’re a curious and collaborative person who wants to make a big impact through technology, then we want to hear from you! Find out more at https://www.aveva.com/en/about/careers/

Job Purpose AVEVA is seeking a Team Leader, Sales Development to build and mentor its team of Sales Development Representatives (SDRs) in the Asia Pacific Region. The Team Leader, Sales Development will play a critical and highly visible role with Executive Leadership by owning the early stages of our sales cycle and connecting Marketing efforts to qualified Sales pipeline. Dimensions This is a management role reporting to the Director of Global Sales Development and will have regular exposure to Sales and Marketing Executives. You will manage a team of 8-12 Sales Development Representatives focused by region to develop new Opportunities for AVEVA Sales personnel. This team is responsible for Outbound Prospecting, as well as fielding and responding to all Marketing-originated Inbound leads. Your work will involve building close relationships with Field Marketing, Regional Sales, and other key stakeholders, to develop and deploy high-touch campaigns in alignment with their needs. Primary Responsibilities: Build, manage, and mentor a team of 8-12 Sales Development Representatives working to augment the Sales pipeline by establishing new business opportunities for AVEVA Account Managers. Motivate and inspire the team to meet and exceed KPIs by supporting their daily activities—aiding with account targeting, prospecting approach, and communications development, while escalating operational and business issues accordingly. Deliver 100+ Million GBP of pipeline through expeditious qualification of Inbound leads and best-in-class techniques for Outbound prospecting. Partner with Regional Sales and Marketing teams to establish execution strategies and identify content requirements for campaigns tailored to the unique needs of the Region. Serve as the voice of high-touch Marketing engagements from the field, providing feedback to global functions regarding campaign and nurture effectiveness; closing the loop to increase conversion rates. Collaborate with SDR leadership team to continuously improve the standardized Global approach to lead management—including key process steps, selection of enabling technologies, and resource identification—while communicating specific adaptations required of the Region. Coach and strengthen the skillsets of SDR team members to ensure adequate preparedness for accepting quota-bearing Sales positions as the likely next-step of their careers. Ensure all activities are executed in alignment with Global SDR measurement/reporting framework. VP & Directors, Regional Sales Market(s) (APAC) Sales Account Managers (APAC) We’re looking for: 5+ years leading Sales Development and/or Inside Sales teams with an emphasis on Outbound Prospecting; preferably in the B2B software business. Min 3 years as people manager and leading by example. Demonstrable success with building and developing high-performance teams; including selection & training, addressing coaching needs, holding regular performance reviews, and reward & promotion. Proven track record of exceeding team goals through inspiration, motivation, and adaptation. Thorough understanding of diverse market needs and business cultures in APAC, drawing from experience to define tailored approaches for lead development. Experience navigating complex multi-cultural/multi-channel business environments, managing budgets, and communicating success. Passionate team player, eager to co-develop global best practices for lead development strategy and processes; adjusting for cultural & business norms within region as required. Experience with establishing and maintaining strong alignment between Sales and Marketing functions, building rapport and influence at all levels. Willing to share opinions and challenge where appropriate, recognizing the value of and purpose for intellectual conflict in fostering high-functioning teams. Experience with fast-paced environments and unwavering leadership during periods of change. Ambitious, results-oriented, and highly motivated to advance their career by accepting increasing levels of responsibility as a participant in AVEVA’s talent pipeline. Outstanding communication and time management skills, with a high degree of Emotional Intelligence. Expertise in lead development productivity and automation platforms. Familiarity with Salesforce, Outreach, Marketo, and LinkedIn Sales Navigator a plus. Working experience as an individual contributor in Sales Development or Account Management required. Bachelor’s degree preferred. This role will be expected to travel up to 15% of the year as conditions allow. About AVEVA We are the makers of the PI System, the leading operations data management platform in essential sectors, such as power generation and utilities, water, oil and gas, mining, metals, manufacturing, pharmaceutical, facilities, transportation, food and beverage, and more. Every day, industrial professionals in 146 countries rely on the PI System to improve operational performance, protect health and safety, keep the lights on, and make the world run more smoothly. Learn more about how you can make a difference at www.osisoft.com/careers. OSIsoft is now part of AVEVA, a global leader in industrial software, driving digital transformation and sustainability. By connecting the power of information and artificial intelligence with human insight, AVEVA enables teams to use their data to unlock new value. We call this Performance Intelligence. AVEVA’s comprehensive portfolio enables more than 20,000 industrial enterprises to engineer smarter, operate better and drive sustainable efficiency. The company is headquartered in Cambridge, UK, with over 6,500 employees and 90 offices in over 40 countries. AVEVA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed to being an exemplar employer with an inclusive culture, developing a workplace environment where all our employees are treated with dignity and respect. We value diversity and the expertise that people from different backgrounds bring to our business. Come and join AVEVA to create the transformative technology that enables our customers to engineer a better world. Concerning agencies: AVEVA does not accept unsolicited resumes and will not be responsible for fees related to such.

AVEVA requires all successful applicants to undergo and pass a comprehensive background check before they start employment. Background checks will be conducted in accordance with local laws and may, subject to those laws, include proof of educational attainment, employment history verification, proof of work authorization, criminal records, identity verification, credit check. Certain positions dealing with sensitive and/or third party personal data may involve additional background check criteria.

AVEVA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed to being an exemplary employer with an inclusive culture, developing a workplace environment where all our employees are treated with dignity and respect. We value diversity and the expertise that people from different backgrounds bring to our business.

Come and join AVEVA to create the transformative technology that enables our customers to engineer a better world."
Consumer Science & Product Understanding (R&D) - Intern,"Site Name: Singapore - Rochester Park

Posted Date: Jan 5 2023

WHY HALEON

Our purpose is to deliver better everyday health with humanity. #HelloHaleon

Hello. We’re Haleon. A new world-leading consumer health company. Shaped by all who join us. Together, we’re improving everyday health for billions of people. By growing and innovating our global portfolio of category-leading brands – including Sensodyne, Panadol, Advil, Voltaren, Theraflu, Otrivin, and Centrum – through a unique combination of deep human understanding and trusted science. What’s more, we’re achieving it in a company that we’re in control of. In an environment that we’re co-creating. And a culture that’s uniquely ours. Care to join us. It isn’t a question.

This is an exciting time to join us and help shape the future. It’s an opportunity to be part of something special.

JOB PURPOSE:

We are looking for an intern to assist Consumer Science and Product Understanding R&D in delivering innovation programs for Haleon Consumer Health R&D. The Industrial Placement student will work under supervision of the Consumer Science and Product Understanding Lead and collaborate with other functions of commercial, innovation, manufacturing, medical, regulatory, insights and R&D scientists in the company to provide appropriate and timely input into our innovation program.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:

You will be required to support the Consumer Science and Product Understanding team in undertaking consumer research, data analysis & innovation workshops, including evaluating & summarizing consumer and sensory data. Key responsibilities include:

Landscaping: understanding consumer, competitor, product trends to generate new insights and opportunities relevant for Consumer Healthcare categories (Pain Management, Respiratory and Skin Health, Oral Health and Wellness)
Data Mining: conducting review and analysis of previous consumer studies to generate new insights and learning to strengthen current proposition or identify new opportunities for further research and exploration

Consumer/Sensory Research: assist in the preparation, planning, conduct, data analysis and documentation of consumer studies in CH R&D
Coordinating with other functions to prepare for consumer research studies – questionnaire review/alignment, sample preparation and shipments, internal clearances and approvals
Coordinating with respective agencies for preparation and conduct of consumer research studies
Assist in the preparation of reports and documentation of relevant studies following internal SOPs and guidelines

Innovation Workshops: assist in the preparation, planning, and conduct of innovation workshops for CH R&D
Working with internal and external partners to prepare for innovation workshops
Assist in facilitation and execution of Innovation Workshops


LEARNING OUTCOMES:

You will be able to:

Obtain high level overview of the R&D/Innovation processes and activities and its position in the product lifecycle
Understand importance of consumer and sensory sciences in the product development and market success
Understand relevance and applications of fundamental science / technical knowledge to industry / product development

This role is an excellent opportunity to learn about the fast-moving consumer healthcare (FMCH) industry and experience the role of research & development in shaping business strategy and success. This role will be based in Singapore.

HALEON IDEAL FIT:

We are looking for someone with the following:

Business Skills And Competencies

Educational background – studying Pharmacy, Food Science or Life Sciences related degree (Penultimate students preferred)
Proficient in use of IT and software/systems, ideally document management and database systems

Behavioural Skills And Competencies

Strong written and oral communication skills
Deadline-driven, flexible with self-reliance to work in an empowered environment
Awareness and ability to work within culturally diverse teams
Demonstrated ability to take initiative, think and work independently, and problem-solve
Strong drive for performance and attention to details
A keen interest in consumer healthcare science, product and development, and a passion for knowledge

INTERESTED?

Prior to shortlisting, we will be dropping you a call to ask for your personal information and why you want to work for us. We recommend you apply as soon as possible, because we accept ongoing applications and offer positions on a first come, first served basis.

At Haleon we embrace our diverse workforce by creating an inclusive environment that celebrates our unique perspectives, generates curiosity to create unmatched understanding of each other, and promotes fair and equitable outcomes for everyone. We’re striving to create a climate where we celebrate our diversity in all forms by treating each other with respect, listening to different viewpoints, supporting our communities, and creating a workplace where your authentic self belongs and thrives. We believe in an agile working culture for all our roles. If flexibility is important to you, we encourage you to explore with our hiring team what the opportunities are.

Care to join us. Find out what life at Haleon is really like www.haleon.com/careers/

At Haleon we embrace our diverse workforce by creating an inclusive environment that celebrates our unique perspectives, generates curiosity to create unmatched understanding of each other, and promotes fair and equitable outcomes for everyone. We're striving to create a climate where we celebrate our diversity in all forms by treating each other with respect, listening to different viewpoints, supporting our communities, and creating a workplace where your authentic self belongs and thrives. We believe in an agile working culture for all our roles. If flexibility is important to you, we encourage you to explore with our hiring team what the opportunities are.

As you apply, we will ask you to share some personal information, which is entirely voluntary. We want to have an opportunity to consider a diverse pool of qualified candidates and this information will assist us in meeting that objective and in understanding how well we are doing against our inclusion and diversity ambitions. We would really appreciate it if you could take a few moments to complete it. Rest assured, Hiring Managers do not have access to this information and we will treat your information confidentially.

Haleon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive equal consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, pregnancy, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, age, disability, genetic information, military service, covered/protected veteran status or any other federal, state or local protected class.

Please note that if you are a US Licensed Healthcare Professional or Healthcare Professional as defined by the laws of the state issuing your license, Haleon may be required to capture and report expenses Haleon incurs, on your behalf, in the event you are afforded an interview for employment. This capture of applicable transfers of value is necessary to ensure Haleon’s compliance to all federal and state US Transparency requirements."
"Officer / AVP, Security Operations Centre (SOC) Level 1 Analyst, Cyber Security Defence, Global Information Security","Job Description:

About Bank Of America

Our purpose as a firm is to make financial lives better, through the power of every connection. Across the world, we partner with leading corporate and institutional investors through our offices in more than 35 countries. In the U.S. alone, we serve almost all of the Fortune 500 companies and approximately 67 million consumer and small-business clients. We provide a full suite of financial products and services, from banking and investments to asset and risk management. We cover a broad range of asset classes, making us a global leader in corporate and investment banking, sales and trading.

Connecting Asia Pacific to the world

Our Asia Pacific team is spread across 19 cities in 12 markets. We are focused on connecting Asia to the world and the world to Asia, using our global expertise to ensure success is shared between us, our clients and our communities. Our regional footprint covers 12 currencies, more than a dozen languages and five time zones, placing us firmly among the region’s leading financial services companies.

Position Description

Background: The Bank of America Global Information Security (GIS) level-one security analyst is part of the Cyber Security Operations Centre (SOC) team. The SOC team works closely with other GIS teams as experts in the detection of and analysis of all cyber-related suspicious security events.

Key Responsibilities
The SOC Analyst I is responsible for the timely and accurate identification of security events, mastery of the technologies and information that we analyse, while maintaining expert-level knowledge of detection tools and techniques, and proper escalation of incidents for immediate response, containment and recovery.
Supports GIS functions analysing, researching, improving, defining, implementing, and executing info security controls and standards. Support team members performing specialized GIS functions.
Follows standard practices and procedures in analysing situations or data. May partner with internal and external stakeholders. Should have a basic understanding of common operating systems and security technologies.
Key Requirements
The SOC Analyst I must be information security savvy, self-motivated professional who has a strong passion for cyber security, and a serious desire to learn.
This individual should be interested in being challenged on a daily basis to stay one step ahead of an ever-changing cyber landscape of threats and adversaries.
The SOC Analyst I should be interested in working both collaboratively and independently to hunt down and identify anomalous and malicious activity, wherever it may be.
The SOC Analyst I can be a cyber-security professional or new to the field, but must be driven to join us in defending our company as the first line of defence to execute numerous monitoring and triage playbooks.
The SOC Analyst I will monitor event queues, investigate and analyse security alerts, monitor the health of security sensors and endpoints, and collect data and context as necessary.
Successful candidates can take advantage of a competitive tuition reimbursement program, as well as a world-class training and industry certification opportunities.
Good / Fast typing skills
Good verbal and written communication skills
Good organizational abilities with keen attention to detail
The ability to think creatively to find solutions to complex problems
The ability to work both independently and collaboratively within a larger team
A willingness to be challenged along with a strong appetite for learning.
Working knowledge of common IT operation systems (Windows etc.) and basic endpoint security principles
Basic understanding of networking systems, cyber security vulnerabilities, exploits and attacks.
Desired Skills:
2-3 years of experience in Cyber Security, Incident Response, or a related field
Prior experience detecting and analysing security events and/or responding to security incidents
Demonstrated ability to analyse and correlate information from a wide variety of enterprise technologies
CompTIA Security+, CompTIA Network+, or similar certificate
Knowledge of common cyber security analysis tools & techniques
Programming experience (Python, Perl, etc.)
(Note: This role may be subject to certification and/or specialized training requirements.)"
Mechanical Engineer,"Job Highlights

Learning & Development opportunities
Great employee welfare benefits
Company bus transport pick-up provided

Job Description

Reporting to Plant Mechanical Manager, this position is responsible for leading site mechanical contractor team in providing engineering services to support safe and stable plant operation and ensuring all mechanical maintenance activities are carried out efficiently and according to local regulations and HSE requirements at plant site.

Responsibilities:

Plan, schedule and manage maintenance works to ensure safe and stable plant operations
Lead and manage site mechanical contractor team and ensure that daily, periodical and shutdown maintenance works are carried out safely, timely and efficiently
Respond to plant emergency calls and resolve mechanical troubles within short time frame
Review and conduct technical investigation of mechanical equipment’s problems, evaluate findings, prepare analysis reports and recommend countermeasures to enhance equipment’s reliability
Develop, review and implement Risk Assessment for all mechanical work activities
Manage fixed assets and stocks movement, and follow up on purchase request and delivery
Plan annual mechanical budget, and monitor and update monthly expenditure
Identify and develop cost control strategies and cost savings programs
Establish and maintain maintenance system to comply with requirements of Safety Management System for the chemicals industry
Develop, review and implement mechanical maintenance procedure to improve equipment maintenance methodology
Update and maintain proper maintenance records and reports according to plant site’s requirements
Participate in Engineering audits and ensure that mechanical activities comply with required rules and regulations
Provide guidance and conduct training for junior engineers to develop their skills and expertise
Undertake any other duties as assigned by superiors from time to time

Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Mechanical Engineering with at least 3 years of relevant experience or Diploma in Mechanical Engineering with at least 5 years of relevant experience in Oil & Petrochemicals industry
Experience in polymer plant and extruder maintenance would be advantageous
Self-motivated, independent and resourceful
Effective team player with good communication and presentation skills
Possess good analytical thinking and problem solving skills
High sense of responsibility and commitment
Dynamic individual who is able to work under pressure and perform overtime work
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Willing to rotate between 3 manufacturing plants within Jurong Island depending on work arrangement

Additional Information

Career Level

Senior Executive

Qualification

Diploma, Advanced/Higher/Graduate Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma, Professional Degree

Years of Experience

3 years

Job Type

Full-Time

Job Specializations

Engineering , Mechanical

Reporting to Plant Mechanical Manager, this position is responsible for leading site mechanical contractor team in providing engineering services to support safe and stable plant operation and ensuring all mechanical maintenance activities are carried out efficiently and according to local regulations and HSE requirements at plant site.

Responsibilities:

Plan, schedule and manage maintenance works to ensure safe and stable plant operations
Lead and manage site mechanical contractor team and ensure that daily, periodical and shutdown maintenance works are carried out safely, timely and efficiently
Respond to plant emergency calls and resolve mechanical troubles within short time frame
Review and conduct technical investigation of mechanical equipment’s problems, evaluate findings, prepare analysis reports and recommend countermeasures to enhance equipment’s reliability
Develop, review and implement Risk Assessment for all mechanical work activities
Manage fixed assets and stocks movement, and follow up on purchase request and delivery
Plan annual mechanical budget, and monitor and update monthly expenditure
Identify and develop cost control strategies and cost savings programs
Establish and maintain maintenance system to comply with requirements of Safety Management System for the chemicals industry
Develop, review and implement mechanical maintenance procedure to improve equipment maintenance methodology
Update and maintain proper maintenance records and reports according to plant site’s requirements
Participate in Engineering audits and ensure that mechanical activities comply with required rules and regulations
Provide guidance and conduct training for junior engineers to develop their skills and expertise
Undertake any other duties as assigned by superiors from time to time

Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Mechanical Engineering with at least 3 years of relevant experience or Diploma in Mechanical Engineering with at least 5 years of relevant experience in Oil & Petrochemicals industry
Experience in polymer plant and extruder maintenance would be advantageous
Self-motivated, independent and resourceful
Effective team player with good communication and presentation skills
Possess good analytical thinking and problem solving skills
High sense of responsibility and commitment
Dynamic individual who is able to work under pressure and perform overtime work
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Willing to rotate between 3 manufacturing plants within Jurong Island depending on work arrangement"
Application Developer (Avaloq) - Ref: YC,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Avaloq Parameterization, Pl/SQL, UNIX, Big Data/Hadoop
Writing scalable, robust, testable, efficient and easily maintainable code
Translating software requirements into stable, working, high performance software
Ensure that software packages and programs are well documented and has reasonable test coverage
Collaborate closely with other internal technical teams/business users in investigating, testing and deployments
Responsible for handling Release Management, raising Change Request and scheduling for the implementation of fixes and enhancements.
Root cause analysis, management communication and client relationship management in partnership with Infrastructure Service Support team members.
Ensures all production changes are made in accordance with life-cycle methodology and risk guidelines
Application Support, Deployment of Release, patches & fixes on Platform
Analyze application performance, perform tuning and ensure high availability & stability of platform.

Desired Skills and Experience
PL/SQL, Big Data, Release Management, High Availability, Relationship Management, Application Development, Root Cause Analysis, Unix, Information Technology, Tuning, Application Support, Banking, Scheduling, Software Development"
Senior Java Full Stack Engineer (Document Creation And Distribution),"Job Reference #

265884BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role


passionate to resolve business problems with innovative ideas and best engineering practices
collaborate with cross-location pod’s/scrum teams to ship new features
learn and demonstrate in-depth knowledge, industry standard, and expertise throughout the entire SDLC
best-in-class mindset to design, develop, maintain and support strategic software
exhibit sound judgement under pressure in handling time-critical situations
accept new challenges and strive for continuous improvements in overall application performance and platform stability

Your team

You’ll be working with the Document Creation and Distribution Crew and will work in the platform POD providing solutions for the Global platform

Your expertise


ideally 8+ years of experience in software development
strong experience with Java 8, Web Services (REST, SOAP), XML
experience with Spring Framework, Spring Boot
experience with messaging middleware such as Kafka
strong knowledge of Cloud principles and techniques such as Microservices-based architecture/development, RESTful API development, container-based software deployment, Test Driven Development, Strong Unit and integration testing skill, Spring Boot
experience with Event Driven Architecture is a plus
ldap/AD experience is a plus
applied solutions to cater for non-functional requirements including stability, capacity and scalability and manageability

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Technical Support Specialist,"DigitalBridge (NYSE: DBRG) is a leading global digital infrastructure firm. With a heritage of over 25 years investing in and operating businesses across the digital ecosystem including cell towers, data centers, fiber, small cells, and edge infrastructure, the DigitalBridge team manages a $50 billion portfolio of digital infrastructure assets on behalf of its limited partners and shareholders. Headquartered in Boca Raton, DigitalBridge has key offices in New York, Los Angeles, London, Luxembourg, and Singapore. For more information, visit: www.digitalbridge.com.

The Person: At DigitalBridge, we aim for excellence in all we do and our talented team is critical to our success. By joining our team, you will have an opportunity to work with some of the industry’s most experienced real estate veterans and investors from around the world. We are always looking for talented, dynamic team players to work in every part of our business, across our global network. We invite you to explore the opportunity of joining the DigitalBridge team.
 The Technical Support Specialist will apply proven problem solving, customer service, and communication skills to help identify, communicate, and resolve end user issues. This position will work in an office onsite and provide IT support and training to end users on hardware and software both locally and remotely. Some travel maybe required to support multiple office locations.

Responsibilities
Resolve Level 1 (L1) and Level 2 (L2) helpdesk tasks and tickets while meeting service level requirements.
Respond to internal support request issues via phone, email, and chat messages.
Collaborate or triage support requests with external vendor support and internal Level 3 (L3) department support.
Respond to system alerts and notifications.
Reviews and/or assign categorization and priority level of the notification.
Escalate complex or out of service scope assignments to Level 3 (L3) technicians.
Manage local vendor relationships.
Assist with local hardware procurement.
Provide day 1 support for new user onboardings in the APAC region


Qualifications
Between 1-2 years of experience in an IT support environment
Advanced software and hardware technical skills
Experience with Microsoft 365 and Intune managed devices
Experience with Microsoft Teams rooms and Teams Phone system
Experience supporting networked environments
Flexibility in work schedule – must be able to work overtime/afterhours when needed
Strong organizational skills, ability to prioritize tasks
Ability to deliver excellent customer service at all levels of the organization and with external partners
Possess strong organizational, time management and project management skills with a demonstrated ability to work both independently and within a team environment
Skilled in supported mobile devices such as Android and iOS phones.
Exhibit a high level of professionalism and excellent interpersonal skills
Experience in documenting processes and monitoring performance metrics.
Ability to keep up with technical innovation and trends in IT support


Digital Bridge is an equal opportunity employer. We consider candidates regardless of age, ancestry, color, marital status, medical condition, mental or physical disability, national origin, race, religion, political and/or third-party affiliation, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, or military or veteran status."
"Cybersecurity Engineer, Global E-commerce (Platform Governance and Service)","Responsibilities

About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the Team
Global e-commerce is content e-commerce business with international short video product as the carrier. It is committed to becoming the first choice for users to discover and purchase good products with affordable prices. Global e-commerce business team hopes to provide users with more tailored, active and efficient consumption experience, enabling merchants to receive stable and reliable platform services in different scenarios such as live e-commerce, short video content e-commerce, so as to make more affordable and high-quality products sell easily and a better life within reach.

E-Commerce’s Governance and Experience is a global team responsible for ensuring a safe and trustworthy marketplace for not only our buyers, but also our sellers and creators. We constantly work on areas such as risk detection abilities, fairness and sustainability of the E-Commerce ecosystem, content and commodity quality, friction-free experiences to drive improvement.

Responsibilities:
- Partner with cyber security and business partners lines of business across the Global E-Commerce to gather information to facilitate and complete threat models
- Understand and safely use various open source penetration testing tools and when appropriate, emulating hacker tactics, techniques, procedures
- Respond to security violations, potential vulnerabilities and alerts from detection systems
- Stay up to date on 0 day exploits for tech stacks we use
- Communicate with stakeholders (technical and non-technical), both verbal and written

Qualifications

- Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, CIS, Engineering, Cybersecurity, or related field (or equivalent work or military experience in a related field)
- 2 years of Experience with information security applications and Cloud Security
- Skilled with conducting information security investigations and remediations.
- Experience with assessing APT threats, Penetration Testing, Vulnerability Management, attack methodologies, forensics analysis techniques, attack surface comprehension, Cyber Threat Emulation operations and research, identification, and/or verification of new APT TTP
- Solid understanding of common web app vulnerabilities, exploitation techniques, and remediation options
- Must be detail-oriented and possess strong problem-solving skills and ability to analyze for potential future issues


TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Application Support Engineer,"Company Description

Are you ready to trade your job for a journey? Become a FlyMate!

Passion, excitement & global collaboration are all core to what it means to be a FlyMate. At Flywire, we’re on a mission to deliver the world’s most important and complex payments. We use our Flywire Advantage - the combination of our next-gen payments platform, proprietary payment network and vertical specific software, to help our clients get paid, and help their customers pay with ease - no matter where they are in the world.

What more do we need to truly be unstoppable? Perhaps, that is you!

Who We Are

Flywire is a global payments enablement and software company, founded a decade ago to solve high-stakes, high-value payments in education, using modern technology.

Today, we’ve digitized payments for more than 3,000 global clients across education, healthcare, travel & B2B, covering more than 240 countries and territories and supporting over 140 currencies. And, we’re just getting started!

With over 950 global FlyMates, representing more than 40 nationalities, and in 14 offices world-wide, we’re looking for FlyMates to join the next stage of our journey as we continue to grow.

Job Description

The Opportunity:

We, at Flywire, are looking for a hands-on and customer-centric Application Support Engineer. This FlyMate will be dedicated to providing application expertise, solving support requests, and assisting the Helpdesk and Development teams. This position will only handle internal requests!

Engage with FlyMates to accurately detail issues in the support ticketing system
Triage issues and find workarounds if possible
Become an expert in Flywire products
Engage with the development team to raise bugs, problems, or information gaps
Maintain documentation relating to solving common issues
Find opportunities of improvement in our support process and internal staff training
Provide day-to-day maintenance and support for applications supported by the customer and their partners
Resolve in a timely manner tier-2 application issues and raise tier-3 issues to designated development squads
Assist in the evaluation, configuration and installation of new releases in accordance with established configuration management standards
Assist in database structural changes required during system upgrades
Deploy tools and implement processes to assist in operational support
Be responsible for responding to application-related queries from end users in remote locations
Perform knowledge transfers to tier-1 and train end users on the usage of applications
Take ownership of development and updating of software applications related documentation, including user documentation and system reports, attend operational and other meetings and perform other duties, as the need arises.

Qualifications

Here’s What We’re Looking For:

Minimum of three to five years of experience in software maintenance and support
An understanding of web applications, ours are written in RoR, Java and React
Knowledge in any of our key technologies: Ruby, Java, React, MySQL, MongoDB, Redis, RabbitMQ
Strong categorization skills, and aptitude to find ways to improve our ticketing system
A desire to improve the support process (on-boarding, training, escalation, etc) and ensure that tickets are closed timely
Ability to grasp complex concepts, logical and analytical approach to solving problems
Proficient in working under pressure and with minimum supervision
Good interpersonal skills and ability to work in a team of diverse skills and cultures

What We Offer

Additional Information

Competitive compensation, including Restricted Stock Units
Employee Stock Purchase Plan (ESPP)
Flying Start - Our immersive Global Induction Program (Meet our Execs & Global Teams)
Work with brilliant people that will keep you on your toes, learn more about their journeys by checking out #InsideFlywire on social media
Dynamic & Global Team (we have been collaborating virtually for years!)
Wellbeing Programs (Mental Health, Wellness, Yoga/Pilates/HIIT Classes) with Global FlyMates Be a meaningful part in our success - every FlyMate makes an impact
Competitive time off including FlyBetter Days to volunteer in a cause you believe in
Great Talent & Development Programs (Managers Taking Flight – for new or aspiring managers!)

Submit today and get started!

We are excited to get to know you! Throughout our process you can expect 4-5 rounds of interviews with different FlyMates including the Hiring Manager, Peers on the team, the VP of the department, and a homework assignment (don’t worry - this is the fun part!) your Talent Acquisition Partner will walk you through the steps and be your “go-to” person for any questions.

Flywire is an equal opportunity employer. With over 30 nationalities across 12 different offices, and diversity and inclusion at the core of our people agenda, we believe our FlyMates are our greatest asset, and we’re excited to watch our unique culture evolve with each new hire."
Test Data Management Engineer,"About Accenture

Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 699,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities.

Key Qualifications And Deliveries

Data Load Scrub Accounts creation conditioning

Hands on experience on Test Data Management Tools including the deployment, support, maintenance

Experience with test data management tools like Broadcom TDM (Priority1), IBM Optim (Priority2), Informatica, Delphix (Priority3)

Understanding of data structures and ability to perform the mapping of legacy database to new tech stack

Knowledge on database systems (MSSQL, Azure DB)

Self-learner and proficiency in new tools setup and exploration

Fundamental knowledge on azure cloud

Must have skills:

Management of test data including creation and mining using data management tools

Exposure and hands on evangelist on cloud components like Azure blob, AKS, AKV, PaaS database

Ability to write queries macros scripts using tools like SQL, VB, QTP, Selenium and XML"
CASC Trade Product Control (TPC) Analyst,"Want to build a stronger, more sustainable future and cultivate your career? Join Cargill's global team of 155,000 employees who use new technologies, dynamic insights and over 154 years of experience to connect farmers with markets, customers with ingredients, and people and animals with the food they need to thrive.

Job Purpose and Impact

The CASC Trade Product Control (TPC) Analyst will be responsible for financial risk management in commodity, foreign exchange risks and trading profit and loss for the defined businesses and areas. In this role, you will partner with key stakeholders to deliver key controls, compliance, data and reports timely and accurately. You will contribute to standardization and optimization of processes and new solutions to enhance automation and implement transformation.

Key Accountabilities
Complete commodity and foreign exchange position reporting and reconciliation in collaboration with key stakeholders, and ensure any significant differences are resolved and communicated appropriately.
Monitor commodity and foreign exchange exposure and complete all financial reporting within deadlines and compare against limits, escalate breaches of limits and get resolution of breach in collaboration with business stakeholders.
Manage reports and reconcile trading profit and loss by line of impact with key stakeholders.
Support compliance operations and monitor points of control.
Collaborate with peers to implement process simplification and enhance process standardization, optimize reporting, and deliver automation and transformation processes.
Drive risk management best practices and improvement activities.
Coach junior team members to ensure a high performing team.
Independently solve moderately complex issues with minimal supervision, while escalating more complex issues to appropriate staff.
Other duties as assigned
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience
Minimum of two years of related work experience
Other minimum qualifications may apply
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in finance operations with a knowledge of financial risk management and related financial processes"
.Net Developer,"Location: Changi Business Park


Responsibilities

Responsible for analysing, designing, development, implementing and/or maintaining of system, ensuring the best possible performance and quality in deliverables.
Work with Team Lead to gather requirement from customer, perform technical impact analysis and estimate effort for development, prepare and update schedule for development
Prepare and update functional and technical documents, prepare test cases.
Develop or modify the applications according to the requirement with high quality, conduct peer source code review if necessary
Perform unit test and system integration test, support user acceptance test
Prepare release procedure and support production implementation
Update user manual, system operational manual and other necessary deliverables.
Troubleshoot issues and problems, work out clear action plan(s) to resolve the issues, develop, test, and implement the agreed solution into production, following the bank's Policies and Procedures


Requirement:

With at least 3 years of hands-on experience in .Net development
Prior work experience in banking industry is a plus
Possess DevOps knowledge with experience in tools like Jira, Bamboo, Sonarqube
Indepth knowledge in project life cycle methodologies (Waterfall and/or Agile)
Experience in working with offshore team in project development
Experience in working in a complex matrix organization


*Shortlisted candidates will be informed.



Interested applicants please send in your updated resume to jeffrey.koh@experis.com.sg with the subject "".Net Developer""



Jeffrey Koh Kok Ann
Registration No.: R1770345
EA License No.: 02C3423"
Solution Architect,"Why apply to Circles.Life?

Circles.Life is not just your digital telco provider. Since our launch, we revolutionised the telco industry by seamlessly integrating both telco and digital lifestyle services on our Circles-X platform. Over the past years, we have captured more than 5% market share in Singapore, launched in Australia and Taiwan while attaining record breaking CSAT and NPS (+50). We were voted the Top Employer in Digital Telco and also became an accredited winner in showcasing excellence in workplace culture in 2019.

About This Role

As the Solution Architect, you will be responsible for the overall end to end architecture of the customer solution and implementation of CXOS SaaS platform, MNO and other third parties integration. The expectations of the role are as per below:
Lead business and technology solution architecture and design for Telecom Business Support System (BSS) i.e. CRM, Billing, Order Management and Enterprise Product Catalogue.
Work harmoniously with different stream leads in the technical team to orchestrate the outcomes from a technical standpoint.
Providing the overall architecture guidelines and sets the vision for our Telco solution.
Ensure timely delivery of planned technical outcomes, and within budget while maintaining and possibly exceeding the desired quality.
Ownership to provide necessary solutions to all the Functional and Non-Functional requirements.
Own and define architecture roadmap, technology elements work packages for each domain/application and application roadmap.
SPOC for all communication with customer IT and Service Design teams and manage work-stack level stakeholder relationships with customer.
Steering direction from technical perspective, conducting and facilitating technical reviews.
Conducting workshops to close the requirements, technical decisions etc.
Preferred Qualifications & Experience Requirements
10+ years of experience in E2E BSS areas with specific focus on Real Time Charging & Billing, CRM, Provisioning, Order Management and fulfillment, Enterprise product catalogue, telco system integration.
IT and/or software development experience in one or more of the following areas: large-scale, mission-critical applications, Product Catalog, Billing, CRM, Fulfilment, OSS, general large-scale system architecture, large-scale databases.
Extensive experience in consulting, solution leadership and solution delivery with in-depth technical experience in BSS solutions and overall IT Architecture of a telecom operator.
Must also have prior experience driving consulting engagements around technology, operational and business consulting.
Must have prior experience driving big OSS/BSS Transformation programs, especially onto BSS Transformation Program.
Proven implementation experience with at least two large BSS solution rollouts in Telco industry.
In depth understanding of fixed, mobile and convergence domains and related markets.
Ability to work closely with Sales, Business Development, Pre-Sales and Clients in building E2E Convergent BSS Solutions
Demonstrated knowledge of major industry standards: eTOM, SID, TAM, ITIL, OSS/j.
Excellent written, verbal, and interpersonal communication skills, as well as strong strategic and analytical skills.
Well-developed knowledge and understanding of the global telecommunications marketplace.
What’s On Offer

We provide a great environment and platform for employees to build their career. In this role, you can expect:
Unique opportunity to be a part of innovating the telecommunications industry
Once in a lifetime chance to help shape a brand from the ground up
Autonomy in the role and in managing your own portfolio
Exposure to the fast-paced world of high-tech start-ups
Attractive experience and compensation
Working with passionate, smart and driven colleagues in a vibrant environment"
"Derivatives Operations - Client Analytics, Associate","This is a unique opportunity open to an Associate who will be supporting a Vice President on global client channels initiatives in the Futures & Derivatives Clearing Operations business. This is a fast-paced team that will utilize the associate's strong data analytics background to improve the client experience with direct measurable client and business impact. The associate will have an opportunity to learn about the growing clearing business and the clients' perspective. The associate will be responsible for running different initiatives ranging from client deep dives to data modeling, while having the opportunity to present to senior business and technical stakeholders.

The uniqueness about this role is that it is part of executing the strategy and vision for the FDCO business to determine what strategic platform enhancements or digital solutions we invest in to remain appealing to our client base. This individual must be passionate problem solvers with a solid knowledge about trade life cycle / operations processes, able to challenge the status quo and understand platform and digital technology. Having an innovative mindset, bringing new and creative ideas to the table will also be at the heart of this role.

Responsibilities

Work closely with business and technical stakeholders to identify data needs
Analyze data sources to map and source data inputs required to support the business objectives
Use data to tell a story; observe and identify trends and patterns that is meaningful to the business and operations alike
Defining and building out the data quality rules and framework
Collaborate with technology to obtain access to data in a controlled manner
Champion and lead a data mindset with the BAU operations partners through leading various forums and discussions
Work collaboratively with relevant functions within the business to deliver the project
Managing deadlines and deliverables

Qualifications / Experience

Minimum 5 years of relevant end-to end data modeling/ data analytics experience is required
Competency with at least one of SQL, Python or R is highly preferred
Proficiency in automation tools, such as Alteryx, Xceptor, UIPath, Tableau etc is highly desirable
Prior experience in banking industry is preferred
Focus on high quality and timely delivery that will translate into direct measurable client impact
Financial markets knowledge; Futures & Options, FXPB, OTCPB, or Treasury knowledge a plus
Strong entrepreneurial spirit and ability to structure and scope complex problems; the candidate must be self-starting and independent in managing their own delivery
Comfortable partnering with multiple teams and locations across geographies
Collaborative mindset
We are a global company whose primary business language is English and hence, fluency in English (written/verbal) is required
Bachelor's degree or equivalent

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Information Technology - Scrum Master (SAP),"Job Description

The Scrum Master (SAP) will be leveraging on his/her business process knowledge, work with internal stakeholders to understand business requirements, identify and anticipate fit, gaps and functionalities to design solutions. He/She will foster strong rapport and establish open communication channels with internal stakeholders and external IT vendors to drive the implementation of projects.

Responsibilities
Gather and understand requirements from users for new systems and/or enhancements to existing IT systems
Manage IT vendors and liaise with existing IT team to provide efficient solutions and timely delivery of projects
Review and re-design of existing system design and business processes together with business unit
Evaluate newly released SAP functionalities, new technology and applications, and recommend suitable solutions for implementation
Work with business units to troublesome system errors
Support UAT for new systems cutover and/or enhancement cutover
Any relevant ad-hoc duties
This is an individual contributor role
Note: You could be posted to any subsidiary in SIA Group.
Requirements
Good Honours Degree in Engineering / Computer Science / Information Systems / Computer Engineering / Software Engineering
Certified Scrum Master highly desirable
Minimum 3 years’ experience in handling SAP MM or PM module
Knowledge of SAP HANA is an advantage
Experience in or and/or knowledge of the aviation industry is an advantage
Excellent analytical, interpersonal and communication skills"
Pipeline Design Engineer,"Pipeline Design Engineer
Location: Singapore
At Subsea 7, we take pride in being recognized globally as a leader across the Energy Industry. For 5 decades our people have delivered over 1,000 projects in all water depths across our energy hubs and we continue to do so, adapting and evolving in an ever-changing world.

Our success and sustainability are only made possible by continuing to develop our assets and technology through innovation and collaboration, and importantly through the development and diversity of our people who every day ‘Make Incredible things Happen’ At Subsea 7.
Subsea 7 is looking for talented Pipeline Design Engineers expert in engineering skills to projects, tendering activities, engineering studies relevant to pipeline design area including procurement support.

The Engineer will usually work as part of a team and may also be required to provide information and engineering guidance to other functions such as SCM and operation team.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Provide skills, integrity and knowledge in key areas of pipeline engineering, including design codes, legislative requirements and current good engineering practice. Understands clients’ needs; identifies and addresses design parameters and problems; develops and implements solutions.
Under direct supervision, is involved with production of deliverables, which may include engineering support to the Drafting Department, design calculations, specifications, procedures, analyses, progress reports, bid evaluations, study reports and various 3rd-party submissions.
Originates technical documentation, accepting personal responsibility for its adequacy.
Involved with meetings/correspondence with Clients, subcontractors, 3rd parties, etc. in a technical capacity.
Be aware of associated subsea related disciplines and understand the interfaces within a project environment.
Provide engineering assistance during mobilisations and occasional periods of offshore or site working where required.

PROFESSIONAL QUALIFICATIONS & EXPERIENCE

Mechanical Engineering / Civil Engineering Degree holder.
At least two years’ work experience related to pipeline or piping engineering.
It is an advantage if the candidate is familiar with ABAQUS, ANSYS, Ceasar II, Autopipe, or Orcaflex.

PERSONAL SKILLS

Strong analytical skills
Creative problem solving - able to suggest and develop new methods and ways of working
Sound communication skills – able to communicate ideas and results to various stakeholders both in written reports and in meetings, presentations etc.
The ability to work in a team as well as individually with a minimum of supervision
The ability to organize and prioritize own work and as such have responsibility for discrete work packages ongoing simultaneously
Understanding of clients’ needs and ability to suggest and apply “fit for purpose” solutions

OUR OFFER
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed in creating a diverse workforce and look to offer an exciting and excellent international career opportunities as you develop your skills and aspirations.

Along with a range of employment benefits, career development opportunities (mentoring and development programmes) and a flexible working environment, our employees can also further enhance their work-life balance through our Remote Working Policy and wellbeing through a Medical Private Plan and a Wellbeing support initiatives.
Join Us
All applicants that meet the job criteria will be contacted in the two weeks following the application submission date by our AMEC recruitment team. Remaining applications will be integrated in our database and considered in future job opportunities."
Business Development Professional - Global,"About TikTok

Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us



At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

Responsibilities

Responsible for business development work at company level.
Network with other technology companies and following up on potential collaborative projects.
Follow up on market frontier dynamics and industry research to provide decision support and suggestions for the company's strategic layout.
Promote the full process of specific project.

Qualifications

More than 8 years of Consulting, Investment Banking, Law Firm, Big 4 or related professional service experience.
Rich experience in business development and familiar with high-tech industry.
Strong internal and external communication skills, great team player.
Strong spiritual and cognitive ability to learn and explore new sectors/industries, sensitive and curious about new trends.
High standard, high work engagement, self-drive and has the habit of active learning and thinking
Frequent international business travel required.
Professional proficiency in English and Mandarin.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace.

At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations during our recruitment process. If you need assistance or an accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com."
Application Engineer #61934,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Industry/ Organization Type: Manufacturing/ Machinery
Position Title: Application Engineer/ Support Engineer (Hardware & Software)
Working Location: Ubi (Walking distance from Ubi MRT)
Working Hours: Monday to Friday, 9 am – 5.40 pm
Salary Package: Up to $3,500 + Bonus
Duration: Permanent
Key Responsibilities
To provide pre-sales and post-sales technical support and product demonstration as and when necessary.
To participate in webinars, training sessions, and demos for customers;
To prepare relevant documentation for customers related to their industry.
To provide advice and support to the sales team on the selection of suitable products, technical assistance, and product strategies.
Other duties as assigned by the Supervisor.
APPLY NOW!!
At least Diploma, preferably in Digital & Mechanical/ Mechatronics/ Aerospace Manufacturing Engineering or related discipline.
Minimum 1 year of relevant working experience. Inexperienced candidates are welcome to apply as training will be provided.
Knowledge of 3D modeling and/or CAD software (3D Systems, Autodesk, Rhino, ZBrush, Blender, etc.).
Experience with 3D scanning and/or 3D printing would be advantageous.
Possess Class 3 license.
Willing to travel locally or oversea within short notice, e.g., Training, Trade shows, etc.
Kindly Apply Through ANY Of The Following Methods
Submit your application by clicking the APPLY button;
Email your resume to Job(at)anradus.com.sg. Please indicate #61934 on the email subject.
Anradus Policy: This clarifies Anradus' working procedures, from receiving the applicant's resume, screening to shortlisting. We assure you our consultants will go through every resume we receive but we regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Anradus Pte Ltd | EA License No. 20C0161 | Adelin Chong | EA Reg No.: R1875641
Desired Skills and Experience
3D Modeling, Trade Shows, Class 3 License, Manufacturing Engineering, Technical Assistance, Hardware, Zbrush, Aerospace, 3D, Rhino, Product Demonstration, Screening, Manufacturing, CAD, Technical Support"
Business Analyst,"We Build Reliable Solutions. For Customers, Company And Country.
You will be part of SP Digital. Together, you will innovate, create, and deploy digital products that will empower more than 3,800 employees within SP Group and improve the quality of life for the 1.5 million commercial, industrial and residential customers that SP Group serves. We build solutions that enable sustainable, high-quality lifestyles and help consumers save energy and cost, as well as support national goals for a sustainable, livable city. Now, imagine the impact you can create.


What You'll Do:
Part of SP Digital’s Green Energy Tech team. You will work closely with product managers, UX/UI, engineering, and sales to gather and produce business requirements for our suite of products.
You will gather and analyse, validates the business needs and client’s requirements complete the product requirements and also contribute to the roadmap planning and prioritization of the Green Energy Tech team.
Convert roadmap features into user stories that are clear and well-structured business requirements/documents for cross-teams to develop further.
Communicate and validate business requirements with relevant stakeholders
Translate problems and opportunities into actionable user problems with frequent interaction with internal and external user feedback
Collaborate and support partners to implement


What You'll Need:
~5 years of experience
Education: degree in engineering or relevant work experience
Passionate & dynamic self-starter and a go-getter
Commercial acumen
Strong stakeholder management skills
Project management experience
Proven experience in a business analyst role
Independent in working with engineering/design onshore/offshore.
Outstanding problem-solving skills with an excellent analytical mindset.
Ability to develop solid roadmaps and strategic plans as well as to provide execution details through product specifications
Strong communication skills with the ability to collaborate & communicate with cross teams within the organisation

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Site Support Engineer,"Job Description

About DXC Technology: We are a Fortune 500 global IT services leader. Our more than 130,000 people in 70-plus countries are entrusted by our customers to deliver what matters most. We use the power of technology to deliver mission critical IT services across the Enterprise Technology Stack to drive business impact. DXC is an employer of choice with strong values, and fosters a culture of inclusion, belonging and corporate citizenship. We are DXC.

Responsibilities
Provide 24x7 1st level support (12hrs shift helpdesk & onsite) for DXC Support Teams, Clients and Client’s 3rd Parties Vendors
Provide 1st level troubleshooting to customers.
Respond to customer calls in a professional and courteous manner
Responsible for logging calls and ensure all calls contain clear problem description, resolution and all activities carried during resolution of the problems with the customers
Attend Daily Operations Review Meeting
Able to do initial diagnostic, categorization, set priority, dispatch job
Able to support & coordinate with Support teams in incident/problem investigation and resolution
Able to identify incident trends in order to elevate incidents in accordance with standard operating procedures
Ensure timely case attention, resolution, escalation and closure, so that SLA is met
Ensure timely escalation of major and critical incidents
Ensure timely submission of daily and periodic statistics and reports
Ensure timely reporting of services outages or degradation and/ or batch failures
Contribute and Submit knowledge request if found lacking in the knowledgebase.
Liaise with internal and external vendors to satisfy customer queries
Proactively assist customers to avoid or reduce problem occurrence.
Actively pursue Continuous Improvement initiatives to improve the overall performance of the service desk
Requirements
Diploma or Certification in Information Technologies related fields
Minimum of 1-2 years of post-education IT work experience required
Working knowledge on Windows, Unix and Network
Basic Configuration and Administration of PC and Laptops will be a plus
Proficient level of computer skills including O365. Data analysis skill using Excel and Power BI will be a plus.
Experience with call tracking / ticket management system (ServiceNow or Jira), Autotask preferred
Experience with Managed Services, IT Integration and/or Consulting experience a plus
Must be able to work independently and/or in a team environment
Ability to deliver valuable and professional IT services to external clients
Time management and organizational skills to efficiently complete assigned tasks
Good communication skills to ensure successful resolution to client issues
Ability to interact professionally with a diverse group of colleagues and clients
Ability to work on site at client locations with respect to client’s work environment & staff
Capable of maintaining a calm cool composure even when navigating challenging situations and frustrated clients
Provide excellent communication with client while on site assuring superior client service
Only Singaporeans
Willing to work shifts – 12-hr shift including PH and Weekends
Fully Vaccinated
Our Culture And Benefits

DXC is committed to building better futures for our customers, colleagues, environment, and communities. We take care of each other and foster a culture of inclusion, belonging and corporate citizenship. We put this to action developing and implementing societal initiatives within our Social Impact Practice. #WeAreDXC

Our “people first” philosophy means we offer competitive remuneration, benefits, training and career opportunities that reflect our commitment to improving the lives of our employees, and the communities in which we live and work.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer

DXC is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and we welcome submissions from people from all walks of life. We celebrate our diversity and recognize it is the unique contributions of our people that give us our edge. We stand by the ‘bring your whole-self to work’ philosophy. It is our inclusive culture that powers our results, and our company grows only if our people grow."
"Solution Architect, IaaS","Ingram Micro Cloud (IMC) is fast-paced business with an entrepreneurial mentality within the foundation of a Fortune 100 company that is growing absurdly fast and changing how business is done in the cloud. We are committed to helping our channel partners and professionals get access to an infinite ecosystem of cloud solutions, platform technology, enablement programs and relationships with the biggest players in the cloud industry.

We’re inviting an innovative Solution Architect, IaaS and problem solver who isn’t afraid to think outside-of-the-box to provide the best solutions for our partners so they can drive accelerated and profitable new revenue for IaaS solutions with new end-user workload adds. If you have a successful solution architect track record this opportunity is a great chance to excel at what you love doing.

Key Responsibilities:
Provides technical pre-sales support/guidance for IaaS to our partners across assigned territories with primary focus to driving net new recurring revenue for Google GCP solutions
Identifies and evaluates industry trends, and jointly develops technical enablement plan with partners
Leads and/or contributes to the delivery of workshops, bootcamps, and trainings necessary to build the technical skills and expertise of partners
Leads the execution of deep technical engagements, such as Technical Briefings, Proof of Concepts, Architectural Design Sessions, with the goal of defining and brining new solutions, offers and/or practices to market
Network and collaborate with vendor’s & Ingram’s Engineering teams on specific skill requirements for partners and the sharing of best practices. Participates in external architect community events and shares learnings with internal team.
Champions an existing architecture approach, synthesizes data about partner business, applies broad technical, industry, and enterprise knowledge, anticipates technical blockers and adapts methodology to minimize risks.
Connects gaps and patterns across business and technology areas. Improve partners’ success in implementing solutions and/or practice development
Develops and expands existing impactful relationships; creates and sustains constructive tension and trust with partner and leads the adoption of Microsoft architecture technologies.
Maintains technical skills and knowledge of market trends, opportunities, and competitive insights
Provides accurate & detailed pipeline and forecasting reports
Creates and nurtures strategic relationships with both customers and vendors
Resolves any issues in conjunction with internal sales and support

Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Engineering or related field preferred
Fluent in English
Expert-level technical certification in Microsoft Azure or AWS desirable, Google GCP a plus
Domain expertise of cloud infrastructure solutions (i.e. Windows and Linux IaaS, BCDR, Security, Management, Compute, Storage, Networking, OSS, containers and Infra as a code technologies) required

Key Skills and Attributes:
Ability to build reciprocal relationships with different parts of the business, partners and customers.
Ability to develop deep technical and product knowledge
Strong competency in building value proposition and positioning strong proposals
Strong interpersonal skills with proven ability to communicate across all levels
Be creative with strong problem-solving skills and the ability to adapt and succeed in a fast-paced
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, multi-function, high-pressure environment

Ingram Micro Inc. is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or any other protected category under applicable law."
Business Analyst,"Job Reference #

257553BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

You will be part of the Regional Operating Team providing business management support to Operating Heads within APAC in various areas including:


financials: Forecast, planning, tracking, governing the functional headcounts and financials (e.g., cost)
Chief of Staff: Strategy, communication, management governance, and people related topics (staff engagement, upskilling and talent development).
Business Process Outsourcing: Vendor, contract and invoice management.
ad hoc support: Work with senior management on business management related topics

We are looking for a Business Analyst to assist the more senior members of the team in their day-to-day tasks mainly focusing on Business Management and Chief of Staff. Tasks may include but are not limited to:


assist in the implementation of our strategy and in driving transformation throughout our function
assisting in the preparation of senior management presentations, forums, workshops, townhalls and Head office updates
help oversee people related topics such as engagement, upskilling and talent development
help drive the implementation of our communication plan (e.g.: intranet updates, quarterly newsletters)
provide analysis support related to Business Management subjects on headcount, financials, vendor management
lead other assignments under senior team member guidance

Your team

You'll be working in the Global Wealth Management COO Regional Operating team based in Singapore. Our team also has footprints in Hong Kong, Taiwan, China and Japan. You will engage closely with our Regional team and occasionally with colleagues in Switzerland.

Your expertise


ideally 2 years of experience in a similar role, project management or consulting
strong written and verbal communication skills. We are looking for someone who is outgoing and comfortable with exposure to senior team members and senior management
self-starter: Ability to work autonomously with limited guidance and genuine curiosity in finding the answer
excellent organizational skills: Project Management experience required as this role will require a lot of multi-tasking, prioritization and time management to address short deadlines
strategic and critical thinking: capacity to quickly grasp the big picture to tackle a task and support the team in the most efficient way
problem solver: you enjoy solving problems and proactively coming up with solutions
stakeholder management: this role will expose you to many different teams in the organization. Relationship building will be key to success in this role
demonstrated experience at similar Business Management/Chief of Staff support type of roles
experience / exposure in Communications / social media a plus

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
"Regional Actuary, Structured Solutions","This is an additional position in Munich Re's Life and Health Regional Structured Solutions team and provides an exciting and challenging role with a focus on Structured Solutions transactions. Being within the regional unit will also expose you to major insurance markets in the Asia Pacific, Middle East & Africa regions.

Your job

Strategic
Each Asian market is analysed together with the local office to determine possible Structured Solutions opportunities, and clients are segmented with a focus on the best potentials.
You will support as needed
Structuring
Each transaction is structured based on client needs, taking into account local and parent accounting requirements, local regulatory environment, client capital, tax, volatility issues, and MR structural advantages
You will help the team establish the best structure for meeting client's needs
Pricing
The products covered range from traditional life to unit linked products and their features need to be fully understood
The underlying assumptions are key, as well as internal Munich Re requirements
You will price/ review the local office pricing of the transactions to ensure that all risks are appropriately considered and our targets are being met
You will liaise with the local office (and client as appropriate)
Deal Approval
Each Structured Solutions transaction needs to be thoroughly reviewed and vetted by the regional office, and depending on the size, by head office.
You will work with internal stakeholders as required so that their needs are met and we have a timely and successful internal approval
Infrastructure
It's key that our underlying guidelines, standards, templates and frameworks are kept up to date and communicated with local teams.
You will assist in making sure these are current and understood by the appropriate parties

Your profile

Fellow, or working towards fellowship of a recognised actuarial body or equivalent (FSA, FIA, FFA or FIAA)
More than 3 years of actuarial experience in an direct, reinsurance or consulting environment.
Excellent verbal & written communication skills in English. Secondary language an advantage.
A highly-motivated team player
Knowledge of Solvency II, IFRS, US GAAP & RBC developments is an advantage
Strong experience and technical grounding with spreadsheets (i.e. can perform complex functions)


At Munich Re, we embrace, and value, the interaction of diverse backgrounds, experiences, perspectives and thought. This interaction is our foundation. Of our open culture and spirit of partnership. Of how our teams are built and cultivated. Of how we are supported and developed. And at the centre of this interaction is each of us."
Senior Machine Learning Engineer,"About the company
We introduce and implement machine vision to enhance the performance and reliability of the existing robotics and automation solutions. Working with industry experts and scientists to realize and implement end-to-end solutions.

About the job
You will lead and collaborate with local research institutes to drive and derive computer vision solutions to improve overall system performance

Working with the raw image data, research, develop, evaluate, and optimize various computer vision and deep learning models for different automation applications
Exploring and visualizing data acquired to identify features, and differences in data distribution that could improve performance when deploying the model in the real world
Deploy machine vision models on edge devices after optimization to meet customer requirements and maintain them to later improve to address additional customer requirements in the future
About the manager/team
You will collaborate with research team and reporting into the VP of Engineering.

Skills and experience required
You will need min bachelor's degree in computer science or related fields with relevant technical knowledge and experience in computer vision will be considered

Minimally 2 years of experience in computer vision and/or deep learning for object detection and tracking along with semantic or instance segmentation either in the academic or industrial domain.
In-depth understanding and breadth of computer vision and deep learning algorithms.
Strong foundation in data structures and algorithms in Python or C++
Proficiency with a deep learning framework and tools such as TensorFlow or Keras.
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model with the required latency including exposure to IoT technology like edge computing principles and architecture preferably for Raspberry Pi.
Experience in different model optimization techniques apart from hyperparameter tuning to reduce memory usage without hindering the performance of deploying on-edge devices.
Must be able to produce solutions independently in an organized manner and be able to work in a team
To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may contact Steve at steve.ling(@)randstad.com.sg
(EA: 94C3609/ R1332781)
Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
Software Test QA Analyst (Automation / Selenium),"Exposure to latest technology (Selenium and UIPath)
Concrete project timeline
About The Company

Our Client is a market leader within their industry. They have a well-established presence of more than 20 years with a global footprint of more than 20 countries. With rapid expansion plan, they are now looking for an Software Tester (Automation) & RPA Consultant to be a part of their team.

Responsibilities

Your responsibility includes:
Creating the test plan/cases and strategy for projects. This includes creating quality assurance processes and contributing to the software design, managing systems integration and compatibility
Executing and evaluating manual or automated test cases to locate bugs and regressions and ensure product quality is of a high standard
Ensuring quality and the design of software testing and improvements to maintain the business reliability. This includes ensuring the validity of all testing artefacts required during the Build and Test Phases of the SDLC project delivery methodology
RPA Consultant
Analysing and designing process workflows. This includes building, testing and implementing RPA solutions.
Analyse business processes to suggest process improvements and develop RPA solutions around them.
Working with business stakeholders teams to integrate RPA solutions.
Skills And Experience Required

As a successful applicant, you will have at least 3 year of experience in Software Test/ Software Quality Assurance (automation). Exposure to selenium will be of added advantage.

Whats on offer

This is an excellent opportunity to join a MNC with exposure to high value projects.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you can reach me at https://www.linkedin.com/in/hoonteck-nologyrecruitment or 6510 3633. (EA: 94C3609/ R1219669)

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
Global Finance Talent Program: Finance Analyst (Treasury),"Description And Requirements

We are currently seeking motivated, talented, and ambitious Finance & Accounting graduates to join Lenovo through our Global Finance Talent Program (GFTP) in various office locations around the world.

What is Lenovo GFTP?

GFTP is an accelerated career development program that recruits top university graduates who have both a passion for technology and a strong aptitude for finance. Consisting of three 12-month rotations in key Finance positions at Lenovo, GFTP offers new graduates the opportunity to develop their professional finance skills and business acumen while gaining valuable work experience. During your time at Lenovo, you will learn how to operate in a multicultural Fortune 500 company and make important contributions to Lenovo’s global business.

Learning Opportunities and Responsibilities:

This is a full-time, permanent position with a dedicated, three-year development program that includes:

A comprehensive onboarding and training plan focused on strengthening core financial and accounting skills in the fast-paced, competitive world of technology
Three 12-month rotations as a Financial Analyst in Treasury Function to establish a strong foundation of corporate accounting and finance knowledge
The key areas in Treasury are Cash Management, FX, Trade Finance, Debt capital market, AR and Supplier Financing, and Insurance.
Work with a variety of businesses, including PCs, mobile phones, servers, and cloud products, to provide you with a deep understanding of a variety of customers in both commercial and consumer segments
Interactive job shadowing and assignment of peer and career mentors
Engagement with key members of the Finance executive leadership team
Ongoing exposure and training on Lenovo’s business strategy, Lenovo culture, key business initiatives, and innovative products and services
Understanding of basic financial and accounting concepts and the ability to execute on profitability analysis, budget and forecast analysis, expense management, cost management, and basic tax, treasury, and accounting processes
Complete a group project using insight gained from your first job rotation and apply to your second rotation to make an impactful change to Lenovo
Upon completion of GFTP, you will be prepared to assume key positions within the Finance organization globally

Upon completion of GFTP, you will be prepared to assume key positions within the Finance organization globally.

Required Skills / Our Expectations

Bachelor’s/ Master’s Degree in finance, accounting, or related
Corporate internship experience in the areas of analytics, statistics, accounting or finance
Flexibility, willingness to learn, to work and provide support to stakeholders based in different countries and time zones, which may require some work outside of standard business hours

Preferred Skills / Abilities

Capabilities in managing systems, data mining, PowerPoint presentations, etc.
Strong organizational skills with the ability to prioritize and manage a demanding workload involving multiple tasks, responsibilities and deadlines
Proactive team player with flexibility and attention to detail; ability to work independently and effectively with little oversight or management
Strong desire to work in a fast-paced, dynamic environment with high-energy and mission-driven colleagues
Critical and strategic thinker with the ability to solve complex problems and present innovative solutions
Excellent written and verbal communication and presentation skills; strong executive presence
Ability to build relationships and negotiate
Excellent data analysis, reporting and project management skills
Ability to read between the lines and intuitively anticipate the needs and priorities of the organization

Multiple Countries (Posting Locations)

Singapore"
"Search Ads - Platform Specialist, Vietnam","Summary

The people here at Apple don’t just create products — they create the kind of wonder that’s revolutionized entire industries. It’s the diversity of those people and their ideas that inspires the innovation that runs through everything we do, from amazing technology to industry-leading environmental efforts. Join Apple, and help us leave the world better than we found it.


We are seeking a Platform Specialist with a real passion for customer excellence to join our Search Ads team to help businesses with promotion and discovery across Apple services. Platform Specialists at Apple are key contributors, responsible for building, maintaining and growing client relationships both in a pre- and post-sale capacity.


We are looking for a collaborative, analytical and dedicated individual who is ready to take on new and exciting challenges. You have a consistent track record as an account manager in building and maintaining great relationships with advertisers in both the mobile and app developer space. You will make a big impact from the beginning by helping Vietnamese clients meet and exceed their goals by utilizing everything Apple Search Ads has to offer.


Key Qualifications

Relevant years working experience in a customer service capacity, successfully supporting sales teams and clients.

Extensive background understanding Performance Advertisers’ needs and expectations (preferably in the search marketing ecosystem).

Deep knowledge of the mobile advertising landscape, specifically games, productivities & utilities, ecommerce, fintech, and/or education (both local and cross-border advertising). Experience interacting with mid to senior management.

Familiar working with performance and mobile app agencies, mobile measurement partners (MMPs) and comfortable with this interaction.

Strong in collaboration, prioritization and planning skills. Excel/Numbers and data pivoting savvy is essential.

Experience working with data and relating it in a thoughtful and cohesive manner in order help customers grow their business.

Organized and efficient, with the ability to perform at peak under tight deadlines.

Ability to focus on the details.

Excellent verbal and written communication skills.


Description

Collaborate across the organization to provide an excellent client experience in order to influence and drive the business forward.


Build a positive relationship with the client, which may include developers, marketers and advertising agencies.


Collaborate with advertisers on the best and most efficient ways to optimize and maximize their campaign goals.


Use search marketing experience to drive efficiencies and steer advertiser strategy.


Build, shape and deliver campaign metrics to help grow the clients' business.


Be an expert of the tools that are built to support the business.


Work closely with sales, marketing, research, product, analytical and operational teams to give guidance on what’s moving the industry.


Education & Experience

Bachelors degree in a related field or equivalent.


Additional Requirements

Visit https://searchads.apple.com for more info on Apple Search Ads.


Apple is an Equal Opportunity Employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We also take affirmative action to offer employment and advancement opportunities to all applicants, including minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities. Apple will not discriminate or retaliate against applicants who inquire about, disclose, or discuss their compensation or that of other applicants.


We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation


Role Number: 200347255"
Project Manager / Senior Project Manager,"As a Project Manager at Linesight , you will work with highly experienced, culturally diverse, and passionate teams nurturing a strong social dynamic and a shared sense of achievement. You will gain vast industry experience that will open doors for you, extend your skillset and expand your perspective. We will empower, support, and enable you to take real responsibility in your role so that you can take charge of your career progression with us. For us lasting trusted relationships are everything, both with our teams and our clients.

In This Role You Will:
Manage large scale construction projects for clients, ensuring they are delivered on time, within budget, with high quality
Monitor the day-to-day activities in the field, managing the flow of information, and reporting and tracking issues arising from progress, quality and safety
Assist in completing the handover plan, ensuring documentation is completed and expectations are met on time and with quality
Be a visible leader onsite, assessing progress and ensuring safe work practices
Coordinate with the client team, consultant team and the contractor on all snagging activities, including the schedule and partner engagement
Identify issues proactively and work with the team to resolve effectively
Implement and monitor key project processes, partnering with the client to make improvements and revisions
Implement project procedures and use reasonable endeavors to ensure that these procedures are always observed
Lead and attend key meetings to monitor progress, actively collaborate on solving problems and communicate impacts to partners
Review proposed variations and delays in the works

We Would Love To Hear From You If You:
Have construction project management experience
Have a degree or comparable experience in a project management or construction discipline
Have a project management professional certification, or are seeking one. We can help
Are detail oriented and quality focused
Are an excellent communicator verbally and in writing
Excel in a collaborative and friendly team environment
Thrive on building strong relationships with your team and clients through a shared purpose and sense of openness and fun

About Us
Linesight is a highly successful global project and cost management consultancy that keeps clients coming back. And for that we have our people to thank. You see we’re not like the others. We’re different. Unique. It’s our fresh thinking and focus on what matters that has led to our evolving. We are on a journey working in some of the most exciting innovative sectors with some of the world’s most prestigious companies delivering major projects that deliver a more sustainable built environment. We have an open culture and a flat structure where you can expect to be treated with genuine care, respect, and empathy. With Linesight, you can truly discover the power of team!

Diversity, inclusion and accessibility
Linesight is committed to transparent, equal opportunity employment practices. We are building a diverse and inclusive organisation, accessible to all, based on having a safe culture which enables all our people to be their true selves. We are a people business, and we understand that the more inclusive we are, the happier our people and better our work will be. We will ensure that individuals with disability are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the application or recruitment process and are accommodated in the workplace. If you require assistance or accommodation of any kind, please mention this in your application, we would love to hear from you!"
System / SW ASPICE Process Engineer – Electrified Propulsion Systems,"Responsibilities

Primary Function

Uses systems/software experience and lessons learned to improve the team proficiency in applying the BorgWarner engineering development process to projects.

Be a change agent to support the organizational transformation of the electrified drive systems and software teams to achieve ASPICE compliance goals.

Responsibilities

Proactively analyzes systems/software process deployments, identifies opportunities for improvement and develops solutions
Uses systems/software best practices and lessons learned to drive engineering project teams to achieve their quality goals and leads project teams in the usage of the Business Unit’s evolving Processes, Methods and Tools (PMT)
Develops training curriculum and transfers knowledge of the BorgWarner process, roles, and responsibilities to the engineering teams.
Implements the quality assurance plan as defined by the Quality Assurance group on each project assigned.
Works closely with the engineering teams to monitor performance of the systems and software processes
Performs pre-assessments of work products and adherence to process before official auditor.
Performs pre-assessment of work product review effectiveness. Makes recommendations on improvements.
Creates and maintains a dashboard and metrics for reporting to the project and matrix organization.
Raises and tracks) pre-assessment findings to closure.
Performs random checks of document consistencies and accuracy.
Identifies and escalates issues for non-compliances.
Make recommendations for process improvement back to the PMT organization.

Skills

Mandatory

Demonstrated Systems Engineering, Software Engineering, or Software Quality Assurance competency
Good written and oral communication skills and good interpersonal skills; effective working as a team member
Experience in using engineering V cycle development processess
1~5 years Systems Engineering/Software Engineering/Softwar e Quality Assurance working experiences

Desirable

Working knowledge of ASPICE, ISO26262 (Functional Safety), and ISO21434 (Cybersecurity)
Knowledge of Agile practices
Proven organizational and facilitation experience
Experience delivering a system/software product

Educational Requirements

Educational Requirements (R = Required /P = Preferred)
Degree Bachelor’s degree (R), MS (P)
Major Computer Engineering (P), Computer Science (P), Electrical Engineering (P), Systems Engineering (P)
Proficiency in both oral and written English

Attributes

Self-motivated with a strong and flexible attitude towards work
Ability to communicate at all levels
Excellent attention to detail
Ability to work under pressure and to deadlines when required
The ability to prioritize and organize own workload
Treat colleagues with respect (Equality and Diversity)

Internal Use Only Salary

Global Terms of Use and Privacy Statement

Carefully read the BorgWarner Privacy Policy before using this website. Your ability to access and use this website and apply for a job at BorgWarner are conditioned on your acceptance and compliance with these terms.

Please access the linked document by clicking here, select the geographical area where you are applying for employment, and review. Before submitting your application you will be asked to confirm your agreement with the terms."
"Senior Software Engineer, Mobile (Android)","We are living in dynamic times. Technology is reshaping how we live, and we want to use it to redefine how financial services are offered. Grab is the leading technology company in Southeast Asia offering everyday services to the masses. Singtel is Asia’s leading communications group connecting millions of consumers and enterprises to essential digital services. This is why we are coming together to unlock big dreams, and financial inclusion for people in our region is just one of them. We want to build a digital bank with the right foundation - using data, technology and trust to solve problems and serve customers. If you have what it takes to help build this new Digibank with us.

Get to know the team:

We are seeking talented & passionate Mobile Engineers (Junior and Senior) to join our team.

When people talk about Digibank, they generally refer to the apps that we develop, optimize and maintain. With all eyes on us, you’ll be treated as a hero when you deliver according to our high expectations. Our mobile engineering team is a large international group of highly talented developers who strive for quality and innovation. You’ll be working in an agile and test-driven development environment. Apart from developing new features, platforms and maintaining existing products, you also trial and evaluate new mobile technologies.

We are continuously looking to innovate payment platforms, which requires the help of top-notch engineers. Operating on this level is hard but deeply rewarding.

Get to know the role:
Work closely with the Product, UX/UI and Backend teams to design, build and extend consumer and/or partner facing new products, platforms and features.
Build reusable Android software components.
Collaborate with QA on continuous integration and delivery (CI/CD) as well as other automated and manual testing to make sure our app releases are always worthy of five star ratings.
Monitor the performance of the live apps and continuously improve them on both code and experience level.
Raise the bar by reviewing each other's code, share knowledge, tips and tricks, and generally help out - within and across teams. This may include pair programming.
Evaluate new mobile methodologies and technologies.

The Must-Haves:
A degree in computer science, software engineering, information technology or related fields.
Up-to-date on the modern Android programming paradigm, including the use of RxJava and/or Kotlin.
Strong UX/UI design exposure and experience in making apps work intuitively and with pixel perfect interfaces.
Familiar with MVVM, Clean Architecture.
Strong CS fundamentals (with competencies in algorithms and data structures).
You are highly accountable and take ownership. You also have a collaborative attitude, because ‘Your Problem Is My Problem’ (YPIMP).
(For Senior Engineers) At least 5 years of mobile engineering experience with a track record of building and maintaining complex applications.
(For Senior Engineers) Working knowledge of several architectural approaches, caching, data storage and security."
"Senior Principal Engineer, ES, Automation & Electrical","Job description:



Responsibilities



Lead a team of electrical engineers to apply knowledge and experience to manage engineering and design of a vessel. Able to perform implementation of power system and electric propulsion design for Naval and Commercial vessel, and product development. Also, to evaluate design of subsystem that will involve participating in various design review meetings with pre-requisite work, including check and evaluation of specifications and its engineering drawing to ensure systems are in accordance with contract specifications and marine classification rules.



Requirements



At least 8 years’ experience in design and engineering projects
Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical engineering related or Master of Engineering.
Diploma holders with strong engineering experience may also be considered
Knowledge in MS office/ 2D and 3D CAD software is a must
Knowledge and ability to carry out 3D model based design information
Working knowledge of competing and alternative technologies will be advantageous
Knowledge and experience of marine electrical and automation system design
Familiar with standards applicable to engineering disciplines and awareness of classification, industry, statutory and regulatory requirements.
Excellent inter-personal skills dealing with internal and external customers
Good command of both written and spoken English
Independent, self-motivated and able to work with minimum guidance.
Determined, results orientated and able to work within deadlines."
HR Data Intern,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities:

HR data entry in accordance with guidelines
Communicate with HR Service Delivery team to retrieve supporting documents to ensure maintenance of Google Sheet
Transfer of HR data within sheets/documents from Google Drive
Verify accuracy of HR reports/other given tasks before each submission

Requirements:

Strong willingness to learn
Data-driven & Meticulous
Flexible working arrangements (may be requested to come to office occasionally)
Experienced in excel (i.e. understand vlookup/pivot table functions)
3 months full-time commitment

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Quality Assurance Engineer (TikTok) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok/ByteDance jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the TikTok Engineering Team
We are building up an engineering team for core TikTok product in Singapore, to ensure TikTok continues a healthy growth, deliver the best product experience to all of our users, build the most attractive features to help users on enjoying their time on TikTok, earn trust on privacy protection, and more.

Responsibilities
- Manage the quality assurance of TikTok products;
- Actively involve in the product development process and coordinate with various roles to continuously deliver high-quality products;
- Improve product quality and efficiency through technical means such as tool platform development, automated testing and performance testing;
- Prospective technology research and application, applying appropriate technology to improve business quality.

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline
- Have a passion for computer science and Internet technology, strong interest in software quality assurance
- Solid data structure and algorithm foundation
- Good computer foundation, highly proficient in at least one of the programming languages: Python, Java, Go, PHP
- Good logical thinking and team communication skills
- Prior internship in quality assurance work is a plus

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Data Center Customer Operations Engineer III,"Data Center Customer Operations Engineer III

Who are we?

Equinix is the world’s digital infrastructure company, operating 200+ data centers across the globe and providing interconnections to all the key clouds and networks. Businesses need one place to simplify and bring together fragmented, complex infrastructure that spans private and public cloud environments. Our global platform allows customers to place infrastructure wherever they need it and connect it to everything they need to succeed.

We are a fast-growing global company with 70+ consecutive quarters of growth. Through our innovative portfolio of high-performance products and services, we have created the largest, most active global ecosystem of nearly 10,000 companies, including 1,800+ networks and 2,900+ cloud and IT service providers in over 26 countries spanning five continents.

Joining our operations team means that you will be at the forefront of all we do, maintaining critical facilities infrastructure as part of a close-knit team delivering best in class service to our data center customers. We embrace diversity in thought and contribution and are committed to providing an equitable work environment. that is foundational to our core values as a company and is vital to our success.

Job Summary

Applies acquired job skills to work on tasks that are semi-routine in nature. Focus is on semi-routine tasks within standard operating procedures. Supports the overall team.

Responsibilities

Queue Management / Reporting

Reviews work order requests in the queue and responds to semi-routine work orders by adhering to commitment times.
Escalates and expedites orders to appropriate teams upon standard operating procedures; supervision needed on the escalation of non-standard procedure escalation requests.
Ensures adherence to commit times within standard operating procedures.
Maintains detailed written records of all work activity
Updates local asset databases and other systems.

Installations

Rack and stack semi-routine customer equipment tickets.
Supports intra-cage infrastructure installations by following the standard operating procedures of semi-routine customer installs, which may include:
fiber trays, ladder racks, customer equipment and cabinets;
semi-basic cage installs for mesh and overhead cable trays; and, performs tape changes and standard operating back-up changes.

Cross-Connect

Supports semi-routine datacenter standard operating cross-connect work order requests (installs, terminations, modifications, and testing).
Ensures the standard operating procedures are followed on cable management of: coax, fiber, twisted pair copper, and semi-routine intra-building cross connects.
Learns to install 'across' connect circuits (switched, multiplexed, etc.), under supervision.

Testing / Troubleshooting

Supports semi-routine standard operating testing and standard operating installations of customer assets.
Supports standard operating procedures of layer 1 cross-connect certification testing.
May learn non-standard operating testing, such as: layer 2 and layer 3 testing, under supervision.

Stakeholder Partnership

Supports the operations and security personnel team for breaks or other activities, when necessary.
Supports standard operating procedural tasks provides back-up assistance to team members when necessary.

Customer Management

Supports customer satisfaction with timely adherence to following semi-routine execution order requirements.
Delivers a high level of service and an excellent customer experience when interfacing with customers.
Provides support with time expectations on new deployments and existing alterations, by following standard operating procedure guidelines.
Supports customers on-site by through access control and escorting services.

Projects

Supports fulfillment of projects that follow standard operating procedures; if projects deviate from standard procedures, then works under supervision.
Supports vendors on projects.
Supports physical customer audits.

Training

Completes all assigned training in a timely manner.
May provide support to new hires.

Typical Degree & Years Of Experience

Typically requires a high school diploma and 1-2 years of equivalent work experience.

Visit our Career page here to understand about Equinix COVID-19 Vaccine Policy."
MSSQL Database Administrator,"Keyrus is an international consulting firm, specializing in the integration of data intelligence and Digital solutions. With over 3000 employees spread across 18 countries, Keyrus continues to deliver on such projects to a wide range of clients from various industries including but not limited to Banking/Finance, Healthcare/pharmaceuticals, FMCG, Oil & Gas, and more.

As part of Keyrus’ solution delivery, we are also in a position to recruit and place technical consultants to complement on existing client projects with their expertise. As such, we seek innovative and agile people to support ambitious and forthcoming technological challenges.

In a challenging and multicultural environment, we are looking for a MSSQL Database Administrator to join a mission at our client IT Technology Department.

Main Objectives:

Services & system deployment:
· Set up Databases infrastructure architecture in APAC ( SG, HK, JP, IN) :
a. Capacity planning, optimization & upgrade
b. Configuration & customisation
c. DR/Off country DR strategy planning

Maintenance & Support:
· Provide Incident troubleshooting and support for the Databases infrastructure, assist providing 2nd level support during night support. Working hours 9:00-6:00 calls; WE support
· DB’s performance monitoring and fine-tuning
· DB’s problem management and recovery
· DB’s provisioning and usage control
· Maintain and participate regional DR drills
· dashboard and charge-out report
Essential Technical Knowledge/Skills:

· Hands on experience with MSSQL as DBA
· Hands on experience with MSSQL Always on, Logshipping, MSSQL Cluster
· Development skill using powershell
· Knowledge of Sybase DBA is a plus
· Knowledge of Delphix is a plus
· Knowledge of using Foglight for monitoring is a plus
· Provide high quality ,balanced analysis and advice on a range of issues of considerable complexity within specified SLA
· Take principal responsibility for the identification of key methodological or process issues in the team
· Evaluates solutions critically on the basis of logical assumptions, factual information and chooses appropriate solution
· Good aptitude in comply with ITIL framework (Incident Management, Change Management,)
· Understanding of Business Continuity requirements
· Excellent time management skills
· Participate in identification and root cause analysis of repeating problems and escalation to the responsible party for recovery and future prevention


Qualifications and Experience:

§ Degree B.S preferably in an Information Technology discipline with certified in MSSQL Databases
§ At least 6 years’ experience in an IT Function of which 5 years’ experience has been as a DBA
§ At least 3 years’ experience in a multi-disciplined IT environment with strong background in service delivery ,Production Operational Support
§ Strong interpersonal Skills to interact with fellow team members ,fellow teams both regionally and local
§ Experience in an investment banking-focus business
Fluency in English."
IT Manager - (ICT),"Opportunity to take on a leadership role to lead a team
Attractive Salary Package
About The Company

Our client is one of the market leaders and pioneers in the Property and Industry with a well established presence of more than 30 years. They are now looking for an IT Manager to be a part of their team.

About The Job

As an IT Manager (ICT), your responsibilities involve:
Leading a team of IT executives, this includes end to end delegation, resources management and project management.
Providing continuous review of existing IT strategies and policies while identifying potential opportunities or gaps within technology to keep abreast with industry standards.
Participating in the design, development and implementation of ICT solutions across the organization, this includes vendor selection.
Ensuring optimal service level standards while taking overall responsibility for infrastructure and operational activities.
Preparing and managing of IT budget, this includes end to end management, reporting and expenditure allocation.
Skills And Experience Required

As a successful candidate, you should have at least 6 years of working experience in proven IT leadership role having managed a team of direct reports. You should have a strong hands on experience in ICT systems, this includes network, data centre and business applications.

Whats On Offer

This is an exciting opportunity to be at the forefront of an Industrial Market leader that bridges the latest IT/Technologies as part of their business strategy. You will get the opportunity to be empowered with IT decision making strategies while leading a team under you.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you can reach me at https://www.linkedin.com/in/RoystonLow. (EA: 94C3609 / R1871559)

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM’s regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
MERN Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Work cross-functionally across product, design and engineering to develop our internal prod
Contribute quality code across the full-stack in developing and rolling-out new features
Authoring functional and integration tests to ensure features meet product requirements
Tackle bugs and troubleshoot production issues for different platforms in tandem with operations
To Be A Qualified Candidate
3 to 5 years of web application engineering experience working on MERN stack
strong focus on Backend Technologies(Express, Node and RESTful API)
Note

All our clients work on a hybrid model.
Desired Skills and Experience
MongoDB, Developing web application, CSS, Coding the web application, Node.js, HTML, TypeScript, JavaScript, WebSockets, Scalable Web Applications, REST APIs, Web Applications, React.js"
Senior Backend Developer,"572276BR

Introduction

As an Application Developer, you will lead IBM into the future by translating system requirements into the design and development of customized systems in an environment. The success of IBM is in your hands as you transform vital business needs into code and drive innovation. Your work will power IBM and its clients globally, collaborating and integrating code into enterprise systems. You will have access to the latest education, tools and technology, and a limitless career path with the world’s technology leader. Come to IBM and make a global impact!

Your Role and Responsibilities

As a Backend Developer In IBM, You Will

Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design and build performant modern web applications and services
Build high quality web applications and services by writing clean and modular code.
Write unit and integration tests to ensure robustness and reliability of web applications and services
Measure and improve performance of microservices
Catalyse growth within the team through code reviews and pair programming to maintain high development standards
Investigate operational issues to find the root cause and propose improvements
Design, build, and maintain APIs, services, and systems across Stripe’s engineering teams
Debug production issues across services and multiple levels of the stack

About You

Enjoy and have experience building APIs
Expert level of experience in design and development of Web Applications, distributed systems and banking applications.
Should have experience in development skills using latest technologies including Spring Boot, Microservices, Elastic search
Exposure in Java Application Servers like Websphere, Web Logic, GlassFish, Jboss, Pramati and Apache Web Server.
Should have exposure in Oracle, DB2 databases and PL/SQL development.
Comprehensive knowledge of physical and logical data modelling, performance tuning.
Should possess excellent communication, presentation and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work collaboratively and productively with globally dispersed teams

Desired Background

Experienced in NodeJS, Java, Elasticsearch, Spring, and Spring Boot.
Familiar with Domain-driven design, microservices design pattern.
Design, develop, test, and maintain scalable REST APIs.
Develop unit testing using JUnit and Mockito.
Experience working with relational and non-relational databases, query optimization, and designing schema.
Shall have at least a diploma in Computer Science, Computing, Electrical Engineering, IT or equivalent with Java training or certification with at least one (2) year experience in system analysis, design, and programming.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

As a Backend Developer in IBM, You will have below

Requirement Gathering
Preparing Design Document
Application entity design and Data modelling
Program Specification and Code Review
Java, J2ee, Spring boot, NodeJS and Elastic Search program development, Unit testing
Tracking deployments and defects
SIT and UAT support.

About You

Expert level of experience in design and development of Web Applications, distributed systems and banking applications.
Should have experience in development skills using latest technologies including Spring Boot, Microservices, Elastic search
Exposure in Java Application Servers like Websphere, Web Logic, GlassFish, Jboss, Pramati and Apache Web Server.
Should have exposure in Oracle, DB2 databases and PL/SQL development.
Comprehensive knowledge of physical and logical data modelling, performance tuning.
Should possess excellent communication, presentation and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work collaboratively and productively with globally dispersed teams

Desired Background

Experienced in NodeJS, Java, Elasticsearch, Spring, and Spring Boot.
Familiar with Domain-driven design, microservices design pattern.
Design, develop, test, and maintain scalable REST APIs.
Develop unit testing using JUnit and Mockito.
Experience working with relational and non-relational databases, query optimization, and designing schema.
Shall have at least a diploma in Computer Science, Computing, Electrical Engineering, IT or equivalent with Java training or certification with at least one (2) year experience in system analysis, design, and programming.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

As Above

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology . With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

Are you craving to learn more? Prepared to solve some of the world's most unique challenges? And ready to shape the future for millions of people? If so, then it's time to join us, express your individuality, unleash your curiosity and discover new possibilities.

Every IBMer, and potential ones like yourself, has a voice, carves their own path, and uses their expertise to help co-create and add to our story. Together, we have the power to make meaningful change – to alter the fabric of our clients, of society and IBM itself, to create a truly positive impact and make the world work better for everyone.

It's time to define your career.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
"Associate Engineer, Mobile Voice","Singtel Networks, the most established telecommunications infrastructure provider in Singapore is transforming to enable the digital generation of tomorrow. We are introducing new capabilities in 5G, Cloud, Analytics, Digital Commerce, Software Engineering, Cyber Security to enhance our core competencies and deliver innovative and differentiated Mobile and Fixed services (Broadband, TV and Telephony) for our customers. We are committed to celebrating inclusion and diversity and is a strong believer to upskill and nurture all individuals. Come join us today as we build Singtel’s Networks of tomorrow, and Empower Every Generation to live, work and play in new ways!

Responsibilities
Be part of Singapore’s Market leading team in Roaming Coverage an widest destination by performing IREG testing for VoLTE roaming and support for new roaming partners and service launches.
Enrich your communication skills by coordinating with sponsored roaming, roaming hub, bilateral roaming partners and roaming carriers to ensure a high-quality roaming experience and address roaming and interworking issues all over the world.
Sharpen your analytical thinking by assisting initial level diagnosis of problems and incidents and helping in resolving them when appropriate.
Manages roaming complaints SLA compliancy and reporting which includes helping to follow up on incidents to ensure customer satisfaction or service issues resolved.
Collaborate with network teams and technology vendors to monitor and constantly improve roaming experience.
Manages roaming customer experience KPIs from active testing and passive monitoring platforms. Studies roaming quality trends to identify gaps and opportunities.
Maintain and distribute industry documentation (IR21). Upon receipt of roaming partners IR21, create and track work orders for data network changes.
Responsible for roaming steering in line with product team agreements.
The Ideal Candidate Should Possess
Good engineering or IT diploma, preferably in the area of communications engineering and networking.
Entry level candidates with good attitude and keen interest in Mobile technologies are welcome to apply. Appropriate training will be provided.
Able to work during non-office hours on an occasional basis and be on 24 x 7 hours’ standby alert for ad-hoc faults or service degradation
Passion to embrace telecommunications technologies, including 4G, 5G, LTE and VoLTE and keen interest in developing ways to improve customer experience.
Basic technical knowledge of computer networking and Internet standards TCP/IP and CISCO switch / router and SUN Solaris, RedHat, HPUX, SHELL programming will be an added advantage.
Good oral and written communication skills with good customer focus.
Ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment to improve customer service.
We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated."
"Associate, Professional Practice Development, Assurance","At EY, you’ll have the chance to build a career as unique as you are, with the global scale, support, inclusive culture and technology to become the best version of you. And we’re counting on your unique voice and perspective to help EY become even better, too. Join us and build an exceptional experience for yourself, and a better working world for all.

You’ll work in high-performing teams that helps drive audit quality within EY organisation and play your part in building a better working world.

The opportunity

We are looking for someone with excellent data analysis and Excel skills to drive change, and improve the monitoring initiatives and regulatory compliance process undertaken by Professional Practice team.

Familiarity with the operations of an audit firm or professional services firm or financial audit process would be an added advantage.

Our structured career framework means you’ll continue to develop, whatever level you’re at. Whenever you join, however long you stay, the exceptional EY experience lasts a lifetime.

Your Key Responsibilities

Provide data analysis support to drive changes and improve the monitoring initiatives under Professional Practice function, such as:
Collate and analyze audit statistics and quality indicators
Record relevant data and maintenance of data within the firms’ systems
Monitor a schedule to track significant project dates or work progress
Assist in information compilation and analysis for regulatory submission
Keep abreast of developments in regulatory/professional standards.
Assist in the implementation and operation of the Firm’s system of quality management.
Assist in updating audit guidance and enablers.
Administer updates to technical databases.

Skills And Attributes For Success

Passionate and have interest in data analysis and drive process changes.
Good data analysis, excellent Excel skills and proficiency and Powerpoint skills.
Good knowledge or strong interest to learn regulatory/professional requirements.
A team player with good interpersonal and communication skills.
Good command of written and spoken English.

What We Offer

Continuous learning: You’ll develop the mindset and skills to navigate whatever comes next.
Success as defined by you: We’ll provide the tools and flexibility, so you can make a meaningful impact, your way.
Transformative leadership: We’ll give you the insights, coaching and confidence to be the leader the world needs.
Diverse and inclusive culture: You’ll be embraced for who you are and empowered to use your voice to help others find theirs.

If you can demonstrate that you meet the criteria above, please contact us as soon as possible.

The exceptional EY experience. It’s yours to build.

Apply now."
"Regional Business Intelligence Intern - Strategic Planning & Analytics, Regional BI & Planning","Job Description

Conduct data collection, transformation and analysis using excel and data visualization software.
Automate data collection and aggregation processes to build reporting dashboards.
Collaborate with local market teams to build up data management processes.
Work with other regional teams in strategic projects to optimise marketing spend.

Requirements

Currently pursuing a Bachelor’s degree or higher in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Business Analytics, or related fields.
Comfortable with datasets and able to manage large amount of data meticulously
Experience with data visualisation software (PowerBI/Tableau)
Experience with data collection/storage (SQL and Excel)
Excellent in tackling a variety of unique and challenging business problems while collaborating with different stakeholders, both within the department and beyond.
Enjoys working in a dynamic environment
Passionate about ecommerce and digital financial services industries
Full-time interns preferred (3-6 months)
Part-time interns who can commit at least 3 working days a week are also welcome to apply"
Executive/Senior Engineer (Regional Network West),"SP Group is a leading utilities group in the Asia Pacific, empowering the future of energy with low-carbon, smart energy solutions for its customers. It owns and operates electricity and gas transmission and distribution businesses in Singapore and Australia, and sustainable energy solutions in Singapore and China. We believe in investing in our people, to help them achieve their career aspirations. With a strong culture based on commitment, integrity, passion and teamwork, we provide a conducive environment for our people to succeed.

We are looking out for self-motivated, dynamic and talented individuals to join our growing team. If you are keen to uphold world-class grid reliability and drive a sustainable future for all, join us and make your mark in the energy industry today!

What You'll Do:
Lead and manage a team of Technical Officers and Technicians in carrying out predictive and preventive maintenance on transmission electrical equipment
Steer the planning and preparation of cost estimates and coordination of cable diversion, equipment installation and maintenance works
Implement and manage various service contracts
Liaise with the relevant parties to execute work assignments
Site management
Front and follow up on stakeholders’ feedback
Lead and participate in study teams, task forces or committees
Attend to customers’ complaints and feedback
Perform site management and supervise contractors
Perform standby duty during and after-office hours
Any other duties and responsibilities as and when assigned

What You'll Need:
Degree in Electrical Engineering recognised by Professional Engineers Board Singapore
Good oral and written communication skills
A team player with a positive working attitude and the ability to handle tight deadlines

Thank you for your interest in SP Group. You will be contacted if you are shortlisted for an interview."
System Engineer,"Graviton is a privately funded quantitative trading firm striving for excellence in financial markets' research. We are seeking a System Engineer for our team in Gurgaon. Graviton trades across a multitude of asset classes and trading venues using a gamut of concepts and techniques ranging from time series analysis, filtering, classification, stochastic models, pattern recognition to statistical inference analysing terabytes of data to come up with ideas to identify pricing anomalies in financial markets.

Responsibilities
Installation of Linux Operating System on Servers/System.
RAID configuration/Driver package/ Application Installation on Server
Installation of Server in Rack/Troubleshooting of Server/system
Installation of Printer/LAN cabling/ WiFi issues
Managing Data Center facility by interacting with different vendors
Participate in the installation, monitoring, maintenance, support
Liaising with third parties to maintain communication lines and procure hardware Equipment.
Monitor and report on technical progress and track project deliverable
Responsible for equipment orders, returns, shipments, and general inventory management
Coordinate with local and remote teams to troubleshoot technical issues and manage connectivity

Qualifications

The ideal candidate will have:
Knowledge of data center installation and cabling standards
Knowledge of data center ecosystem (cooling, electrical, networking, and structured cabling)
2 plus years of working experience in a Data Center environment (racking & stacking gear, cable management)
Knowledge of Unix or Linux(OS installation, OS troubleshooting, application installations,installation of hardware driver packages, disk partitions, user/file permissions, RAID configurations, IP addressing, LAN connectivity)
Open to provide after-hours support as needed
Ability to work independently, with little direct management
Good to have an understanding of Networking and Systems concepts (knowledge of network topology, switching, concepts of open system, inter connection model, Internet/Intranet concepts, monitoring tools, cabling concepts, wired/wireless topology, console Access)

Benefits:

Our open and casual work culture gives you the space to innovate and deliver. Our cubicle free offices , disdain for bureaucracy and insistence to hire the very best creates a melting pot for great ideas and technology innovations. Everyone on the team is approachable, there is nothing better than working with friends!

Our perks have you covered.
Competitive compensation
6 Weeks of paid leaves
Monthly after work parties
Catered breakfast and lunch
Fully stocked kitchen
International team outing"
Associate Sales Recruitment Consultant,"Looking for a career that makes a positive impact on our world while making you money?

Here at Spencer Ogden, sustainability is at the heart of everything we do, we have removed more than 200KG of waste from our oceans in just a month!

How?

Spencer Ogden has partnered up with Seven Clean Seas to remove 1KG of waste from our oceans for each placement made!

What a meaningful cause! Making money while doing good! 🙂 Keep reading to find out more!

Corporate Values
We’ve been setting the PACE since 2010 and our values have guided us to deliver excellence to all of the candidates and clients we work with on an international scale.

People - People not numbers. We value our clients, candidates, and colleagues by nurturing these relationships.
Accountability - Own it. We do what we say we will do.
Collaboration - Embrace teamwork. We support others to achieve our common business goals.
Excellence - Never settle for ordinary. We deliver superior results and exceed expectations.


What does the role entail?
Networking, and developing new business relationships.
Handle the entire end to end recruitment life cycle
Assisting high calibre candidates find amazing new opportunities.
Achieving set targets and working to deadlines.

Why choose Spencer Ogden?
Competitive basic salary and industry leading uncapped commission
World-class, award-winning training and development program
Global Relocation Opportunities
2 days working from home flexibility
‘Quarterly lunch club’ – Incentive lunches at high-end restaurants
Birthday off as extra paid annual leave
Friday 3.00pm finish
End of month celebratory drinks
Paid Incentive Trips (previous trips included Fiji, Bali, Tokyo, Seoul, Capetown!)


Follow us on Instagram (@spencerogden_apac), Twitter, Facebook and LinkedIn to stay up to date with #LifeatSO

Check out our Youtube channel with videos of our incentive trips and more about #lifeatSO! - https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCScD0GJW03_IL_kHnZjjYEQ/videos

https://www.gradtouch.com/company/spencer-ogden

Excited about this opportunity? Send me an email - michelle.michael@spencer-ogden.com

Thank you for your interest in Spencer Ogden, only shortlisted candidates will be contacted.

Spencer-Ogden Pte Ltd | License Number: 13C6321"
"Software Engineer, Associate - Trade Surveillance","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You'll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment-one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.

This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:

 Bachelor's degree in computer science. 
 2 or more years of experience with full stack Java application development and distribution, including frameworks like Spring, JPA, Java 11 features, REST services 
 Experience with SQL based databases like MySql/Oracle 
 Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines 
 Exposure to Cloud based application development platform such as Cloud Foundry/AWS or container based such as Kubernetes 
 Working proficiency in developmental toolsets 
 Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices 
 Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals 


 Understanding and knowledge of Data Engineering/Analytics and Machine Learning 
 Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito, Jest. 

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Real Estate Development Project Lead,"Want to build a stronger, more sustainable future and cultivate your career? Join Cargill's global team of 155,000 employees who are committed to safe, responsible and sustainable ways to nourish the world. This position is in Cargill’s food ingredients and bio-industrial business, where we anticipate trends around taste, nutrition and safety to innovate and provide solutions to manufacturers, retailers and foodservice companies.

Job Purpose and Impact

The Real Estate Development Project Lead, as a strategic partner to the Business, will independently oversee and handle the real estate portfolio and transaction process. In this role, you will provide strategic vision and review of the portfolio, including identifying and evaluating opportunities, applying critical domain expertise to support business goals, optimizing real estate portfolio, decreasing risks and enabling better outcomes across all asset types.

Key Accountabilities
Provide expert thought leadership to identify and resolve obstacles to completing real estate portfolio and transaction on time and to budget.
Partner with business leadership, internal and external stakeholders to develop and deploy real estate strategy.
Adhere to internal and external quality standards.
Monitor and report on the status of projects including real estate transaction management, site selection, negotiation and contractual documentation.
Independently organize project teams, assign individual responsibilities, develop project schedules and resolve resource requirements.
Provide expert thought leadership in your field and work with limited direction, using additional research and interpretation to identify issues or problems. You may provide direction to supporting team members and be a strategic contributor.
Other duties as assigned
Qualifications

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s degree in real estate, facilities management, finance or economics
Minimum six years corporate real estate experience
Other minimum qualifications may apply
Preferred Qualifications
Networking skills to enhance relationship with business leaders and stakeholders, and collaboration across all levels of the organization
Customer-driven mindset and commercial acumen in managing financial data and capturing value
Process and project management skills, keen attention to details. Drives projects and tasks to successful completion and closure
Strong data management discipline, analytical, problem-solving, presentation, influencing and storytelling skills
Fluent in English. Fluency in Mandarin will be advantageous
International and domestic travel up to 20-30%"
Business Development Manager,"Job Description

Like the freedom to create the right solutions for your customers?

So do we.

Business Development Manager

If you want to contribute to a global success story, you’ll fit right in at CSC. As the world’s leading provider of business, legal, tax, and digital brand services, we partner with more than 90% of the Fortune 500 companies and employ 7,000+ people around the globe!

As a Business Development Manager, you will drive revenue by sourcing new business for our Digital Brand Services division. This sales person will focus on hunting and acquiring new clients by selling our suite of Digital Brand Services, including Domain Management, Online Brand Protection Monitoring Solutions and Digital Security Services. This role would suit a highly driven individual who is internet savvy and seeking a career working with cutting edge technology and global internet branding.

We don’t believe in micromanaging people at CSC. Instead, we’ve created an environment where ambitious sales professionals like you have the freedom to work how, when, and where they are at their best. Sound like the kind of autonomy you’re looking for? Then this opportunity, to hunt and close new sales opportunities with international companies, could be the perfect role for you.

What You'll Do For Us

Develop a deep understanding of CSC products and services and articulate the value propositions, features and benefits of these services
Carry out end to end sales activities (develop proposals, present offers, negotiate, and close opportunities)
Make outbound calls and build relationships with new prospects
Represent the company at networking events
Achieve sales targets through strategic selling and commitment to sales plans
Maintain and build strong internal relationships within the company

What technical skills, experience, and qualifications do you need?

Desire to work autonomously and take accountability for own performance;
Positive, resilient attitude, highly motivated, competitive and self-starter
Ability to identify prospect needs and quickly recognize buy signs
Outstanding interpersonal and verbal skills
Strong closing skills
Experience speaking with executive level decision makers
Proficiency in MS Office applications

What We'll Do For You

Provide outstanding opportunities for monetary rewards for your outstanding performance, including a base salary and uncapped commission
Help you take your career to the next level by offering you first-hand experiences with a growing global organization
Give you the freedom to find your own solutions to customer problems without always needing to get sign-off from a supervisor
Give you the experience of working as a trusted partner of top global brands of 90% of the Fortune 500
Provide excellent benefits for you and your family

#CSCDBS

About Us

We are the premier global business, legal, and financial services company providing knowledge-based solutions to clients worldwide. Based in Wilmington, Delaware, USA, we have locations and capabilities in more than 140 jurisdictions in the Americas, Europe, Asia Pacific, and the Middle East, with more than 7,500 employees. We are the business behind business.®

Working with us means entering a dynamic, international, and growth-oriented company. Diverse teams give us a competitive advantage and drive innovation. We’re committed to attracting, developing, and retaining talented people who create an environment where everyone is valued and respected. CSC is an equal opportunity employer.

CSC is a great place to work with smart and dedicated people. We’ve been voted a Top Workplace every year since 2006.
We offer challenging work and career opportunities. Many positions are filled with internal moves and employee referrals.
CSC offers excellent benefits. Employees are eligible for an annual success sharing bonus or commission plans based on role and individual performance.

Careers | CSC (cscglobal.com) Visit our careers site to learn more about CSC’s diversity and belonging program, as well as our commitment to our clients, communities, and each other.

Disclaimer: The information above describes the general nature and level of work performed by employees in this role. It is not intended to be a description of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications.

Organization

At CSC®, we’re always looking ahead, finding ways to improve and anticipate the future needs of our customers. Curiosity fuels our innovation and productivity drives our results. This proactive mindset has helped us adapt and create solutions that have enabled businesses to run smoother and smarter for more than 120 years.

CSC is committed to attracting, developing, and retaining talented people whose personal values align with ours. We empower our employees to bring the right solutions to market to meet customer demand. That is why we are the premier provider of global solutions for more than 180,000 businesses.

CSC is a great place to work with smart and dedicated people. We have been voted a Top Workplace every year since 2006 and are a 2022 National Top Workplace.
We offer challenging work and career opportunities. Most positions are filled with internal moves and employee referrals.
Employees are eligible for an annual success sharing bonus or commission plans based on role and individual performance.
CSC offers excellent benefits, including medical, dental, life insurance, and flexible spending and health savings accounts. We also offer you a 401(k) with employer match and profit-sharing, paid time off, tuition reimbursement, and more.
Our global standard for our work environments supports current and future technology initiatives through open design, sit-stand workstations, and digital interface points with wireless access throughout the campus. It’s an exciting time for us in terms of growth and expansion."
Research Fellow (DYNAMO),"Job Description
The Coffman lab is interested in understanding the pathogenesis of diabetic kidney disease using multi-omics approaches and animal models recapitulating key features of the human disorder. Our laboratory works closely with DYNAMO (Diabetes StudY in Nephropathy And Microvascular cOmplications), a Singapore-based international consortium of basic and clinical scientists focused on identifying the root causes of diabetic nephropathy to provide a basis for new approaches to prevention, risk stratification, and treatment. Seeking candidates with experience in molecular and cell biology techniques, mouse models, and statistics/bioinformatics.

The selected candidate will perform a variety of research activities which include planning, organising and conducting research studies within the overall scope of a research project under the supervision of the Principal Investigator or his/her designate, including but not limited to the following: -
Independently carry out the design and execution of experimental research required by the research component of the project.
Write and review research papers, present research outcomes, conceptualise new ideas and develop plans for independent research which could have a considerable influence and impact on the relevant field attracting research funding.
Provide support for external grant/protocol development, study design and management of research activities.
Contribute to occasional educational / instructional activities and project management.
Provide guidance and mentorship to undergraduate / medical students and research assistants.
Maintain optimal experiment progress in the laboratory or in the research work undertaken.
Perform other related duties incidental to the work described therein.

Job Requirements
PhD and/or post-graduate medical degree with at least 3 years’ relevant research experience and training.
Entry level candidates may also be considered.
Knowledge of the scientific background relevant to the research area and laboratory experimental skills, where applicable.
Proven track record in the form of high impact publications.
Demonstrated capability of research independence progressively.
Strong writing and critical thinking skills, as well as good communication and presentation skills.
A team player who is able to prioritise, multi-task and work collaboratively in a diverse workforce.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.


COVID-19 Message
At NUS, the health and safety of our staff and students are one of our utmost priorities, and COVID-vaccination supports our commitment to ensure the safety of our community and to make NUS as safe and welcoming as possible. Many of our roles require a significant amount of physical interactions with students/staff/public members. Even for job roles that may be performed remotely, there will be instances where on-campus presence is required.

Taking into consideration the health and well-being of our staff and students and to better protect everyone in the campus, applicants are strongly encouraged to have themselves fully COVID-19 vaccinated to secure successful employment with NUS."
Senior / Software Engineer (Java Back-end / Multi-threading),"Description

We are looking for a motivated Senior / Software Engineer (Java Backend / Multi-threading) in Malaysia to make the team stronger.

Responsibilities

Design and build applications using Java, JavaScript, Typescript and related technology
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and ship new features
Build micro-services using Spring Boot, single page application using React and others
Implement core practice of Agile, leveraging cloud native architecture pattern using Test Driven Development (TDD), continuous integration/continuous delivery, in an on-premises or public-cloud environment, where everything is automated
Work on bug fixing and improving application performance
Continuously discover, evaluate, and implement new technologies to maximize development efficiency

Requirements

Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or equivalent
Minimum of 5 years of hands-on server-side application development experience in Java Technology / JavaEE / Webservice / Eclipse RCP, multi-threaded programming and Oracle technologies
Hands on experience on Spring boot, JPA, Hibernate
Experience in building and running containerized microservices for Kubernetes/Cloud environment
Experience in java-based caching technologies like redis / Ehcache
Working experience with Agile methodologies
Working knowledge in tools such as JIRA, GitHub/Bitbucket, Maven, Jenkins, Confluence, etc
Good communication skills and be able to coordinate technical discussion and activities with global and offshore teams
Self-initiative and comfortable working in difficult situations
A team player with positive attitude to build trusted working relationship with global and offshore teams

We offer

Friendly team and enjoyable working environment
Work-life balance and flexible schedule
Online training library, mentoring, career development and potential partial grant of certification
Unlimited access to LinkedIn learning solutions
Referral bonuses
Compensation for sick leave and paid time off
Opportunities for self-realization"
2023 Summer Internship - GrabAds (May - Aug),"Job Description:

This job requisition is for candidates who are available for an internship of minimum 12 weeks between the months of May and August 2023. If you are keen on an H1 term-time internship, please apply to the role: 2023 H1 Term-Time Internship - GrabAds (Jan- May). Applications close on 10 Oct 2022**

Life at Grab

At Grab, every Grabber is guided by The Grab Way, which spells out our mission, how we believe we can achieve it, and our operating principles - the 4Hs: Heart, Hunger, Honour and Humility. These principles guide and help us make decisions as we work to create economic empowerment for the people of Southeast Asia.

Get to know the team

GrabAds allows Advertisers, Agencies, and Merchants to engage the Grab Audience via innovative online and offline advertising experiences. Through a unique ecosystem and transacting user base, clients are able to reach their desired audiences at scale, while driving measurable business outcomes.

Get to know the role

You can now apply for our GrabAds Internship, running from May to Aug 2023. Our internships are designed to provide real-world experience that enables you to put everything you've learned into action and give you an opportunity to join us in driving South East Asia forward together.

Interns in GrabAds have the opportunity to perform their internships in different team, including but not limited to the following areas:

Sales Operations / Finance Operations
Media Strategy
Backend Engineering
Ad Operations
Strategy & Partnerships

The Must-Haves

Only for candidates who are available from May to Aug 2023
You should be enrolled in a Singapore university, Singaporean/ Singapore PR studying abroad
You should be a full-time student majoring in business economics, accounting, business management or related fields, with focus on Marketing, Analytics, Media or Communications seeking a matriculated internship
Proficient in productivity and data analysis tools (Word, Excel, Slides, Docs, Sheets, other sales CRM tools)

The Nice-to-Haves

Knowledge in operating Salesforce, PowerBI tools preferred but not required
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Excellent communication & presentation skills with ability to transmit across different level stakeholders
Prior experience in working with Digital Marketing, Media Sales, Advertisers, Consulting, Business Development or Media Agencies preferred

We require our interns in Singapore to be covered under the Employment Act (EA) and Work Injury Compensation (WICA) act. As such, our internship opportunities are limited to students of any nationality studying in Singapore, and Singaporean/PR studying in any location.

D&I Statement

We are committed to building diverse teams and creating an inclusive workplace that enables all Grabbers to perform at their best, regardless of nationality, ethnicity, religion, age, gender identity or sexual orientation and other attributes that make each Grabber unique.

About Grab

Grab is the leading superapp platform in Southeast Asia, providing everyday services that matter to consumers. Today, the Grab app has been downloaded onto millions of mobile devices, giving users access to over 9 million drivers, merchants, and agents. Grab offers a wide range of on-demand services in the region, including mobility, food, package and grocery delivery services, mobile payments, and financial services across 428 cities in eight countries.

Join us today to drive Southeast Asia forward, together."
Quality Assurance Engineer Intern,"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Responsibilities

Work closely with team members to develop, test and deliver high quality products.
Understand business scenarios and tech design, and be able to design test cases.
Be able to do test automation based on existing test frameworks, or write scripts to increase efficiency.
Ability to execute test plans and identify issues through testing.
Able to track issues through to resolution, actively participate in projects and deliver on time.
Understanding project dependencies and risk mitigation.

Requirements

Undergraduate students in Computer Science/Engineering or related majors.
Master at least one of Java, Python, Javascript and other programming languages.
Familiar with Linux, database operations or cloud services.
Strong analytical and trouble-shooting skills.
Strong verbal and written communication.
Strong work ethic and attention to detail.
Self-managed, proactive work style, Ability to work well in teams.
Having software development or testing experience is a plus.

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
"VP, Service Desk Lead, Group Infrastructure & Platform Services","About UOB

United Overseas Bank Limited (UOB) is a leading bank in Asia with a global network of more than 500 branches and offices in 19 countries and territories in Asia Pacific, Europe and North America. In Asia, we operate through our head office in Singapore and banking subsidiaries in China, Indonesia, Malaysia and Thailand, as well as branches and offices. Our history spans more than 80 years. Over this time, we have been guided by our values – Honorable, Enterprising, United and Committed. This means we always strive to do what is right, build for the future, work as one team and pursue long-term success. It is how we work, consistently, be it towards the company, our colleagues or our customers.

About The Department

Group Technology and Operations (GTO) provides software and system development, information technology support services and banking operations.

We have centralized and standardized the technology components into Singapore, creating a global footprint which can be utilized for supporting our regional subsidiaries and the branches around the world. We operate and support 19 countries with this architecture to provide a secure and flexible banking infrastructure.

Our Operations divisions provide transactional customer services for our businesses while also focusing on cost efficiency through process improvements, automation and straight through processing.

Job Responsibilities

Help Desk & Desktop Support is responsible for coordinating the activities of the Help Desk function with other systems areas (e.g., UNIX, Windows, and network systems administration), and providing dedicated “generalist” technology infrastructure support to a specific unit (e.g., trading floors).

The Technology function is responsible for activities related to the strategic direction and control of all information systems and technology capabilities, both internally and externally. Includes system design and programming, network planning, budget planning, database management, and computer operations.

Job Requirements
With relevant information Technology experience for at least 15 years
Experience in vendor management of End User Deskside and Helpdesk is preferred
Experience in providing Deskside support / Technical level 2 support for End users
ITIL Trained / Certified
Hold a minimally a Bachelor Degree qualification from a reputable university
Ability to work independently on projects and vendor management
With excellent business acumen, interpersonal, teaming and customer service skills
Strong written and communication skills to effectively communicate with stakeholders and senior management
Proven ability to identify, build and maintain strong working relationships with key stakeholders at all levels of the enterprise

Be a part of UOB Family

UOB is an equal opportunity employer. UOB does not discriminate on the basis of a candidate's age, race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or other non-merit factors. All employment decisions at UOB are based on business needs, job requirements and qualifications. If you require any assistance or accommodations to be made for the recruitment process, please inform us when you submit your online application.

Apply now and make a difference."
"Remote Diagnostics Expert, Four-Stroke Engines","Wärtsilä is leading the maritime industry’s transformation towards a decarbonised and sustainable future. We at Wärtsilä Marine Power are proud to offer our customers the world’s widest network of maritime expertise and the full portfolio from engines to lifecycle solutions.

We want to change the course towards an interconnected and cleaner maritime future and are constantly on the lookout for future-oriented talent to join our team and to work towards enabling sustainable societies through innovation in technology and services - together. Are you ready to jump onboard?

Remote Diagnostics Expert, Four-Stroke Engines

Do you have an interest in troubleshooting and analysing the performance of four-stroke engines? Then this job may be for you.

We are a team of more than a dozen experts who follow the condition of Wärtsilä four-stroke engines. We utilize the digital tool “Expert Insight”, which highlights deviations from expected behaviour of the engine type. Data from engine sensors come from the field via an internet connection and the digital tool uses both artificial intelligence and rules set up by engine experts.

The engines we monitor are primarily on ships under maintenance agreements where there is a dedicated team of Wärtsilä experts delivering services for the customer. We send regular notifications and monthly reports to customers, thereby proactively maintaining the engines in good condition.

We are now looking for reinforcement to our office in Singapore or in Finland (Vaasa or Turku). Your background can be in marine operation (chief engineer etc), engine field service, R&D, engine manufacturing or similar. Understanding the correlation between various engine operational parameters is essential to be successful in this role. Our experts should be comfortable giving advice to customers about four-stroke engines when sensor data is noticed to be deviating.

Other requirements for the role:
You are comfortable working with numbers in the form of tables and graphs
You are willing to work in a structured way with routine work
You are willing to work as an expert and a team player
You have good written and verbal communication skills, as well as proficiency in English

We offer you tutoring to get into the role, and after that continuous training and skills updating so that you will become a full-fledged expert on four-stroke engine diagnostics. You will work in a team where everyone is supporting each other and discussing together their interesting cases. You will get to work with state-of-the art digital tools (including artificial intelligence) and be part of a modern and global business. Your customers will be located all over the world and you will be working in English only.

We at Wärtsilä believe in empowerment, ownership and taking responsibility of our work. We support each other’s growth and co-creation is the true basis of our innovation. We are authentic and honest, and we strongly believe in a diverse and inclusive work community where everyone can be their true self. That is why we have built an environment that empowers you and everyone around you, and where you can feel safe and cared for.

Contact & next steps:

Does this sound like the job for you? If yes, we hope to hear from you before the application deadline 22nd of January 2023, through submitting your application through our Careers portal. We aim to keep you updated on the process all the way. Please also state your preferred location in the application (Vaasa, Turku or Singapore).

Are you still wondering if you should apply and would like to get something clarified?

Please contact:

Vaasa: Isak Lindén, +358503758210, isak.linden(a)wartsila.com

Turku and Singapore: Marko Kuningas, +358405659892, marko.kuningas(a)wartsila.com

All new Wärtsilä employees in Finland will attend occupational health check, including the drug test/screening. The legislation of the country followed when person is located outside of Finland.

Last application date: 22/01/2023

At Wärtsilä we value, respect and embrace all our differences, and are committed to diversity, inclusion and equal employment opportunities; everyone can be their true self and succeed based on their job-relevant merits and abilities.

This is Wärtsilä

Wärtsilä is a global leader in innovative technologies and lifecycle solutions for the marine and energy markets. Our team of 17,000 professionals, in more than 200 locations in 68 countries, shape the decarbonisation transformation of our industries across the globe. Read more on www.wartsila.com.

#wärtsilämarine"
"Digital Customer Engagement Executive, Digibank","We are living in exciting times. Technology is reshaping how we live and we want to use it redefine how financial services are offered, which is why Singtel and Grab are coming together. Singtel is Asia’s leading communications group connecting millions of consumers and enterprises to essential digital services while Grab is the leading technology company in Southeast Asia offering everyday services to consumers. Together, we have big dreams to unlock and financial inclusion for people in our region is just one. We want to build a digital bank with the right foundation - using data, technology and trust to solve problems and serve customers. Get to know our Team: Reporting into the Customer Service Operations head of the bank, the Customer Service operations team ensures the smooth operation of the bank’s contact centre, where customer support executives interact with the bank’s customers across different touch points. The mission of the team is to deliver excellent customer support journeys throughout the customer lifecycle focusing on quality, customer satisfaction and efficiency.

Get to know the Role: Provide real time human-assisted customer support via various channels including but not limited to voice, live chat, email, social media, L1 and L2 support, handle enquiries and resolve any issues while building and maintaining good relationships with Digibank customers in Singapore Guide our customers in using the Digibank application and resolve issues as per SOPs via self serve tools, HelpCentre and FAQs. Clear understanding and adherence to the SOPs, resolution solutioning and on-going process improvements

Follow through and escalation to internal & external parties as necessary to resolve any issues from our customers Meet individual and team qualitative and quantitative operations performance metrics

Collaborate closely with the Customer Service Operations team and SMEs in the delivery of relevant customer support initiatives Be the advocate of Digibank values and standards for self and team The day-to-day activities: Provide quality customer support (24/7) through various channels including but not limited to Voice, Digital and Chat channels for our customers Provide 1st level investigation and timely escalations as required to respective teams to ensure proper root cause analyses, speedy resolution and customer satisfaction Gather feedback from customers, observe and highlight front-line issues such as application failure, transaction issues, product enquiries and clarifications etc. and report promptly to supervisor Be a fast learner to execute new processes related to product launches, tactical campaigns, systems enhancements, process automation or channel optimization projects Perform ad-hoc tasks as required by the team to improve overall business such as market research, service quality audit, etc. Monitor various company communication channels including call center, social media, web enquiries, etc. and respond appropriately in a timely manner Provide regular data analytics, project / issue reports to operations head, Customer Service management team as required The must haves: Able to work on weekend and rotational shifts; At least 2 years working experience in any service industry; Experience in Customer Service/Contact Centre in banking/financial industry will be good advantage; Tertiary education, must possess at least a Diploma in any relevant field; Experience in Zendesk, Livechat and digital servicing channels will be an added advantage; Proficiency in using Microsoft products such as Excel, PowerPoint, Word; Ability to communicate results to management and in a fast paced environment; Customer centric and attention to detail; Can thrive under minimal supervision; Outstanding organizational skills with multitasking skills; Excellent verbal/written communication skills in English language"
Security Engineer,"Position Overview

As a part of the Security Operations department, the incumbent will review and conduct technical security risk checks. SecOps is also aligned to SOC for incident management handling, reporting and investigation. Candidate will have to work on technical risk management. Handle day-to-day incident reporting and support investigation to healthcare IT platform

Role & Responsibilities

Work closely with internal and external stakeholders to manage the technical risk, security operation and SOC.
Act as IT security expert for department in the areas of cyber security assessments, PAM, Database, WAF, Firewall and EPP/EDR.
Perform risk assessment and identify mitigation controls for the risk area identified.
Enhance and build cyber threat detection user cases and assist in analysing and reducing false positive.
Identify infection/compromise in the company utilizing threat intelligence and indicators of compromise (IOCs) from different threat Intel sources and regulators
Ensure all compliance and security control functions are performed timely and orderly.
Drive continuous improvement of procedures and processes related to cybersecurity process and operations monitoring.
Track, monitor and valid security-related and risk issues, provide an action plan to rectify the issues and prevent recurrence.
Generate security reports and metrics as required.
Provide timely and periodic update to managements on its security matters.
Stay current on the latest Cyber threats, Attacks and vulnerabilities etc

Requirements

Good diploma or degree in Computer Science, Digital Forensic or Engineering preferred

Professional security related qualification (e.g. CEH, ECIH/GCIH, ITIL) will be favourable although not mandatory technical skills

At least 3 - 6 years’ experience in developing, implementing and maintaining IT systems

Ability to write and communicate in English is an added advantage

Added advantage to have knowledge in security technology like firewall, IPS, WAF, endpoint

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
"2023 Real Estate Finance, Analyst Program, Singapore","Blackstone is the world’s largest alternative asset manager. We seek to create positive economic impact and long-term value for our investors, the companies we invest in, and the communities in which we work. We do this by using extraordinary people and flexible capital to help companies solve problems. Our $951 billion in assets under management include investment vehicles focused on private equity, real estate, public debt and equity, infrastructure, life sciences, growth equity, opportunistic, non-investment grade credit, real assets and secondary funds, all on a global basis. Further information is available at www.blackstone.com. Follow @blackstone on LinkedIn, Twitter, and Instagram.

Blackstone Real Estate:

Blackstone is a global leader in real estate investing. Blackstone’s real estate business was founded in 1991 and has US $319 billion of investor capital under management. Blackstone is the largest owner of commercial real estate globally, owning and operating assets across every major geography and sector, including logistics, residential, office, hospitality and retail. Our opportunistic funds seek to acquire undermanaged, well-located assets across the world. Blackstone’s Core+ business invests in substantially stabilized real estate assets globally, through both institutional strategies and strategies tailored for income-focused individual investors including Blackstone Real Estate Income Trust, Inc. (BREIT), a U.S. non-listed REIT, and Blackstone’s European yield-oriented strategy. Blackstone Real Estate also operates one of the leading global real estate debt businesses, providing comprehensive financing solutions across the capital structure and risk spectrum, including management of Blackstone Mortgage Trust (NYSE: BXMT).

Job Title: Blackstone Real Estate Finance Analyst, Singapore

Job Description:

The Blackstone Real Estate Finance team is a process-oriented business partnering function with a focus towards ensuring efficient fund operations and reporting by undertaking the following:

Key Responsibilities:

Responsibilities include but not limited to:
Valuation Reporting
Coordination and managing quarterly valuation/forecasting processes across Asia open and close-ended funds
Reconciliation of key valuation inputs
Generation of fund level returns and materials to facilitate meetings with various stakeholders
Perform ad-hoc/on-going analysis and reporting for senior management
Participate and lead various technology and process improvement initiatives
Other ad hoc tasks/projects
Able to build and maintain relationships and navigate diverse stakeholders
Works closely with other offices in New York, Hong Kong, and other Asia offices

This is a 2-year Graduate Analyst Program, which seeks to offer recent university graduate exposure to the Real Estate Finance team based in the Singapore office.

Qualifications:

Blackstone seeks to hire individuals who are highly motivated, intelligent, and have demonstrated excellence in prior endeavors. In addition to strong analytical and quantitative skills, the successful candidate should have:

Knowledge of real estate, including market fundamentals will be an advantage
Strong Microsoft Office skills (MS Excel, MS PowerPoint and MS Word)
Strong attention to detail and ability to work both independently and in a team environment.
Ability to multi-task and manage shifting priorities in a fast-paced environment
Self-motivated with a passion for making business processes more efficient and successful
Excellent communication, problem solving and interpersonal skills necessary
Drive and desire to learn new technologies and grow technical and functional skill sets
Fluent in English

Required Skills:

Undergraduate or master’s degree student, majoring in Accounting and Finance with strong GPA. Anticipated graduation date between December 2022 to Spring 2023
Relevant experience at a professional services firm a plus
Resume must include (expected) graduation month/year and GPA
Resume must be in PDF format

If you do not meet these criteria, please see Blackstone’s Careers website for other opportunities that may be available, including other entry level positions.

Blackstone is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, marital or partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, genetic predisposition, veteran or military status, status as a victim of domestic violence, a sex offense or stalking, or any other class or status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including but not limited to hiring, placement, promotion, termination, transfer, leave of absence, compensation, and training. All Blackstone employees, including but not limited to recruiting personnel and hiring managers, are required to abide by this policy.

The duties and responsibilities described here are not exhaustive and additional assignments, duties, or responsibilities may be required of this position. Assignments, duties, and responsibilities may be changed at any time, with or without notice, by Blackstone in its sole discretion.

Blackstone is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, marital or partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, genetic predisposition, veteran or military status, status as a victim of domestic violence, a sex offense or stalking, or any other class or status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including but not limited to hiring, placement, promotion, termination, transfer, leave of absence, compensation, and training. All Blackstone employees, including but not limited to recruiting personnel and hiring managers, are required to abide by this policy.

If you need a reasonable accommodation to complete your application, please contact Human Resources at 212-583-5000 (US), +44 (0)20 7451 4000 (EMEA) or +852 3656 8600 (APAC).

Depending on the position, you may be required to obtain certain securities licenses if you are in a client facing role and/or if you are engaged in the following:

Attending client meetings where you are discussing Blackstone products and/or and client questions;
Marketing Blackstone funds to new or existing clients;
Supervising or training securities licensed employees;
Structuring or creating Blackstone funds/products; and
Advising on marketing plans prepared by a sales team or developing and/or contributing information for marketing materials.

Note: The above list is not the exhaustive list of activities requiring securities licenses and there may be roles that require review on a case-by-case basis. Please speak with your Blackstone Recruiting contact with any questions.

To submit your application please complete the form below. Fields marked with a red asterisk * must be completed to be considered for employment (although some can be answered ""prefer not to say""). Failure to provide this information may compromise the follow-up of your application. When you have finished click Submit at the bottom of this form."
Sales Development Representative APAC,"Brandwatch is the world’s premier social suite, empowering over 7,500 of the world’s most admired companies to understand and engage with customers at the speed of social.

Combining pioneering, AI-enriched digital consumer intelligence with industry-leading social media management tools, Brandwatch offers a complementary suite of specialized, best-in-class products and services that support intelligently connected workflows. With Brandwatch, brands and agencies can adapt and thrive in today’s fast moving digital world by making smarter decisions and executing data-driven social strategies at every customer touchpoint.

Operating and serving clients the world over, Brandwatch has 15 offices across the globe and more than 1,000 employees worldwide. Brandwatch is a Cision Company.

At Brandwatch, we know that the key to growth is in a high-performing sales team. That’s why we’re seeking Sales Development Representatives to impact the growth of our business and support our sales team by engaging new clients.

You will reach out to potential clients to learn their current needs with social media and sell both our top-rated social media management solution and our consumer intelligence tool.

This is the perfect role for someone who is a great communicator, competitive, driven, hard-working, and a team player.

What you’ll do:

Be the face of Brandwatch, you are the first point of contact to engage our potential customers;
Stay up to date on industry news and understand the social media landscape;
Become an expert on our brand, business, and SaaS product;
Work closely with the Account Executive team to build a sales pipeline and drive revenue through new business opportunities.

How you will do it:

Generate leads and build relationships by nurturing warm prospects and finding new potential customers, using Salesloft, Salesforce, LinkedIn, Cognism, Gong and other platforms;
Make an average of 100 outbound activities to prospects daily, with the goal of scheduling platform walk-throughs and starting the sales process;
Manage and maintain a pipeline of interested prospects and engage sales executives for next step;
Engage in training and development programs.

What you have:

A background in sales (sales and/or BDR and SaaS experience preferred)/ real estate/ recruitment or just a passion to develop your career in sales;
Excellent written and spoken English;
Motivation and determination to succeed paired with positive mindset that allow you (over)reach your targets;
Ability to execute and take responsibility;
Coachability and self-awareness;
Team player attitude because we believe the teamwork makes the dreamwork;
Ability to thrive in a quota driven environment with short and dynamic sales cycles.

What we offer:

Clearly defined career path: a transparent growth plan with potential to become an Account Executive and beyond;
Buddy setup to help you onboard and beyond;
Personal and professional development opportunities;
A competitive compensation package with a solid base and an uncapped commission model that is designed to ignite you;
A place in a high performing sales team at a growth-driven company;
An open, informal, diverse and multinational working environment;
25 days of PTO per year to encourage a healthy work-life balance, plus 5 carryover days allowed;
Additional pension and healthcare;
Full Headspace subscription and 24/7 Employee Assistance program;
Hybrid working model.

Our Values:

Authentic - We value openness and integrity, and strive for both between our colleagues and customers.
Bold -We value fearlessness and conviction, and encourage our employees to push the company forward.
Creative - We value originality and curiosity, and apply both to our work at all levels and in all areas.

*Our recruitment process in entirely remote for your safety!*

If you’ve found our job opportunity interesting but you don’t meet all of the requirements, it’s still worth applying. We’d love to hear from you!

Brandwatch is a globally distributed organization. However, we can’t provide any legal sponsorship to attain a work visa or permit in your country of residence, nor in any of the countries where we operate. We strongly advise you to seek legal counsel to ensure your residential status is fully legal before you apply. Any offer of employment we make you will be conditional upon you having the right to work in your hiring location and Brandwatch will verify this as part of the onboarding process.

To all recruitment agencies: Brandwatch does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias or Brandwatch employees. Brandwatch is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
"Backend Engineer, Global Live Service Arch (Compliance)","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Global Live Service Arch’s Major Objectives are,
• Ensure Global Live to meet compliance requirements, and promote cross-team architecture governance.
• Build Global Live architecture with stability, low-latency and resilience to support long-term business development
• Optimize end-to-end stability and engineering efficiency

Our Key Problems To Solve,
• Under the strict Compliance requirements, how to construct Global Live platform with Stability, better Performance (Low-Latency and High-Concurrency), Resilience and Efficiency.

Responsibilities
• In-depth analysis of the Global Live streaming business and tech architecture, identify potential risks and probable evolution based on business development direction and to form solution
• Improve System quality and engineering efficiency
• Optimize standard operating procedure and standards
• Be Involved in researching and developing basic services, implement high qualified throughput and consistency under complex global distributed scenarios;

Qualifications

Qualifications
• BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major, deep understanding of computer architecture, data structures and algorithms, in depth knowledge of common databases
• Deep understanding of software design pattern;
• Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++;
• Large scale client-facing industry project development experience; Extensive experience in high scalable, highly available, distributed and mission-critical systems.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Senior Manager/Manager, Data Engineering","To ensure that source data generated via AIC's multiple business-specific systems are organized and transformed in ways that support business users' needs and Business Intelligence applications.
To work closely with Business Intelligence (BI) and Advance Analytics and Modelling (AAM) colleagues in the Research Department, and partner with program development, sector development, outreach, and grants divisions in AIC to understand the business requirements and translate them into long-term data solutions.
To work with key external partners within the existing IT development processes, monitor and provide input to influence the;
Design, development, and optimization of scalable data warehouses;
Building of data pipelines across data systems both internal and external to AIC's data ecosystem; and
Optimizing of existing data structures so that it supports self-service reporting requirements.


Job Requirements:

Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or Engineering.
Professional Data Engineer certification will be considered favorably.
At least 5 years of relevant experience developing, testing, and maintaining data warehouses, preferably in health or social care settings.
Experience in
Data mapping and integration processes;
Building and managing ETL processes;
Handling large data systems with relational databases;
Building pipelines to automate data interface pipelines; and
Familiarity with Excel, SQL, Informatica, Python, Tableau;
Be an advocate for best practices and lifelong learning;
Able to work well independently and in teams;
Excellent written and oral communication skills; and
Flexible, self-motivating, and able to manage multiple projects efficiently.
Desired Skills and Experience

data mapping; data integration; data warehouse"
Database Administrator ($9k / FinTech / Global MNC),"to succeed in this role, you should have:
Min 2 years of experience in a DBA role
Strong proficiency in Database architecture
Proficiency or Familiarity in either Sybase, C# or SSRS will be an added advantage

about the job:
Spearheading MS SQL Server cluster architecture
Managing MS SQL Server installation, upgrades, maintenance, and configuration
Linux server maintain operation
Resolve incidents and problems with database or related third party products
Improve and enhance the existing stored procedure performance
Handling Database Backups/restores, Scheduler tasks Monitoring (SSIS), Database performance Monitoring/Tuning
Maintain database security and compliance
Work closely with clients or Backoffice teams to generate reports from database

Interested candidates, please click 'APPLY' or send your CV (in MS Word) to xylon.chian@randstad.com.sg

EA: 94C3609 | R1984287 | Xylon Chian

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
Project Associate / Lead (Retail Store FFS Innovation & Business Improvement),"About Us
As Singapore’s leading supermarket retail player and a household name close to all, we have grown with you over the years. It is now your turn to grow an exciting new career and fulfil your aspirations with us. Join us as we embark on a journey to make lives better for our customers, community, environment and employees.

At NTUC FairPrice, we offer you more than just a job. We are committed in giving our employees a rewarding career through comprehensive development opportunities. We promise a wonderful workplace culture with ample opportunities for growth at different levels of your career. Every of our 10,000 employees across Singapore is important.
If the prospect of working in an organization at the forefront of retail technology and innovation excites you, look no further.

Grow your career with us today and make a difference.

Job Description
Reporting to the Director of Category Portfolio & Business Planning (CPBP)
Support on managing the Key Strategic Initiatives; in conceptualising the end to end process & workflow, analysis both internal and external data to provide insights, strategy and clear action plans
Engage and work with key stakehodlers across all functions in order to get feedback, garner buy in, implement action plans, check and control and ultimtaly clear measurements against the goals
Look for better ways of working to innovate and present new findings and insights
Seek better ways of working to innovate and support the initiatives; in order to identify business opportunities critical to Co-operative's success

Qualifications
Diploma in Business Administration, Economics or equivalent with minimum 2 years of experience in management consulting, corporate strategic planning and/ or financial planning
Working experience in retail industry and/or preferably, with experience in global consumer packaged goods
Excellent financial, modelling and data analytics skill with strong business acumen
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills with the ability to translate complex concepts into actionable data and presentation. And also be able to work with various stakeholder (buyers, channels and other functions)
Excellent presentation skills that encompass clear, compelling communications tailored to different group of stakeholders
Able to work independently, motivated, meticulous, passion for detail and results oriented
Resourceful and problem solver
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills with good listening skills and an eye for detail
Think out of the box and not afraid to challenge status quo; to reinvent oneself constantly
Ability to engage with different stakeholders cross functionally
Good system knowledge in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Power BI and SAP retail system
Thrives in a fast paced FMCG retail environment and able to multitask

Other Information
Primarily in Fairprice HQ, store runs per business needs. (Hybrid work from office and from retail store)"
Software Engineer (Java) - HC002,"Activate Interactive Pte Ltd (“Activate”) is a leading IT solution and service provider headquartered in Singapore with a presence in Malaysia and Indonesia. Our clients are empowered with quality, cost-effective, and impactful end-to-end application development, like mobile and web applications, and cloud technology that remove technology roadblocks and increase their business efficiency.

We believe in positively impacting the lives of people around us and the environment we live in through the use of technology. Hence, we are committed to providing a conducive environment for all employees to realise their full potential, who in turn have the opportunity to continuously drive innovation.

We are searching for our next team members to join our growing team.

If you love the idea of being part of a growing company with exciting prospects in mobile and web technologies that create positive impact on people’s lives, then we would love to hear from you.

We are looking for Software Engineer (Java)

Internal Code: HC002

What will you do?
Code, modify, test, correct and document new and existing programs using assigned languages, tools and coding conventions
Prepare and document test data
Prepare and set up testing and production environment
Conduct unit, module, functional and volume testing
Analyze test results and take corrective actions
Prepare and maintain program and system documentation
Assist in establishing file structures and processing logic requirements
Troubleshooting and supporting end-users in the implementation and maintenance of application systems
Participate in Disaster Recovery activities eg simulation exercise at Disaster Recovery sites

Requirements

What are we looking for?
Excellent experience in Java, JSP, Servlet, EJB, Java Script, SQL / JDBC / ORM
Excellent experience in HTML5 and/or XHTML, Javascript, REST and ajax, JSON, XML
Good communication and interpersonal skills
Self-driven and independent

Benefits

What do we offer?
Fun working environment
Employee Wellness Program

Does it sound like something you are interested in exploring further? Please be in touch with our team for an initial chat at chi@activate.sg

Activate Interactive Singapore is an equal opportunity employer. Employment decisions will be based on merit, qualifications and abilities. Activate Interactive Pte Ltd does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, colour, religion, sex, sexuality, national origin, age, disability, marital status or any other characteristics protected by law.

Protecting your privacy and the security of your data are longstanding top priorities for Activate Interactive Pte Ltd.

Your personal data will be processed for the purposes of managing Activate Interactive Pte Ltd’s recruitment related activities, which include setting up and conducting interviews and tests for applicants, evaluating and assessing the results, and as is otherwise needed in the recruitment and hiring processes.

Please consult our Privacy Notice (https://www.activate.sg/privacy-policy) to know more about how we collect, use, and transfer the personal data of our candidates. Here you can find how you can request for access, correction and/or withdrawal of your Personal Data."
Senior Consultant - Data Science & Analytics,"You will also contribute to internal data science projects hosted on Heka, our internal accelerator for data science projects: https://www.heka.ai/en
As part of the global data science team, you will contribute to the development of various solutions designed to address our clients’ needs.

Key responsibilities:

Partner with our client’s leadership teams, engineers, program managers and data analysts to understand business needs.
Steer a small team or work independently on client projects with support of senior leadership
Identify, acquire, process and explore relevant data sources.
Analyze large amounts of structured and unstructured information to discover trends and patterns.
Use your data analytics and data science expertise to derive valuable insights from datasets, build predictive models and machine-learning algorithms.
Communicate at scale, through multiple mediums: presentations, dashboards, datasets, bots and more.
Propose solutions and strategies to business challenges.
Collaborate with engineering and product development teams.
Contribute to a broad range of projects and deliverables, including models, algorithms, datasets, measurements, services, tools and processes.
Evangelize data science in the region by contributing to training & upskilling
Contribute to business development activities such as building proposals, conducting research, and driving thought leadership

Qualifications

3+ years’ experience as a Data Scientist or Data analyst (ideally in consulting)
At least a bachelor’s or equivalent degree in a relevant area of study (Data Science, Business Analytics, Statistics, Economics or a related field of study) from a top university
Good skills in Python and ideally another analytical language (e.g., R, SQL)
Problem-solving aptitude and strong business acumen
Excellent communication and presentation skills
English fluency. As you will be working with our regional offices in Hong Kong and Japan, additional regional languages is a plus (e.g., Cantonese, Mandarin, Japanese)
Strong plus: Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, PowerBI, R-shiny)
Strong plus: Good understanding of statistical techniques and concepts
Strong plus: Knowledge of Machine Learning techniques or optimization

Additional Information

What do we offer?

Competitive salary & top tier benefits
Training resources to further develop yourself as an expert in your discipline
Opportunity to work with top tier clients in financial services, retail, and other sectors in SG and beyond
Dynamic environment with many opportunities to take on responsibilities usually reserved for more experienced professionals
Sia Partners is an equal opportunity employer. All aspects of employment, including hiring, promotion, remuneration, or discipline, are based solely on performance, competence, conduct, or business needs."
Project Engineer,"Job description:

Job Purpose


This role will be under our joint venture company - ChargEco (Strides and YTL). The Project Engineer will report to the Head of Project Delivery and will work closely with the Head of Project Delivery on the deployment of EV charging network. This will include project planning, project budgeting, and project execution of EV chargers in the EV charging network.



Responsibilities


The duties and responsibilities of the Project Engineer are as listed below. Note that the list is not comprehensive and related duties and responsibilities may be assigned from time to time.

• Provide detailed planning including breaking the project into tasks, subtasks and setting the schedule.
• Survey car park before installation.
• Prepare and submit the pre-work documents to all the relevant agencies, including HDB, Town Council, LTA and SP Services for approval.
• Monitor the status of approvals and ensure compliance with relevant agencies and building LEW.
• Manage documentation and reports, including what has been done and completed.
• Work closely with the EPC partners and EV chargers vendors for the installation and commissioning of the EV chargers
• Arrange shutdown for MCB & meter installation


Qualifications & Work Experience


Qualifications and work experience include:
• Degree in Civil Engineering, Electrical and Electronics Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or equivalent.
• Minimum 3 years of experience in Project Management.
• Experience in e-Mobility space is highly valued.

Skills
Technical skills include:
• Knowledge in electrical Single Line Drawings (SLD) and site layout plans.
• Familiarise with electrical shutdown and equipment energization procedures.
• Proficiency in Project Management tools.

Generic skills include:
• Team player and entrepreneurial
• Independent and takes ownership of projects assigned
• Good time-management skills
• Great interpersonal and communication skills
• Willing to take on challenges and work well in a fast-moving environment."
"Product Specialist (IoT, M2M)","At Singtel, we believe in the strength of a vibrant, diverse and inclusive workforce where backgrounds, perspectives and life experiences of our people help us innovate and create strong connections with our customers. We strive to ensure all our people practices are non-discriminatory and provide a fair, performance-based work culture that is diverse, inclusive and collaborative.

Join us and experience what it’s like to be with an Employer of Choice*. Together, let’s create a brighter digital future for all. *Awarded at the HR Fest Awards 2020.

Position Summary

Our Product Specialists team is responsible for achieving the revenue objectives for Singtel’s IoT Connectivity portfolio. The team will evangelise the value proposition of IoT to internal stakeholders and enable stakeholders to amplify the product, marketing and selling efforts of IoT across all relevant Singtel sales segments. Our product specialists are also expected to deliver excellent customer experience through highest level of external customer engagements throughout the customer life cycle starting from pre-sales stage.

Key Responsibilities
Work with Account Management teams and participate in the sales cycle on IoT opportunities.
Identify customer requirements and design solutions that best meet their needs in IOT solutions
Work closely with the Product Management team as part of fronting the RFP requirements from customers and also leading the response on proposals.
Provide effective responses to tenders/ RFPs/ Proposals with solution design and technical clarifications.
Deliver technical presentations of proposed solutions covering both technical and operational benefits to customers.
Work closely with implementation and operations team on proposed design for successful delivery and implementation.
Build a healthy sales funnel to meet IoT revenue target along with the sales organisation
Organize quarterly knowledge briefing sessions for new Account Managers
Education And Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, Engineering or related discipline

Work Experience

5 years or more of Experience in business development, technical and solutions pre-sales
Ability to design and translate solutions into business proposals.
Technical Skills
Demonstrated strong professional experience in direct and/or related domain areas (mobile networks, GSM/CDMA/UMTS/LTE, IP networks)
Knowledge of Connectivity Management platforms such as Cisco Jasper, Ericsson DCP would be big plus
Knowledge of embedded SIM and the relevant subscription management platforms
Working Experience and or exposure with M2M and IoT (Internet of Things) technology would be a plus (NB-IoT, LTE-M, IoT Application Enablement platforms)
Knowledge of Software platforms, middleware technologies in the areas of M2M/IoT would be a plus
Knowledge of Cloud Technologies and platforms.
Fundamentals of 5G
Knowledge of various industry verticals with IoT use-cases."
Platform Operations Manager,"Who we are:
minden.ai is a technology venture founded by Temasek in strategic partnership with DFI Retail Group and coalition partners BreadTalk Group, DBS Bank, PAssion Card, Mandai Wildlife Group and Singtel. We are on a mission to redefine the engagement between brands and consumers in Southeast Asia.

The way we work:
At Minden, we treat each other with respect. We embrace authenticity and transparency. We pride ourselves on agility and innovation, and believe in embracing continuous learning and self-improvement. We strive to be the preferred employer by providing comprehensive benefits, a dynamic and exciting working environment, work-life balance and effort recognition.

We are seeking for individuals with grit and passion, an insatiable intellectual curiosity and a heart for people to amplify effectiveness as a team.

We are looking for an experienced Platform Operations Manager to join our Operations Team.

Your responsibilities will include but not limited to
Governance and ownership of the App assets
Lead and manage the Operations Executives on the creation and uploading of contents on the App
Ensuring the contents and designs on the App are set up and updated accurately and promptly within the guidelines
Work with the Partnership team to gather the contents for App publishing
Work with the User Experience Design team to improve and update the App visuals and content structure
Work with the Product & Engineering Team on the creation of new tools and gamification
Provide continuous feedback to cross-functional teams to ensure the App is at its best performance

You should have:
Minimally 2 years of working experiences in contents management related fields
Experience working in a matrix structure with multiple stakeholders
Strong project management skills in managing tight timelines
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills and is a strong team player with a proactive attitude
Ability to perform in ambiguous, low control yet fast paced environment
Proficient with the Management tools (SessionM and Contentful)
Experience working in a startup environment will be an added advantage

We regret to inform you that we will not be able to sponsor work pass for this role."
"Head, Collaboration Platform, xCloud","What The Role Is
As a Head (Collaboration Platform) in HTX, you will manage a team to collaborate with key stakeholders in the delivery of ICT application systems for MHA. This covers end-to-end implementation and sustenance of ICT systems and applications from eliciting business requirements, defining and delivering suitable ICT solutions and ensuring their continued operations.

What You Will Be Working On
The job-holder will be responsible to provide oversight in the management of projects under his/her team’s purview and provide guidance on technical implementation, solutioning and consultancy on a spectrum of tasks, which includes the following:

Work with various key stakeholders to elicit, scope and manage the business requirements.
Conceptualise the project, develop the business case for approval.
Translate business requirements into Technical specifications.
Manage and execute the procurement of the ICT application system in a timely manner.
Evaluate and recommend the solution that best address the needs.
Manage the vendors to develop and deliver the solution.
Identify, manage project risks and implications to the project and to recommend mitigating measures.
Manage contractual and payment matters affecting the projects and ensure that systems are operating according to service level agreements.
Understand the various prevailing policies and security guidelines and to ensure the system and processes are designed to comply with these policies and guidelines.
Experience with implementing Corporate ICT systems and Microsoft Sharepoint would be an advantage.

The job-holder will be expected to have supervisory duties as well, in managing a small team to deliver the above tasks. The job-holder will be required to manage and supervise areas such as staff training, competency management and 360 feedback.

What We Are Looking For
Tertiary qualification in Engineering/ Computer Science/ Information Technology or relevant disciplines.
At least 4-7 years of relevant working experience, with prior experience in leading small teams.
Participated in the full software development life cycle (SDLC), with past development experience.
Good analytical, interpersonal, communications and facilitation skills.
Competent, self-motivated, pro-active, dedicated and responsible self-starter.
Experience in implementation of projects in at least one of the following areas (Cloud, Agile Methodologies, Data Analytics, Design Thinking) will be an added advantage.

All new appointees will be appointed on a two-year contract in the first instance.

We wish to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified within 4 weeks upon closing of the advertisement."
QA Engineer (Junior),"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

We are looking for a talented junior QA & Test Engineer to join our team.

This is a full-time permanent position in Singapore. We are open to candidates with little to several years in QA assuming you are strong in Computer Science basics and passionate about engineering/crypto.

Responsibilities:

Work closely with team members (developers, product manager, customer support and partners) to develop, test and deliver high quality products
Create detailed, comprehensive and well-structured test plans and test casesPrevent, collect, analyze and track product defects
Design, develop and execute automation scripts
Manage project dependencies and risk mitigation
Stay up-to-date with new testing tools and test strategies

Requirements:

3+ years experience in software testing methodologies, both manual and automated
Working experience for bank and payment system is a big plus
Experience in writing clear, concise and comprehensive test plans and test cases
Experience testing backend services such as APIs, Databases, distributed services
Familiar with Linux and database operation
Familiar with test environment construction by CICD, Spring Boot
Good programming ability, master at least one of Java, Python and other programming languages
Strong analytical and trouble-shooting skills
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum development process and using collaboration tools, such as Jira, Trello, Slack, etc
Excellent interpersonal, consultative and communication skills
Self-managed, proactive work style
Able to work independently within a team centric environment

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Team Lead,"Description

If you are someone who can thrive in a fast-paced environment and takes pride in delivering smiles to our customers, then Amazon is looking for you. We are hiring for Process Assistant (Team Lead) roles at our Fulfillment Center where associates pick, pack and ship Amazon orders for our customers. If you want to be the one behind the smiles of our customers, take ownership of critical job functions and most importantly, be a part workplace where we “Work Hard, Have Fun, Make History” every day, then join us!

A Process Assistant (Team Lead) is assigned to the Area Manager, and will hold responsibilities specific to the different Fulfillment Center areas. Associates can expect to work across all site job functions including receiving, stocking, and packing products and quality checks.

Key Job Elements
Support and work in the department as required
Helping support daily management of department duties, including allocating labor, leading meetings, assigning job duties, and communicating with internal and external suppliers
Providing vacation coverage for Area Managers
Providing policy follow-up, attendance tracking (duties do not extend to discipline)
Tracking and reporting of labor hours
Assisting the floor as an associate resource, training associates and verifying SOP compliance
Ensuring successful area performance, through tracking, reporting and feedback of associate performance
Participating in Operational Excellence initiatives in some capacity
Filling in as needed with production duties
Fully understanding workflow and daily production goals
Reviewing and updating SOP as required
Assisting in keeping work area clean and organized
Identifying and addressing safety hazards within the work area
Coaching associates to work safely at all times
Participating in safety initiatives
Referring all job injuries immediately to area manager
Amazon is an equal opportunities employer. We believe passionately that employing a diverse workforce is central to our success. We make recruiting decisions based on your experience and skills. We value your passion to discover, invent, simplify and build.

**Amazon Operations and Distribution is a 24/7 environment and shifts may change due to business needs**


Basic Qualifications
Minimum education requirement - Diploma
Proficiency in computer usage, email, MS Office Suite
Demonstrated problem solving skills and analytical skills
Demonstrated communication skills (written and verbal) with all levels of Amazon associates and management
Associate must be in a good standing
Ability to work overtime as required
Ability to work flexible schedules/shifts/areas
Preferred Qualifications
1+ year of leadership experience directly managing others
1+ year working in a like environment (manufacturing/distribution/warehousing/large retail)
Experience with performance metrics and lean process improvement
Excellent written and verbal communication and interpersonal skills to coach, train and assist team members

Company - Amazon Asia-Pacific Holdings

Job ID: A1395083"
Operations Specialist,"Neste Asia Pacific is looking for

Operations Specialist

Your part in Neste’s journey

You will be the team lead for dynamic Non-Bulk and Bulk Operations teams in our Singapore commercial office who coaches and supports the sub teams daily work, execution of commercial, service and/or terminal contracts, ensuring optimal operational performance. Supporting the team in operational challenges, growing operational awareness and overall competency in the team with an in-depth knowledge of operations processes and actions. Drive accurate daily work performance, streamline and efficient processes. Support strong team culture and well-being to achieve set targets.

In your role, you will
Independently leads and supports the team’s daily performance providing Subject Matter Expertise
Analyzing productivity and workload of team members.
Participates in recruiting. Onboarding, orientation, mentoring and coaching of new and existing team members
Participates in performance planning. Follows up on sub team's performance. Provides feedback and identifies teams training needs
Implementation and coaching of Neste templates, instructions and principles
Ensures desk instructions are complete and kept up-to-date. Coordinates vacation and cover planning
Participates in team’s business support, value creation and efficiency adding actions
Leads their weekly team and relevant stakeholder meetings
Coordinates team’s Monthly business review reporting. Supervising and approving designated month end closing activities.
Coordinates internal/external audit requests
Works closely with internal and external stakeholders to improve operational performance
Other possible responsibilities and tasks assigned by the management
You will work closely with external customers, cargo inspectors and logistics suppliers. Your main internal stakeholders include operations team members, sales and supply managers, supply chain planners, finance, laboratory etc. to ensure high level customer and supplier experience. Our work combines commercial understanding with accuracy and cooperation as well as the desire to develop and renew.

Keys to success in this role

The Best Combination Of Experiences, Skills And Background Is
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in a relevant area, e.g. from business, supply chain or engineering/technology
Prior experience in international commodity business and/or logistics
Fluency in English is a must, both written and oral
Have a business and result oriented mindset
Ability to prioritize and handle pressure
Have a flexible, responsible and independent approach to work
SAP experience is an asset
Experience in a leadership role is an asset
We also value
Relevant knowledge of oil and renewable industry, especially from Asia Pacific’s region
In-depth knowledge of cargo operations workflow and efficient ways of carrying out operations with ability to understand the big picture
Performance-driven attitude
Excellent communication and collaboration skills, virtually and in person
Commercial awareness - ability to understand the drivers of a commercial trade and associated P&L
Our success is based on our people who are the driving force behind Neste’s transformation to become a global leader in renewable and circular solutions. The passion that we have for creating a healthier planet for our children is what makes us unique. We believe everyone is a leader and share a natural desire for collaboration. Our three values ``We care, We have courage and We collaborate” are embedded in our everyday work. Working safely and responsibly at all times is essential to all of us.

If this resonates with you, we look forward to receiving your application by 6 January 2023.

If you have any questions regarding the process or the position, please get in touch with joseph.tan@neste.com or kenneth.so@neste.com

Join us in creating a healthier planet for our children.

The recruitment process includes interviews and aptitude testing.

Our success begins with you.

Every company needs a purpose, and Neste has a strong one: to create a healthier planet for our children. We are a team of dedicated professionals committed to that purpose. Everything that we do, down to the smallest detail, shows our clear commitment to tackling the challenges of climate change. As an employer, understanding and valuing wellbeing is vital for our success. At the same time, we encourage every individual at Neste to contribute towards creating a positive impact on the environment as well as on the people, communities and societies around us."
Lead/ Senior Application Consultant (.Net),"What The Role Is
As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.
Information Technology
IT systems form the backbone of our operations. We are looking for individuals with passion and IT expertise, to help us improve the delivery of our systems and services. The Board’s IT systems support a high daily volume of financial transactions for CPF members. In addition to keeping the lights on, the Board also keeps pace with the external environment through innovation in its IT systems.
What You Will Be Working On
You will be involved in the software development lifecycle activities such as analysis, design, development, implementation and maintenance of a variety of mission-critical web applications using Microsoft technologies.
What We Are Looking For
Relevant web application experience
Technically competent in one or more of the following languages, tools and technologies:
- Frontend/full-stack development experience using Microsoft Azure development platform such as .Net core, Logic Apps, App Services, Azure Data Factor, SQL database,
- Others such as Angular, NodeJS, CSS, HTML, Javascript, etc
- Micro-services and container technologies eg. Kubernetes,
- Restful API, OAUTH 2 and 2 Way SSL
Experience in building secure and resilient applications
Experience in the following will be an added advantage:
- UI/UX design
- Adobe technologies eg. Adobe Experience Manager (Sites/Forms), Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Adobe Launch, Adobe Campaign, Adobe Audience Manager
- Azure DevOps
- GitHub
- Agile software development tools and standards eg. SCRUM
Proven experiences in implementing, troubleshooting, performance tuning of web applications
What you can expect
A challenging and rewarding career
A variety of formal and informal training where you can hone your skills in the evolving technology landscape
Promotion opportunities through your capability and on the job performance
A friendly work environment with like-minded colleagues to co-create and collaborate together
A hybrid work model where you can work remotely up to 50% of the time
A productive yet growth-oriented workplace with flexible dress code where you are empowered to decide your appropriate outfit for the day
Comprehensive rewards package
Annual leave and pro-family leave
Medical and dental benefits
Access to recreational activities
Position is on 2-year full time contract directly under the payroll of CPF Board with potential for emplacement into permanent position"
Solutions Architect,"Job Responsibilities:
1. Responsible for participating in the planning and execution of various Technical & Pre-Sales activities,
2. Responsible analyze competitor products and solutions.
3. Assist selecting and winning of fist 3 projects of industry products/solutions,
4. Responsible of technical support to partners (technical training and key project support and guide)
5. Responsible for Technical Demo or POC planning and present.
Job Qualifications:
1. Bachelor degree or above, major in computer, software engineering, communication, etc.;
2. 3+ years of pre-sales experience in: education industry(preferred), healthcare, government, medium and large enterprise industry.
3. Good customer communication and presentation skills, strong document writing and presentation skills, sensitive to new technologies; eager to learn and grow.
4. Good network technology skills. (Holding CCIE, CCNP or similar certificate preferred)
5. Ability and experience in network planning and design, complete POC configuration and demonstration of products and solutions;
6. Good English, coordination and persuasion skills."
Assistant Principal Data Scientist/Analyst,"ST Engineering is an integrated Maintenance Repair and Overhaul (MRO) service provider. We offer solutions that optimise the life cycle of customer vehicle assets (air, land and sea), including maintenance to ensure equipment serviceability and smooth vehicle fleet operations.
The candidate shall be responsible for the application of Machine Learning techniques and Data Science-related technology in the area of Predictive Maintenance for various vehicular systems.
Job Description
Ability to understand business needs and translate them to a data analytics plan for developing the required solution.
Recorded vehicle-related (air, land and sea vehicles) sensor & defect report data understanding, cleansing, uploading to database.
Tap knowledge from vehicle domain experts and write SQL scripts to manage & query databases to extract & generate required data for analysis.
Compare & assess various machine learning methods to generate insights, detect anomalies and predict remaining useful life of vehicle components and engines.
Ability to implement the developed and tuned model(s) in Python/R, SQL and/or C# is preferred.
Ability to develop dashboards to show the results for internal & external customers is preferred.
Requirements
Degree in Engineering or Computer Science or IT, with Data Science elective
Work experience in Data Science or Analytics, Probability & Statistics, Python programming and SQL scripting
Good team player and communicator
Experience in developing Data Science models and Analytics dashboards to communicate with the team, Management and customers."
"Senior Software Engineer, Mobile","We are living in dynamic times. Technology is reshaping how we live, and we want to use it to redefine how financial services are offered. Grab is the leading technology company in Southeast Asia offering everyday services to the masses. Singtel is Asia’s leading communications group connecting millions of consumers and enterprises to essential digital services. This is why we are coming together to unlock big dreams, and financial inclusion for people in our region is just one of them. We want to build a digital bank with the right foundation - using data, technology and trust to solve problems and serve customers. If you have what it takes to help build this new Digibank with us.

Get to know the team:

We are seeking talented & passionate Mobile Engineers (Junior and Senior) to join our team.

When people talk about Digibank, they generally refer to the apps that we develop, optimize and maintain. With all eyes on us, you’ll be treated as a hero when you deliver according to our high expectations. Our mobile engineering team is a large international group of highly talented developers who strive for quality and innovation. You’ll be working in an agile and test-driven development environment. Apart from developing new features, platforms and maintaining existing products, you also trial and evaluate new mobile technologies.

We are continuously looking to innovate payment platforms, which requires the help of top-notch engineers. Operating on this level is hard but deeply rewarding.

Get to know the role:
Work closely with the Product, UX/UI and Backend teams to design, build and extend consumer and/or partner facing new products, platforms and features.
Build reusable Android software components.
Collaborate with QA on continuous integration and delivery (CI/CD) as well as other automated and manual testing to make sure our app releases are always worthy of five star ratings.
Monitor the performance of the live apps and continuously improve them on both code and experience level.
Raise the bar by reviewing each other's code, share knowledge, tips and tricks, and generally help out - within and across teams. This may include pair programming.
Evaluate new mobile methodologies and technologies.

The Must-Haves:
A degree in computer science, software engineering, information technology or related fields.
Up-to-date on the modern Android programming paradigm, including the use of RxJava and/or Kotlin.
Strong UX/UI design exposure and experience in making apps work intuitively and with pixel perfect interfaces.
Familiar with MVVM, Clean Architecture.
Strong CS fundamentals (with competencies in algorithms and data structures).
You are highly accountable and take ownership. You also have a collaborative attitude, because ‘Your Problem Is My Problem’ (YPIMP).
(For Senior Engineers) At least 5 years of mobile engineering experience with a track record of building and maintaining complex applications.
(For Senior Engineers) Working knowledge of several architectural approaches, caching, data storage and security."
Technical Lead - Digital Banking,"About Us

We are an established, globally active management consulting company with offices in Switzerland, Germany, Austria, UK, USA, Singapore, Hong Kong, the Philippines, Australia, Indonesia and India. We are a valued partner to many of the world‘s largest international financial services and insurance firms. We support our clients at all project management stages from the development of strategies and operational frameworks to the technical implementation and handover. Our expertise in business and technology combined with our methodic approach enable us to create sustainable added value for our client’s business.

About the job:

Design and write with cutting-edge languages to improve the availability, scalability, latency, and efficiency of Digi bank’s range of services
Work with the engineering team to explore and create new designs/architectures geared toward scale and performance
Participate in code and design reviews to maintain our high development standards
Engage in service capacity and demand planning, software performance analysis, tuning, and optimization
Collaborate with product and experience teams to define and prototype feature specifications
Work closely with the infrastructure team in building and scaling back-end services as well as performing root cause analysis investigations
Design, build, analyze and fix large-scale systems
Learn full-stack performance tuning and optimization
Debug and modify complex, production software


Requirements

A Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Information Technology, or related fields with strong Computer Science fundamentals in algorithms and data structures
6+ experience in software engineering in a distributed systems environment, and retail/ digital banking space.
Track record of designing, developing, and implementing large-scale highly available online services.
Strong understanding of system performance and scaling
Possess excellent communication, sharp analytical abilities with proven design skills, able to think critically of the current system in terms of growth and stability
You can be a good coder in any language (C++, C, Java, Scala, Rust, Haskell, OCaml, Erlang, Python, Ruby, PHP, Node.JS, C# etc.), but willing to work on Golang
You believe in Agile development and putting the customer first in anything you design; experience with SCRUM is a plus
You’ve designed and clearly understand concepts like Web Services, SOA, REST APIs, RPC, SPRING Framework, and Micro Front Ends
You want to hit the ground running on Day 1; you take ownership of your work and can work independently
For Lead Positions – we’re looking for a hands-on leader who regularly codes. This leader should be comfortable leading a tribe of engineers.


Requirement:
At least 3 years of experience in sales and business development.
Strong track record in C-Level negotiations and possess an ability to understand the different nuances in negotiation.
Strong verbal and written communication.
Exhibit proficiency in Microsoft Office Excel and PowerPoint.
Possess critical thinking and problem-solving skills.
A keen learner with an inquisitive mind.
Tenacious and able to adapt quickly and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
Self-motivated, proactive, and driven.
Meticulous with a keen eye for detail.
Adept at working and communicating with various internal stakeholders.
Take relationship accountability for potential customers and maximize minting volume into the business globally by successfully pitching to potential investors (this includes getting partners to announce that they’ll be using us).
Support your wider team in all aspects of the sales process and keep accountable to your KPIs.
Foster a culture of over-achievement to achieve our targets.


Why us:


Attractive fringe benefits and remunerations that are market-competitive


You will be provided with training and mentorship to progress in your career


Can-do mentality and one-spirit culture


Varied events and employee initiatives

We look forward to receiving your resume to: career.id@synpulse.com. Also do visit us at"
Cybersecurity Engineer (Fraud Analysis & Threat Hunting),"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) seeks to transform the delivery of Government Digital Services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with the public to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

Imagine citizens having a common and secure digital identity that will make their lives so much easier, and open doors to a plethora of services for them - allowing citizens to do everything from accessing health prescriptions, completing government transactions to starting a bank account through their smartphone.

If you are inspired by this vision, we invite you to join our National Digital Identity team. You will collaborate with a team of highly motivated peers to develop and deploy the next generation National Digital Identity platform that will transform the lives of citizens by enabling secure and seamless delivery of personalized online digital experiences.

What you will be working on:

This officer will be part of the fraud analytics operation team and is required to carry out below duties:

Perform weekly monitoring and analysis of transactional records and datasets in the risky score band
Provide a report on the trends and unusual activities within the risky score band
Escalate the unusual activities for further investigation
Liaise with various teams for follow-up on investigation status
Conduct proactive hunting for fraud trends
Analyse and propose the list of detection rules that require further fine-tuning
Perform rules enhancement/finetune in system

What we are looking for:

Intermediate level of data analysis and reporting experience in professional setting
Experience dealing with large data sets
Experience with SQL and the ability to create complex queries and joins
Good data analysis skills and having prior experience with data tools: R, SPSS, SAS and Tableau
Experience with high level programming languages: Python, or similar
High level concepts of Online Behavioural Analysis and Internet Security
Good written and verbal communication skills

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is essential to innovation. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, gender, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform crucial job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment.

Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s meaningful for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
Senior / Partnerships Manager,"We are looking for an Senior Partnerships Manager for M-DAQ Global to be based in Singapore. As part of this dynamic role, you will manage and acquire new partners for the firm through strategic partnership channels.
You will report to Head of Partnerships and work closely with key stakeholders to ensure all strategic relationships with partners are properly managed.


Key Responsibilities
Lead and grow both strategic and commercial partnerships for the firm across Southeast Asia and North Asia
Manage and maintain ongoing productive relationship with existing strategic partners
Having a good and sound understanding of FinTech and Payments landscape and equipped to identify potential partners to expand firm’s outreach in the Southeast Asia and North Asia region
Coordinate and manage partner’s onboarding process from initial outreach, commercial negotiation to execution
Drive accountability by managing partnership pipelines and ensuring all partnership initiatives are aligned with firm’s overall business vision and strategy

Desired Skill Set and Attributes

Degree in Business / Finance or related disciplines
6-8 years of work experience in partnerships, business development or sales in banking / fintech / payments service providers / brokerage / online travel industries
Demonstrated track record of successfully securing and managing partnerships and business opportunities
Strong analytical, problem-solving skills and can navigate complex commercial discussions
Proficient in English and possess good written communication skills
10% traveling required"
Quality Engineer - Automation Selenium,"Roles and Responsibility
Build advanced automated test suites to exercise our world-class applications
Conduct load and performance tests to identify system bottleneck
Conduct research on emerging technologies
Analyse and decompose complex software systems to craft various test strategies
Collaborate with Product Owners and stakeholders for User Acceptance Testing (UAT) with manual/functional/performance/exploratory testing
Conduct application performance and security testing to ensure we have a robust and secured system in place
Maintain and improve automated regression test suite in testing environments
Actively refine and improve test plans on the CI pipeline
Perform system integration testing with other system owners
Manage defect life cycle
Drive continuous improvement in Agile testing practices and tools
Perform peer code review to ensure code quality is upheld
Involve in supporting and resolving production issues
What You’ll Bring To The Team
Minimum 3 years of professional software quality testing experience in application regression test automation, performance and or security testing
Strong understanding of test-driven development (TDD), continuous integration and continuous delivery
Experience with coding in any of the following programming languages (Java, JavaScript, Python)
Experience with various testing tools and automated testing frameworks (Robot, Selenium, Cypress, Cucumber)
Meticulous attention to details
Excellent verbal communication with non-technical stakeholders
Proactive, self-driven and motivate
Bonus Points For
Degree in software engineering, computer engineering, electrical engineering or info-comm related discipline
Experience in an Agile development environment
Experience with automated testing frameworks (i.e. Robot, Selenium, Cypress)
Experience with performance testing tools (JMeter, Gatling, Locust, HP LoadRunner)
Experience with penetration testing tools (ZAP, Burp Suite, SQL Map, HP WebInspect)
Experience with CI and deployment builds (Bamboo, Gitlab, Jenkins, TeamCity)
Experience with Docker containers
Experience with AWS services (Glue, Lambda, DynamoDB, MSK)
Employee Status : Full Time Employee

Shift : Day Job

Travel : No

Job Posting : Jan 05 2023

About Cognizant

Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 185 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @Cognizant."
Account Executive - Indonesia Market (Lark APAC),"Responsibilities

Lark

Lark is a next-generation team productivity suite that boosts organizations' efficiency, creativity, and engagement. It seamlessly integrates Messenger, Docs, Calendar, Video calls, Emails, OKR, and more into one easy-to-use app.

Why Join Us

At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.

About Lark APAC Sales Team

Lark APAC Sales Team is responsible for APAC market expansion by helping businesses transform digitally through our collaboration solution. The sales team will explore and tap into market opportunities to acquire new customers.

Job Responsibilities

Prospect relentlessly to build pipeline and strong relationships with the assigned markets
Own and overachieve assigned quota
Create reliable forecasts, manage pipeline and achieve target of key customer references and active adoption of the Lark platform
Negotiate favorable pricing and business terms with small and medium enterprises by selling value and ROI
Listen to the needs of the market and share insights with product and marketing teams
Create and own your plan towards how you can achieve the goals as set to you by the business
Have an intuitive sense of required steps to close business and gain customer validation and identify robust set of business drivers behind all opportunities
Maintain, build and manage specific relationships internally and externally with customers and partners for your territory including existing relationships and aspirational contacts
Be proactive about solving problems even if it’s outside of your area and be ready to take on additional initiatives and responsibilities as they emerge
Have a thorough understanding of customer's business and ensure continued usage from customers

Qualifications

University degree or equivalent experience. MBA will be an advantage
Experienced in selling and developing the business portfolio in APAC; focusing on Indonesia market
Prior sales or business development relevant experience working with SMB, enterprises and/or growth-stage startups for SaaS/IT product
Problem solving ability in a sales environment including the ability to qualify and close business.
Excellent customer skills and people management skills.
Understanding of competitive landscape for growing the business’ revenue and devising strategies / programs for success.
Detail oriented, able to track and organize information, data and communications efficiently to ensure business issues are dealt with promptly and properly.
Ability to negotiate agreements and/or reach consensus with all levels and positions within the organization.
Considerable knowledge of current trends and best practices.
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Fluency in Bahasa Indonesia will be an added advantage to bridge communication with local Indo customers/partners

ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

Lark will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require Lark sponsorship of a visa."
"Software Engineer, Trilogy (Remote) - $100,000/year USD","Crossover is the world's #1 source of full-time remote jobs. Our clients offer top-tier pay for top-tier talent. We're recruiting this role for our client, Trilogy. Have you got what it takes?

“Coding competitions are for university students” - Wrong.

“Competitive programming is a sport for your free time. Building a software development career is something completely different” - Incorrect.

“Software developers work in Agile teams. You need to collaborate and participate in daily project and team meetings.” - Not when you are with us.

Trilogy uses cloud-native technologies to improve software products for dozens of customers, and we are looking for veteran competitive programmers to help us. We have reinvented the software development process to break down product specs and milestones into individual code challenges with 4-8 hour SLAs, and your job is to crack the problem and beat the clock. It’s no different from a coding competition - except for the $100k salary and the chance to quadruple your compensation as you move up the Engineering ladder.

The future of work started long ago with us. Home office twice a week? We have been working from wherever we want for the last fifteen years in our 100% remote model. While scrum rituals and daily standups are still dominating the rest of the industry, our team is already operating under a global asynchronous model where each developer follows 8-hour shifts three or four days a week, plans the rest of their workweek flexibly, and never exceeds 40 hours. The development operates 24x7, but you are free to choose your own schedule!

This role will challenge and develop you like no other while still providing the perks for optimal work-life balance. Apply today to join our team!

What You Will Be Doing

Implementing new features on existing software products by solving complex implementation problems and making the appropriate technical decisions.
Fixing bugs to permanently eliminate defects that impair product functionality.
Reviewing code from other developers to ensure they meet strict code quality standards and will not cause a regression.
Performing root cause analyses that investigate defects based on reported outages, and create product fixes.

What You Won’t Be Doing

Dealing with unclear expectations or non-technical managers. Every task will have a clear scope and objective for you to implement, defined by a technical VP of Engineering.
Executing repeated tasks for the same product using the same tech stack. Our portfolio of 60+ products ensures you are always tackling new challenges.
Managing projects or stakeholders. We have automated management overhead so you can focus entirely on programming.

Software Engineer Key Responsibilities

Deliver flawless features and bug fixes that make customers delighted with Trilogy products.

Basic Requirements

5+ years of software development experience, enabling senior-level programming skills and basic software architecture expertise
Proven experience as a competitive coder
Availability to work in at least one of the 8-hour shift options starting at 3 am, 11 am, or 7 pm UTC during three or four days a week (shift rotation includes work during weekends)
A drive to develop yourself and push your limits, embracing direct feedback and a high-quality bar

About Trilogy

Hundreds of software businesses run on the Trilogy Business Platform. For three decades, Trilogy has been known for 3 things: Relentlessly seeking top talent, Innovating new technology, and incubating new businesses. Our technological innovation is spearheaded by a passion for simple customer-facing designs. Our incubation of new businesses ranges from entirely new moon-shot ideas to rearchitecting existing projects for today's modern cloud-based stack. Trilogy is a place where you can be surrounded with great people, be proud of doing great work, and grow your career by leaps and bounds.

There is so much to cover for this exciting role, and space here is limited. Hit the Apply button if you found this interesting and want to learn more. We look forward to meeting you!

Working with Crossover

This is a full-time (40 hours per week), long-term position. The position is immediately available and requires entering into an independent contractor agreement with Crossover. The compensation level for this role is $50 USD/hour, which equates to $100,000 USD/year assuming 40 hours per week and 50 weeks per year. The payment period is weekly. Consult www.crossover.com/help-and-faqs for more details on this topic.

What to expect next:

You will receive an email with a link to start your self-paced, online job application.
Our hiring platform will guide you through a series of online “screening” assessments to check for basic job fit, job-related skills, and finally a few real-world job-specific assignments.

Important! If you do not receive an email from us:

First, emails may take up to 15 minutes to send, refresh and check again.
Second, check your spam and junk folders for an email from Crossover.com, mark as “Not Spam” since you will receive other emails as well.
Third, we will send to whatever email account you indicated on the Apply form - by default, that is the email address you use as your LinkedIn username and it might be different than the one you have already checked.
If all else fails, just reset your password by visiting https://www.crossover.com/auth/password-recovery if you already applied using LinkedIn EasyApply.
Crossover Job Code: LJ-3888-SG-Singapor-SoftwareEngine1.077"
Product Manager 2 - Technical,"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.

Job Description Summary:

PayPal is the world’s leader in online payments processing. The company helps buyers and sellers around the world make and receive payments. PayPal is headquartered in San Jose, CA with multiple offices within the United States and around the world. Compliance is one of PayPal’s core competencies and is a key contributor to the company’s profitability and the customer value proposition, which is focused on secure payments. The Compliance team is responsible for the global approach to assessing various buyer-side and seller-side Compliances that PayPal takes on (including identity fraud, seller fraud, account takeover, credit) and the treatments, actions and experiences triggered by the results of the Compliance assessment and used by PayPal to control losses. The product management team in Compliance Platform builds innovative products to manage Compliance Risk

Job Description:

Responsibilities

The goal of the Compliance Platform team is to deliver time to market improvements, cost reduction, and quality improvements in support of Compliance initiatives and solutions.

Platform Capabilities

Define and drive the next generation Compliance Platform required to support growing needs of PayPal
Own the investment and roadmap for Compliance Platform build-out
Define and build the Platform with product development and architecture.
Maintain and support the Platform, ensuring definition and ongoing monitoring of Platform KPIs for both Financial and Regulatory Compliance
Have a keen interest in being hands-on on higher level tasks (design, analysis)
Readiness to be in our users’ shoes – be the level one users of Platform and capabilities
Create use cases and product requirement documents to articulate desired service features and functionality to the user experience and technology teams for both tactical project delivery and long term strategic direction of Compliance service capabilities.
Gain deep understanding of customer experiences and preferences and funnel the requirements to build a scalable infrastructure than goes beyond channel / device.


Integration

Be an expert on Compliance and Compliance Platform within PayPal
Understand Integration needs (internal systems and external); assimilate and synthesize the needs of various stakeholders into a common set of platform capabilities and Platform
Partner with other groups within and outside Compliance to define business goals and metrics, understand Platform capabilities, leverage existing solutions, or implement and deploy new solution and platform capabilities
Assess buy vs. build and work with 3rd parties to integrate Compliance Platform on a case-by-case basis


Team Leadership

Lead by influence, with strong execution skills and focus.
Ongoing focus on Compliance business knowledge; ability to constantly prioritize and to deal with ambiguity.
Lead project teams of engineers and designers to ensure that the product solution delivers to requirements and meets business needs
Collaborate across business and technical areas to manage all aspects of Compliance Platform
Present business case, product roadmaps, and strategies to key stakeholders and executives
Creates new metrics to measure customer insights as needed. Helps more junior PMs understand key customer insights. Gathers insights about competitor's customers
Persuades leadership with verbal arguments. Thinks and responds to questions in real-time, varying the approach based on audience needs and reactions
Sought after to help attract, hire and retain talent across product roles. Cultivates talent through career mentorship.
Works with product development and quality engineering team leads to consistently manage multiple products to planned milestones with high quality. Effectively plans resourcing based on priorities and constraints


Innovate

Introduce new products, programs, policies, and procedures to achieve business strategies
Source and develop strategic relationships with industry partners and alliances
Drives innovative solutions to cross-domain product gaps or misalignment of goals. Learning to make difficult trade-off decisions under stress. Reputation for getting things done.


Requirements

2 to 3 years of Product Management experience or related field, including technical product management, software development, or analytics. Total experience of 2 to 3 years.
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in a relevant field, such as Computer Science
MBA Preferred
Ability to understand and appreciate engineering and analytical solutions. Understanding of web technologies, SOAP, XML, WSDL, Java, relational databases. Experience developing/working with API sets and Platform.
Skill sets: analytical, problem solver, strategic planning, leadership, project management and execution, communication with diverse audiences and stakeholders, (written, verbal, and oral)
The candidate should bring a high level of enthusiasm to the projects, the ability to organize and motivate large groups and a high degree of passion for technology
Demonstrated track record managing all aspects of a successful software or technology product throughout its lifecycle, including product strategy development, requirements definition, product marketing, and product P&L ownership
Experience with SOA, Data repositories/warehouses, Disputes and Case Management systems (Pega) and processes, Rules Engines (Blaze) or payments or Compliance management a strong plus.
Previous Technical Product management a plus


Opportunities

Join the market leader in online payments, playing a leadership role in a fast-growing space that is relevant to the lives of millions of users on a daily basis
Join a group that is one of the best in the Compliance and Compliance industry
Launch a career in Compliance and Compliance, acquire a highly sought-after spike while leveraging your quantitative/analytical/technical background and learning about Payments and Ecommerce
Work with high-performing professionals, in a culture that is very merit-focused and gives ample opportunities for growth and development to its best performers


Our Benefits:

At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.

We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:

To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

PayPal has remained at the forefront of the digital payment revolution for more than 20 years. By leveraging technology to make financial services and commerce more convenient, affordable, and secure, the PayPal platform is empowering more than 400 million consumers and merchants in more than 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy. For more information, visit paypal.com.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.

As part of PayPal’s commitment to employees’ health and safety, we have established in-office Covid-19 protocols and requirements, based on expert guidance. Depending on location, this might include a Covid-19 vaccination requirement for any employee whose role requires them to work onsite. Employees may request reasonable accommodation based on a medical condition or religious belief that prevents them from being vaccinated.

REQ ID R0096608"
Solution Architect - DaaS and Managed Services,"Description And Requirements

Lenovo (HKSE: 992) (ADR: LNVGY) is a US$70 billion revenue Fortune Global 500 company serving customers in 180 markets around the world. Focused on a bold vision to deliver smarter technology for all, we are developing world-changing technologies that power (through devices and infrastructure) and empower (through solutions, services and software) millions of customers every day and together create a more inclusive, trustworthy and sustainable digital society for everyone, everywhere. To find out more visit https://www.lenovo.com,and read about the latest news via our StoryHub.

Position Description

Lenovo is currently seeking an experienced Device as a Service (DaaS) Solution Architect who will develop comprehensive, creative and cost-effective services solutions for our customers within a Device as a Service model. Successful candidates will evaluate customer opportunities as presented in, RFPs/RFQs or engagements, from the Services Sales teams and use this information to develop solutions to meet customer’s requirements. Lenovo DaaS solutions may incorporate one or more lifecycle services including plan, configure, deploy, support, manage, and/or retire stages. As a DaaS Solution Architect, you will collaborate with internal teams and Lenovo Services delivery partners, as well as travel to facilitate workshops with customers for scoping requirements. The ideal candidate will successfully partner across multiple organizations including, but not limited to, sales; finance; service delivery; customers and business partners and is expected to lead all elements of the services solution governance from the project kickoff; stakeholder coordination and end solution strategy. The DaaS Solution Architect will also contribute to customer presentations and briefings, provide input during deal qualification reviews, and prepare content for solution reviews with key stakeholders as required. Upon award, the DaaS Solution Architect is responsible for the development of a SOW contract with the customer as well as with any selected business partners, which includes negotiation with the partner and the customer to ensure that requirements are explicitly documented to mitigate risk. Finally, the DaaS Solution Architect is expected to promote, sell, manage pipeline and contribute to the overall business management systems within the services group.

Position Requirements

5+ years of Contract Management, SOW’s, Business Development, Professional Services, Project Management and/or IT Services operations experience.
Preference will be given to candidates with direct experience in Managed Services Industry focused on PC’s
Proven success in building solutions in the Managed Services industry
Strategic mindset and sound business acumen are required, along with effective decision making, contract negotiation and partner management skills
Excellent communication, both oral and written, and polished presentation skills
Strong prioritization skills, attention to detail, commitment to deadlines
Proficiency in Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, Excel, MS Dynamics
Proven ability to operate with a high level of professionalism; entrepreneurialism and agility
Demonstrated ability to work across all levels of the organization with a teaming attitude
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience required
Travel estimated at 40%
Fluent in English

Additional Preferred Qualifications

MBA or Advanced technical degree
Experience with MS Dynamics, Salesforce & ServiceNow
Consumption based sales experience in SaaS, DaaS, or Cloud Services.
Global Account or Global Enterprise Account Sales experience with multiple stakeholder buy in.

References

Visible links

https://www.lenovo.com/
http://storyhub.lenovo.com/"
Software Engineer (Real Time Communication) - TikTok,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

TikTok RTC is the world's leading real-time communications service, providing instant and high-quality multimedia interactions to customers around the world. We are building next-generation audio/video processing and interaction platforms to deliver high-volume, low-latency and rich Cloud as a Service technology.

Our popular products are empowered by our cutting-edge RTC technology. Working in this team, you will have the opportunity to meet the challenges of advanced audio/video algorithm design and global large-scale real-time communications interaction, while improving your skills in encoding, algorithms, data by working with many outstanding real-time communications professionals. Expertise in analytics and large-scale system design.

Responsibilities
- Responsible for researching and developing real-time communication SDK on Windows or MacOS with high-quality code
- Responsible for the design and development of RTC solutions for TikTok
- Responsible for optimising connectivity index, performance, stability, and audio & video quality to improve user experiences.
- Continuously tracking and learning new technologies and new architectures.
- Willing to challenge and resolve difficult technical problems.

Qualifications

- Bachelor Degree or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields
- At least 5 years experience in developing frontend web applications
- Proficient in C/C++, solid knowledge of multi-threading, data structure, operating system and network
- Familiar with system architecture and audio & video multimedia client development
- Good learning ability, communication ability, logical thinking ability, and innovation ability
- Experience in live streaming, co-host, player SDK, and video conference is preferred
- Experience in ffmpeg, x264, WebRTC, etc. is preferred

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
IC Design System/AMS Verification Engineer,"In the fast growing digital world, STSECURE products and solutions protect your privacy and your assets by ensuring their confidentiality, their integrity and their availability to authorized requesters where and when needed. We deliver hardware- and software-certified solutions, offer seamless integration of security features, and are experts in cryptography and device architecture. With its STSECURE portfolio, ST is securing all your applications from traditional applications, such as SIM, banking and ID, to the latest ones including contactless transactions and IoT connectivity.
Work Location : Ang Mo Kio BHQ at 5A Serangoon North Avenue 5 Singapore 554574
The position is an exciting opportunity to be part of a dynamic team in the growing markets of secure microcontrollers used in state-of-the-art secure applications including IOT, Mobile, Banking and Band Protection. The role works within the digital team in Singapore that includes all disciplines required for digital design and verification.
Job scope:
· Work on IP verification or SOC verification.
· Verification planning, this includes vplan writing, functional points identification and review.
· Multi languages testbench development.
· Implementation using different verification techniques (constraint random dynamics simulation and static formal verification).
· Verification closure by ensuring 100% coverage functionality are fully covered.
· Schedule preparation and execution adhere to plan.
· Good reporting to the management.
Requirements:
· Masters in Electronics' Engineering (a relevant experience with atleast 6 years in a semiconductor or high technology R&D environment would be appreciated)
· Experience in Digital IP verification and good understanding of microcontroller architecture.
· Experience in Hardware Design Language (such as VHDL or Verilog).
· Experience in Digital verification with various skill sets:
o (a) Universal Verification Methodology (UVM) & SystemVerilog (SV)
o (b) System Verilog Assertions (SVA)
o (c) C/C++ language
o (d) Formal Methodology (e.g JasperGOLD)
o (e) Coverage analysis
o (f) Low-power verification
o (g) Scripting languages (e.g TCL, SHELL, PERL, PYTHON)
· Good communication and written skills in English.
· Able to work in a multi-cultural team.
· Strong analytical and problem solving skill.
· Able to keep up with fast moving new verification methodology"
Product Engineer (Java),"Responsibilities
Responsible for design, implement and testing the application to achieve project goals and objectives
Responsible to write the clean code, testable and maintainable
Perform peer code reviews
Participate in regular tech-sharing sessions and team retrospectives
Responsible for documentation update
Work closely with internal team or cross-functional teams when necessary
Able to adopt latest software development trends and industry best practices
Happier to deliver output in fast paced and result driven environment
Involved in application support and with other internal teams to facilitate root cause analysis of application issues to meet the required SLA

Job Specifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science (related) or higher
At least 3 years of experience of hands-on development experience or in a similar role
Team player with good communication skills in English
Proficient in Java 8 and above
Proficient in Spring Framework, Spring Boot, Spring Integration, Hibernate and RESTful APIs implementation
Experience in SQL database
Knowledge in design pattern
Good problem-solving skills and ability to think outside the box
Excellent verbal and written communication skills in English

Good to have
Full-stack experience or other experiences with open source technologies
Secure software development
Distributed application using message queue
Agile practice or Scrum knowledge
Experience in using JIRA"
"Senior Manager, Program Development (Outreach and Delivery)","about the company


My client is a leading training provider that helps to equip wealth and asset management professionals with superb industry knowledge and expertise.



about the job


You will play a key role in developing and managing programmes, mainly focused on sustainability / ESG and topics related to the financial services industry. You will be working closely with the faculty, industry experts and stakeholders to develop content and curriculum for new programmes, including course structure, teaching materials, learning content and assessments, while keeping relevant skills framework in mind to meet certain accreditation. You will need to understand the learning needs of your clients to cater and tailor solutions for them, and also plan and deliver outreach initiatives, such as webinars, conferences and campaigns, to continuously engage the community. Working in collaboration with leading universities and global thought leaders to gather insights regarding research projects and develop case studies alongside faculty and researchers, will also fall under your care.




about the manager/team


You will report to the Head of Department and will have 2 Program Managers reporting to you.



skills and experience required


The ideal candidate should be tertiary educated and have at least 8 years of experience in a similar role, preferably in account management and managing programmes. You should be meticulous, organised and have strong interpersonal and coordination skills to ensure efficient communication and quality standards of service to the faculty and clients. Exhibiting a positive attitude and energy, along with the ability to work effectively and independently, will contribute to your success in this role.





To apply online please use the 'apply' function. Consultant in-charge: Rebecca Koh

(EA: 94C3609/ R2198637 )



Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
Quality Assurance Engineer - Trust and Safety Platform,"Responsibilities

[About Tiktok]
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

[About the Team]
Our content platform team enables the content safety and content understanding for all ByteDance's products, which is crucial for the business development and growth.

[Responsibilities]
- Responsible for the quality of Trust & Safety Platform's overseas business
- Contribute to the team's technology, not limited to automatic testing ,security testing and custom testing
- Innovate test tools, test tech, test platform, product R&D to improve test efficiency
- Contribute to online troubleshooting, provide advice and summarize the reasons for improvement
- Maintain test environment and build CI/CD

Qualifications

[Minimum Qualifications]
- Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent with 3+ years of relevant experience
- Development experience in at least one programming language (Python/django/Java/Go/C++).
- Solid computer basics (network/database/algorithm).

[Preferred Qualifications]
- Familiar with API test platform, pytest, diff tools is a plus.
- Familiar with django/golang/C++ is a plus.
- Proactive, self-driven, and in-depth understanding of the business; capability of communicating with cross-functional teams and taking charge of a business independently.
- Familiar with web architecture, understanding of Django/Flask and other frameworks is preferred.
- Experience in continuous integration is preferred.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Real Time Solutions Consultant, APAC","As part of the Data and Analytics Product Team, we have an immediate opening for a Real Time, Enterprise Solutions Consultant with C++ Developer experience role in APAC.

We are looking for passionate and enthusiastic problem-solvers with expertise in capital markets data to join us as we continue providing technology innovation and support to the world’s leading global capital markets companies. In this role, you will be part of a growing, talented team that is tasked with presenting the Data and Analytics Real Time data solutions to the financial services industry.

The role of the Real Time, Enterprise Solutions Consultant, within the high performing Enterprise Product Management team, will help focus on commercialising the next generation of software and data solutions primarily into Tier 1 banks, hedge funds, asset managers and proprietary trading firms.


In this role, you will support the sales team by providing deep technical expertise on the Enterprise Data Divisions Real Time product suite, features, benefits and capabilities. You will work in tandem with the sales team to present our offerings using a solution selling approach and work creatively to solve problems and bring deals to a successful close.

You will be tasked with executing our strategy for long term sustainable growth of Refinitiv’s footprint in this area through an understanding of market, client needs and competitive dynamics that will assist in driving Sales execution. The role will require the successful candidate to possess strong technical domain and product expertise to work with the local Sales and Account Management teams to deliver results.


Realtime Low Latency Direct Feeds, End of Day & Time Series Pricing Data (all asset classes)
Workbench Data Management tools and services
Professional Services Solutions


As a Solutions Consultant you will be seen as the technical specialist when it comes to supporting the sale of our Real Time Data Solutions and will be accountable for ensuring that business and technology requirements are understood and how our services meet those needs. You will need to:

Develop subject matter expertise on all Data and Analytics Real Time products and services and gain a deep understanding of the underlying technologies, uses and functionalities
Develop subject matter expertise on client requirements and use cases and the applicability of Data and Analytics Real Time products and services to their businesses
Answer questions from prospective clients relating to Data and Analytics Real Time products and services, and respond to RFIs/RFPs
Work alongside the sales team, performing product demos for prospective clients and attend trade shows to promote and demo Data and Analytics Real Time products
Collaborate with Sales, Engineering, and Implementation teams to develop proposals and design custom solutions for prospective clients
Research the competition, their capabilities, strengths, and shortfalls to enhance Data and Analytics Real Time value proposition as well as to anticipate and adapt to any upcoming changes in the industry landscape
Keep up to date on regulatory and industry challenges/opportunities, to enhance Data and Analytics Real Time commercial opportunity, value proposition as well as to anticipate and adapt to any upcoming changes in the industry landscape
Help the Sales Team structure appropriate client solutions


The ideal candidate should have professional experience as a sales engineer, technical presales or other relevant position, preferably with a background in financial services and/or capital markets technology.

Superb written and verbal communication skills.
Outstanding sales ability, with a proven track record in enterprise sales, closing complex deals involving multiple stakeholders.
A degree in computer science or other highly technical field is strongly preferred.
Previous experience as a Software Engineer with working knowledge of C++ is a must.
Highly motivated self-starter, Creative problem solver and good sales ideation skills

At LSEG, we believe that creating a diverse and inclusive organisation is fundamental to the way we deliver on our promise of creating essential partnerships and open opportunities. Our open culture is central to how we deliver our purpose – driving financial stability, empowering economies and enabling customers to create sustainable growth – in everything we do.

Working with us means that you will be part of a dynamic organisation of 25,000 people across 70 countries. However, we will value your individuality and enable you to bring your true self to work so you can help enrich our diverse workforce. You will be part of a collaborative and creative culture where we encourage new ideas and are committed to sustainability across our global business. You will experience the critical role we have in helping to re-engineer the financial ecosystem to support and drive sustainable economic growth. Together, we are aiming to achieve this growth by accelerating the just transition to net zero, enabling growth of the green economy and creating inclusive economic opportunity.

LSEG offers a range of tailored benefits and support, including healthcare, retirement planning, paid volunteering days and wellbeing initiatives.

We are proud to be an equal opportunities employer. This means that we do not discriminate on the basis of anyone’s race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital status, veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. Conforming with applicable law, we can reasonably accommodate applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.

Please take a moment to read this privacy notice carefully, as it describes what personal information London Stock Exchange Group (LSEG) (we) may hold about you, what it’s used for, and how it’s obtained, 

If you are submitting as a Recruitment Agency Partner, it is essential and your responsibility to ensure that candidates applying to LSEG are aware of this privacy notice."
Head of Engineering,"We are looking for a passionate and hands on leader with strong technical ability to join us as our Head of Engineering. In this role, you will lead a team of developers and engineers in building scalable and extendable infrastructures tailoring to DeFi analytics. The ideal candidate would have prior experience with cloud native platforms and building backend database designs from the ground up. The Head of Engineering should also be able to inspire confidence by training and guiding others. You will help us achieve team efficiency and contribute directly towards building analytics at scale.

Roles & Responsibilities
Design analytics systems with large-scaled databases, microservices, and distributed computing technologies
Set strong technical/architectural foundations, implementing good design practices and principles in software development
Review current infrastructure design and draft proposals to develop and deploy scalable technologies.
Lead and organise engineering projects, ensuring resource optimization
Department planning, including setting of department goals and OKRs
Planning, management and execution of technical project plans, ensuring on-time delivery
Coordinate project management, software architects, and other engineering teams in determining overall system solutions

Skills & Requirements
Excellent people skills, comfortable working with remote teams
8 to 10 years of experience in data engineering/architecture, with prior leadership/management experience
Experience with cloud based distributed databases solutions and streaming processes
Hands-on infrastructure development experience in large-scaled databases architectures at reputable data firms
Deep understanding and application experience of database management technology
Strong verbal and written communication skills

Perks
Unlimited leave policy
Regular workplace social activities and events
Funding for sports, wellness activities, and interest groups
Onsite company gym
The opportunity to work alongside a fun and global team

Company Description
Treehouse provides DeFi users with live analytics and risk metrics of their digital assets. We are building a unified and user-friendly interface to help users successfully manage their portfolio in the ever-changing world of DeFi. We aim to be the gateway for all traders to effectively manage their DeFi risk across chains, and are backed by some of the world’s top VCs. We strive to provide a people-centred culture with a focus on personal development and professional growth."
Gaming LQA Project Manager / Gaming LQA Manager,"Gaming LQA Project Manager / Gaming LQA Manager

Your responsibilities:

· Be a part of the Global Team responsible for setup and develop Gaming QA Operations (starting with LQA)
· Provide project leadership, vision, and clear direction to a team of Games Test individuals
· Liase with clients to understand their goals and expectations, and anticipating client needs and concerns to prevent issues
· Track all aspects of the project - scope, schedule, effort, staff, risks, issues etc.
· Identify corrective and preventive actions if the project performance does not meet the required criteria
· Monitor and evaluate project performance to established goals and balance the project team according to business objectives
· Shift priorities, change style, and respond with new approaches as required by swinging conditions
· Manage and address project issues and risks
· Ensure awareness of game LQA processes in team, planning and implementing quality activities
· Participate in improving and defining testing processes, solutions, and offerings
· Prepare and implement goals, Training and Career Plans for the team
· Mentor leads or other managers and have a succession plan in place

You Will Have:

· Passion for video games
· 5+ years of work experience and strong competences in gaming industry
· Capability in creating and developing test plans, test cases and executing test strategies
· Strong understanding of LQA process and documentation standards (understanding of FQA process is welcome)
· Minimum Bachelor degree required
· Willingness to learn new things
· Demonstrated understanding of general finance and budgeting, including profit and loss management
· Knowledge of both Waterfall and Agile testing contexts
· Demonstrated, practical experience with bug tracking systems such as Jira, Mantis, Bugzilla, TestTrackPro or similar
· Fluency in written and verbal English communication skills
· Willingness to travel"
Business Analytics Lead,"Be part of something bigger. Decode the future.

At Electrolux, as a leading global appliance company, we strive every day to shape living for the better for our consumers, our people and our planet. We share ideas and collaborate so that together, we can develop solutions that deliver enjoyable and sustainable living.

Come join us as you are. We believe diverse perspectives make us stronger and more innovative. In our global community of people from 100+ countries, we listen to each other, actively contribute and grow together.

Join us in our exciting quest to build the future home.

All about the role:

This is a Data Analytics Lead, APAC & MEA role.

What you’ll do:

Establish the governance of data and algorithms used for analysis, analytical applications, and automated decision making
Develop the platform that supports data reporting and insights – design and build a reporting ecosystem that supports business reporting and insights
Lead and inspire developers to deliver business analysis and insights within agreed timeframes
Consistently work with business leaders to ensure analytics are supporting business planning, sales, and decisions
Innovate reporting to consistently improve relevance and usefulness to the business
Develop solutions utilizing multiple sources of data for high-level reporting
Bring added value through data exploitation
Envisioning data-enabled strategies
Enabling all forms of business outcomes through analytics
Support operation team to prepare reports for KPI evaluation, sales, and marketing
Proactively participate in ad-hoc projects

Who You Are

For you to succeed in this role, you should be:
Always Hands-On – Problem solver with a ""roll-up-your-sleeves"", and ""get it done"" mentality
Data-Driven – With an eye for detail and the ability to interpret complex data, you can also translate this into meaningful, useful information that informs decision-making and continuous improvement;
Multi-tasker – Attention to detail with excellent planning and organization skills and can adjust to changing demands to prioritize multiple deliverables and tasks in a fast-paced environment.
Technical Translator - Ability to explain digital concepts and technologies to business leaders
Solution Oriented - Able to work across business lines at a senior level to influence and effect change to achieve common goals.
Effective Communicator - Concisely build recommendations and speak to them (with confidence and the ability to answer tough questions)
Team player - Strong team player with the ability to build relationships and experience collaborating with and supporting geographically dispersed users.

EDUCATION

You should have a bachelor’s degree or higher in business analysis, business administration, finance, or a related field
Fluent in English (oral and written
Other APAC Language knowledge would be a valuable addition

Experience

At least 5-7 years of Data & Analytics experience (e.g. in a consultancy, agency, or on the customer side) - ideally with a marketing/ e-commerce industry background
Experience in data analysis and visualization tools such as Tableau, MS Power BI, QLIK, etc.
Advanced MS Office skills, with distinct Excel. SQL expertise
Business reporting system knowledge (i.e. SAP, Qlikview)
Optional skills are a plus: Digital analytics tools (Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics), Coding: Python/R/JavaScript, Experience with data science projects

Where you’ll be:

You will be based in our Regional Singapore office.

Benefit highlights:

Flexibility of work hours.
Discounts on Electrolux products and services.
Medical & Hospitalization coverage for both employees and dependents.
Dental & Optical.

As part of Electrolux, we will continuously invest in you and your development. There are no barriers to where your career could take you.

Find more on:

Electrolux APAC & MEA: https://www.linkedin.com/company/electrolux/life/apacmea/

req41994"
Associate Sales Representative (Full Time) - Singapore,"Please Note: Due to the holiday season and Cisco's shutdown period - you will have an update on your application in January 2023.

Location: Singapore

Why you'll love Cisco:

Are you ready to change the World? Do you want to be passionate about your employer and the brand you represent? Everything is converging on the Internet, making networked connections more meaningful than ever before in our lives. Our employees' ground-breaking ideas impact everything imaginable - from entertainment, retail, healthcare, and education, to public and private sectors, smart cities, and everyday devices in our homes. Here, that means you will take creative ideas from the drawing board to dynamic solutions that have real world impact. You'll collaborate with Cisco leaders, partner with expert mentors, and develop incredible relationships with colleagues who share your interest in connecting the unconnected. You'll be part a team that cares about its customers, enjoys having fun, and you'll take part in changing the lives of those in our local communities. Come prepared to be encouraged and inspired.

Who You'll Work With

:

You’ll be part of our Cisco Sales Associates Program (CSAP), an award-winning and industry recognized early-in-career development program for top university graduates from around the world. You’ll train alongside incredibly talented individuals, like yourself, from different countries and diverse backgrounds. Early on, you’ll make long-lasting friendships and belong to a rich human network that will support you throughout your career.

As a successful Associate Sales Representative (ASR), you’ll learn to discover, build and drive new opportunities with our Cisco partners while collaborating with Cisco engineers to provide technical solutions that drive business outcomes for our customers.

You’ll learn from top experts and coaches in a unique setting using our own leading-edge technology. You’ll have your own mentor, a CSAP alumnus who’s been in your shoes and will guide you in your first year. With a strong Cisco team committed to your success, you’ll gain hands-on education and experience, while receiving an attractive salary and pursuing your career dreams.

What You’ll Do:

Cisco Sales Associates Program offers a global environment that provides structured training and on-the-job-experience. We will develop your sales, technical and communication skills and you will be offered the opportunity to rotate and understand diverse areas of Sales via our model of Education Exposure Experience. You will learn how to position Cisco’s architectures, solutions and products to our customers.

Your career will continue as a Virtual Account Manager (VAM) role as part of Cisco’s Global Virtual Sales (GVS) Team. The GVS organization is passionate about driving sales productivity breakthrough and building compelling business value for our partners while nurturing our partner relationships. As a VAM, you’ll build positive relationships with existing customers and partners, working closely with them to understand their business strategy and uncover new business opportunities, whilst achieving their desired business outcomes. You’ll partner with Sales Engineers and together you’ll position the benefits of our Cisco solutions to your customer, using our market-leading collaboration tools.

While challenging, it will push you to become the best version of yourself. You will achieve industry-standard certifications, as part our perpetual learning approach, and be assessed and coached through customer simulations and on-the-job activities. We’ll offer you a safe and fun environment to practice what you’ve learnt, all the while providing you with feedback to develop your potential

From there, your career can develop and grow into a variety of sales opportunities at Cisco.

Who You Are

:
Technology enthusiast, who enjoys talking about innovation and always keeps up with the latest technology news.
A strong communicator with the confidence to engage and talk to a wide range of people.
Willing and able present your ideas in front of an audience.
View team collaboration as instrumental to achieving success.
Enjoy looking at practical real-life challenges and thinking creatively to solve them.
Approach situations with an open and curious mind, taking on challenges with an eye for opportunity.
Ability to take complex problems and simplify them.

What You Need To Be Eligible:
Must have graduated by May 2020 or later
Preferably hold a degree in Business and Management, Finance, Marketing, Entrepreneurship, MIS, Engineering and other related degrees.
Fluent in English and the official language(s)
Must be able to legally live and work in the country of hire, without visa support or sponsorship (student visas or visas obtained on your own are not applicable for the program)

Why Cisco

#WeAreCisco, where each person is unique, but we bring our talents to work as a team and make a difference.

Here’s how we do it.

We embrace digital, and help our customers implement change in their digital businesses. Some may think we’re “old” (30 years strong!) and only about hardware, but we’re also a software company. And a security company. A blockchain company. An AI/Machine Learning company. We even invented an intuitive network that adapts, predicts, learns and protects. No other company can do what we do – you can’t put us in a box!

But “Digital Transformation” is an empty buzz phrase without a culture that allows for innovation, creativity, and yes, even failure (if you learn from it.)

Day to day, we focus on the give and take. We give our best, we give our egos a break and we give of ourselves (because giving back is built into our DNA.) We take accountability, we take bold steps, and we take difference to heart. Because without diversity of thought and a commitment to equality for all, there is no moving forward.

So, you have colorful hair? Don’t care. Tattoos? Show off your ink. Like polka dots? That’s cool. Pop culture geek?"
Software Engineer (Intelligence Analysis Applications Development),"The Defence Science and Technology Agency (DSTA) brings you to the forefront of cybersecurity, digital transformation and engineering. From working on software development and systems integration to unmanned technologies and artificial intelligence, you can have an impact on Singapore’s defence.

Achieve your fullest potential with opportunities to build your technical expertise and hone your competencies in diverse domains. You can also expect an immersive learning experience, where you will work with bright minds and collaborate with global industry experts.

DSTA is recognised as one of the top 10 employers in the Engineering & IT sector, where our engineers and IT professionals work alongside procurement specialists to deliver state-of-the-art capabilities for Singapore’s peace and security.

Learn more about DSTA at https://www.dsta.gov.sg .

Opportunity
DSTA’s Information Programme Centre (Info PC) develops software solutions to harness information to enhance SAF’s capabilities on the battlefield to fight smarter and faster. We are looking for motivated individuals to join us to develop data driven applications in the military intelligence domain. The selected applicant will build image and signals analysis applications for early warning and real-time threat detection.

This role will require you to:

Translate use cases into solution designs or technical specifications.
Design applications to process and analyse satellite/airborne imagery and radio frequency signals for derivation of intelligence.
Continuously develop and improve software applications to enhance users’ experience in achieving mission objectives.
Work closely with other supporting teams in area of infrastructure and cybersecurity for project delivery.

Minimum
Degree in Computer Science or related technical field such as Electrical Engineering.
Software engineering experience in Java, C++ or another object-oriented language.
Team player with good communication and interpersonal skills.

Preferred
Fluent in GIT source code control.
Fluent in software design, code modularity and maintainability.
Experience in one of more of the following:
PowerShell or other scripting languages
Containerisation technologies e.g. Docker
Microservices architecture
Stream processing technologies e.g. Kafka
Geospatial technologies from Luciad and ESRI
Applied Machine Learning for Computer Vision and/or Signal Processing

Why join us
As a Software Engineer for Intelligence Analysis applications, you have the freedom and technical autonomy to build the technologies required to solve real world problems. You will have the opportunity to take on the challenge of building algorithms that will help us understand potential adversaries to Singapore and the software you develop will have lasting impact on our nation’s long term defence and security. Here in DSTA, you will work with modern tech stacks and grow in your technical abilities as you learn from experienced mentors in the Information Programme Centre community."
Business Development Manager,"Job description:

Job Purpose


This role will be under our joint venture company - ChargerCo. The Business Development (BD) Manager, will be responsible to develop a strong pipeline of opportunities (with building owners, developers and condominium MCSTs) to expand our EV charging network and to also develop the relationships with electric vehicle fleet owners and drivers to channel them towards using our EV charging network.

Responsibilities


The duties and responsibilities of the BD Manager are as listed below. Note that the list is not comprehensive and related duties and responsibilities may be assigned from time to time.

Business Development
• Engage relevant stakeholders and develop a strong pipeline of opportunities to secure premises for the deployment of EV chargers.
• By working closely with the engineering and financial teams, to take the lead in generating the proposals for each opportunity, including financial modelling, feasibility assessment and commercial structuring.
• Develop relationships with electric fleet owners and fleet owners with plans for electrification and develop compelling value propositions for them to use our EV charging network.


Account Management
• Continue to cultivate the relationships with secured accounts, and explore new opportunities


Qualifications & Work Experience
Qualifications and work experience include:

• Degree in relevant disciplines, with at least 5 years of experience in developing leads, cultivating relationships and closing deals.
• Experience in e-Mobility space is highly valued.

Skills


Technical skills include:
• Financial modelling
• Commercial structuring

Generic skills include:
• Team player and entrepreneurial
• Independent and takes ownership of projects assigned
• Good time-management skills
• Great interpersonal and communication skills"
Downstream BDSP Analyst,"Job Description:
Conduct research on the subject matter - primary and secondary research
Work collaboratively with various functions in the group to gather information and identify issues
Perform data analysis and provides insights / data interpretation
Build robust financial model (Valuation using DCF, Multiples) to facilitate decision making
Assist in preparing reports / presentation slides which concisely articulate findings and recommendations
In relation to inorganic growth projects to assist in: (1) preparing data room, (2) coordinating work with external-advisers and (3) reviewing transaction documents
Assist in building the ‘Knowledge Banks’ for Downstream business
Participate actively in discussions, providing thoughts / ideas
Other projects-related works

Candidate Requirements:
Min. Bachelor Degree in Accountancy / Business (Finance major) / Economics
Min. 3 years working experience in Accountancy / Corporate Finance (M&A or Due Diligence or Valuation) / Management Consulting
Pro-active, independent and a team player
Proficiency in Financial Modelling
Proficiency in Ms. Office (Excel, Power Point and Words)
Proficiency in Bahasa Indonesia is an advantage"
Solution Architect - DaaS and Managed Services,"Description And Requirements

Lenovo (HKSE: 992) (ADR: LNVGY) is a US$72 billion revenue Fortune Global 500 company serving customers in 180 markets around the world. Focused on a bold vision to deliver smarter technology for all, we are developing world-changing technologies that power (through devices and infrastructure) and empower (through solutions, services and software) millions of customers every day and together create a more inclusive, trustworthy and sustainable digital society for everyone, everywhere. To find out more visit [1] https://www.lenovo.com,and read about the latest news via our [2] StoryHub.

Position Description

Lenovo is currently seeking an experienced Device as a Service (DaaS) Solution Architect who will develop comprehensive, creative and cost-effective services solutions for our customers within a Device as a Service model. Successful candidates will evaluate customer opportunities as presented in, RFPs/RFQs or engagements, from the Services Sales teams and use this information to develop solutions to meet customer’s requirements. Lenovo DaaS solutions may incorporate one or more lifecycle services including plan, configure, deploy, support, manage, and/or retire stages. As a DaaS Solution Architect, you will collaborate with internal teams and Lenovo Services delivery partners, as well as travel to facilitate workshops with customers for scoping requirements. The ideal candidate will successfully partner across multiple organizations including, but not limited to, sales; finance; service delivery; customers and business partners and is expected to lead all elements of the services solution governance from the project kickoff; stakeholder coordination and end solution strategy. The DaaS Solution Architect will also contribute to customer presentations and briefings, provide input during deal qualification reviews, and prepare content for solution reviews with key stakeholders as required. Upon award, the DaaS Solution Architect is responsible for the development of a SOW contract with the customer as well as with any selected business partners, which includes negotiation with the partner and the customer to ensure that requirements are explicitly documented to mitigate risk. Finally, the DaaS Solution Architect is expected to promote, sell, manage pipeline and contribute to the overall business management systems within the services group.

Position Requirements

5+ years of Contract Management, SOW’s, Business Development, Professional Services, Project Management and/or IT Services operations experience.
Preference will be given to candidates with direct experience in Managed Services Industry focused on PC’s
Proven success in building solutions in the Managed Services industry
Strategic mindset and sound business acumen are required, along with effective decision making, contract negotiation and partner management skills
Excellent communication, both oral and written, and polished presentation skills
Strong prioritization skills, attention to detail, commitment to deadlines
Proficiency in Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, Excel, MS Dynamics
Proven ability to operate with a high level of professionalism; entrepreneurialism and agility
Demonstrated ability to work across all levels of the organization with a teaming attitude
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience required
Travel estimated at 25%
Fluent in English

Additional Preferred Qualifications

MBA or Advanced technical degree
Experience with MS Dynamics, Salesforce & ServiceNow
Consumption based sales experience in SaaS, DaaS, or Cloud Services.
Global Account or Global Enterprise Account Sales experience with multiple stakeholder buy in.

References

Visible links

https://www.lenovo.com/
http://storyhub.lenovo.com/

Multiple Countries (Posting Locations)

Hong Kong, * Singapore"
[Intern - DCC] Data Analyst,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us



At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About The Team

The Decision Science team within the Data Cycling Center (DCC) delivers impactful insights for our stakeholders through the marriage of structured and unstructured data. We are uniquely positioned due to our access to structured data and ability to derive insights from unstructured data(Images/Videos/Webistes) through our labeling pipeline and predictive machine models.

About The Role

We are looking for an intern with a strong sense of ownership and ability to deliver with minimal guidance. He/she will be expected to build ETL pipelines, interface with cross team applications/ stakeholders and perform in-depth statistical analysis. He/ she will own the development of our model evaluation pipeline.

What You'll Need

 Proficiency with databases and SQL.
 Experience with large-scale data warehousing architecture and data modeling.
 Expertise with data processing (ETL) technologies is required.
 Proficiency in one programming language such as Java, Scala, or Python.
 Knowledge in Multi and Asynchronous processing
 Strong analytical skills.
 Aptitude to independently learn new technologies.
 If need be, act as a Leader to drive big efforts with other data analysts.

What You'll Do

 Plan and design the Model Evaluation pipeline.
 Interface with stakeholders like our Labelling Platform to enable functions like auto data injection.
 Build auto SOP creation that will allow us to scale our tag evaluation capabilities.
 Create tables to store evaluation results.
 Create pipelines to extract results from labeling platform.
 Work with AI research team to create process for model re-training and iteration.
 Document progress and finding to present to leadership and enable smooth handover.
 Derive key insights from the relationship between model performance and labels.
 Work with our Decision Scientists to build our label confidence metric which will aid in understanding of unstructured data.

Basic

Qualifications

 MS, Bachelors / currently pursuing a degree in Statistics, Economics, Computer Science or another quantitative field.
 Experience building high-quality end-to-end data solutions in an agile environment from requirements to production.
 Be able to proactively handle prioritization of work and deliver work of great quality and to influence the broader team.
 Experience with Looker, Tableau, Power Bl, or other business intelligence platforms.

Preferred

 Working knowledge of Multi and Asynchronous processing
 Experience with APIs
 Knowledge of Hadoop related technologies such as HDFS
 Ability to perform Statistical analysis
 Previous experience working with social media data (unstructured and structured) is a plus
 Strong communication skills demonstrated through documentation and presentations to senior members of the team and stakeholders

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. 

At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Product Specialist- Consumer Product,"About NETS
The NETS Group is a leading payments services group, enabling digital payments for merchants, consumers and banks across the entire payments value chain.
The Group operates Singapore’s national debit scheme enabling customers of DBS Bank/POSB, HSBC, Maybank, OCBC Bank, Standard Chartered Bank and UOB to make payments using their ATM cards or mobile devices at more than 120,000 acceptance points in the country as well as online payments.

Position Summary
The position of Product Management Executive focuses on these primary products under the Consumer Product Team:
NETS FlashPay & NETS Motoring Cards
NETS CashCard
NETS Prepaid Card
NETS vCashCard
NETS App
He/she will report to the VP Product Owner on the day-to-day product development of these products. The incumbent will also be exposed to NETS product development methodology and is expected to follow the processes/methodology to ensure that products are developed/managed with compliance and excellence in mind

Key Responsibilities
1.Product Development & Enhancement
Identify and document business requirements
Engage internal and external stakeholders to evaluate on feasibility
Participate in requirement gathering sessions
Support feature enhancements and change request
Conduct user acceptance test to ensure the product is developed or enhanced according to requirements
Ensure products are developed or enhanced to cater the current and future market needs
Manage incidents/escalations from contact centre
Gather and report on product data/analytics
Provide support to sales and servicing team on product related materials and queries
Coordination with internal stakeholders on new features/changes
Conduct training to internal stakeholders such as Contact Centre, Operations and Sales/Servicing teams for new product launches or enhancements
Draft and finalize operations manual and product programme
Manage product information and FAQS with marketing, contact centre and 3rd party channels
Be accountable as a product owner and review to the financial performance of the product.
Support Product management policy and Product risk management

2. Other Administrative Duties
Updating of policies and procedures
Process card requests from banks/partners
Perform regression testing for various systems, and work with User Acceptance Testing team where necessary.
Facilitate the submission of reports and documents to Public Transport Council and other governmental authorities.
Development of test plan, test cases and perform live verification of services
Development of service management documentation for product development

3.Manage 3rd party card vendors/suppliers.

Requirements
We are looking for fresh graduates OR graduates with 1-2 years of working experience
Has demonstrated keen interest in payment business and landscape (competitive offerings and industry trends)
Strong presentation and engagement skills with ability to develop and cultivate relationships with a variety of business stakeholders.
Excellent communication and articulation skills
Strong conceptual, critical thinking and analytical skills - demonstrating outside-the-box problem solving skills
Highly skilled in using - MS Office (Word, Powerpoint, Excel)
Should have good project management/coordination skills"
Principal Software Engineer / Tech Lead,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
SISTIC.COM PTE LTD, part of the MCCY family, is Singapore's largest ticketing agency and one of the leading e-commerce players, selling over 6 million tickets annually.

Under a new leadership team, SISTIC is preparing for the next stage of hyper growth.

We would love to hear from you if you
take pride in delivering quality code on time
are a self-starter who works well with people
In return, we offer
work-life balance
hybrid work
Role
Lead software engineers by example
Design and implement solutions
Guide and train team on coding related matters
Assist Engineering Manager to plan sprints and ensure quality code is delivered on time
Work on mission-critical systems with high requirements on availability, reliability and performance
Monitor reliability and performance of systems to suggest improvements
Collaborate with DevOps team to improve processes
Requirements
Degree/Diploma in an Engineering, Computer Science or other technical field
Proficient in Java Spring Boot (min. 3 years)
Good experience with SQL and NoSQL (ideally Redis and Cassandra) databases
Willing and able to learn new technologies quickly
Team management experience would be a plus
Experience with RabbitMQ and Kafka would be plusses

Desired Skills and Experience
HTML, Spring Framework, Software Engineering, RabbitMQ, NoSQL, SQL, Team Management, Java, Redis, Databases, Software Development, Business Requirements"
Service Manager (Engineering),"Purpose of role
The main focus of the role involves maximizing sales and maintaining customer satisfaction with the existing customers. This includes meeting existing customer requirements as well as ensuring contract renewals and other opportunity closures. He/she is also responsible for overseeing budgets, profits and losses and after-sales upselling.

Main Responsibilities
Excellence in Customer Experience
• Ensure all customer concerns, requests and requirements are regularly tracked with timely follow up
• Ensure respective stakeholders take actions timely to fulfil customer requirements
• Build good relationships with customers and internal stakeholders
• Solicit regular feedback from customers on the performance of bbp
• Actively develop and implement customer engagement plans
Develop strong partnerships and key accounts
• To be the key contact point for all existing customers and partners
• To ensure continuity of optimization subscription contracts
• To access and pick up new leads from customers
• Collaborate closely with the internal stakeholders to ensure smooth and professional delivery
• To follow up and ensure all contracts are maintained and renewed timely
• To ensure reports are submitted to customers timely
• To ensure purchase orders, acceptances, invoices, billings and other documents are submitted to customer timely
Sales growth across markets
• Knowledge of existing sites and portfolio level market research & study
• Define the service sales strategy in consultation with management
• Define and closely monitor sales targets, actuals vs. budgets, and identify root causes from deviations in sales performance
• Identify, develop and explore new segments for new growth.

Requirements
• Bachelor’s degree in Business/Engineering or equivalent
• At least 5 to 8 years of proven sales/business development experience
• Experience in the HVAC or semi-conductor industry preferred
• Proven track record to drive sales or/and develop new markets/customers
• Excellent communication skills in English
• Self-driven with a high level of initiative
• Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to interface at all levels of the organization"
R&D Industrial Design Engineer,"Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc. is the world leader in serving science. With annual revenue exceeding $39 billion and the largest investment in R&D in the industry, we allow our people to build meaningful contributions to the world. Our Mission is to enable our customers to make the world healthier, cleaner and safer. Whether our customers are accelerating life sciences research, solving complex analytical challenges, improving patient diagnostics and therapies or increasing efficiency in their laboratories, we are here to support them.

How will you make an impact?

Engineer II, Industrial Design position collaborates with Singapore R&D team and US ID team to streamline our instrument development cycles. Together with R&D partner, we support product ideation, execution, and commercialization to meet customer requirements and time to market commitments within target costs.

What will you do?

Propose design concepts that are consistent with visual brand language
Be actively involved with the design process from concept creation to production
Assist senior members of the design team in concept brainstorming, prototyping, & illustration
Able to carry out task assigned independently with minimal direction
Generate and/or finalize CAD/3D surface modeling & support Mechanical Engineering through detailed design phase.
Participate in Design for Manufacturing (DFM) reviews with tooling vendors
Compare design intent with implementation and document differences
Generate brand and product graphic artwork, CMF (Colors, Materials & Finishes standards) documentation, 3D photo realistic renderings
Evaluate and approve CMF & printed graphics on final parts
Evaluate and approve fit & finish of final assembled parts ready for production

Education & Experience

Bachelor's degree in Industrial Design is required.
Min 2 years of related experience in manufacturing environment preferred

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities

Proficient with engineering tools and applications including CAD (SolidWorks preferred), PLM software, 3D rendering software (Keyshot preferred), Adobe Creative Suite.
Exceptional surface modeling skills- Class A or Curvature Continuous 3D surfaces
Detail oriented, possess a high sensitivity to 3D form development and design aesthetics
Proficient in user-centered industrial design concepts
Basics knowledge in design for manufacturing (DFM) of plastic parts and sheet metal.

Proficiencies Preferred

Project management.
Team oriented.
Ability to apply existing visual brand language
Experienced in medical or life sciences product development in R&D environment

Our global team of more than 80,000 colleagues delivers an outstanding combination of innovative technologies, purchasing convenience and pharmaceutical services through our industry-leading brands, including Thermo Scientific, Applied Biosystems, Invitrogen, Fisher Scientific, Unity Lab Services and Patheon. For more information, please visit www.thermofisher.com

Thermo Fisher Scientific is an Equal Opportunity Employer where all are welcome. We strive to build a sense of community and offer an expansive individual and family benefits package to support all employees."
Principal Cloud Native Architect,"When our customers are looking for IT consulting expertise, where else would they turn but to the company driving human progress through technology? Our Solutions Architecture team within Professional Services are experts in package customization and integration as well as total, end-to-end solutions in targeted industry segments. After thorough consultation with our customers and careful analysis, we develop new IT systems or replace existing systems that support customers’ strategic, operational and financial goals.

Join us to do the best work of your career and make a profound social impact as a Principal Cloud Native Architect on our Cloud Native Center of Excellence in Singapore.

What You’ll Achieve

An opportunity to work for a company whose software is utilized by every Fortune 500 company and significantly impacts every industry. You will be a part of a collaborative environment whose teams care about the product they are creating, how they create it, and the impact it has on customers’ business objectives. More importantly, you drive the opportunity to collaborate and work interactively with our clients to ensure their successful deployment of the Kubernetes platform on-premise or cloud IaaS.

Success in the Role: What are the performance goals over the first 6-12 months you will work toward completing?
Provide technical direction for the development, and design of Cloud Native architectures, standards, and implementation approaches and systems integration for client engagement and product/ solution development from the definition phase through implementation.
As a member of the Cloud Native Architecture group, you will be expected to work with and contribute to its Kubernetes-based microservices architecture, and all your deliverables must align with the group’s development and deployment standards.
Demonstrate leadership in IT management by producing strategic and innovative concept proposals, and papers, and speaking at conferences.

What type of work will you be doing? What assignments, requirements, or skills will you be performing on a regular basis?
Recognize system deficiencies and implement effective solutions.
Communicate and enforce best practices for building and running applications on Kubernetes
Continually seeks opportunities to increase customer satisfaction and deepen client relationships.
Manages client interactions and expectations regarding architectures.
Organizing tech talks and participating in meetups/events.

Take the first step towards your dream career

Every Dell Technologies team member brings something unique to the table. Here’s what we are looking for with this role:

Essential Requirements
Experienced Software Enterprise Architect with demonstrated skills in designing PaaS solutions, enterprise middleware, and Java Spring microservices based mission-critical applications.
Understands complex enterprise, cloud-based concepts and effectively employs different design techniques; A clear understanding of cloud service and deployment models.
Experience with more than one relational database management systems; Understands the benefits and ideal uses of various programming languages.
Excellent communication skills with the ability to engage with Senior level leaders.
Ability to travel and work on-site with customers and partners.

Desirable Requirements
8 years of experience as an enterprise architect.
Experience with various public clouds & Kubernetes.

Here’s our story; now tell us yours

Dell Technologies helps organizations and individuals build a brighter digital tomorrow. Our company is made up of more than 150,000 people, located in over 180 locations around the world. We’re proud to be a diverse and inclusive team and have an endless passion for our mission to drive human progress.

What’s most important to us is that you are respected, feel like you can be yourself and have the opportunity to do the best work of your life -- while still having a life. We offer excellent benefits, bonus programs, flexible work arrangements, a variety of career development opportunities, employee resource groups, and much more.

We started with computers, but we didn’t stop there. We are helping customers move into the future with multi-cloud, AI and machine learning through the most innovative technology and services portfolio for the data era. Join us and become a part of what’s next in technology, starting today.

You can also learn more about us by reading our latest Diversity and Inclusion Report and our plan to make the world a better place by 2030 here.

Dell is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Dell are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV Status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Dell will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Dell encourages applicants of all ages. Read the full Equal Employment Opportunity Policy here.

Job Id: R206383

Job Function: Professional Services"
"Business Strategist, Process Optimization & Automation","Job Reference #

268153BR

Job Type

Full Time

Your role

Are you passionate about change and always looking to improve processes? Do you have a knack for understanding business processes and how we can optimize and improve through a combination of process re-engineering and technological changes? Do you have a curious nature, and are always interested in finding ways to innovate and improve processes?

We are looking for someone like this to help us:


collaborate with business to assess business processes, identify opportunities to eliminate waste and find process automation solutions in order to increase efficiency, reduce costs/operational risks and enhance customer satisfaction
manage all process improvement and automation solutions of an assigned project
design new processes and provide assessments of business impact
ensure compliance with policies, standards and regulatory requirements
identify opportunities to improve business processes and implement solutions in close collaboration with all involved business divisions
guide business teams to improve Data Management in GWM by establishing standardized capacity management, data collection, reporting and monitoring
share CI/Automation knowledge enabling business teams to identify and eliminate waste in business processes
build good customer relationship and establish strong problem-solving culture
support and initiate cultural change towards a continuous improvement mindset

Your team

You will be working in the WM division aligned to Strategic Initiatives team which is located in Singapore. The team is responsible for the implementation of the strategic projects focusing on Data Enablement topics, Process Optimization and Continuous Improvement to support Transformation & Digitalization of UBS. Our COE team in F2B Digitization Organization helps UBS business functions implement their digital strategy and accomplish their ambitions in the areas of emerging technologies.

We accompany functions across all businesses to build a sustainable transformation, combining the power of emerging technologies with a profound understanding of UBS businesses.

Your expertise


good understanding of bank processes
strong analytical and problem-solving skills
the ability to juggle multiple deliverables simultaneously
business analysis experience and/or a change management background
experience in working in a dynamic Agile project delivery environment
experience with Lean Six Sigma methodology
good oral, written and presentation skills
passionate about change and always looking to improve processes
curious and collaborative, comfortable working independently as well as in a team and generate new ideas leading to success
highly self-motivated with passion and enthusiasm for transformation and able to inspire other people
a confident and effective communicator who can build and manage relationships and trust with various stakeholders
organized, able to multi-task and manage competing priorities in a demanding environment

About Us

UBS is the world’s largest and only truly global wealth manager. We operate through four business divisions: Global Wealth Management, Personal & Corporate Banking, Asset Management and the Investment Bank. Our global reach and the breadth of our expertise set us apart from our competitors.

With more than 70,000 employees, we have a presence in all major financial centers in more than 50 countries. Do you want to be one of us?

How We Hire

This role requires an assessment on application. Learn more about how we hire: www.ubs.com/global/en/careers/experienced-professionals.html

Join us

At UBS, we embrace flexible ways of working when the role permits. We offer different working arrangements like part-time, job-sharing and hybrid (office and home) working. Our purpose-led culture and global infrastructure help us connect, collaborate, and work together in agile ways to meet all our business needs.

From gaining new experiences in different roles to acquiring fresh knowledge and skills, we know that great work is never done alone. We know that it's our people, with their unique backgrounds, skills, experience levels and interests, who drive our ongoing success. Together we’re more than ourselves. Ready to be part of #teamUBS and make an impact?

Disclaimer / Policy Statements

UBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and seek to empower each individual and support the diverse cultures, perspectives, skills and experiences within our workforce."
Business Transformation Consultant (HR Digital Change),"615941BR

Introduction

IBM Consultants work directly with our clients on key initiatives. You will have the opportunity to build an in-depth understanding of their business issues and implement organizational strategies that drive adoption of change. We are looking for experts who can build credibility and trust with our clients and provide knowledge that addresses individual and unique business needs.

Your Role and Responsibilities

As a Change Management Consultant, you will successfully manage one end to end change program independently and be a part of Business change management team for a technology/ non-technology related change project and been involved in two or more full cycles of Change Management work stream in a project.

Ability to be a part of complex global change management engagements within the ERP implementation, process transformation, M&A / Strategic Outsourcing context
Align Case for Change and Change Management strategy to overall organizational/project goals
Apply Organization Change Management (OCM) framework, methodology and tools to create a change strategy to support adoption of the changes
Conduct organization impact analysis and enterprise redesign strategies emerging out of large-scale transformation/business model innovation/digital transformation/globalization initiatives and identify key stakeholders
Develop a Change Management Plan to drive faster adoption and higher utilization of process/system changes
Work with the Change Management Lead and Project Leads to ensure that change management activities are incorporated into the overall project plan
Support the design, development, delivery and management of all engagement activities, including communications
Demonstrate experience in using multiple digital communication channels to engage stakeholders and impacted users across geographies
Apply design thinking principles to create user centric design and enhance user experience
Ensure high quality and timely execution of communication plans and strategies by on-time design and development of quality communication collaterals - Mailers/ newsletters/ posters/ flyers etc.
Support training efforts by managing the development and deployment of training materials using effective training channels
Work with key stakeholders to establish and maintain the commitment necessary to address workforce transition challenges that might arise and implement change deliverables
Apply data analytics to create dashboard and derive actionable insights to drive change efforts and adoption
Emphasis on Human Resources, General Management, Organizational Behaviour with at least 3 years of experience in leading, devising, implementing and evaluating complex organisational change programmes is desired.
Expertise in Stakeholder Engagement, Change Impact Assessment, Communication Planning and Execution, Change Measurement (Change Readiness/ Surveys, Business Readiness) etc.
Additional experience in Benefits Realization, Organization Design/ Culture and Change Diagnostics / Analytics areas would be beneficial.
Proficient in organization change management principles, methodologies and tools
Demonstrate structured thinking to problem solving
Ability to communicate effectively and influence others
Ability to collaborate and work with geographically spread multi-cultural / diverse teams
Demonstrate capability to perform task independently with thought leadership

Further to the specific expertise described above, this position also calls for:

Knowledge of Design Thinking Principles, Change Management models
You love collaborative environments that use agile methodologies to encourage creative design thinking and find innovative ways to develop with cutting edge technologies
Ambitious individual who can work under their own direction towards agreed targets/goals and with creative approach to work
Intuitive individual with an ability to manage change and proven time management
Proven interpersonal skills while contributing to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed
Up-to-date technical knowledge by attending educational workshops, reviewing publications

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

As shared above.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

As shared above.

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
"Senior Software Engineer, Robot Navigation","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Contribute to the development of various components of our navigation system (e.g. mapping, localization, planning, and control) together with Research Engineers. We take the time to ensure everything works robustly and reliably with each sensor/compute configuration.
Lead the development of software libraries, frameworks, and tools that allow Research Engineers to easily convert prototypes to testable modules that run on real time systems. We expect you to always be on the lookout for improvements to the software systems and libraries that make up the backbone of our autonomy stack.
Work closely with research engineers to co-develop research prototypes into operational ready software modules in ROS2.
Work closely with robot navigation specialists on the navigation system’s software architecture.
Contribute to architecture, design and development of other software libraries and tooling required by the autonomy stack such as data loggers, diagnostics managers etc.
Lead the development of profiling, benchmarking, and testing tooling to facilitate the development of robust autonomy software.
Provide leadership to software system designs and software documentation and maintenance. In addition to the above, you will also be assisting on system architecture and design, mapping out software tooling technology roadmap, and executing them together with the rest of the team.
Job Requirements
A degree related to Computer Science or Engineering and 5 years of industry experience.
Experience in Software Engineering for real-time systems. Having experience in robot software development in ROS/ROS2 is an advantage.
If you have knowledge or experience in machine learning, computer vision, control system or related discipline would also be an advantage.
Proven experience and knowledge on software development processes, and design and architectural patterns.
Ability to take technical leadership on topics related to Software Design and Development.
An eye for detail, and commitment and enthusiasm to keep improving the software systems.
Good communication and presentation skills
Flexibility to travel

Desired Skills and Experience
Machine Learning, Architectural Patterns, Autonomy, Localization, Software Engineering, Software Documentation, JavaScript, Computer Vision, Architecture Design, Software Design, Presentation Skills, Technical Leadership, Benchmarking, System Architecture, Software Development"
2023 Campus Recruitment (Technical- Chemical Engineering),"About Us

At ExxonMobil, our vision is to lead in energy innovations that advance modern living and a net-zero future. As one of the world’s largest publicly traded energy and chemical companies, we are powered by a unique and diverse workforce fueled by the pride in what we do and what we stand for.

The success of our Upstream, Product Solutions and Low Carbon Solutions businesses is the result of the talent, curiosity and drive of our people. They bring solutions every day to optimize our strategy in energy, chemicals, lubricants and lower-emissions technologies.

We invite you to bring your ideas to ExxonMobil to help create sustainable solutions that improve quality of life and meet society’s evolving needs. Learn more about our What and our Why and how we can work together.What role you will play in our team

ExxonMobil in Singapore

ExxonMobil is one of Singapore’s largest foreign manufacturing investors with over S$25 billion in fixed asset investments.

We have manufacturing facilities that include an integrated world-scale refining and petrochemical complex in Jurong and Jurong Island, a network of service stations under the Esso brand, operate a lubricant plant and are a supplier of cylinder cooking gas. ExxonMobil provides customers and commercial markets in the region with ground transportation, industrial, aviation and marine fuels, lubricants, petrochemicals and liquefied natural gas (LNG).

As Singapore serves as the AP hub for some of our businesses, we employ about 3,500 people across positions in operations, projects, commercial, corporate support functions and others.

ExxonMobil also contributes to community programs in Singapore that support the arts, education, health and the environment.

For more information, visit www.exxonmobil.com.sg or follow us on Instagram @exxonmobil_sg

ExxonMobil Campus Recruitment for 2023 Hiring (Technical- Chemical Engineering)

Secure a job with ExxonMobil before graduation - start a career with us today.

We offer you various career paths:

Technical: Chemical Engineering
Position Title:Process Engineer, Applications Engineer

Your Benefits

An ExxonMobil career is one designed to last and we provide job rotations throughout your career with us. Our commitment to you runs deep: our employees grow personally and professionally, with benefits built on our core categories of health, security, finance, and life.

Currently our employees benefits include: Long Term Savings Allowance, dental reimbursement, annual health checkups and Home Ownership Assistance Plan amongst others and these are updated from time to time.

Stay connected with us:

Learn more at our website
Follow us on LinkedIn and Instagram
Like us on Facebook
Subscribe our channel at YouTube

Equal Opportunity Employer

It is the policy of the Company to provide equal employment opportunity in conformance with all applicable laws and regulations to individuals who are qualified to perform job requirements. The Company administers its personnel policies, programs, and practices in a non-discriminatory manner in all aspects of the employment relationship, including recruitment, hiring, work assignment, promotion, transfer, termination, wage and salary administration, and selection for training.

Please be informed that only shortlisted candidates will be notified, and you can find out more about our hiring process here.

We thank you for your interest in ExxonMobil."
Product Specialist,"Reporting to the Business Unit Manager of the Surgical division, the position will develop business opportunities across the Surgical range of products with the objective of achieving/exceeding the sales and profit targets for businesses set.

1. Sales Development
Establish sound understanding of market (customers, competition, new technology, etc.) and key trends
Analyze, set clear objectives and develop strategies to drive market penetration and growth
Actively identify market opportunities, potential customers and establish new accounts to expand business
Ability to take on and assist to launch new product lines

2. Sales Maintenance
Monitor sales performance (target, competition, accounts, etc.)
Maintain close relationship and establish good rapport with customers
Service existing contracts, tenders, quotations and other documentations
Participate in sales forecasting, budgeting, and market data collection
Work closely with operations team in inventory management

3. Product support
Conduct product presentations, demonstrations, and manage product trials
Provide “Product Usage Guidance” and conduct product training to existing and new customers and stand-in cases to provide guidance
Manage and support exhibitions, trade shows and promotion program
Learn and acquire strong knowledge of product features and benefits against competitors’ products
Ability to take on and promote a wide range of products to support training and education across the medical division portfolio

Requirements:
Diploma/Degree in Business or Science or related disciplines
Prior sales experience in the Healthcare industry and/or Nursing will be an added advantage
Demonstrate effective communications skills with positive working attitude
Highly resourceful and ability to work independently
Driven, a team player and possess strong interpersonal skills
Proficient in verbal and written communication"
"Backend Software Engineer (Stability Assurance) , Server Architecture","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

This position is with TikTok's Reliability & Quality Assurance Team. The team is responsible for ensuring that the services provided by TikTok are highly reliable with low-latency. Reliability assurance is complex and systematic, for any massive application system. We focus on optimizing the application architecture from end to end, driven by data analysis and aim at automatic and intelligent failure recovery.

In this role you are:
- Responsible for the optimization of TikTok's core function architecture, designing a highly available, high performance, and highly maintainable system to ensure the stability of core functions;
- Design and achieve the guarantee system of end-to-end full-link stability for the core functions

This role will allow you to:
- Optimize the quality and process of the entire R&D process, conduct in-depth research on code quality improvement, automatic testing, and automatic deployment.
- Optimize the architecture of TikTok, improve the architecture for better reliability, better scalability and lower latency, design automatic disaster recovery solutions.
- Build a massive service governance system with the ability to visualize the entire system architecture, and locate and resolve faults automatically. Help develop an automated chaos system
- Build a stability measurement system, systematically measure the system's ability to prevent, detect, and resolve failures, and provide a one-click solution to solve stability problems
- Become an SRE expert, gain insight into the hidden dangers of the system, establish operation and maintenance standards, improve the automaticity of operation and maintenance with the R&D team, and improve the stability guarantee system

Qualifications

- Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical background involving software/system engineering, or equivalent working experience.
- Good programming experience with high concurrency/complex business system/service management
- Proficient in at least one of the following backend languages: C/C++/Java/Go/Python/Shell/PHP
- Positive and optimistic, strong sense of responsibility, self-driven, serious, good team communication and collaboration skills"
"Technical Hub Underwriter, APAC Casualty","Who we are
American International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading global insurance organization. Building on 100 years of experience, today AIG member companies provide a wide range of property casualty insurance, life insurance, retirement solutions, and other financial services to customers in more than 80 countries and jurisdictions. These diverse offerings include products and services that help businesses and individuals protect their assets, manage risks and provide for retirement security.

Get to know the business
General Insurance is a leading provider of insurance products and services for commercial and personal insurance customers. It includes one of the world’s most far-reaching property casualty networks. General Insurance offers a broad range of products to customers through a diversified, multichannel distribution network.

Your future team
AIG’s underwriters develop insurance solutions that address the exposures of companies and individuals, and embody AIG’s tradition of innovation, bringing to market groundbreaking insurance solutions for our changing world. AIG’s underwriters help to find insurance solutions for risks from a range of areas including life insurance, aviation, financial lines, casualty, environmental, catastrophic events, high net worth individuals, and boardroom liabilities.

About the role
What you need to know:
Assist in developing our wholesale market capabilities in Singapore whilst supporting on referrals across the APAC business in high risk classes.
Be responsible for the achievement of business mix goals focusing on the implementation of strategy and the redeployment of capacity.
Establish/Maintain strong customer/industry relationships including:
Broker relationships at all levels with wholesale, local and international broking firms
Direct relationships with clients where possible
Good working relationships with competitors on coinsurance accounts
Solid relationships with the reinsurance market
Underwriting all liability classes of business including new and renewal business within authorities granted and in accordance with profit centre guidelines including reviewing and signing-off referrals from underwriters from across the Casualty team.
Help with the continual review and development of Products and development of new Products including associated Marketing material
Ensure all Risk Management is arranged in accordance with current company guidelines
Attain appropriate levels of expertise in all product lines including changes and developments.
Complete all delegated projects in the manner expected and requested by the Liabilities Management.
Develop and improve office systems on an ongoing basis including the department's self-audit procedures.
Direct responsibility for monitoring of premium processing including:
Ensuring that estimates are met and that premiums are processed in a timely manner
Ensure that accounts are processed according to AIG guidelines.
Any other duties as required.


What we are looking for:
Minimum of 5 – 8 years Underwriting experience across a broad range of products and Industries including: Commercial General Liability, Employers Liability and Construction and Energy Risk.
Entrepreneurial and Solution based approach to Underwriting whilst maintaining and demonstrating a high degree of technical skill
Proven working relationship with key Broking partners.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills (English), combined with the ability to influence people
Possess relationship management and strong interpersonal skills



A look at our Benefits

We're proud to offer a range of employee benefits and resources that help you protect what matters most - your health care, savings, financial protection and wellbeing. We provide a variety of leaves for personal, health, family and military needs. For example, our ""Giving Back"" program allows you to take up to 24 hours a year to volunteer in your community. Our global mental health and wellness days off provide all colleagues with a paid day off to focus on their mental health and wellbeing.
We also believe in fostering our colleagues' development and offer a range of learning opportunities for colleagues to hone their professional skills to position themselves for the next steps of their careers. We have a tuition reimbursement program for eligible colleagues to enhance their education, skills, and knowledge in areas that relate to their current position or future positions to which they may transfer or progress.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer

American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates are committed to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and its policies and procedures reflect this commitment. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories such as sexual orientation. At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.

To learn more please visit: https://www.aig.com/about-us/diversity-equity-and-inclusion

AIG is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to job applicants and employees with physical or mental disabilities. If you believe you need a reasonable accommodation in order to search for a job opening or to complete any part of the application or hiring process, please send an email to candidatecare@aig.com. Reasonable accommodations will be determined on a case-by-case basis.




Functional Area:
UW - Underwriting
Estimated Travel Percentage (%): Up to 25%
Relocation Provided: No
AIG APAC Holdings Pte Ltd"
"Account Executive, LE/GE, GTS","Account Executive JD – GTS, LE Sales

The Role

The Account Executive is a field-based, direct sales role responsible for both client retention as well as growth through contract expansion and the introduction of new products and services. You will consult with C-level executives to develop and implement an effective, enterprise-wide strategy that maximizes the value delivered by Gartner’s products and services.

What You’ll Do

Account management with an outcome of increased customer satisfaction and an increase in retention and account growth
Quota responsibility of $800,000+ of contract value within a territory of major client accounts
Mastery and consistent execution of Gartner’s sales methodology
Account planning and territory management
Managing forecast accuracy on a monthly/quarterly/annual basis
Maintaining competitive knowledge and focus
In-depth knowledge of Gartner’s products and services

What You’ll Need

6-10 years of experience with proven consultative sales, preferably in high technology (services, software, or consultative environment), with evidence of prior success in Sales
Strong demonstration of intellect, drive, executive presence and sales acumen
Proven experience building excellent client relationships at C-level within large enterprise organisations
Strong computer proficiency and presentation skills
Knowledge of the full life cycle of the sales process
Bachelor’s or master’s degree – desired

What’s In It For You

Uncapped earnings and challenging, but achievable quotas – 85% of our salesforce hit quota and 40-50% secure maximum accelerators every year
Unbeatable training and growth opportunities, including an intensive an intensive 5-week sales academy for new hires
Excellent corporate benefits
The opportunity to sell at C-level and work with some of the brightest minds in the industry

Who Are We

Gartner is the world’s leading research and advisory company, offering information, advice and tools for business leaders. We provide objective and invaluable insights to our C-level executive clients, where we guide them to achieve the mission-critical priorities of their organization. We’ve grown exponentially since our founding in 1979 and now employ over 17,000 associates globally and support 12,000 clients in more than 100 countries.

Our Awards And Accolades

Fortune World’s Most Admired Companies 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019 & 2020
Forbes America’s Best Employers 2018, 2019; Best Management Consulting Firms 2017, 2018, 2019
Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index Best Places to Work for LBGTQ Equality 2018, 2019 & 2020

Learn more about Gartner sales teams on our career blog. Here are a few suggestions to get you started, Gartner Sales Roles and Life of Gartner Sales.

Who are we?

Gartner delivers actionable, objective insight to executives and their teams. Our expert guidance and tools enable faster, smarter decisions and stronger performance on an organization’s most critical priorities. We’ve grown exponentially since our founding in 1979 and we're proud to have nearly 16,000 associates globally that support our 14,000+ clients in more than 100 countries.

What makes Gartner a great place to work?

Our teams are composed of individuals from different geographies, cultures, religions, ethnicities, races, genders, sexual orientations, abilities and generations. We believe that a variety of experiences makes us stronger—as individuals, as communities and as an organization. That’s why we're recognized worldwide as a great place to work year after year. We've been recognized by Fortune as one of the World’s Most Admired Companies, named a Best Place to Work for LGBTQ Equality by the Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index and a Best Place to Work for Disability Inclusion by the Disability Equality Index. Looking for a place to turn your big ideas into reality? Join #LifeAtGartner

What We Offer

Our people are our most valuable asset, so we invest in them from Day 1. When you join our team, you’ll have access to a vast array of benefits to help you live your life well. These resources are designed to support your physical, financial and emotional well-being. We encourage continued personal and professional growth through ongoing learning and development opportunities. Our employee resource groups, charity match and volunteer programs keep you connected to your internal Gartner community and causes that matter to you.

The policy of Gartner is to provide equal employment opportunities to all applicants and employees without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, citizenship status, age, national origin, ancestry, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected status and to affirmatively seek to advance the principles of equal employment opportunity.

Gartner is committed to being an Equal Opportunity Employer and offers opportunities to all job seekers, including job seekers with disabilities. If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you may request a reasonable accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access the Company’s career webpage as a result of your disability. You may request reasonable accommodations by calling Human Resources at +1 (203) 964-0096 or by sending an email to ApplicantAccommodations@gartner.com.

Job Requisition ID:73544

By submitting your information and application, you confirm that you have read and agree to the country or regional recruitment notice linked below applicable to your place of residence.

Gartner Applicant Privacy Link: https://jobs.gartner.com/applicant-privacy-policy

For efficient navigation through the application, please only use the back button within the application, not the back arrow within your browser."
"Director, Global Luxury & Lifestyle Sales - Asia Pacific","Role Purpose

Leads a team of sellers focused on accounts in the luxury & lifestyle segment and manages/develops a portfolio of own accounts. Focuses on expanding existing opportunities and converting new business from team’s and own account portfolio of luxury-focused accounts. Team portfolio value of $120M+. Delivers from assigned sales territory to hotels globally, maximizing revenues and market share for all brands with focus on Luxury & Lifestyle. Keys to success in this role are 1) ability to coach, develop, motivate and inspire team and self to achieve stretch revenue and market share targets, account plan goals, segment strategies/goals, 2) identifying, soliciting, influencing and converting highly valuable revenue opportunities, 3) developing and maximizing relationships with contacts at all levels within the assigned account portfolio, 4) developing and executing innovative plans for each account, in order to grow revenue and share.

Key Accountabilities
Coach and develop team members; inspire and motivate sales success; effectively manage team and individual seller performance to achieve success metrics.
Listens to understand each account’s needs and expectations, and delivers tailored solutions to the account which maximize returns to the client and our business, intentionally differentiating our offerings vs. competitors. Drives and maximizes revenue and market share growth from each account, resulting in achievement of individual and team sales targets which contributes to the outperformance of our brands and fuels growth for the company, with focus on Luxury & Lifestyle brands. Owns the account relationship for own account portfolio on behalf of the company, with focus on Luxury & Lifestyle brands, engaging the account and company business functions in all interactions (at all levels) related to our mutual business together, representing a 360 view of our account relationship.
Leads and directs company resources across a portfolio of accounts that focus on higher-rated, premium business, including major travel management companies and agencies., luxury consortia & networks, and luxury tour operators. Responsible for all facets of strategic account management for own accounts, including the development, evolution and execution of strategic account plans, account progress updates for internal and external stakeholders,, RFP’s, communicating brand differentiation through brand programs, agency events, roadshows, tradeshows, next-gen initiatives, B2B marketing and other sales activity. Coaches and develops sellers to also excel at strategic account management.
Direct the planning and implementation of the managed account strategies and initiatives within team’s account portfolio. Manage performance-to-plan and market opportunity at all levels. Ensure sellers effectively manage assigned portfolio of accounts, accumulate and provide to all stakeholders a deep level of knowledge in the account along with guidance on how to successfully grow market share and revenue.
Along with Head of Luxury & Lifestyle Sales, responsible for goal setting and performance optimization of customer revenue, room night and market share targets for sales team. Develop, document and execute revenue and market share growth plans to achieve assigned targets.
Introduce and promote to customer base, major programs and promotions as directed. This will include all loyalty programs, sales strategies and initiatives.
Act as the chief customer advocate within the assigned market segment(s) or geographies, ensuring the voice of B2B customers is present and considered as new company and/or sales strategies are developed and adopted. Be the escalation point for and take the lead on resolving issues of conflict or concern as these arise.
Responsible for T&E budget for self and direct reports.
Key Skills & Experiences

Education

Bachelor's or Master's Degree in Marketing, Management, Business, Hospitality or a relevant field of work, or an equivalent combination of education and work-related experience.

Experience

10 or more years of progressive work-related experience in the service industry with at least 5 years in multi-unit or corporate roles, as well as demonstrated mastery of technical and business knowledge and understanding of multiple disciplines/processes related to the position. Extensive sales experience is required, as well as client management experience among large, complex luxury accounts. Prior experience of 3+ years in leading teams, direct or indirect, is highly preferred.

Technical Skills And Knowledge
Applies all behaviors of the IHG Global Sales leadership competencies (Strategic Thinking and Planning, Lead the IHG Global Sales Process, Embody the IHG Global Sales Culture, Work Collaboratively) & demonstrates success in application of each competency; is an innovative thought-leader who adapts & synthesizes to achieve novel results
Has experience in coachimg, leading and developing people, and the ability to motivate and inspire sales teams to achieve success metrics; has the ability to effectively manage performance across a geographically dispersed team.
Possesses knowledge and expertise, both deep and broad, of our luxury & lifestyle brands, along with competitive brands.
Experience in working in global markets, deep understanding of managing across diverse, multi-cultural teams and customer organizations.
Sales management experience in organizing, planning and executing large-scale sales segment plans from conception through implementation and assessment.
Effective verbal and written communication skills for providing information to clients, vendors, senior management and staff.
Works effectively at board level in client companies, possess strong relationship management skills, and well-developed probing, listening, negotiating and persuading abilities.
Knowledge of hotel sales & marketing, business planning, along with strong sales ability, sales management, problem solving and analytical skills.
Knowledge of macro-economic and industry trends, competitive landscape and other factors which influence account strategies, positions and initiatives.
Strong commercial / business acumen and an ability to influence/build consensus across diverse groups of stakeholders; is able to assess the impact of non-traditional approaches to gaining market share.
Computer skills in MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint, social media, and sales/CRM software."
End User Computing - Engineer,"This role exists in the Devices, Data & Application Services team, as part of a group of skilled support and implementation staff responsible for the management, administration, delivery and integrity of the mobile and endpoint computing infrastructure for some 6,500 end users globally.

Expectations of the role

Provide support of the day-to-day service delivery, escalation, problem solving and implementation tasks.
Proactive systems monitoring, problem identification, analysis and resolution
Support of multiple technologies associated with the desktop infrastructure, to agreed service levels. These areas include Windows 10, build, deployment and support activities.
Able to communicate appropriately at all levels and to develop and encourage effective communications processes across Technology.
Taking part in multiple projects and programmes of system change, and the associated maintenance and support duties.
Ensure documentation, policies and procedures are maintained and adhered to.

Experience

Minimum of 5 years relevant IT systems experience.
Operational experience of systems management.
Detailed knowledge of the following:
Windows 10 O/S
Performance monitoring, troubleshooting and debugging
Deployment of task sequence builds /packages using MECM
End user device builds on tablets, laptops and smartphones, drivers and firmware deployment
Useful to have:
VPN and sync technologies
Mobile management technology such as Intune, and phone synchronisation technologies
Release processes and cycles including UAT, deployment rings and configuration targeting.

What We Are Looking For

Fluency in spoken and written English, with language skills in other major Asian countries a distinct advantage
Good analytical skills, able to identify and resolve problems.
Effective team worker - working closely and sharing knowledge with geographically distributed cross-functional teams, with a real focus on customer service.
Good time management, confident and effective communicator.
Self-motivated, takes ownership. Good sense of humour.
Self-starter, able to work with minimal supervision and handle potentially complex issues.
Have a clear desire to extend skills into other areas as required by the role over time.

The Team

You will be welcomed into a friendly, supportive and globally diverse team. Team members have a mix of experience, backgrounds and technical focus, offering you the support to be successful. It’s a busy team focused on delivering best in class service to the firm, driving improvements and efficiencies, whilst ensuring a consistent value add service to our stakeholders.

This list of duties and responsibilities above is not exhaustive. It is intended to describe the general content of, and requirements for, the performance of this job. As such, the role may also include the undertaking of additional tasks as required.

Job Offer Scams

Be alert to fictitious job opportunity posts and offers of employment which claim to be in the name of Linklaters. We have been made aware of various recruitment-related scams which ask for upfront payments, for example, for office equipment and promise start up bonuses and reimbursement in return for such payments. These scams often involve the use of email addresses similar to a genuine domain name. Genuine emails from Linklaters only use the domain of “@linklaters.com”. We will never ask you to make payments for office equipment or otherwise as part of our recruitment process. If you are in doubt about a job opportunity that appears to relate to our firm, please get in touch using the contact details on our careers website at www.linklaters.com/careers.

Pre-joiner screening

In the event that we make an offer to you, and where local legislation permits, we will conduct pre-engagement screening checks that may include but are not limited to your professional and academic qualifications, your eligibility to work in the relevant jurisdiction, any criminal records, your financial stability and references from previous employers. Your offer will be subject to the successful completion of these checks which will be initiated following your consent.

Equal Opportunities

As a responsible business, it is important that we represent the diversity of our people, our clients and our communities. We know that diversity makes us a better law firm and helps us attract the best talent, drive innovation with diversity of thought, and deliver the best experience to everyone who comes into contact with us. We recruit on the basis of merit, irrespective of age, disability, gender, gender identity, race or ethnicity, marital status, religion, sex, sexual orientation or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate.

Selection decisions, and the reasons for those decisions, are recorded at each stage of the selection process. Selection criteria and, where appropriate, technical skills tests are in place to measure an individual’s ability for the safe and effective performance of a job. Those involved in recruitment and selection decisions and processes are also provided with guidance on diversity issues. If you require reasonable adjustments to be made during the selection process, please talk to a member of the recruitment team so that any required adjustments can be made in advance. Specific experience requirements advertised on a role do not intend to preclude applications from candidates who may have more or less experience. Our intention is only to indicate a guideline as to the necessary skills for the role as described."
"Trade Product Control Analyst, CASC","Want to build a stronger, more sustainable future and cultivate your career? Join Cargill's global team of 155,000 employees who use new technologies, dynamic insights and over 154 years of experience to connect farmers with markets, customers with ingredients, and people and animals with the food they need to thrive.

Job Purpose and Impact

The Trade Product Control Analyst will be responsible for financial risk management in commodity, foreign exchange risks and trading profit and loss for the defined businesses and areas. In this role, you will partner with key stakeholders to deliver key controls, compliance, data and reports timely and accurately. You will contribute to standardization and optimization of processes and new solutions to enhance automation and implement transformation.

Key Accountabilities
Complete commodity and foreign exchange position reporting and reconciliation in collaboration with key stakeholders, and ensure any significant differences are resolved and communicated appropriately.
Monitor commodity and foreign exchange exposure and complete all financial reporting within deadlines and compare against limits, escalate breaches of limits and get resolution of breach in collaboration with business stakeholders.
Manage reports and reconcile trading profit and loss by line of impact with key stakeholders.
Support compliance operations and monitor points of control.
Collaborate with peers to implement process simplification and enhance process standardization, optimize reporting, and deliver automation and transformation processes.
Drive risk management best practices and improvement activities.
Coach junior team members to ensure a high performing team.
Independently solve moderately complex issues with minimal supervision, while escalating more complex issues to appropriate staff.
Other duties as assigned
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience
Minimum of two years of related work experience
Other minimum qualifications may apply
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in finance operations with a knowledge of financial risk management and related financial processes
Our Offer

We provide a fast paced stimulating international environment, which will stretch your abilities and channel your talents. We also offer competitive salary and benefits combined with outstanding career development opportunities in one of the largest and most solid private companies in the world.

Interested? Then make sure to send us your CV and cover letter in English today:

Follow us on LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/company/cargill

Cargill is committed to being an inclusive employer. Click here to find out more https://careers.cargill.com/diversity/"
"VP, SRE Lead (Digi), Consumer Banking Group Technology, Technology & Operations","Business Function 

Group Technology and Operations (T&O) enables and empowers the bank with an efficient, nimble and resilient infrastructure through a strategic focus on productivity, quality & control, technology, people capability and innovation. In Group T&O, we manage the majority of the Bank's operational processes and inspire to delight our business partners through our multiple banking delivery channels.

We are looking for a dynamic SRE Lead that can build a world class team that ships high quality production code daily. As an SRE lead, you’ll be responsible for shaping our SRE strategy and building out to that strategy for distributed cloud native architectures that securely serve millions of customers every day. We expect the candidate to have practical banking experience in managing incidents and administrating Enterprise Web/Mobile applications.

SRE lead will be responsible for availability, latency, performance, efficiency, change management, monitoring, emergency response, and capacity planning.

The Role

This is a unique opportunity to drive the SRE engineering and delivery of our programs. Driving forward our engineering teams on modern technology stacks, focussing on reliability, monitoring and observability

Job Purpose

We are looking for a dynamic SRE Lead that can build a world class team that ships high quality production code daily. As an SRE lead, you’ll be responsible for shaping our SRE strategy and building out to that strategy for distributed cloud native architectures that securely serve millions of customers every day. We expect the candidate to have practical banking experience in managing incidents and administrating Enterprise Web/Mobile applications.

SRE lead will be responsible for availability, latency, performance, efficiency, change management, monitoring, emergency response, and capacity planning.

Experience working in Agile-based SDLC environment and participating in different Scrum sessions 
Manage high severity incidents and high customer impact incidents focusing on fast recovery 
Champions production resilience and availability, focusing on superior client experience, by working with the operation team and technology development teams 
Drive the implementation of Site Reliability Engineer (SRE) and Chaos Engineering design for all strategic systems 
Drive effective communication between business and technology with regards to production service reliability and performance 
Drive continuous improvements in processes or systems leveraging Site Reliability Engineering methods 
Respond to, evaluate and analyse production incidents to minimize their impact as well as devise innovative solutions to prevent them in the future 
Improve the reliability and availability of systems by gathering hard data, designing systems for increased service reliability and performance 
Provide expert advice and training to our engineers as to which technology solutions and advanced reliability techniques to use on each situation 
Strong experience on building microservices with spring boot. 
Excellent programming skills in Java, J2EE, Spring, Hibernate, Servlets, JSP, jQuery, HTML, Ajax, JavaScript developing client-server, n-tier, Web and Distributed Applications 
Experience working in version control tools like GIT and SVN; build tools like Maven; continuous integration tools like Jenkins, and issue-tracking platform like JIRA 
Writing, updating, and using documentation, including runbooks/playbooks 

Experience with Banking at least 5 years will be an added advantage 
At least 5 years of working experience in J2EE Servers like Jboss, Tomcat and Apache 
Knows their way around a Unix/Linux shell 
Understands networking and messaging, especially between services 
Experience using source control (Git) and feature branching strategies 
Has experience with variety of databases MySQL, Redis. 
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science and at least 10 or more years of relevant experience 
Experience driving major production incidents and organised incident Retrospective Meetings 
Experience with high availability, high-scale, and performance systems 

Self-disciplined and motivated - Ability to work independently without much supervision 
A pro-active ‘can-do’ attitude 
Ability to prioritize and self-manage incidents and defects 
Apply Now 

We offer a competitive salary and benefits package and the professional advantages of a dynamic environment that supports your development and recognises your achievements.

Primary Location

Singapore-DBS Asia Hub

Job

Technology

Schedule

Regular

Job Type

Full-time

Job Posting

Jan 5, 2023, 12:22:48 AM"
"VP, Business Developer","Job Role: VP, Business Developer
Location: Singapore

Who we are
Imagine what even the world’s finest organizations could achieve if all of their employees were coached to be their absolute best.

At Ezra, we’re on a mission to do just that. We believe through coaching, people get to know themselves. Their goals. Weaknesses. Hang-ups. And once they know all that, they can build on the good stuff and work on the rest.

This mindset applies not only to our clients, but is manifested in our own Ezra family. We believe we are changing people’s lives. We believe a happy team is a productive team. We want our people to care and be proud of what they do. We also practice what we preach – every member of our teams gets to experience the superpower that is coaching for themselves, amongst some other pretty incredible perks.

Ezra is the fastest growing global virtual coaching company, supporting some of the world’s leading companies. If all of this resonates, Ezra just might be the place for you.

The Role
The team:
Reports directly to the Head of Sales, Asia
Participates regularly in team selling with colleagues and partners, with Sales and marketing efforts and with Global Projects, when required.
Direct Reports: None

Work you’ll do
Sales Planning:
Develops overall sales for assigned new business prospects and for revenue growth in current clients. Activities include:
Analysis of local market opportunity and LHH / Ezra market share
Recommendation of strategies for all Ezra lines of business
Implementation planning and execution
Quarterly review to determine progress
Conducts research to gather competitive data and market trends.
Direct Sales:
Ultimate responsibility for meeting assigned revenue and profitability targets
Provides regular updates to Head of Sales with regard to sales activity including client visits, first-in new business meetings, current client updates, ongoing account proposals, win/loss record with details, , conversion and engagement rates, pipeline reports and progress toward quarterly and annual revenue and profitability targets.
Fulfills assigned role and responsibilities in a national account team-sell.
Coordinates closely with account management team on delivery of local and regional client projects.
Writes proposals, creates and presents winning client presentations, leads RFP response process and follows organizational pricing guidelines.
Maintains acceptable levels of account receivables with client and ensure coordination of organized collection efforts through internal and external methods.
Marketing:
Ensures that marketing activities support sales strategies and priorities.
Plans and generates measurable ROI for local marketing events, including evaluation of participation, events success and compliance with tracking.
Increases local awareness of Ezra through active participation within the community and industry related organizations.
Professional Development:
Continually seeks professional development opportunities and self-improvement activities.

About you
Proven track record in a professional sales environment for 5+ years preferably selling HR or Human Capital Solutions to the CHRO and other C-suite leaders.
Experience selling career and leadership development a plus
Demonstrated ability to develop credible relationships with all levels of management
Organized self-starter who enjoys prospecting and cold calls
Highly developed presentation and communication skills
Team player who effectively draws on others in order to maximize the firm’s resources
Demonstrated basic computer skills with a general understanding of technological sales support techniques
Active community involvement
Can speak fluent English and knowledge of local language is preferable.

What we offer
Your own world class coach
Regular team social events
Flexible working
Contribution to a wellbeing app (think meditation, fitness, sleep!)
A weekly wellbeing hour and much more!
Competitive benefit package

We are an equal opportunity employer dedicated to having a thriving, diverse team where everyone has a voice and feels able to be themselves. We believe that through valuing our uniqueness and respecting our differences, we can achieve more and that diversity adds to our culture. Attracting and developing a diverse workforce that reflects the communities in which we serve is essential to us."
Visualization Engineer,"Summary

We are looking for a highly motivated and detail-oriented Visualization Engineer to be a part of delivering world class visualisation capabilities at Dyson.

As a member of the CITO team, you will be joining a newly established dedicated visualisation practice. You will work closely with a diverse and talented team within CITO, and form rich, valuable relationships across the organisation using your communication skills and empathetic personality.

This is a unique opportunity to set the standard for visualization and storytelling excellence at Dyson, inspiring the organisation and demonstrating the art of the possible when communicating insights and narratives through beautiful, intuitive data visuals.

About The Role

You will be a Visualization Engineer in the Chief IT Officer (CITO) team and be based in Singapore.
You will work with Data Scientists, Data Engineers and Data Architects as part of a squad to deliver incredible visual products to different business areas around the organisation.
You will help respond to complex business questions beyond what business intelligence teams and low-code visualisation software is capable of today.
You will engage with the business to shape and refine their questions, driving the frontend portion of diverse projects, and seizing the chance to work with and learn from your talented colleagues in CITO.
You will work with experts in CITO to get advice and support on accessing data and productionising your products.
Cutting edge approaches are key to keeping pace with Dyson’s innovative culture: you will be expected to stay abreast of industry trends and emerging technologies and methodologies.

About You

A drive and know-how to design, code and deliver powerful visual experiences through data.
You write clean, efficient and test-driven JavaScript.
You have strong HTML5 and CSS experience.
You have extensive D3.js experience, along with its abstractions, or a comparable data visualisation library, and you can demonstrate this experience with a portfolio.
You're comfortable with modern frontend frameworks like React or Vue.
You have a talent and passion for visual design of products - you advocate for simplicity, can judge and remedy composition problems, and achieve satisfaction from pixel-perfection when it's demanded.
You foster a collaborative atmosphere when you work and welcome constructive, well-delivered feedback from multiple stakeholders.
You're comfortable using Git to collaborate with others and are familiar with CI/CD practices to develop and deliver software optimally.
Keen to fail fast, you like to rapidly prototype and ideally would have encountered interface design tools like Figma or Sketch in your career.
The possibility of being part of an emerging sophisticated visualization capability and contributing to the refinement of its way of working, including tool selection and standards, motivates and inspires you!

Dyson is an equal opportunity employer. We know that great minds don’t think alike, and it takes all kinds of minds to make our technology so unique. We welcome applications from all backgrounds and employment decisions are made without regard to race, colour, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other any other dimension of diversity."
"Account Executive - General Business, Singapore","To get the best candidate experience, please consider applying for a maximum of 3 roles within 12 months to ensure you are not duplicating efforts.

Job Category

Sales

Job Details

We are seeking proven sales performers to help us grow our loyal customer base for our Commercial division.

This is a role for someone who is a hunter and eager for new business success. Responsibilities include generating new business in new accounts and also expanding the footprint inside existing customers, as well as playing a key role as you drive strategic CRM initiatives for our customers.

This is a role for someone who can see the value of Cloud Computing and who can be a combination salesperson and evangelist to get the Salesforce penetration into the sector growing even more.

On top of your own business development, we provide a range of support functions to help build and drive opportunities from internal sales support to highly skilled pre-sales so it is not just you against the world.

Responsibilities

Developing and managing relationships within our Commercial segment focusing on customers in the Singapore market.
Orchestrating complex sales-cycles and presenting to C-level executives the value of our enterprise suite of applications.
Forecast sales activity and revenue achievement in Salesforce while creating satisfied and reference-able customers.
Demonstrating our product via the Web.

Requirements

6-10 years of experience carrying quota and closing deals in software (business applications preferred) or technology sales.
Extensive experience selling to customers in Singapore.
Consistently over-achieved quota (top 10-20% of company) in past positions.
Successful track-record managing complex deals from lead to close.
Business-level proficiency in Mandarin or local Asian language is advantageous
Experience will be evaluated based on alignment to the core competencies for the role (e.g. extracurricular leadership roles, military experience, volunteer work, etc.).

Desired Skills

Strong and demonstrated written and verbal communications skills.
Previous Sales Methodology training preferred.
CRM experience preferred.
Ability to work in a fast pace, team environment.
Strong customer references.
Strong digital literacy, including CRM, Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, and Excel.

Accommodations

If you require assistance due to a disability applying for open positions please submit a request via this Accommodations Request Form.

Posting Statement

At Salesforce we believe that the business of business is to improve the state of our world. Each of us has a responsibility to drive Equality in our communities and workplaces. We are committed to creating a workforce that reflects society through inclusive programs and initiatives such as equal pay, employee resource groups, inclusive benefits, and more. Learn more about Equality at Salesforce and explore our benefits.

Salesforce, Inc. and Salesforce.org are Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employers. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status. Salesforce, Inc. and Salesforce.org do not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Salesforce, Inc. and Salesforce.org will not pay any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Salesforce, Inc. or Salesforce.org.

Salesforce welcomes all."
Senior Software Engineer,"Requirements
5-8 years of experience in building applications using C# and .Net
Ability to come up with creative/practical solutions to complex issues.
Experience in ASP.NET MVC, Azure Web Apps.
Experience as a front-end or full-stack developer is a plus
Good knowledge of SQL, Microsoft SQL Server or Oracle is a must.
Develop solutions to improvise performance and scalability of systems.
Ability and willingness to refactor existing portions of non-conformant code to adhere to coding standards and best practices.
Ability to work effectively as a member of a team while also performing strongly without constant supervision.
Ability to work flexible hours as required to meet installation project objectives is necessary. (This is needed a couple of times per year)
Writing unit tests as part of the code, to provide code coverage.
Excellent verbal & written skills in English.
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related technical field required.
SINGAPOREANS OR SINGAPOREANS PR ONLY.
Preferred/optional Skills
Experience with Microsoft Azure Cloud platforms, and knowledge of different PaaS services available with Azure Cloud Platform.
Experience in building UI using Blazor framework and ability to deliver incremental progress to enhance customer experience.
Experience with API standards, Open API framework.
Experience with Azure Dev Ops and Build processes."
Network Engineer L2,"Want to be a part of our team?

Working at NTT

What will make you a good fit for the role?

Responsibilities
Manage post implementation support issues (fault call tickets)
Conduct post implementation review as part of quality process
Participate in regular operations review meetings, including operational issues, tickets review etc.
Conduct internal training as part of knowledge sharing
Prepare Network/Security analysis reports, including findings with analysis
Provide Level 2/3 operations support for Network and Security infrastructure
Ensure compliance to policies, processes and standards, both internal and clients’ organization
Bi-monthly after-hours standby support (24x7) for a week

Requirements
Singaporeans / Singapore PR applicants only
Knowledge of CISCO network routing and switching technologies and protocols
Knowledge of security firewall and VPN technologies
Able to work extended hours and on duty, when required
Able to work independently as well as in a team
Analytical in nature and possess good trouble shooting skills
Willing to work hard and eager to learn about new technologies
Polite and able to communicate well to clients

Preferred Requirements
Experience from System Integrator environment
Hands-on experience in the following:
Cisco ASA Firewall and VPN
Cisco ACS / ISE
Cisco Firepower
Bluecoat Proxy & Packetshaper
RSA Authentication Manager
Palo Alto firewall
Fortinet firewall
Checkpoint
Juniper
McAfee SIEM/IPS/DLP
Splunk Enterprise/Cloud Platform"
"Cloud Solutions Development Specialist, IaaS","Ingram Micro Cloud (IMC) is fast-paced business with an entrepreneurial mentality within the foundation of a Fortune 100 company that is growing absurdly fast and changing how business is done in the cloud. We are committed to helping our channel partners and professionals get access to an infinite ecosystem of cloud solutions, platform technology, enablement programs and relationships with the biggest players in the cloud industry.

We’re inviting a customer obsessed Cloud Solutions Development Specialist, IaaS who will focus on driving accelerated and profitable new revenue for IaaS solutions through partner acquisition, and new end-user workload adds. If you have a successful sales track record this opportunity is a great chance to excel at what you love doing.

Key Responsibilities:
Earn NEW annual recurring revenue with a primary focus on driving Google GCP IaaS and PaaS
Recruit and develop sales relationships with new and existing channel partners to add new end-customer workloads to maximize consumption
Work with targeted partners to develop their sales, marketing and technical readiness
Proactively identify sales opportunities and close sales within your assigned base of partners
Maintain a high level of expertise on Cloud offerings – including product schedules, technology benefits, pricing schedules, and certifications as needed
Collaborate with a variety of internal resources including presales technical consultants, customer success managers, and post-sales support
Execution of marketing programs, developing channel and end-customer demand generation
Exceed quarterly sales targets by selling and increasing IaaS consumption into existing and new customer accounts
Pipeline development through a combination of cold calling, email campaigns and market intelligence
Creation of commercial proposals for the services and solutions we offer

Qualifications:
2+ years of B2B technology, preferably with cloud/IaaS technology; Google GCP knowledge a plus
Knowledge of professional, effective telephone techniques, and sales skills
Demonstrated understanding of strategic selling principles and order management
Ability to dig deeper into an organization and take advantage of cross and upsell opportunities.
Successful track record of new business sales, with the ability to prove consistent over achievement against targets.

Key Skills and Attributes:
Ability to build reciprocal relationships with different parts of the business, partners and customers.
Ability to develop deep technical and product knowledge
Strong competency in building value proposition and positioning strong proposals
Strong interpersonal skills with proven ability to communicate across all levels
Be creative with strong problem-solving skills and the ability to adapt and succeed in a fast-paced
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, multi-function, high-pressure environment

Ingram Micro Inc. is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or any other protected category under applicable law."
"Execution Engineer, Third Party Data Center Construction","Google will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require Google's sponsorship of a visa.

Minimum qualifications:

Bachelor's degree in Electrical, Mechanical, Building Services, or related Engineering field, or equivalent practical experience.
10 years of experience in design, construction, commissioning or operation of critical facilities or data centers in the APAC region.

Preferred qualifications:

Master's degree in a related engineering field
Professional Engineering License
Ability to travel 25% of the time.

About The Job

Our thirst for technology is a part of everything we do. The Data Center Engineering team takes the physical design of our data centers into the future. Our lab mirrors a research and development department -- cutting-edge strategies are born, tested and tested again. Along with a team of great minds, you take on complex topics like how we use power or how to run state-of-the-art, environmentally-friendly facilities. You're a visionary who optimizes for efficiencies and never stops seeking improvements -- even small changes that can make a huge impact. You generate ideas, communicate recommendations to senior-level executives and drive implementation alongside facilities technicians.

As an Execution Engineer, you will work as part of the capital engineering project team for third-party facilities, greenfield or brownfield sites, and any associated major modifications. You will be leading projects with other engineering team members to deliver and support the ongoing operations on major construction items.

In this role, you will work on the technical due diligence and analysis for proper site selection. You will set up technical and performance requirements. You will work with the external vendors and internal cross-discipline and cross-functional partner teams on the proper design of the projects, including scope of works, performance specifications, reviews, interfaces of systems, startup and commissioning, engineering submittal reviews in conjunction with cost, and schedule considerations.

Google is an engineering company at heart. We hire people with a broad set of technical skills who are ready to take on some of technology's greatest challenges and make an impact on users around the world. At Google, engineers not only revolutionize search, they routinely work on scalability and storage solutions, large-scale applications and entirely new platforms for developers around the world. From Google Ads to Chrome, Android to YouTube, social to local, Google engineers are changing the world one technological achievement after another.

Responsibilities

Collaborate with other stakeholders and team members to develop and review the electrical systems design from due diligence, masterplanning, design, and construction completion for data center projects, third-party facilities, and major infrastructure upgrades.
Interface with the internal product teams and vendors for appropriate development, product insertion, and technical interfaces into projects.
Localize internal standard designs, materials, and equipment for APAC data center projects.
Identify and resolve any engineering issues regarding the third-party data center engineering systems with cross-functional teams and stakeholders, and feedback to the program level for continuous improvement.

Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. See also Google's EEO Policy and EEO is the Law. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing our Accommodations for Applicants form ."
Jumpstart - Product Engineer (Electrical Failure Analysis),"The candidate will be responsible for Infineon Microcontroller Electrical Failure Analysis task of RMA (customer return) and rejects of test optimization during product ramp-up phase. The candidate is also responsible for big test data handling to support cost saving activities and developing Tooling to improve the efficiency of failure analysis and data mining.

In your new role you will:

Be responsible for Product Engineering activities for Microcontroller during product Ramp Up phase including: Yield, Test Time and Burn-In optimization, Wafer process improvement, and quality improvement etc.
Execute Electrical Failure Analysis (EFA) to identify failure mechanism and root cause finding.
Be responsible to handle customer return (RMA) of Microcontroller.
Do Data Analysis to contribute to Cost Saving, Yield and Test quality improvement initiatives.
Develop Tooling to improve the efficiency of EFA and seeking digitalization and automation.
Collaborate with Design, Product and Test Engineering team to develop optimal test solution for high volume MCU manufacturing with best-in-class quality and reliability.

You are best equipped for this task if you have:

Bachelor's Degree in Semiconductor, Physics or Electrical & Electronics Engineering.
Fundamental acknowledge on semiconductor process, Device and VLSI (analog/digital) circuit design of microcontroller.
Strong problem solving and analysis skill.
Familiar with programming languages in Embedded C, C++, Perl, Python
Passion at semiconductor failure analysis and product test.
Teamwork spirit and strong communication skill.
Fresh graduates are welcome to apply.

This is a 24-month contract with job rotation exposure.

Part of your life. Part of tomorrow.


Infineon is a world leader in semiconductor solutions that make life easier, safer, and greener. Our solutions for efficient energy management, smart mobility, and secure, seamless communications link the real and the digital world.

In accordance with the requirements set by the Singaporean Government, Infineon Technologies Asia Pacific Pte Ltd (“Infineon”) can only allow individuals who are (a) fully vaccinated, (b) certified to be medically ineligible for a vaccine or (c) have recovered from COVID-19 within a prescribed period, onto company premises. Therefore, Infineon requires all new employees, as well as contractors and business partners, to be fully vaccinated against COVID-19. “Fully vaccinated” means individuals have completed the full regime of an approved COVID-19 Vaccine as listed under the World Health Organization (WHO) Emergency Use Listing (EUL) including the respective post-vaccination period to ensure the vaccine has become full effective. Anyone who is unable to be vaccinated due to an approved and/or recognised exemption condition may apply for special consideration."
Senior Network Engineer,"603829BR

Introduction

At IBM, work is more than a job - it's a calling: To build. To design. To code. To consult. To think along with clients and sell. To make markets. To invent. To collaborate. Not just to do something better, but to attempt things you've never thought possible. Are you ready to lead in this new era of technology and solve some of the world's most challenging problems? If so, lets talk.

Your Role and Responsibilities

As a Network engineers that enjoy solving problems, You will have strong network troubleshooting skills, drive to ensure robust network performance, and support secure communications with a high number of connected customers.

Your Role & Responsibilities

Design and implement network segmentation in highly complex with multi-tier applications
Diagnose and troubleshoot network issues 
Lead efforts to design, & implement core network & security technologies in data-center environments
Apply industry best practice standards on network infrastructure builds in a world wide environment
Excellent collaboration with team members and other IT organizations to successfully support network operations 
Effectively communicate with customers and partners using collaboration tools regarding technical issues
Act as an escalation point for network 2.0 engineers to resolve complicated network issues
Involve in architecture level discussion as and when required.
Recommend and perform technological platform upgrades 
Provide network design inputs as and when required 
As part of global network project team – ensure timely delivery of agreed project modules
Design and drive technical operation improvements 
Coordinate with OEMs ( Juniper / Cisco, Palo Alto etc) and drive resolution for complicated network issues

Required Skills

8-10 years in Network trouble shooting / designing experience 
Proven knowledge understanding of various network tools ( Netim, Thousand eyes, Solar winds etc) 
CISCO / Juniper professional level certification or equivalent knowledge 
Proven Network Engineering and Operations skills with experience in leading Network and Security platforms, Network Routing, Switching, and Security Firewall and Proxy technologies
Maintain latest security and compliance posture for all devices supported.
Do deep dive, trouble shoot and resolve network issues reported for various platforms ( Cisco, Juniper, Palo Alto etc)

Preferred Skills

CCIE or equivilant technical knowledge 
Scripting skills

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

As above.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

As above.

About Business Unit

The IBM Finance organization is responsible for driving enterprise performance and transformation. We are the financial stewards of IBM, delivering IBM’s financial strategy, developing new business models, and mitigating enterprise risk. Do you have a passion for creating business value? Join our team in accounting, financial planning, pricing, business controls, tax, treasury, business development (acquisitions & divestitures), and global financing.

Your Life @ IBM

Are you craving to learn more? Prepared to solve some of the world's most unique challenges? And ready to shape the future for millions of people? If so, then it's time to join us, express your individuality, unleash your curiosity and discover new possibilities.

Every IBMer, and potential ones like yourself, has a voice, carves their own path, and uses their expertise to help co-create and add to our story. Together, we have the power to make meaningful change – to alter the fabric of our clients, of society and IBM itself, to create a truly positive impact and make the world work better for everyone.

It's time to define your career.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
.NET Developer (Full Stack) (Senior),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
The .NET Developer will be part of our development team that has strong experience in agile development and in-depth knowledge of digital solutions. You will work in a highly productive and collaborative team where your ideas will be listened to and put into action. This exciting opportunity would suit a .NET Developer who is looking to move upwards and onwards and is eager to work closely with senior management on interesting and super cool ideas. You will be collaborating with the Product, Design and Business teams to develop and maintain digital solutions for our prestigious clients in public sector and large commercial enterprises.

Responsibilities
Join project teams to work on full life-cycle web/mobile application projects from requirement gathering to solutioning, development, releasing and post-launch maintenance
Work with agile cross functional, cross countries teams to design, develop, maintain web/app application base on specifications and ensure successful releases
Support Project Manager/Scrum Master to provide consultation and direction to stakeholders for managing and delivering their expectations
Be a self-starter, proactively recognise and solve issues as they arise
Be motivated in continuous learning and improvement to enhance your skills in an ever changing environment
Qualifications And Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or other relevant qualifications
We are hiring all levels of experiences of .NET-based web/app development with full-stack exposure
1-3 years of programming experience : Junior
4-6 years of programming experience : Mid
Minimum 7 years of programming experience: Senior
Minimum 11 years of programming experience: Technical Lead
Proficient in .NET development with excellent knowledge of .NET Core 3.1 and above.
Solid understanding of object-oriented programming and fundamental design principles behind a scalable application on the cloud (Azure/AWS)
Comprehensive experience and knowledge of modern development tools and technologies: Redis, Docker, Kubernetes, Infrastructure-as-code
Extensive experience and knowledge of Relational Database, SQL-query programming, microservice, ORM (Entity framework) and various architectural and design patterns (MVC, concurrency pattern, singleton pattern, etc.)
Hands-on experience on server setup and maintenance, DevOps, and experience working with Cloud Infrastructure (Azure/AWS) will be an advantage
Hands-on experience with SharePoint or Sitefinity will be an advantage.
Following certifications will be highly considered: Azure Developer (Associate), Azure Solutions Architect (Expert), Azure DevOps Engineer (Expert), AWS Developer (Associate), AWS Solutions Architect (Professional), AWS DevOps Engineer (Professional)
English-speaking with good communication and teamwork skills
Ability to work within a fast-paced agile development environment
Candidates with extensive experience, excellent communications skills and good certifications will be considered for Team Lead/Technical Architect role
Required Technology Stack
Front-end: React JS, Angular, HTML/CSS
Middleware: IIS, Nginx, .NET Core 3.1 and above
Database: MS SQL Server, PostgreSQL, Azure SQL Database, Azure Database for PostgreSQL, Amazon RDS (MS SQL/PostgreSQL), Amazon Aurora (PostgreSQL)
OS: Windows Server
IDE/CLI: Visual Studio, Nuget, Gradle, Npm
CI/CD: Bitbucket/Gitlab, Bamboo/Jenkins, SonarQube (code quality inspection), Robot Framework (test automation)
Cloud Infrastructure: Azure, AWS
Infrastructure-as-Code: Terraform
Platform: SharePoint, Sitefinity
NOTICE

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.

By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read and agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining, and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration.

Consequences of Not Providing Personal Data for Transaction/Service/Application

Please be noted that should you not consent and provide us with the relevant personal data to fulfil the “Purposes” of collection, use and disclosure of your personal data by Decision Science Agency Pte Ltd, it may hinder our ability to continue to interact with you. We may not be able to make a decision on your recruitment and employment or comply with the law and therefore, we may not be able to make an offer of employment.

You may refer to and access our website https://www.decision-science.com/ for more information.
Desired Skills and Experience
RDS, Kubernetes, .NET, PostgreSQL, Azure, Design Patterns, Architect, MySQL, Agile, Test Automation, SQL, SharePoint, SQL Server, Angular, Docker, Agile Development"
Quality Engineer,"Abbott is a global healthcare leader, creating breakthrough science to improve people’s health. We’re always looking towards the future, anticipating changes in medical science and technology

Primary Function/Primary Goals/Objectives

Develops and implements company and regulatory quality standards in the manufacturing facility.
Develops, implements, revises and maintains quality standards, tools and methods for processing materials into finished products.
Designs and implements quality control processes and procedures. Recommends revision of specifications when indicated.
Formulates or assists in formulating quality control policies and procedures.
Works with product group organization to design the lowest cost, highest efficiency and highest quality products.
Drives quality improvement and cost reduction using Six Sigma or Lean methodology.

Major Responsibilities

Undertake plant investigations.
Monitor CAPA and perform trending.
Review and approve change controls and protocols.
General knowledge of procedures and activities within own work area.
Focused on learning the key aspects and duties of the job being performed.
Applies research, information gathering and analytical skills.
Handles detailed, structured problems.
Works on assignments where judgment is required a majority of the time.
Works under general direction, seeks assistance as needed.
Works with team to support achievement of project milestones and deliver on internal and/ or external commitments.
When assigned to a customer team, supports small project teams or specific components of a customer engagement.
Contributes to own team/closely related teams through quality and accuracy of own work.
Conveys information in a concise and professional manner.
Asks effective questions and solicits feedback to understand needs.
Anticipates future needs based on past transactions.
Any other duties as assigned by supervisor.

Skills/Experience Requirements

0 to 3 years of relevant experience or equivalent combination of education and work experience.
Project management skills or experience in project management is essential.
Team player with initiative, drive, good communication skills and a strong command of written English.
Proven problem-solving capability, customer focus and commitment to continuous.
Good practical knowledge of GMP in food/ pharmaceutical manufacturing.
Good report writing skills.

Education

Bachelor of Engineering or Science in Food Science, Food Technology, Dairy Science or related discipline or Diploma with minimum 1 to 3 years of experience.

Follow your career aspirations to Abbott for diverse opportunities with a company that can help you build your future and live your best life. Abbott is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to employee diversity."
Engineer Digital Verification,"In the fast growing digital world, STSECURE products and solutions protect your privacy and your assets by ensuring their confidentiality, their integrity and their availability to authorized requesters where and when needed. We deliver hardware- and software-certified solutions, offer seamless integration of security features, and are experts in cryptography and device architecture. With its STSECURE portfolio, ST is securing all your applications from traditional applications, such as SIM, banking and ID, to the latest ones including contactless transactions and IoT connectivity.
Work Location : Ang Mo Kio BHQ at 5A Serangoon North Avenue 5 Singapore 554574
The position is an exciting opportunity to be part of a dynamic team in the growing markets of secure microcontrollers used in state-of-the-art secure applications including IOT, Mobile, Banking and Band Protection. The role works within the digital team in Singapore that includes all disciplines required for digital design and verification.
Job scope:
· Work on IP verification or SOC verification.
· Verification planning, this includes vplan writing, functional points identification and review.
· Multi languages testbench development.
· Implementation using different verification techniques (constraint random dynamics simulation and static formal verification).
· Verification closure by ensuring 100% coverage functionality are fully covered.
· Schedule preparation and execution adhere to plan.
· Good reporting to the management.
Requirements:
· Masters in Electronics' Engineering (a relevant experience with atleast 6 years in a semiconductor or high technology R&D environment would be appreciated)
· Experience in Digital IP verification and good understanding of microcontroller architecture.
· Experience in Hardware Design Language (such as VHDL or Verilog).
· Experience in Digital verification with various skill sets:
o (a) Universal Verification Methodology (UVM) & SystemVerilog (SV)
o (b) System Verilog Assertions (SVA)
o (c) C/C++ language
o (d) Formal Methodology (e.g JasperGOLD)
o (e) Coverage analysis
o (f) Low-power verification
o (g) Scripting languages (e.g TCL, SHELL, PERL, PYTHON)
· Good communication and written skills in English.
· Able to work in a multi-cultural team.
· Strong analytical and problem solving skill.
· Able to keep up with fast moving new verification methodology"
"Sales Specialist, Real Time Data APAC","Role Overview

As part of the Data and Analytics Sales Team, we have an immediate opening for a Real Time, Enterprise Sales manager role in APAC.We are looking for a passionate and enthusiastic sales manager with expertise in low latency feeds and success in growing a similar business in the Asia Pacific region. The successful candidate will lead a talented team that is tasked with presenting the Data and Analytics Real Time data solutions to the financial services industry.

In this role, you will be responsible for leading a newly-formed team to develop and grow a new Enterprise product line at Refinitiv. You will lead from the front, sourcing and closing deals yourself at existing and new clients, whilst directly managing a team of sales people across Asia, with dotted line management responsibilities to in-region pre-sales consultants.

Highly driven, you meet and exceed targets by leading with customer value, winning trust with your natural people skills and have an in-depth proposition knowledge. You know how to inspire a team to meet aggressive targets and you can structure deals and leverage market and business acumen to outsell the competition. You will manage the sales pipeline and work closely with colleagues and management within the high-performing Asia Enterprise team.

You will have a focus on commercialising the next generation of software and data solutions primarily into Tier 1 banks, hedge funds, asset managers and proprietary trading firms.

You will be tasked with executing our strategy for long term sustainable growth through an understanding of market and competitive dynamics and will detail and drive Sales execution. The role will require the successful candidate to possess strong direction-setting and influencing skills to work with the wider Enterprise team and local Account Management teams to deliver results.

The Real Time Proposition Elements Are

Realtime Low Latency Direct Feeds., End of Day & Time Series Pricing Data (all asset classes)
Workbench Data Management tools and services
Professional Services Solutions

What You'll Be Doing

As the manager you will work with your direct reports to help them grow the Low Latency business across Asia.

You will have day-to-day management responsibilities of pre-sales Solution Consultants to ensure they’re fully supported in Asia time zone and are aligned with your sales goals

You Will Be Seen As The Specialist When It Comes To Selling Our Real Time Data Solutions And Will Be Accountable For Structuring, Negotiating And Closing Deals To Drive Growth By

Providing in-depth customer and market insights, to identify new business opportunities and drive the sales process
Partnering with technical sales engineering experts, you will execute through strong collaborative relationships across matrixed functions, including Account Management, Product, Marketing, Sales Strategy, and external partners
Monitoring all aspects of key competitors, analysing their strengths, weaknesses, opportunities, and threats and develop strategies to achieve competitive advantage
Driving our thought-leadership agenda as the internal and external spokesperson for your proposition, supporting community building
Having a strong eye for business and commercial strategy
Being able to influence individuals as well as groups in meetings
Being able to work within tight deadlines in a high performing and inspiring environment
Proactively identifying pipeline opportunities
Delivering customer demonstrations on their specific propositions

What Are We Looking For

A track record for growing a similar business in Asia and leading by example
Ability to performance manage a team compiling of direct and dotted-line reports
Experience in selling Realtime Direct, low latency data-feeds and experience of selling timeseries data for quant and strategy development workflows.
Outstanding solutions selling skills with a proven track record in a quota-bearing environment
Highly driven, self-motivated knowledge and direct experience in selling solutions to the Financial Services community
Creative problem solver and good sales ideation skills
Strong presentation skills (verbal & written)
Strong listening skills and interpersonal skills
Expert understanding of the Financial Services and Competitor Landscape
Strong technical knowledge specifically within the financial markets trade and execution domain

At LSEG, we believe that creating a diverse and inclusive organisation is fundamental to the way we deliver on our promise of creating essential partnerships and open opportunities. Our open culture is central to how we deliver our purpose – driving financial stability, empowering economies and enabling customers to create sustainable growth – in everything we do.

Working with us means that you will be part of a dynamic organisation of 25,000 people across 70 countries. However, we will value your individuality and enable you to bring your true self to work so you can help enrich our diverse workforce. You will be part of a collaborative and creative culture where we encourage new ideas and are committed to sustainability across our global business. You will experience the critical role we have in helping to re-engineer the financial ecosystem to support and drive sustainable economic growth. Together, we are aiming to achieve this growth by accelerating the just transition to net zero, enabling growth of the green economy and creating inclusive economic opportunity.

LSEG offers a range of tailored benefits and support, including healthcare, retirement planning, paid volunteering days and wellbeing initiatives.

We are proud to be an equal opportunities employer. This means that we do not discriminate on the basis of anyone’s race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital status, veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. Conforming with applicable law, we can reasonably accommodate applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.

Please take a moment to read this privacy notice carefully, as it describes what personal information London Stock Exchange Group (LSEG) (we) may hold about you, what it’s used for, and how it’s obtained, your rights and how to contact us as a data subject.

If you are submitting as a Recruitment Agency Partner, it is essential and your responsibility to ensure that candidates applying to LSEG are aware of this privacy notice."
"Engineering Lead, Developer Experience","Airwallex is the leading financial technology platform for modern businesses growing beyond borders. With one of the world’s most powerful payments and banking infrastructure, our technology empowers businesses of all sizes to accept payments, move money globally, and simplify their financial operations, all in one single platform.

Established in 2015 in Melbourne, our purpose is to connect entrepreneurs, business builders, makers and creators with opportunities in every corner of the world. Today, Airwallex has a global footprint across Asia-Pacific, Europe, and North America.

Your work

Airwallex has a mission: to provide a world class developer experience to our customers. Our platform provides a comprehensive set of APIs and tooling that allows our customers to automate everything in an industry where manual processes have been the norm. The new Developer Experience (DX) Team at Airwallex empowers developers to evaluate, integrate, and operate our platform in a completely self service model.

The Engineering Lead is a high-impact role that will collaborate with product, engineering, customer-success, and technical support teams to ensure our customers have a delightful developer experience from start to finish. This will cut across all product domains and require working with cross functional teams across the business, and includes our customers.

Who You Are

You are passionate about developer experience – you are eager to solve the challenges that developers like yourself face.

You can think on your feet – with experience building platforms which resolve fast paced, ever changing success measures.

You are team player – you enjoy working in a collaborative, innovative and customer first driven environment

You are naturally curious – always asking why to better understand our customer needs

You are a problem solver – You love digging deep and brainstorming with colleagues in order to come up with the best solution for a problem

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, other related field or equivalent practical experience

Experience with backend technologies is essential. While we do not mind what language you have most recently been using we are using Java or Kotlin, Spring / Spring Boot

Experience building REST APIs

Experience in designing large scale systems

Evidence of working on high volume distributed systemsStrong cloud experience GCP (preferred) or AWS (EC2, RDS, ELB, CloudFront etc) with docker and Kubernetes

Observability tooling such as Splunk, NewRelic, Prometheus, Grafana

Basic experience with frontend technologies such as React and Angular is preferred but not required

Strong communication and collaboration skills

At Airwallex you’ll have the ability to make an impact in a rapidly growing, global fintech. You’ll be offered a competitive salary and we also like to ensure we create the best environment for our people by providing a collaborative open office space with a fully stocked kitchen. We organise regular team building events, encourage flexible/remote working and we give our people the freedom to be creative.

Airwallex is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We value diversity and anyone seeking employment at Airwallex is considered based on merit, qualifications, competence and talent. We don’t regard colour, religion, race, national origin, sexual orientation, ancestry, citizenship, sex, marital or family status, disability, gender, or any other legally protected status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

Airwallex does not accept unsolicited resumes from search firms/recruiters. Airwallex will not pay any fees to search firms/recruiters if a candidate is submitted by a search firm/recruiter unless an agreement has been entered into with respect to specific open position(s). Search firms/recruiters submitting resumes to Airwallex on an unsolicited basis shall be deemed to accept this condition, regardless of any other provision to the contrary."
Application Engineer - 5 days #64421,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description
Industry/ Organization Type: Manufacturing & Production
Position Title: Application Engineer
Working Location: Woodlands
Working Hours: 5 days, Monday – Friday (9 AM-6 PM)
Salary Package: Basic Salary + Transport Allowance $100 + Variable Bonus
Duration: Permanent Role
Key Responsibilities
Provide application support to all customers (Hardware/Software interfacing, Preparation of sample codes).
Manage technical support issues via case tickets.
Technical verification of related equipment to provide value-added service for customers and provide on-site troubleshooting when necessary.
Provide product testing and RMA handling in Singapore.
Act as a bridge between Asia and HQ technical requirements and escalate second-level support issues.
Provide training to sales channel partners or direct customers.
Prepare technical demos and presentations.
Assist in tradeshows and seminars.
Any ad-hoc tasks as assigned by supervisor.
APPLY NOW!!!
Degree in Engineering, preferably Electronics or Computer Engineering. Diploma holder with relevant working experiences may also be considered.
Proficient in C++/C# .NET programming.
Good knowledge of Windows and Linux OS.
Knowledge of electronic circuits.
Some travel may be required.
Kindly Apply Through ANY Of The Following Methods
Submit your application by clicking the APPLY button;
Email your resume to Job(at)anradus.com.sg. Kindly indicate #64421 on the email subject.
Anradus Policy: This clarifies Anradus' working procedures, from receiving the applicant's resume, screening to shortlisting. We assure you our consultants will go through every resume we receive but we regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Anradus Pte Ltd | EA License No. 20C0161 | Angel Lim | EA Reg No.: R1769781
Desired Skills and Experience
Staff responsibility, Discipline, Troubleshooting, .NET, Channel Partners, Hardware, Electrical, Social Responsibility, Application Support, Windows, Team Player, Screening, Bridge, Manufacturing, Linux, Electronics, Technical Support"
Artificial Intelligence Engineer (NLP),"S2T develops cutting edge cyber-intelligence solutions for Government and Enterprise Customers.

The Role

As an artificial intelligence engineer at S2T, you will be creating AI/ML capabilities by training new models, fine-tuning existing models, and exploring state-of-the-art research. You will get the opportunity to build new projects from the ground up, learn about the cutting-edge of artificial intelligence, explore new artificial intelligence research, and apply your skills to new and novel situations in the real-world.
We develop models in different domains such as NLP (Named Entity Recognition, Opinion Extraction, Document Parsing), Vision AI (Facial Recognition, License Plate Recognition [LPR], Optical Character Recognition [OCR]), Predictive models (e.g. to identify viral topics online).


What We Are Looking For
Experience designing, implementing, and training new machine learning model, and fine-tuning pre-trained machine learning models.
Experience working with large datasets, including data normalisation, filtering, and feature extraction.
Experience with a variety of different machine learning architectures (convolutional neural networks, transformers, reinforcement learning, Gaussian processes).
You have strong coding skills: whatever your language of choice, your projects are beautifully designed and cleanly written
You are dynamic, curious and eager to learn, always looking to expand your fields of expertise
You are proactive and take ownership of your work
You often come up with new ideas to solve complex problems, and know how to get your teammates behind them
You want your work to have an impact: rather than a cog, you see yourself as the engine
You are comfortable dealing with the pressure of delivering an excellent service to our customers
You can communicate clearly in English

Our Recruitment Process
HR interview including one of our developers/leads
Technical hands-on interview with developers/leads"
"Data Engineer - ETL, Azure, Informatica","Career progression & people centric organisation
Hybrid work arrangement
Exposure to cloud technologies (MS Azure, AWS)
About The Company

A scale up company based in Singapore is looking for a Data Engineer to join their team to add value to their applications within its industry. The company currently works with a wealth of clients, both internationally and nationally which combines data within deep knowledge about problems within the industry business systems.

About The Job
Translating business needs to technical specifications.
Analyzing business requirements; understand underlying data sources, transformation requirements, data mapping, data modelling and metadata for reporting solutions.
Designing EDW data layer with appropriate enterprise considerations like scalability, performance, security, maintainability, automation etc.
Building infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources, applications and platforms.
Building and designing the company’s data warehouse.
Code writing; conduct unit testing, documentation and troubleshooting.
Create visualizations and reports for various business units.
Participate in technical sharing and peer review sessions with team members.
Skills And Experience Required

5 years relevant experience in Azure, ETL & Informatica or similar software. Proven experience as a data warehouse architect & developer, including full implementation of data warehousing solution.

Solid experience in designing and implementing robust data pipelines and ETL framework.

what's an offer

Visibility in the organisation - as this role will be participating in driving the data team and data projects across the regions.

The permanent opportunity for a Data Engineer will pay a salary range of $ 7,000 - $ 8,000 plus benefits. This opportunity offers a hybrid working arrangement.

To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you can reach me at

https://www.linkedin.com/in/Oliviatoh-032330132/. (EA: 94C3609 / R22109942).

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM’s regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
Site Reliability Engineer - Recommendation Architecture,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

About The Team

Our Recommendation Architecture Team is responsible for building up and optimizing the architecture for our recommendation system to provide the most stable and best experience for our TikTok users.

On the SRE team of Recommendation Architecture, you'll have the opportunity to sharpen your expertise in coding, performance analysis, large-scale system operation, and get heavily involved in the process of hardware/capacity decision-making.

SRE ensures that the recommendation services at ByteDance have the highest level of availability, as well as creating highly automated systems and pipelines.

Responsibilities

Reliability and operation optimization for large-scale clusters of TikTok Recommendation System.
Continuous integration and delivery of core services, optimizing the efficiency and automation of operation, and improving service stability and R&D efficiency.
Cloud platformization, resource optimization and SLA guarantee for large-scale clusters.
Collaboration with software engineer to design and implement DevOps solutions to Improve the efficiency of the entire R&D process.

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree or above in computer science, software engineering, or a related field
Operation experience of large-scale systems, familiar with system operation skills on Linux and network.
Good programming experience with at least one of the following languages: Shell/Python/Perl/Go/C++.
Expertise in analyzing, and troubleshooting large-scale distributed systems.
At least 3 years of relevant experience.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace.

At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Machine Learning Engineer (MLE) - Data Solutions Center,"Responsibilities

About the team
The success of TikTok's data business model hinges on the supply of a large volume of high quality labeled data that will grow exponentially as our business scales up. However, the current cost of data labeling is excessively high. The Data Solutions team is built to understand data strategically at scale for all Global Business Solution (GBS) business needs. Data Solutions Team uses quantitative and qualitative data to guide and uncover insights, turning our findings into real products to power exponential growth. Data Solutions Team responsibility includes infrastructure construction, recognition capabilities management, global labeling delivery management.

About the role
We are looking for a highly capable machine learning engineer to deploy and optimise our machine learning systems. You will be evaluating existing machine learning (ML) lifecycle, understanding and productionizing the model data pipeline, and enhancing and maintaining the performance of our AI model's predictive automation capabilities.

Responsibility
What you will do
- Model optimisation: Collaborate with data scientists to improve existing machine learning model training and evaluation pipelines, updating/finetuning the models with different training resources such as GPU or distributed training
- Model Deployment: Build continuous integration, testing, and scalable deployment pipelines in cloud computing environments for machine learning services
- Data pipeline productionisation: Work with data scientists and data engineers to design and implement the data pipelines for machine learning models that will support the current and future needs of our business
- Maintenance: Build scalable and reliable infrastructure that supports feature engineering, model training, deployment, inferencing, performance monitoring
- Tracking: Build logging, tracking, analyzing, monitoring and reporting pipelines for both data and model tracking in cloud computing environments to ensure correct model output and stable model performance

What you will need
- Ability to understand the business use case to optimise and implement scalable solution
- Knowledge of machine learning concepts and fundamentals
- Deep learning proficiency in at least one of CV and NLP, with solid experience in model finetuning and optimization
- Solid programming skills with experience writing and maintaining high-quality production code
- Experience in ML pipeline, model training orchestration; large-scale/distributed training experience is desirable
- Ability to work independently and complete projects from beginning to end and in a timely manner
- Great communication skills, both written and oral; comfortable presenting findings and recommendations to non-technical audiences

Qualifications

- BS or above in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field
- 5+ years of industry experience building ML infrastructure at scale
- At least 2 years of experience in developing and deploying large-scale systems, version control, scaling and monitoring
- Experience in machine learning frameworks (scikit-learn, Tensorflow, Pytorch), big data frameworks (e.g., Spark/Hadoop/Flink) and experience in resource management and task scheduling for large scale distributed systems.
- Proficient in Python/SQL and one of C/C++/Go, with deep knowledge of Linux and CD tools (e.g. git); Experience with any microservice framework is highly desirable
- Knowledge of machine learning concepts and fundamentals
- Good communication and teamwork skills to clearly communicate technical concepts with other teammates.

Tiktok is dedicated to fostering a welcoming work space and championing diversity and inclusion. We welcome people as they are, value uniqueness, and inspire potential. The evaluation of our candidates is solely based on our business needs and individual qualifications for job requirements, and we are strongly opposed to discrimination of any kinds based on race, gender, color, age, nationality, religion, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, citizenship, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected characteristics to our candidates and employees."
"Executive, Programme Administration (ACE), School of Computing (3 year contract)","Job Purpose

The NUS School of Computing (SOC) traces its roots back to the Nanyang University Department of Computer Science that was established in 1975. Since then, SOC has developed into one of the leading computing schools in the world, with faculty members who are both internationally recognized researchers and inspiring teachers.

Today, SOC offers undergraduate and graduate degree programmes across the full spectrum of the field of computing, including Computer Science, Information Systems, Computer Engineering, Business Analytics and Information Security, as well as specializations in emerging areas of importance such as artificial intelligence, fintech, blockchain, analytics and security.

SOC Advanced Computing for Executives (ACE) unit was established to help business leaders, managers and professionals learn about emerging technology and how to harness them for digital transformation and business competitiveness. ACE drives the expansion of SOC’s lifelong learning offerings in a concerted and strategic way and aims to be the premier educator and thought leader in advanced computing and information technology.

We are looking for suitable qualified candidates to fill the full-time position of Executive (Programme Administration).

Reporting to Senior Manager (Quality & Programme Management), the incumbent shall assist in ensuring efficient operations and the seamless end-to-end administration of our programmes.

Job Responsibilities
Responsible for coordinating all events/programmes administration and logistics, including activities relating to participant registration, instructor/class confirmation, venue/classroom setup, food catering and related parties liaison to ensure successful execution of each event/programme.
Track applications and manage all invoicing/payment matters with respect to participants and service providers.
Working with Instructors and vendors on asynchronous e-learning course development.
Compile and generate programme feedback reports and statistics, including gathering market research information and maintaining a database of comparative courses offered in the market.
Attend to email and phone enquiries.
Job Requirements
A Bachelor’s degree in any discipline from a reputable university.
Preferably 2 to 3 years of related working experience.
Good interpersonal and communication skills.
IT savvy and proficient in MS Office applications.
Excellent coordination and organization skills, with a customer service mindset.
Independent worker who is able to multi-task with a keen sense of urgency.
Strong team player, resilient, resourceful with good problem-solving and critical-thinking. skills, and thrives in a fast-paced, results-oriented and ambiguous work environment.
Covid-19 Message

At NUS, the health and safety of our staff and students are one of our utmost priorities, and COVID-vaccination supports our commitment to ensure the safety of our community and to make NUS as safe and welcoming as possible. Many of our roles require a significant amount of physical interactions with students/staff/public members. Even for job roles that may be performed remotely, there will be instances where on-campus presence is required.

Taking into consideration the health and well-being of our staff and students and to better protect everyone in the campus, applicants are strongly encouraged to have themselves fully COVID-19 vaccinated to secure successful employment with NUS.

More Information

Location: Kent Ridge Campus

Organization: School of Computing

Department : Dean's Office (School of Computing)

Employee Referral Eligible

Job requisition ID : 18311"
"Risk Strat, Risk Engineering","Job Description

Risk Strat , Risk Engineering

The Risk Division aims to effectively identify, monitor, evaluate, and manage the firm’s financial and operational risks — including reputational risk — in support of the firm’s strategic plan.

Our Risk division develops comprehensive processes to monitor, assess, and manage the risk of expected and unexpected events that may have an adverse impact on the firm. Risk teams play a critical function for the firm, driving how the firm takes and manages risk. Risk professionals execute critical day-to-day risk management activities, lead projects and contribute to the ongoing advancement of a robust risk management program. Effective coordination with executive management, business units, control departments and technology is critical for success.

RISK ENGINEERING

Risk Engineering, which is part of the Risk Division, is a central part of the Goldman Sachs risk management framework, with primary responsibility to provide robust metrics, data-driven insights, and effective technologies for risk management. Risk Engineering is staffed globally with offices including Dallas, New Jersey, New York, Salt Lake City, London, Warsaw, Bengaluru, Singapore, and Tokyo. As a member of Risk Engineering, you will interface with a variety of divisions around the firm as well as the other regional offices. The interaction with numerous departments and the diverse projects that ensue allow for a challenging, varied and multi-dimensional work environment.

Risk Engineering professionals are part of the value proposition of the firm and we balance our key functional responsibility of control with that of being commercial. RE has strong traditions of risk management, client service excellence and career development opportunities for our people.

RISK STRATS

Risk Strats use their programming and mathematical background to identify and measure risk and to implement quantitative and technical risk modelling solutions. Successful Strats are highly analytical, driven to own commercial outcomes, and communicate with precision and clarity. As a part of the team, you will work with our key business partners, understand financial market , to quantify the firm’s risk. You will also focus on developing quantitative models & scalable architecture.

Functionality Description
Developing risk models and risk sensitivity analysis that use advanced mathematical/statistical/engineering approaches such as optimization, machine learning, regressions, visualization
Performing detailed analysis on risk trends and drivers
Updating and maintaining risk models along with business growth and risk environment changes
Developing and maintaining large scale risk infrastructures/systems using strong programming experience in at least one compiled or scripting language (e.g. C, C++, Java, Python, Scala)
Experience in designing highly scalable, efficient systems
Effectively communicating results and outputs from the model and insights from analysis
Qualifications
Post graduate degree /Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Physics, Electrical Engineering or related technical discipline
Experience in software development, including a clear understanding of data structures, algorithms, software design and core programming concepts
Strong analytical and problem solving skills using math, statistics, and programming
Demonstrated ability to learn technologies and apply
Excellent communication skills including experience speaking to technical and business audiences and working globally
Strong programming experience in at least one compiled or scripting language (e.g. C, C++, Java, Python)
Experience in designing highly scalable, efficient systems
Familiarity with financial markets, financial assets and risk management practices is a plus
About Goldman Sachs

At Goldman Sachs, we commit our people, capital and ideas to help our clients, shareholders and the communities we serve to grow. Founded in 1869, we are a leading global investment banking, securities and investment management firm. Headquartered in New York, we maintain offices around the world.

We believe who you are makes you better at what you do. We're committed to fostering and advancing diversity and inclusion in our own workplace and beyond by ensuring every individual within our firm has a number of opportunities to grow professionally and personally, from our training and development opportunities and firmwide networks to benefits, wellness and personal finance offerings and mindfulness programs. Learn more about our culture, benefits, and people at GS.com/careers.

We’re committed to finding reasonable accommodations for candidates with special needs or disabilities during our recruiting process. Learn more: https://www.goldmansachs.com/careers/footer/disability-statement.html

© The Goldman Sachs Group, Inc., 2021. All rights reserved.

Goldman Sachs is an equal employment/affirmative action employer Female/Minority/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity"
Field Engineer,"Description

Summary of the Role: The successful candidate will collaborate with the Project Manager to maintain daily operations for the monitoring equipment used to transmit data from the field to insightful dashboards for water and wastewater clients.

Key Responsibilities

Essential Duties/Principal Responsibilities:
Develop operational knowledge of Xylem’s proprietary technology platforms and associated Sensor Network equipment.
Work as a member of the project delivery team to plan and execute the maintenance of Xylem products.
Act as the Point of Contact for material requisitions, logistics arrangements, and on-site operations with internal staff as well as 3rd party vendors/contractors.
Organize and maintain a variety of files and records; work logically and systematically using effective time management skills.
Drive operational excellence by meeting clients’ expectations on an ongoing basis by continuously improving the processes by which a business operates.
Expected Responsibilities
Schedule, coordinate, and review assignments of field support staff activities to ensure compliance with client/contract requirements.
Ensure project/operational deliverables meet or exceed stakeholder expectations by following Xylem’s standard operating procedures.
Provide technical assistance to staff in resolving problems.
Preparation of maintenance schedule and report,
Ensure the correct functioning and maintenance of all internal and external systems and products serviced by Service Operations
Maintain spares and inventory list, ensuring enough parts for daily operations
Assist to develop and implement operating procedures and cost control initiatives to improve work efficiency and reduce maintenance and operating cost
Analyze field issues and communicate with the internal team for resolutions. Report and escalate to the next level those problems which cannot be resolved
To support cross functional team when needed.
Safety
Ensure company’s safety program and goals are implemented and enforce proper safety procedures while working in any situations.
Comply with rules, regulations, safe work habits and potential hazards presented by the work environment.
Candidate Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering / Diploma in Electrical/ Mechanical Engineering from a Polytechnic or ITE
1 to 5 years of relevant work experience.
Experience with potable water or wastewater systems is an asset
Confined space entry and basic first aid certification are an asset.
Energetic and able to work as a team.
Excellent communication skills to be able to transmit and receive information clearly within a team
Excellent time management skills with the ability to balance multiple priorities and meet deadlines
Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook)
Additional Information
Successful candidates cannot have any restrictions on their driver’s license that prevent them from driving and being insurable on company-owned or rented vehicles
Work Environment
Standard weekly job hours: 40+ hours
May require working outdoors in various weather, traffic and environmental conditions.
May require working at heights
May require working in confined spaces"
Software Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Who Are We Looking For

Here at Hubble, we pride ourselves in having passionate Software Engineers who build highly usable, feasible, and valuable products. We are looking for independent and self-driven individuals who embrace challenges and love to explore new technologies and platforms. At Hubble, we believe the future is in our products, and the future of our products will be in your hands.

What You Will Be Doing
Developing a clean and maintainable code using software engineering best-practices and modern platforms.
Participating in full product development lifecycles from ideation to live production.
Day-to-day tech operations such as server maintenance and deployment.
What We Need From You
Have a good understanding of web application architecture
Have a good understanding of various software engineering design patterns
Experience in one or more of these frameworks: Ruby on Rails, ReactJS, and React Native will be advantageous
Experience in building mobile applications or web applications will be advantageous
Comfortable with working in a fast-paced environment and highly collaborative team to solve real business problems
Versatility and enthusiasm to tackle new problems across the full-stack and to learn new frameworks as we continue to push technology forward
Fresh graduates may apply
About Hubble

Hubble is a leading technology company focusing on the construction and engineering industry. We are on a mission to build the world’s first autonomous construction sites by automating and trading the 4M (Man, Machine, Material, Money) resources.

Our solutions help digitise all your work processes, and connect all key project stakeholders - developers, consultants, fabricators, contractors, and facility managers - onto an all-in-one platform - The Hubble Platform.

Build faster and cheaper and with the highest quality and safety standards with Hubble’s impactful technologies. Let’s transform the way we build our cities for a better tomorrow. Today. Together. For generations to come.

What Hubble Will Give You

Hubble is built by a team of talented, driven, and ambitious individuals. We do not subscribe to conventions. We do not let history and traditions dictate and limit our dreams to shape the world. We adopt the same mindset with our hiring. We are looking for the best and we want to bet on you.

Who Will You Be Working With

If you connect with any of the description below, please apply immediately:
Purpose driven
Hungry, ambitions, and self-motivated
Meritocratic, results/performance > age/bureaucracy
Resourceful, independent, chart our own destiny
Determined, perseverance, and hard working
Creative, innovative, out of the box
Yes, the above is everyone of us at Hubble.

Visit us at hubble.build to learn more for #bettercitiesoftomorrow

Get in touch at talents@hubble.build
Desired Skills and Experience
Application Architecture, Design Patterns, Software Engineering, JavaScript, SQL, Ruby, Engineering Design, React Native, Mobile Applications, Web Applications, Ruby on Rails, Java, Software Development"
Molding Process Engineer,"Summary

We live in a mobile and device driven world where knowledge of the physical world around us is needed. We rely on this knowledge to get around, to learn about our environment and to enable spectacular new features for custom applications. Apple is meeting those needs as robustly and as creatively as possible and is interested in people who want to help meet that commitment.


At Apple, we believe our products begin with our people! By hiring a team with varied strengths, we drive creative thought. By giving that team everything they need, we drive innovation. By hiring incredible engineers, we drive precision. And through our collaborative process, we build memorable experiences for our customers!


These elements come together to make Apple an amazing environment for motivated people to do the greatest work of their lives. You will become part of a hands-on development team that sets the standard in cultivating excellence, creativity and innovation. Will you help us design the next generation of revolutionary Apple products?


Key Qualifications

Minimum 8 years in plastic tool design, mold making, molding industry and minimum 5 years in molding process position


Experience in developing plastic processing parameters with hand-on experience in mold setup, process optimization and problem solving


Experience in managing and develop precision parts, high pace and mass volume products with multiple vendors in parallel


Good knowledge of geometric dimensioning, hot runner systems application and scientific molding technique


Systematic, analytical & strong trouble shooting skills are a must to possess


Able to analyze mold flow analysis, scientific study and provide improvement feedback


Good knowledge in wide range of materials such as engineering plastic, liquid silicon rubber, thermal plastics, primer and epoxy


Extensive experience in molding process setup, improvement and optimization


Proficient in written, presentation and verbal communication


Description

• Trouble shooting issues in scientific approach with the use engineering tools/ techniques such as decoupled molding, scientific molding approach, Tolerance Analysis, SPC, DOE and Six Sigma techniques


• Take the leading role in driving the improvement of productivity and quality of plastic part manufacturing, molding and tooling techniques


• Serve as Apple’s internal expert for molding process by leveraging a thorough understanding various material properties and tool component fabrication techniques


• To take part in new material development, new process development and innovation


• Work closely with Supply Management, Product Design, Industrial Design, Quality and Manufacturing Engineering groups on new part designs


• Frequent travel is required and up to 70% on-site support traveling is required, covering China, India, and other APAC countries.


Education & Experience

Bachelor Degree and above in Engineering, Plastics Technology, Polymer Science or equivalent


Role Number: 200433641"
IT System / Business Analysts,"The IT System / Business Analysts shall perform the following to support the EOS Upgrade:
a) Review design specifications in accordance with the System’s Enterprise and Business Architecture standards;
b) Conduct technical review and assessment of EOS Upgrade proposals before making recommendations to the Authority;
c) Coordinate and oversee the installation/setup works;
d) Supervise LTA’s appointed contractor’s works;
e) Assist in troubleshooting and/or resolving issues and problems;
f) Conduct on-site acceptance and system integration testing;
g) Facilitate and support the conduct of user acceptance testing;
h) Facilitate and support any audit to be conducted by the Authority’s appointed auditor(s) on the system;
i) Design, develop, setup, maintain and execute test automation using test tools and analyze test results for continuous testing of the application/system.
j) Provide technical, implementation and project management support which includes managing the system’s daily operations, performing continuous review to improve the system, and ensuring that the Authority’s appointed contractor complies with the Authority’s requirements in performing the EOS Upgrade."
Global Quality Assurance Specialist - Arabic,"Responsibilities

 Responsible for monitoring international LIVE content quality to ensure community ecological security;
 Thorough data analysis, summarize and feedback problems & handle necessary escalation and form a quality inspection report;
 Work closely with other departments to respond immediately to relevant operation’s needs;
 Participate in the development of quality inspection standards and continuously optimize the process and system platform.

Qualifications

 Bachelor’s degree or above, livestream product user;
 Excellent language skills, English, 1-2 local languages:

Japanese/Arabic/Turkish/Thai/Vietnamese/Russian/German/Portuguese/Spanish;

 In-depth contact with local customs and culture, is highly sensitive to social news;
 Possesses strong learning ability, cross-department communication and collaboration skills, overseas working/ training is a plus;
 Able to work under minimal supervision and have strong logic/ common sense related to job nature;
 Familiar with office software such as Excel, Word, etc. With data processing experience and other data analysis capabilities are preferred;
 Good communication skills, able to abstract problems and find solutions proactively."
Data Analytics,"Job Description – Senior Developer (Data Analytics)
Develop visual reports, dashboards and KPI scorecards using Tableau and PowerBI
Excellent in analytical thinking and translating data into informative visuals and reports
Work closely with Business users to provide Level 1 and Level 2 support in Data Analytics area
Liaise with data owners and other internal IT teams to troubleshoot and resolve data issues
Liaise with the product principal or other 3rd party vendors for issues that requires product support.
Accountable for end-to-end resolution of incidents. Track and monitor incidents throughout the lifecycle.
Able to implement row level security and understand data security standards
Able to understand business requirements, design and develop high quality data analytics solutions
Nimble while responding to changes / enhancement requests / user queries
Work closely with 3rd party SI in Data Analytics implementation projects / Data Platform harmonization exercises
Job Requirements:
A degree in Computer Science or Information Systems or related
5+ years of hand on experience in Data Analytics tools. Experience in Tableau and PowerBI is a must.
Experience in designing and implementing end-to-end Data Analytics solutions including ETL processes, data warehousing strategies and visualizations
Familiar with Microsoft SSAS, SSRS, SSIS and Python
Familiar with SAP BW and/or Microsoft offerings such as Azure SQL Server, Data Lake, Data Factory, Purview etc will be an added advantage
Excellent Verbal and Written communication skill
Working location at Seletar (WFH arrangement applies)"
HRIS Business Analyst #BJT,"Job Description:

Collaborate and drive process harmonization across countries / business entities together with HR functional teams
Collaborate with HR functional teams to identify, streamline and automate business processes
Ensure proper change management and project documentation
Provide subject matter expertise on key business process decisions involving core HR systems
Perform extensive validation and testing of HR solutions

Application Procedures
Interested candidates, please email your resume to:
Attention: Jamie Tan Pei Zhen (CEI No. R2199473)
jamietan@recruitexpress.com.sg
Recruit Express Pte Ltd (EA No. 99C4599)"
Full Stack Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Required Skills
Curious and passionate about technologies
Practitioner of life-long learning
Experienced in Cloud native Java and passionate to learn others languages like C#, Go, C++, Python, Kotlin, R or Node.js
Experience with Vuejs or Angular, REST, gRPC, GitLab, Docker, Kubernetes, Kafka or RabbitMQ will be a plus.
Excellent understanding and experience of Agile (Scrum, Lean Start-Up, Safe, …) principles
Good knowledge of DevOps
Excellent analytical skills
Excellent oral and written communication
Understanding of project management practices (PMP, Prince2 is a plus)
Scope of Work
Plan, design and implement end-to-end software solutions for the bank.
Use and contribute to build an efficient CI/CD software factory.
Interact with product owners and Subject Matter Experts to define solutions.
Quality-first, Agility and Continuous Improvement mindset.

Desired Skills and Experience
Factory, CSS, Lifelong Learning, Kubernetes, REST, Kotlin, PRINCE2, JavaScript, RabbitMQ, Python, Agile Scrum, Angular, Docker, Java, C#, C++"
Applied Sales Engineer,"Trane is a US company owned by Trane Technologies. We are a world leader in HVAC (Heating, Ventilation & Air-Conditioning) equipment & systems, services & solutions.
Responsibilities:
You will promote and propose Trane Chiller & Equipment to building consultants and contractors
Responsible for developing long term customer relationships
Building close business relationship with customers especially key accounts
Maximizing account penetration and customer retention
Identify potential opportunities & develop solutions with existing & new customers
Update forecast timely into the system
Negotiates value, addresses resistance, and close the sales. Differentiates & made Trane as preferred supplier
Any other duties as assigned from time to time
You also need to ensure all works carried out in accordance with the specified quality and EHS standards.
Requirement:
Degree in Mechanical/ Electrical engineering or its equivalent
1-2 years in Engineering sales, experience in HVAC industry will be a plus
Customer driven with excellent communication & interpersonal skills
Candidates with the relevant education qualifications but no prior work experience is welcome to apply
We invite committed individuals to join us. Successful candidate will receive attractive remuneration package.
Only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Location: 30 Boon Lay Way, #04-01, Singapore 609957"
Data Analyst,"What The Role Is

As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.

What You Will Be Working On
Conduct research, in particular Randomised Control Trials, to obtain insights
Deliver insights with the appropriate analytics methodologies and techniques to help departments meet business objectives
Conduct analysis and build analytic models that improve policy targeting, optimise decisions and inject predictive intelligence to business decisions
Able to interpret technical statistical results and communicate insights through storytelling

What We Are Looking For
Preferably with at least 2 years’ relevant experience in research, data related areas or behavioural insights
Meticulous and good with figures
Strong problem solving and critical thinking skills, and able to work independently and as a team
Proficient in statistical and data visualisation tools such as SAS, Tableau, Power BI, R and Python"
Operations Specialist,"We are working with a renowned trading company to recruit an Operations Specialist (Oil) for their team in Singapore. 

You will report directly to the Operations Director and provide operations support for the growing Oils trade desk for their international oil and oil product flows.

The ideal candidate should have experience form working within the oil and gas industry but does not need prior experience from operations. You have a can-do attitude and are looking to develop within the industry."
"VP/Associate, Institutional Sales & Business Development (SG)","About Hex Trust
Hex Trust is Asia’s leading provider of digital asset custody solutions for Banks & Financial Institutions, using leading-edge Blockchain technology. Led by innovators from the financial services industry, Hex Trust has built a proprietary platform that delivers a new way for financial institutions, asset managers, and corporations to safely and efficiently operate in the Blockchain ecosystem. Institutional adoption of digital assets and DeFi requires a fundamental shift in the way banks and financial institutions operate. Hex Trust is the link that connects the traditional financial world to the digital assets ecosystem.

POSITION OBJECTIVE
At Hex Trust, we’re building trust In the digital ecosystem and we’d like you to help us deliver that message to our prospects. Providing institutional custody services like ours takes in-depth industry knowledge, confidence, and persistence. We’re seeing tremendous demand and growth in the space and we’ve created this role to partner with our Global Head of Sales. We’re a small, but rapidly growing FinTech company looking for an energetic individual to work independently, build relationships, and help broaden our client base and take our business to the next level!

DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES
Partnering with our Global Head of Sales on client acquisition and retention efforts to achieve growth targets.
Own all elements of the business development, sales and partnership life cycles: initial scoping, framing of value, negotiation of term sheets and contracts, implementation and post-sales.
Strategize on plans for market engagement, client management, and be seen as a thought leader, across the digital asset ecosystem.
Lead sales pitches, contact prospects and clients, and handle enquiries, feedback and requests.
Ad hoc projects as needed.

Requirements

QUALIFICATIONS
3-7 years of sales or relationship management experience preferably from the financial services or technology sector.
Ability to operate and excel in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment with minimal supervision.
Ability to negotiate and create relationships with both FinTech companies and traditional financial institutions.
Be an effective communicator and ability to collaborate across teams.
Demonstrate a curiosity for and knowledge of the digital asset ecosystem.
Commercial and business awareness and ability to stick to time constraints
Able to work independently in an often ambiguous and fast-paced environment
Good negotiation skills and the ability to develop strong working relationships

PERFORMANCE STANDARDS
Commercial and business awareness and ability to stick to time constraints
Able to work independently in an often ambiguous and fast-paced environment
Good negotiation skills and the ability to develop strong working relationships

Benefits
Make a difference and get yourself noticed in a rapidly growing company, providing multiple opportunities for career and personal development. We are a dynamic, multi-cultural team of smart, motivated people based in brand new offices in the heart of Hong Kong's Central business district. We'll give you tough challenges, while offering rewarding results to match, as well as regular team and social events and flexible working arrangements when needed.
Diverse and inclusive team: A diverse and international team who come from over 15 countries with diversity of both thought and background on a mission to disrupt the digital asset industry. We support each other and take pride in our achievements. We attract talent from well known global multinational companies and institutions.
Ownership & learning-curve: Opportunity to make an active contribution to the growth story of one of the leading disruptors in the FinTech industry.
Communication: We treat our staff like owners by being open, transparent, and providing regular communication about our direction and progress. We provide regular insight into decision making, strategy, and corporate-wide objectives and key results progress so that each of our employees is aligned and empowered. And we constantly strive to improve how we can communicate more effectively.
Office: We offer both the flexibility to work remotely or to work in style and comfort from our modern office in Central, Hong Kong, the heart of the Asian financial services centre.
Hex Trust is an equal opportunity employer devoted to diversity and inclusion in the workplace. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status or disability status."
Sewing Specialist,"Armacell provides numerous and diverse career opportunities. Add your talent to ours and make a difference around the world!

Responsibilities

To doing sewing of fibreglass, aramid and ceramic textiles, tapes and mats to form flexible insulation and fire protection covers and jackets.

To bond insulation foams and do laminatation.

Sewing will be done on industrial sewing machines. Occasionally, the employee will be sent to work/job sites to do installation of the covers.

The jobsite can be outdoors or indoors and the specialist must don PPE and have proper safety licenses to do the job.

Skills & Experience

The candidate must be able to operate an industrial sewing machine.

The candidate must be able to combine different fabrics and sew these together.

For candidates who can do delicate sewing and bonding work, the majority of their work time will be spent doing sewing, lamination, bonding and trimming of materials.

Time Type

Full time"
NLP Engineer (Intelligent Customer Service) - 2023 Start,"Responsibilities

TikTok will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require TikTok's sponsorship of a visa.

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for talented individuals to join us for this future position in 2023. As a graduate, you will get unparalleled opportunities for you to kickstart your career, pursue bold ideas and explore limitless growth opportunities. Co-create a future driven by your inspiration with TikTok.

Candidates can apply to a maximum of two positions and will be considered for jobs in the order you apply. The application limit is applicable to all TikTok and its affiliates' jobs globally. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis - we encourage you to apply early.

About The Team
Our team is responsible for developing state-of-the-art NLP/ML algorithms and strategies to improve user consumption experience, inspire merchants' service quality and revenue, and build a fair and flourishing ecosystem on our E-commerce Platform. More specifically, our team is responsible for the algorithms of Intelligent Customer Service and machine translation under TikTok's global e-commerce business.

Responsibilities
- Participate in the development of AI customer service within the TikTok e-commerce ecosystem to help our sellers better serve our customers.
- Responsible for the language quality of the TikTok shopping platform, including improving machine translation quality of product information, IM of buyers and sellers, and supporting scenario of cross-lingual searching.
- Collaborate with product managers, data scientists, and the product strategy & operation team to define product strategies and features.
- Build an intelligent dialogue system, including mining questions and answers.
- Language understanding, including intention recognition, emotion recognition, FAQ, etc.
- Develop multilingual text generation such as products' copy, dialogue summary, email reply, etc.
- Construct knowledge graphs of buyers and products.

Qualifications

- Final year or recent graduate with a background in Software Development, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related technical discipline
- Experience in one of the following fields: Machine Learning, NLP, and Computer Vision
- Experience with software development in at least one of the following programming languages: C++, Python, Go, Java
- Good sense of teamwork and communication skills, practical experience in relevant business scenarios is preferred.

Preferred Qualifications
- Proficient in using at least one mainstream deep learning framework such as TensorFlow/PyTorch, understanding distributed training, distillation acceleration, and other implementation methods.
- Experience in text classification, text matching, sequence labeling, knowledge graph.
- Aware of certain processing methods and optimization experience on domain adaptation, small sample construction, text mining, unsupervised/semi-supervised, and other similar issues.
- Familiar with commonly used machine learning and deep learning algorithms, understand basic network model structure (DNN/LSTM/CNN, etc.) and text representation methods (LDA/Word2Vec/ELMo/GPT/BERT, etc.), have practical experience in deep learning training and reasoning model tuning.
- Experience in large-scale text data processing or cleaning (Such as using Hadoop/Spark/Hive/Flink).

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

By submitting an application for this role, you accept and agree to our global applicant privacy policy, which may be accessed here: https://careers.tiktok.com/legal/privacy.

If you have any questions, please reach out to us at apac-earlycareers@tiktok.com."
Cyber Security Engineer,"Job Description

About Infosys:

Infosys is a global leader in next-generation digital services and consulting. We enable clients in 50 countries to navigate their digital transformation. With over three decades of experience in managing the systems and workings of global enterprises, we expertly steer our clients through their digital journey. We do it by enabling the enterprise with an AI-powered core that helps prioritize the execution of change. We also empower the business with agile digital at scale to deliver unprecedented levels of performance and customer delight. Our always-on learning agenda drives their continuous improvement through building and transferring digital skills, expertise, and ideas from our innovation ecosystem.

Visit www.infosys.com to see how Infosys (NYSE: INFY) can help your enterprise navigate your next.

Short Description

If your passion is to build solutions that really make a difference to enterprises, the community and your world, Infosys is the right place for you.

Roles And Responsibilities

Supporting the Architect team. in following domains:
Additional Skills: Infosys is an equal opportunity employer and positively encourages applications from suitably qualified and eligible candidates regardless of gender or other attribute covered by equal opportunity legislation.

Cloud Security & migration
Application Security
Incident management and re-mediation.
Information Security consulting
Security program Governance.
Work on POC and Testing.
Status and Reporting.
Excellent customer interfacing skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong attention to detail and outstanding analytical and Problem-solving skills.

Please note in order to protect the interest of all parties involved in the recruitment process, Infosys does not accept any unsolicited resumes from third party vendors. In the absence of a signed agreement any submission will be deemed as non-binding and Infosys explicitly reserves the right to pursue and hire the submitted profile. All recruitment activity must be coordinated through the Talent Acquisition department.

All aspects of employment at Infosys are based on merit, competence and performance. We are committed to embracing diversity and creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Infosys is proud to be an equal opportunity employer."
"Senior Engineer, Field Application Wireless, RF & AI","STMicroelectronics is a world leader in providing the semiconductor solutions that make a positive contribution to people’s lives, both today and in the future. ST is one of the world’s largest semiconductor companies as a leading Integrated Device Manufacturer serving all electronics segments with key strengths in Sense and Power, Automotive, and Embedded Processing Solutions.

STMicroelectronics has the need for a Distribution Account Executive in Schaumburg, IL to generate sales in conjunction with distribution partners for customers in one or more territories by developing business relations through promoting ST image and product portfolio to customers and distributors.

Role Overview:
Work Location : Ang Mo Kio BHQ Site at 5A Serangoon North Avenue 5 Singapore 554574

As a Firmware engineer, you are at the center of many activities. You are the one making the bridge between the system requirements and the IC capabilities. You interface with architects and IC design teams. Software is a key element when it comes to get the quintessence and the ultimate performances from the IC.
In complex systems, some critical functions can also be implemented in software. You can have to deal with real time software, including real time operating system, communication protocols. You can have to deal with filtering and signal processing. You are responsible of all the project steps, from the specification, development, testing to the integration and validation on the IC.
From this software view, you are also involved in customer related activities like documentation (user manual, …) and customer support for complex cases.
In this role it is important to keep pace on the latest technical solutions and technologies, be innovative and creative, take initiative and be autonomous, and work as part of a team of technical experts.

Candidate Profile
Requirements:
You have graduated from an engineering or equivalent level.
You are looking for a first professional experience or have a first experience in Firmware Development and wish to extend your knowledge in this field.
You have good knowledge on software programming (C/C++, Python, …).
You may have basic or advanced skills on digital signal processing.
You are open minded with a good level of listening skills and enjoy working in a diversified team.
You are autonomous, analytical, motivated and desire to propose innovative and competitive ideas for the development of new successful products.
You have graduated from an engineering or equivalent level.
You are looking for a first professional experience or have a first experience in Firmware Development and wish to extend your knowledge in this field.
You have good knowledge on software programming (C/C++, Python, …)You may have basic skills on digital signal processing.
You are open minded with a good level of listening skills and enjoy working in a diversified team.
You are autonomous, analytical, motivated and desire to propose innovative and competitive ideas for the development of new successful products."
"Senior Engineer, Cybersecurity Digital Forensics and Incident Response (DFIR)","Job Description

Job Purpose

The ICE Cybersecurity Digital Forensics and Incident Response (DFIR) team is responsible for defending critical financial infrastructure from Global Cyber threats. We leverage an evolving arsenal of controls that require technical proficiency as well as tenacity, professionalism, and strong communication skills.

Responsibilities
Security Analytics - Efficiently distill actionable information from large data sets for reporting, hunting, and anomaly detection
Incident Management – Detect, document, investigate, and resolve security incidents in an efficient manner
Endpoint Forensics - Construct meaningful incident timelines from forensic artifact analysis
Counter Measures - Ability to design and implement preventative and corrective controls to counteract emerging threats
Proactive Threat Hunting - Develop and execute focused plans to discover advanced threats that evade traditional security controls
Behavioral Analysis - Develop and implement criteria to identify anomalous user behavior leading indicating insider threat activity
Intrusion Detection - Develop and tune network anomaly control capability to produce reliable actionable data
Knowledge And Experience
5+ years of relevant experience
Hands-on experience with Systems Administration
Deep understanding of networking and its application
Relevant technical security certifications
Experience implementing security controls in an enterprise environment
University degree in Engineering, MIS, CIS, or related discipline; or equivalent years of experience
Specific Technologies

Splunk, Kabana, Bro, OpenDNS, Exabeam, Tanium, Cylance, Checkpoint, Palo Alto, WAF, Vectra, X-Ways, Python, PowerShell, RegEx

Schedule

This role is remote, and the employee may be located in Singapore."
"VP, Digital Bank Brand and Engagement Strategy Lead","Job Id: 22598960

Key Responsibilities:

Partner with the digital sales and marketing peers to ensure a connected, one-voice approach for our digital and mobile banking brand proposition and campaign strategy based on an always on and quarterly thematic approach
Help manage brand preference for digital banking as best in class for both cards and retail customers through an always-on content campaign, ramping up our organic and paid presence in the market
Oversee Citi Content Hub content and marketing strategy, maintaining an always-on presence to create demand and leads for the bank.
Conduct reviews and analysis based on iSentia’s monitoring reports to identify topical themes that will form useful insights for Citi’s Content Strategy, digital banking engagement strategy, and the product marketing campaigns managed by rest of Citi’s Marketing Team in cards, loans and retail.
Partner with the Content and Social Media Strategy Specialist to optimize Citi's social media strategy
Partner closely with the digital banking and customer experience team on a roadmap of both functional, servicing and engagement releases, and align on priorities that will help achieve our digibank brand and client engagement objectives
Work with Corporate Affairs on bank wide awards promotion to clients and internal employees, including setting up best practices, playbooks and activation assets
Manage the digital banking web pages, including a revamp of the web pages to align with our overarching content strategy and content hub approach.
Act as advisor to rest of marketing members and product managers on best-in-class approach towards campaign and channel optimization, including paid and organic SEO, social, SEM, push marketing, EDM.
Define target audience segments that maximise impact of marketing activities, including servicing level engagement campaigns to ramp up 30/60/90 days mobile and digital users, buyers, engagers and observers, new mobile app downloads and returning users.
Identify opportunities to test, optimise and scale up successful marketing initiatives.
Work with Regional Marketing counterparts to ensure alignment on priorities and market execution of regionally steered initiatives and best practice.
Share success and learnings across teams and markets when required.
Manage third party creative and media agencies to execute and deliver best in class marketing programs.
Keep abreast of new and emerging marketing resources and techniques that would be relevant for our business, vet them and test as appropriate.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Lead by influencing stakeholders to seamlessly deliver of the above initiatives, hold partners accountable to achieve business outcomes and continually celebrate successes across the team.

Knowledge/Experience/Technical skills:

Min 12-16 years in Marketing or Agency, with deep experience in digital marketing, brand and client engagement and communications strategies.
Team player; ability to partner and negotiate with cross functional team to successfully deliver client needs. Track record of delivering meaningful marketing programs that drive business success.
Comfortable with financial and budget management
Prior experience influencing stakeholders of various seniorities and background without direct team management responsibilities is important, as is the ability to motivate and rally a team around a common vision.
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills.
Partner with product, data & analytics and new digital sales lead to prioritise products and campaigns focus relative to revenue incremental opportunity.
Promotes a culture of teamwork across organizational boundaries and willingness to mentor and coach more junior members of the team.
Demonstrated sense of accountability and decisiveness.
Ability to successfully interact with various levels within the organization, including Senior Management.
Intellectually curious, proactively seeking and developing new opportunities.
Proficient in media targeting and measurement, MarTech, AdTech and data analytics tools, including tableau, adobe analytics, adobe target, SEO, SEM, DMP, CRM, MS Office software preferred.

Personal Skills:

Passion for data-driven and measurable marketing outcomes, technology and numbers.
Curious about human psychology, behaviours and motivations.
Strong analytic, interpersonal and communications skills.
Ability to lead cross-functional teams in a matrix environment

-------------------------------------------------

Job Family Group:

Product Management and Development

-------------------------------------------------

Job Family:

Product Management

------------------------------------------------------

Time Type:

Full time

------------------------------------------------------

Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.

Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi.

View the ""EEO is the Law"" poster. View the EEO is the Law Supplement.

View the EEO Policy Statement.

View the Pay Transparency Posting"
"Real Time Data, Sales Specialist APAC","As part of the Data and Analytics Sales Team, we have an immediate opening for a Real Time, Enterprise Sales role in APAC. We are looking for passionate and enthusiastic problem-solvers with expertise in capital markets data to join us as we continue providing technology innovation and support to the world’s leading global capital markets companies. In this role, you will be part of a growing, talented team that is tasked with presenting the Data and Analytics Real Time data solutions to the financial services industry.

Role Overview

In this role, you will hunt for new prospects and opportunities with new and existing customers. Highly driven, you meet and exceed targets by leading with customer value, winning trust with your natural people skills and have an in-depth proposition knowledge. You know how to structure deals and how to leverage market and business acumen to outsell the competition. With a close eye on the sales pipeline, you will identify more opportunities daily, and you will inspire customers to renew their contracts with us automatically.

The role of the Real Time Services Proposition Sales Specialist, within the high performing Enterprise team, will focus on commercialising the next generation of software and data solutions primarily into Tier 1 banks, hedge funds, asset managers and proprietary trading firms.

You will be tasked with executing our strategy for long term sustainable growth of the company's footprint in this area through an understanding of market and competitive dynamics and will detail and drive Sales execution. The role will require the successful candidate to possess strong direction-setting and influencing skills to work with the local Account Management teams to deliver results.

The Real Time Proposition Elements Are

Realtime Low Latency Direct Feeds., End of Day & Time Series Pricing Data (all asset classes)
Workbench Data Management tools and services
Professional Services Solutions

What You'll Be Doing

As Proposition Sales Specialist you will be seen as the specialist when it comes to selling our Real Time Data Solutions and will be accountable for structuring, negotiating and closing deals to drive growth by:

Providing in-depth customer and market insights, to identify new business opportunities and drive the sales process
Partnering with technical sales engineering experts, you will execute through strong collaborative relationships across matrixed functions, including Account Management, Product, Marketing, Sales Strategy, and external partners
Monitoring all aspects of key competitors, analysing their strengths, weaknesses, opportunities, and threats and develop strategies to achieve competitive advantage
Driving our thought-leadership agenda as the internal and external spokesperson for your proposition, supporting community building
Having a strong eye for business and commercial strategy
Being able to influence individuals as well as groups in meetings
Being able to work within tight deadlines in a high performing and inspiring environment
Proactively identifying pipeline opportunities
Delivering customer demonstrations on their specific propositions

What Are We Looking For

Experience in selling Realtime Direct, low latency data-feeds and experience of selling timeseries data for quant and strategy development workflows.
Outstanding solutions selling skills with a proven track record in a quota-bearing environment
Highly driven, self-motivated knowledge and direct experience in selling solutions to the Financial Services community
Creative problem solver and good sales ideation skills
Strong presentation skills (verbal & written)
Strong listening skills and interpersonal skills
Expert understanding of the Financial Services and Competitor Landscape
Strong technical knowledge specifically within the financial markets trade and execution domain

At LSEG, we believe that creating a diverse and inclusive organisation is fundamental to the way we deliver on our promise of creating essential partnerships and open opportunities. Our open culture is central to how we deliver our purpose – driving financial stability, empowering economies and enabling customers to create sustainable growth – in everything we do.

Working with us means that you will be part of a dynamic organisation of 25,000 people across 70 countries. However, we will value your individuality and enable you to bring your true self to work so you can help enrich our diverse workforce. You will be part of a collaborative and creative culture where we encourage new ideas and are committed to sustainability across our global business. You will experience the critical role we have in helping to re-engineer the financial ecosystem to support and drive sustainable economic growth. Together, we are aiming to achieve this growth by accelerating the just transition to net zero, enabling growth of the green economy and creating inclusive economic opportunity.

LSEG offers a range of tailored benefits and support, including healthcare, retirement planning, paid volunteering days and wellbeing initiatives.

We are proud to be an equal opportunities employer. This means that we do not discriminate on the basis of anyone’s race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital status, veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. Conforming with applicable law, we can reasonably accommodate applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.

Please take a moment to read this privacy notice carefully, as it describes what personal information London Stock Exchange Group (LSEG) (we) may hold about you, what it’s used for, and how it’s obtained, your rights and how to contact us as a data subject.

If you are submitting as a Recruitment Agency Partner, it is essential and your responsibility to ensure that candidates applying to LSEG are aware of this privacy notice."
Full Stack Engineer (MERN Stack),"Who we are:
Avensys is a reputed global IT professional services company headquartered in Singapore. Our service spectrum includes enterprise solution consulting, business intelligence, business process automation and managed services. Given our decade of success, we have evolved to become one of the top trusted providers in Singapore and service a client base across banking and financial services, insurance, information technology, healthcare, retail and supply chain.

We are currently looking to hire Full Stack Developer who has proven track record in IT Industry. This is an exciting opportunity to expand your skill set, achieve job satisfaction and work-life balance. More details as below.

Roles and Responsibilities:
Design, develop, implement, and maintain end-to-end enterprise web applications.
Conduct software analysis, programming, testing, and code debugging, as well as assists in identifying and resolving product problems.
Proficient in MERN stack at building microservices and REST APIs for applications.
Perform unit and system testing of application code, as well as resolve issues to meet customer functional and non-functional requirements.

Requirements:
At least 3 years of experience in full stack development for enterprise applications.
Hands-on in JavaScript, and proficient in at least NodeJS, ReactJS, ExpressJS frameworks.
Be able to write clean and maintainable code, as well as comfortable in debugging/resolving complex problems.
Able to understand integration with heterogeneous systems/applications
Understand Agile methodology and DevSecOps, while being able to apply in full SDLC.
Lateral thinking, passionate, innovative, and creative.
A highly motivated self-starter who possess positive mindset, a doer mentality, proactive and good communication skills.
Will be a plus if have experience in Java.
WHAT’S ON OFFER
You will be remunerated with an excellent base salary and entitled to attractive company benefits. Additionally, you will get the opportunity to enjoy a fun and collaborative work environment, alongside a strong career progression.
To submit your application, please apply online or email your UPDATED CV in Microsoft Word format to nishant@aven-sys.com Your interest will be treated with strict confidentiality.

CONSULTANT DETAILS:
Consultant Name : Nishant Pawar
Avensys Consulting Pte Ltd
EA Licence 12C5759
Privacy Statement: Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Avensys' privacy policy."
DevOps Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Responsibilities
Responsible for the operation and maintenance of the company's logistics platform related systems, mainly including daily operation and maintenance, upgrade changes, fault monitoring, and emergency response to ensure the stable and reliable operation of related systems;
Design and implement solutions in the field of automation of CI / CD processes
Prepare software builds and release
Manage and monitor a server
Build and maintain tools for development, deployment and operations
Create and manage configuration and deployment processes
Support CI/CD procedures and processes and maintain consistent configuration schemes
Support and ensure that the software releases are align with the organization’s internal software release and deployment process.
Development of monitoring and automated operation and maintenance tools.
Interested candidate who wish to apply for this position, please send in your resume to info@wecruit.com.sg.

Wecruit Pte ltd

EA License No. 20C0270
Desired Skills and Experience
Nagios, Git, Maintenance, Applications, Operation, Oracle, DevOps, MySQL, Nginx, Logistics, Bash, daily operation, Tomcat, Python, Docker, Java, Redis, Apache, Linux"
Project System Engineer @ Ang Mo Kio - Up to $4500 + Performance Bonus,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Descriptions
Closely collaborate with Project Manager and Engineers to support the fulfilment of contract obligations within timeline, cost and scope
Manage and oversee project documentations and subcontractor matters
Perform System Setup, Database setup, resolve technical & design issues
Support for IT infrastructure comprising Microsoft OS
Basic setup of Network switches L2 & L3 and able to perform network configuration of all the network devices within the project
Debug and troubleshooting IT-related issues
Period
1 year contract (renewable and convertible)
Location:
Ang Mo Kio
Working Hours
Mon to Fri: 8.30am to 6pm (Will be expected to work beyond these days and timing dependent on work exigence, will be compensated with time off/meal allowance)
Salary
Up to $4,500 + Performance Bonus
Job Requirements
Degree/ Diploma in Project Management/ Computer Science / Computer Engineering in Information Technology, Information Systems, IT Security or Equivalent (Fresh graduates are welcome to apply)
Good interpersonal skills, strong organizational and coordination skills
Experience in Project Management, IT Management Systems Deployment or Equivalent experience
Proficient in Networking and Windows OS
Knowledge in any of the following: Cybersecurity, SQL management studio application and database table, Vulnerabilities Assessment, windows patching or software development knowledge (are preferred but not a strict requirement) will be a strong plus
Able to perform work independently and a team player
Interested applicants, kindly email your detailed resume (MS Word format is preferred):

nicholas@successhrc.com.sg (Reg No: R1549023)

Please ensure that applications sent through email are no bigger than 1Mb.

We thank all applicants for your interest but regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates would be notified.

Success Resource Centre Pte Ltd (EA License Number: 04C3201)

3 Shenton Way, #19-01 Shenton House, Singapore 068805

T: 6337 3183 | F: 6337 0329 | W: www.successhrc.com.sg
Desired Skills and Experience
Switches, Troubleshooting, Interpersonal Skills, Job Descriptions, Information Technology, Windows OS, SQL, MS Word, Project Management, Networking, Windows, IT Management, Team Player, Software Development"
Android Engineer (Real Time Communication) - TikTok,"Responsibilities

TikTok RTC is the world's leading real-time communications service, providing instant and high-quality multimedia interactions to customers around the world. We are building next-generation audio/video processing and interaction platforms to deliver high-volume, low-latency and rich Cloud as a Service technology.

Our popular products are empowered by our cutting-edge RTC technology. Working in this team, you will have the opportunity to meet the challenges of advanced audio/video algorithm design and global large-scale real-time communications interaction, while improving your skills in encoding, algorithms, data by working with many outstanding real-time communications professionals. Expertise in analytics and large-scale system design.

Responsibilities
1. Responsible for researching and developing real-time communication SDK on Android with high-quality code.
2. Responsible for the design and development of RTC solutions for TikTok.
3. Responsible for optimising connectivity index, performance, stability, and audio & video quality to improve user experiences.
4. Continuously tracking and learning new technologies and new architectures.
5. Willing to challenge and resolve difficult technical problems.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor's degree or above with 5+ years of Android development experience.
2. Proficient in Java, familiar with C/C++, solid knowledge of multi-threading, data structure, operating system and network.
3. Familiar with Android system architecture and audio & video multimedia client development.
4. Good learning ability, communication ability, logical thinking ability, and innovation ability.
5. Experience in live streaming, co-host, player SDK, and video conference is preferred.
6. Experience in ffmpeg, x264, WebRTC, etc. is preferred.
7. Open source project maintainer and independent developer are preferred."
Senior Enterprise Support Engineer,"Who We Are

Optiver is a proprietary trading firm and leading global market maker. As one of the oldest market making institutions, we are a trusted partner of 50+ exchanges across the globe. Our mission is to constantly improve the market by injecting liquidity, providing accurate pricing, increasing transparency and acting as a stabilising force no matter the market conditions. With a focus on continuous improvement, we participate in the safeguarding of healthy and efficient markets for everyone who participates. Optiver’s APAC operations are headquartered in Sydney and support trading activities in Singapore, Hong Kong, Japan, Korea, Taiwan and China. Optiver is proud of its unique organisational culture, which is simultaneously low on formality and bureaucracy and highly focused on performance and innovation.

Founded in 2021, Optiver's Singapore location is our ninth global office. As a fast-growing office, we have the feel of a start-up, but the backing of a large multinational trading firm. In Asia Pacific, Optiver was one of the first global market makers to establish a presence in the region, with the incorporation Optiver's APAC head office in Sydney in 1996. Since then, we have expanded our footprint by establishing offices in Taipei (2005), Hong Kong (2007) and Shanghai (2012).

What You'll Do

We are looking for a Senior Enterprise Support Engineer who will work with Windows client fleet management and on small projects with the IT Infrastructure Services team. As a Senior Enterprise Support Engineer, you will have the opportunity to combine your knowledge in customer support and troubleshooting with a problem-solving mindset to solve business issues. You will be expected to identify improvement opportunities to processes and systems and work on implementing solutions to those. You will need to be able to both assist with user and systems related issues and remediate them from reoccurring. Other responsibilities include:

Act as the first point of contact for users seeking support or placing requests
Log and work on incident tickets, user requests and systems alert management
Deal with a range of trading related systems and equipment in a fast-paced environment
Automate, standardize and allow users to self-service processes via scripting, systems and creating quality documentation
Build trust and relationships with all users to understand needs and priorities
Perform periodic audits to the environment enforcing security and standards

Who You Are

Minimum 5 years of experience working in a Service Desk related role
Experience with Microsoft Windows operating system, Office suite, Microsoft stack and associated technologies (AD, DNS, Group Policy, DHCP, etc) and exposure to Basic Network troubleshooting (LAN, WAN, and switches)
Demonstrated experience in management of user access to systems and services, including printers, audio and visual equipment
Specific experience of SOE image creation and installation (including desktop-unattended)
Familiarity with provisioning systems such as SCCM
Genuine passion for IT support, a true love of customer service and a can-do attitude
Excellent verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills

What You'll Get

The chance to work alongside diverse, intelligent and driven peers in a rewarding environment
We offer competitive remuneration, including: an attractive bonus structure and additional leave entitlements
Training, mentorship and personal development opportunities
Gym membership plus weekly in-house chair massages
Daily breakfast, lunch and snacks
Regular social events including an annual company trip

As an intentionally flat organisation, we believe that great ideas and impact can come from everyone. We are passionate about empowering individuals and creating diverse teams that thrive. Every person at Optiver should feel included, valued and respected, because we believe our best work is done together.

Optiver encourages Singaporean nationals and Permanent Residents to apply."
Specialist Engineer Trenchless Technology,"You can expect a lot from a career at Worley

Together, our nearly 60,000 people across 60 countries have already achieved many industry firsts. And we’ve broken several records along the way.

We’re excited about the challenges ahead as the energy transition gathers pace. If you ask us, there’s never been a more rewarding time to work in the energy, chemical and resources sectors.

Whatever your ambition, there’s a path for you here. And there’s no barrier to your potential career success.

About The Role

To review (with calculations) the Contractor’s design, supervise and co-ordinate all aspects of temporary and permanent works for the mining works including trenchless construction methods.
He / she will be required to carry out the supervision work in accordance with the Building Control Act and the Authority's requirements. He / she has to ensure that the construction is carried out in accordance with the design, all relevant standards, contract specifications, approved method statements, safety requirements and to the agreed programme.
The SME is required to exercise his / her professional experience and judgement to ensure that the safe and proper construction methods are being adopted to carry out the mining construction.
To prepare and develop detailed supervision schedule and comprehensive checklist for the conduct of the inspection and supervision by himself / herself, and the Specialist Mining Inspector (SMI).
To prepare and develop detailed Safety Inspection schedule and checklist for the excavation and construction activities for the mining construction.
To review and check the construction drawings, method statements and construction sequence for all aspects of the temporary and permanent works of the mining construction, modification proposals to the design and construction methods and to advise on necessary amendments.
To review and check all contingency measures and their application and decision structure, including all rectification proposals.
. To supervise every stage of the mining construction, including all excavation, shotcreting, installation of support / stabilising elements, casting of concrete and all other works to achieve the full completion of the tunnel, in a safe manner.
. To monitor and interpret the visual / physical conditions of the mining work and assess the potential risks and deviations from the design intent and method statements. To immediately alert the Engineer on the potential risks and all deviations with clear assessment of the courses of actions and implementation of the contingency measures.
To monitor and assess the instrumentation results, and implement/instruct the execution of the various courses of action when the control levels are exceeded.
. To report to the Engineer on the daily progress of excavation and the instrumentation monitoring records, deviation of the ground encountered from expected profile, and to alert Engineer on change in physical / visual condition of tunnel.
. To report to the Engineer on the daily assessment of the conditions of the mining construction works, assessment of the potential risks and remedial measures/contingencies implemented.
. To give presentations to all staff (Client) at regular time periods on the various construction activities, and to assist in the presentations to Client’s Management on mining construction works.
To create a process to provide training, guidance and mentoring of the Client’ engineers and site supervisors attached to the mining construction works.
To prepare a report to preserve the knowledge and experience gained from the project, addressing all aspects of the mining construction and making recommendations for future improvements

About You

The Specialist Mining Engineer (SME) shall have minimum fifteen (15) years of relevant experience in supervising box tunnels that are in close proximity to existing bored tunnels and MRT station, trenchless construction methods such as micro-tunnelling, front jacking, simple faceless tunnelling, mining methods or box jacking methods, etc and/or of similar level of complexity in the Civil Contract
Ability to meet agreed deadlines
Possess excellent interpersonal skills and ability to work as part of team.
Familiarity of Singapore local codes & standards

Benefits To You

Join a fun and inclusive, global team of professionals
Opportunities to progress beyond this role

What We Offer You

Providing an agile culture and challenging work opportunities results in a positive work environment. Our people enjoy competitive compensation packages and a fun, personal, collaborative and safe working environment. We value equal employment opportunity and are committed to promoting fairness, equality and diversity.

Our policy is to conduct background checks for all candidates who accept an offer of employment with us.

If you have the passion and talent to keep up, it's time to test the limits of what you can become. Find your future with Worley.

Worley takes your personal data protection seriously and respects EU and local data protection laws. You can read our full Recruitment Privacy Notice on this link.

Company

Worley

Primary Location

Singapore

Job

Structural

Schedule

Full-time

Employment Type

Direct Contractor

Job Level

Experienced

Job Posting

Jan 3, 2023

Unposting Date

Feb 2, 2023

Reporting Manager Title

Project Manager"
SAP Intern - AI Engineer,"We help the world run better

Our company culture is focused on helping our employees enable innovation by building breakthroughs together. How? We focus every day on building the foundation for tomorrow and creating a workplace that embraces differences, values flexibility, and is aligned to our purpose-driven and future-focused work. We offer a highly collaborative, caring team environment with a strong focus on learning and development, recognition for your individual contributions, and a variety of benefit options for you to choose from.Apply now!

About The Role

The Artificial Intelligence CoE team in IES Technology Services is pushing the SAP internal adoption of Machine Learning through all business processes. We are implementing standard product functionality from the SAP AI portfolio as well as custom built AI scenarios for internal business cases. In this field, we have many existing projects in the horizon and lots of room for experimentation.

In Singapore, we are looking for AI Engineer Interns to work on the technical stacks. They will also be involved in end-user and business stakeholder communications.

SAP will be prioritizing applicants who have a current right to work in Singapore, and do not require SAP's sponsorship of a visa.

What You’ll Do

Position title: SAP Intern - AI Engineer
Location: Singapore
Expected start date and duration: December 2022 or January 2023 start date for 5-6 months duration
Working Hours: strictly looking for students able to commit full time for the entirety of the internship duration ( 5 days/week)

In This Role, You Will

Collaborate with other AI Scientists, Engineers, and Product Owners etc
Communicate with stakeholders to understand SAP business processes
Support the end-to-end MLOps lifecycle (Python, Jenkins, Docker, Kubernetes, KFServing, etc.)
Apply existing SAP AI or open-sourced solutions to solve business problems
Learn the latest advancements in applied Natural Language Processing (NLP), Computer Vision (CV) and DevOps

Who You Are

We’re looking for someone who takes initiative, perseveres, and stay curious. You like to work on meaningful innovative projects and are energized by lifelong learning.

Required Skills

Education and Qualifications/ Skills and Competencies

Proficiency in Python, and libraries such as Pandas, Scikit-Learn, etc
Understanding of basic Machine Learning, algorithms and data structures
Experience with development tools like VScode, Pycharm, Jupyter, Docker, Git, etc
Curiosity to learn about different AI applications
Able to take ownership of one’s work and collaborate with others

Preferred Skills

Driven individual (with an active Github/Gitlab project portfolio)
Good communication skills with end-users and business stakeholders
Additional certificates and courses focusing on machine learning are a plus but not a must

Work Experience

Undergraduate or graduate students in STEM fields from any university
Students with non-technical majors and self-learned data science skills are welcome to apply

We build breakthroughs together

SAP innovations help more than 400,000 customers worldwide work together more efficiently and use business insight more effectively. Originally known for leadership in enterprise resource planning (ERP) software, SAP has evolved to become a market leader in end-to-end business application software and related services for database, analytics, intelligent technologies, and experience management. As a cloud company with 200 million users and more than 100,000 employees worldwide, we are purpose-driven and future-focused, with a highly collaborative team ethic and commitment to personal development. Whether connecting global industries, people, or platforms, we help ensure every challenge gets the solution it deserves. At SAP, we build breakthroughs, together.

We win with inclusion

SAP’s culture of inclusion, focus on health and well-being, and flexible working models help ensure that everyone – regardless of background – feels included and can run at their best. At SAP, we believe we are made stronger by the unique capabilities and qualities that each person brings to our company, and we invest in our employees to inspire confidence and help everyone realize their full potential. We ultimately believe in unleashing all talent and creating a better and more equitable world.

SAP is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to the values of Equal Employment Opportunity and provide accessibility accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with SAP and are in need of accommodation or special assistance to navigate our website or to complete your application, please send an e-mail with your request to Recruiting Operations Team: Careers@sap.com

For SAP employees: Only permanent roles are eligible for the SAP Employee Referral Program, according to the eligibility rules set in the SAP Referral Policy. Specific conditions may apply for roles in Vocational Training.

EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their age, race, religion, national origin, ethnicity, age, gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, et al), sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, protected veteran status, or disability.

Successful candidates might be required to undergo a background verification with an external vendor.

Requisition ID: 359265 | Work Area: Administration | Expected Travel: 0 - 10% | Career Status: Student | Employment Type: Intern | Additional Locations: ."
Full Stack Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
FULL STACK DEVELOPER (BLOCKCHAIN/CRYPTO SPACE)

Job Description & Requirements

We build open, end-to-end financial platforms without limits. As the ideal candidate, you have professional programming experience and a keen interest in the blockchain space.

What you'll do
Develop front end website architecture and blockchain applications.
Modify and test changes to previously developed programs.
Optimise web applications to maximise speed and scale.
Maintain code integrity and organization.
Suggest architecture improvements and recommend process improvements.
Collaborate with the rest of the development and product team.
See through a project from conception to finished product.Cosmos-SDK (Blockchain)
Languages
Golang
Typescript / Javascript
Solidity
Scilla
some Rust
Tooling
PostgreSQL
Pipelines on CircleCI
AWS
Frameworks
React, React Saga
Material UI
Cosmos-SDK
Truffle / Hardhat
OpenZeppelin
What we offer
A dynamic and open culture with weekly sync-ups, fortnightly retrospective sessions, and quarterly check-ins.
A learning environment where you can dive deep into the latest technologies and make an impact in the real world.
Competitive pay on par with top companies
Best-in-class bonuses and employee benefits
Yearly appraisals with regular salary revisions
Exciting work with opportunities for exploration and innovation
A well-stocked pantry filled with healthy snacks and the most exciting selection of craft beers.
A pet-friendly workspace.

Desired Skills and Experience
CSS, PostgreSQL, Appraisals, Pipelines, HTML, TypeScript, JavaScript, HTML5, UI, Employee Benefits, Python, Angular, Web Applications, Java, API, Rust"
Lead Engineer,"Sensia is the unification of sensing, intelligence and action. Sensia brings together the best of the best: the pioneering process automation, real-time control and IoT technologies of Rockwell Automation, combined with the unmatched measurement and instrumentation, software and analytics capabilities of Schlumberger. Sensia is further strengthened by the oil and gas domain expertise and artificial lift experience shared by Rockwell Automation and Schlumberger. The result is Sensia—the leading automation specialist in oil & gas production, transportation and processing with a team of 1,000+ experts serving customers globally. Rockwell Automation is a global technology leader focused on helping the world’s manufacturers be more productive, sustainable, and agile. With more than 25,000 employees who make the world better every day, we know we have something special. Behind our customers - amazing companies that help feed the world, provide life-saving medicine on a global scale, and focus on clean water and green mobility - our people are energized problem solvers that take pride in how the work we do changes the world for the better. We welcome all makers, forward thinkers, and problem solvers who are looking for a place to do their best work. And if that’s you we would love to have you join us! Job Description About Us Sensia is the unification of sensing, intelligence and action. Sensia brings together the best of the best: pioneering process automation, real-time control and IoT technologies of Rockwell Automation, combined with the unmatched measurement and instrumentation, software and analytics capabilities of Schlumberger. It is further strengthened by the oil and gas domain expertise and artificial lift experience shared by Rockwell Automation and Schlumberger. Job Purpose Take lead to deliver & execute the assigned O&G automation & process safety projects on time with good quality / cost effectiveness and customer satisfaction Key Responsibilities Functional: Analyzes customer's requirements to determine the optimal process control system solution and determines applicable control configuration/architecture Performs conceptual process control systems design, determination of process control system strategy, design of assembled programming May provides on-site process control system start-up as required. Need project experience in EPC (Include Marine Business) and Process safety Leadership: Plan, schedule, coordinate and monitor resources for projects including setting and managing time-scales and budgets. Provide verbal and written reports to communicate project status as required and contribute to project review meetings. Visit internal/external panel manufacturing facilities to assess progress, provide technical assistance and for final inspection and sign off. Interpersonal: Client liaison and interface with management Development and maintenance of customer relationship Team player with the ability to integrate with other team project members Business: Review project hardware/software for compliance with applicable codes/standards and assure personnel/machinery safety practices are fully implemented Attends, participates in the preparation and presentation of technical papers in industry symposiums and trade shows, as applicable Coordinate customer requirements with engineering and other appropriate departments to ensure the highest level of customer satisfaction is achieved Key Competencies Required Organizational Competencies: Contributes Professional & Technical Collaborates & Teams Effectively Communicates Effectively Adds Value for Customers & Partners Attains Results Job related competencies Upper intermediate level of expertise in the O&G industry, Integrated Architecture, Safety system & IAS / Component Industry Control, Networks, Cybersecurity Upper intermediate level of expertise in Industry Knowledge, Application Knowledge, Training Skills, and basic understanding of Project Engineering, EHS (Environment, Health & Safety). Educational Qualifications/Work Experience Minimum: Bachelor’s degree in engineering discipline or similar Related control systems application experience as follows: 12 years of experience Desired: Experience of control system applications throughout the project lifecycle from initial design concepts through to installation and subsequent client support Key Internal Stakeholders: Project Manager, Engineer, COE, Business Operations Manager, Account Manager"
Senior Product Manager (DeFi/Wallet),"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

We are looking for an experienced product manager to provide custody products to our enterprise customers.

Responsibilities:

Responsible for the DeFi/Wallet products
Research, innovate and inspire viable new product development strategies and execute up to product launch and beyond
Conduct competitor analysis, learn from the market and differentiate from competitors
Collect and analyse feedback from customers, stakeholders and other teams, consolidate them into requirements, features and end products
Communicate with senior management with product plans and roadmaps
Produce and review product requirements documents (PRD)
Ensure products and releases are launched correctly and on schedule
Track and push development and testing progress
Track and analyse key user metrics in order to form feedback loop to improve our products and services

Requirements:

Minimum 6 years of proven experience as a Product Manager with focus in DeFi/Wallet product developments
Experience in global facing products
Experience in product lifecycle management in agile framework
Experience or knowledge of digital or traditional securities custody
Good skills in PRD.

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Business Analyst,"609994BR

Introduction

IBM Application Consultants work directly with our clients on key initiatives. You will have the opportunity to build an in-depth understanding of their business issues and implement organizational strategies that drive adoption of change. We are looking for experts who can build credibility and trust with our clients and provide knowledge that addresses individual and unique business needs.

Your Role and Responsibilities

As a Business Analyst In IBM, You Will

Analyse business needs, gaps and issues
Recommend best possible solutions to address the problem
Stakeholder management and engagement for both internal, client and industry stakeholders
Overall accountability to ensure high quality and timely solution delivery
Understand and translate customer needs into business and technology solutions, providing consultation on the customer digital journey and digital transformation
Provide implementation of design services through a range of digital methodologies
Analyze as-is and to-be processes to define system/technology/business requirements
Support user requirements capture and translation of requirements into business and digitally enabled solutions
Support the delivery of quality functional/application digital designs
Support development and implementation of quality business digital solutions for the client

Required Technical and Professional Expertise

You are someone we are looking for if you have the following expertise:

Query data to understand user adoption and usage of SG Tech Stack products.
Design, build, launch and maintain efficient, reliable and basic data pipelines to support understanding of users’ adoption and usage of the SG Tech Stack
Support data cleansing and standardization to manage end-to-end data collection and analysis
Integrate and collate data silos in a manner which is both scalable and compliant
Develop new data extraction, transformation and loading processes in production
Provide data visualization as needed to aid in understanding the data
Assist with the interpretation of insights from the data to support decision making
Facilitation, negotiation and conflict resolution skills, and demonstrated success at building teams and relationships with key people in local and remote sites.
Demonstrated sound interpersonal and communications skills.
Understanding of the business processes and ability to detail them as needed by the project.
Skilled in analysing and reengineering business processes and recommending solutions.
Experience in facilitating workshops and brainstorming sessions to gather business requirements.

Preferred Technical And Professional Expertise

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or have equivalent professional experience
Minimum 3 to 5 years’ experience in business analyst role or equivalent management consulting experience.
Experience with query languages such as SQL, and Unix query tools such as awk or grep.
Experience implementing batch and streaming data pipelines
Some understanding of DevOps tools such as BitBucket, Gitlab, and Bamboo
Knowledge of big data analytical techniques would be a plus, such as map-reduce.
Exhibit a data-driven mindset and able to communicate well with data
Demonstrate resourcefulness and creativity when working on data manipulation with common and basic tools likes excel, text editors, google sheets
Meticulous, strong analytical ability, documentation and project management skills.
Good interpersonal, communication, decision-making skills and a responsible attitude.
Ability to multi-task and work well under pressure.
Any prior experience in Business Process Management projects and/or Agile Methodology will be beneficial.
Knowledge and working experience with Cloud, AI Automation, Big Data technologies would be advantageous.

About Business Unit

IBM Consulting is IBM’s consulting and global professional services business, with market leading capabilities in business and technology transformation. With deep expertise in many industries, we offer strategy, experience, technology, and operations services to many of the most innovative and valuable companies in the world. Our people are focused on accelerating our clients’ businesses through the power of collaboration. We believe in the power of technology responsibly used to help people, partners and the planet.

Your Life @ IBM

In a world where technology never stands still, we understand that, dedication to our clients success, innovation that matters, and trust and personal responsibility in all our relationships, lives in what we do as IBMers as we strive to be the catalyst that makes the world work better.

Being an IBMer means you’ll be able to learn and develop yourself and your career, you’ll be encouraged to be courageous and experiment everyday, all whilst having continuous trust and support in an environment where everyone can thrive whatever their personal or professional background.

Our IBMers are growth minded, always staying curious, open to feedback and learning new information and skills to constantly transform themselves and our company. They are trusted to provide on-going feedback to help other IBMers grow, as well as collaborate with colleagues keeping in mind a team focused approach to include different perspectives to drive exceptional outcomes for our customers. The courage our IBMers have to make critical decisions everyday is essential to IBM becoming the catalyst for progress, always embracing challenges with resources they have to hand, a can-do attitude and always striving for an outcome focused approach within everything that they do.

Are you ready to be an IBMer?

This job requires you to provide your COVID-19 vaccination status with supporting documentation, where legally permissible.

About IBM

IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that through the application of intelligence, reason and science, we can improve business, society and the human condition, bringing the power of an open hybrid cloud and AI strategy to life for our clients and partners around the world.Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are not only one of the largest corporate organizations in the world, we’re also one of the biggest technology and consulting employers, with many of the Fortune 50 companies relying on the IBM Cloud to run their business. At IBM, we pride ourselves on being an early adopter of artificial intelligence, quantum computing and blockchain. Now it’s time for you to join us on our journey to being a responsible technology innovator and a force for good in the world.

Location Statement

For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.

Being You @ IBM

IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status."
Engineering Intern,"Job Details

What You Will Do

The Project Engineer Intern is responsible for technical support – primarily customer quotations and business development case studies for various composite applications. Key emphasis will be on the ability to understand customer requirements and rapidly demonstrate how composite based solutions can be utilized to provide solutions with costing, timing, and resources included in the proposals.

How You Will Do It
Assist to provides product technical engineering information by creating and giving presentations on customer proposals. This contains, but is not limited to, 3D representations of finished goods, 3D representations of tooling, etc
Assist to prepares cost estimates by studying blueprints, plans, and related customer documents; consulting with engineers, and other professional and technical personnel
Assist conceptual design of composite components and assemblies to support proposals
Assist to generate solid and surface component and assembly CAD models
Assist to compose detailed bill of materials for proposals
Work as part of a team of design and engineering and ops staff
What We Look For
Pursuing a degree or diploma from a reputable educational institution,
Pursuing a degree or diploma in building and construction-related course/ engineering/ Mechanical and Electronics Engineering
Able to commit to a full-time internship for 6 months
Self-motivated and open minded with passion to challenge status quo and drive for continuous improvement
Process good communication and interpersonal skills
Learning Outcome At The End Of Internship

Will be able to hand-on software Metasys programming (uplift programming skill), exposure to controls world ie i/o module, head end connection and overview system design, building chiller schematic components build up, energy efficiency and saving from chiller optimization.

Diversity & Inclusion

Our dedication to diversity and inclusion starts with our values. We lead with integrity and purpose, focusing on the future and aligning with our customers’ vision for success. Our High-Performance Culture ensures that we have the best talent that is highly engaged and eager to innovate.  Our D&I mission elevates each employee’s responsibility to contribute to our culture. It’s through these contributions that we’ll drive the mindsets and behaviors we need to power our customers’ missions. You have the power. You have the voice. You have the culture in your hands."
Cyber Security Specialist,"Responsibilities include:
• Plan, build and execute technical solution designs for the delivery of both high performance and resilience information security technologies to support Citi’s Low Latency Electronic Trading environments.
• Produce high quality documentation, schematics and presentation materials as needed
• Participate in various reporting functions, analysis of metrics, key performance indicators and vulnerability remediation initiatives
• Ensure the continued stability and resilience of the infrastructure by adhering to strict change management guidelines
• Provide individual leadership in the realm of change, incident, and problem management
• Form collaborative working relationships across geographical boundaries with other internal functions for the purpose of managing internal or external client requirements in alignment with business needs and company policies/standards
• Troubleshoot complex connectivity issues often involving multiple support teams
• Adhere to corporate and Information Security and other functional standards and controls
Skills and Qualifications:

• Professional to expert level proficiency, hands-on skillset including command-line and central management platform
• Network knowledge of routing, switching and wide area networking with understanding of industry standard command line syntax, inclusive of modern network virtualization concepts to a professional level proficiency
• A hands-on practical familiarity with Network Security capabilities including:
Firewalls, ACL’s, intrusion detection, proxies, vulnerability scanning, DNS, DDoS Mitigation, SIEM platforms
Also desired/emphasized are:
• A good level of understanding of service management fundamentals such as ITIL for change management and incident management
• Any operational exposure working within a bank or financial institution would be a positive as would basic scripting capabilities i.e. Perl, Python, Bash, Powershell and basic understanding of Unix/Linux CLI
• Basic to intermediate knowledge of well-known public cloud environments (IaaS, PaaS) and cloud native security controls that are available to protect cloud based resources.
Relevant Certifications: Juniper, Check Point, Palo Alto firewalls. CISSP or CCNA/CCNP as a plus.
Education Level Required: Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or related fields preferred.
Years of Related Experience: 6+"
Full Stack Software Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Responsibilities

Project Delivery
Analyse process/program specifications & translate specifications to program codes, conforming to program guidelines and programming best practices
Make changes to configurable items, which include hardware, software, documentation, etc. It covers configuration management planning, configuration identification, configuration controls & audits
Develop unit test package, execute tests & document test results to ensure the quality of the program
Assist in the integration testing, system testing, User Acceptance Test (UAT) & implementation activities to fix the reported problems/bugs of the system to ensure the smooth execution of programs in the production environment
Investigate all reported problems/errors & initiate amendments & testing so that the system can operate correctly & efficiently
Prepare & maintain up-to-date system documentation.
Analyse functional requirements to translate into application design using established design methodologies and guidelines
Ensure codes comply with security guidelines
Requirements
2-4 years of working experience in developing and delivering application software
Possess initiative and disposition with a strong commitment and orientation towards results and high quality standards
Strong problem-solving skills and ability to think out of the box
Team player with strong communication and interpersonal skills
Self-motivator with a positive attitude and with high energy
Customer focused
Proficient in written and spoken English
Diploma / Degree in Computer Science / Computer Engineering / Information Technology related field, or IT equivalent
Able to travel as required
Backend Skills

Technical Skillsets:
.Net Core with C# and ASP.Net Core Web API Apps, EF Core (Code First Deployment)
Coverlet, FakeItEasy, and NUnit
Confluent Cloud (or at least Apache Kafka concepts)
NuGet package manager
SQL and relational DB concepts
Swagger (e.g. Swashbuckle)
Microservice development experience (DDD, Docker, containerization concept)
Azure experience (e.g. Azure Bastion, Azure Cache for Redis, Azure Application Insights, Azure Logic App, AKS, Azure Key Vault, Azure SQL Server, Azure API Management)
Istio
Frontend Skills
Angular framework (Angular 9, Single-SPA-Angular Library, Angular Elements, Angular Extensions, Angular CLI, and NGRX)
CSS, HTML, JavaScript, TypeScript, RESTful Web APIs
Jasmine test framework with Karma test runner, Selenium
Node.JS with NPM package manager
Storybook, Kendo UI
Micro frontend development experience
Azure experience (e.g. Azure Blob Storage, Azure API Management, Azure Function Proxy)
General
Agile software development with Scrum
Azure DevOps and Git
OAuth2 / OIDC concepts (JWT, JWE, JWS concepts)
Postman API client and test runner
Static analysis tools (e.g. SonarQube)
Unit testing, component testing and (basic) integration testing
Data fabrication
Data migration
Interested candidates may send their CV to MAC (Reg No. R1221300) at anc1@anchorsearchgroup.com quoting the job title in the Subject line. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Desired Skills and Experience
ASPNet, Azure, Node.js, JavaScript, SQL, Angular, Selenium, Docker, C#, API"
Graduate Research Associate (Fund Data),"About Preqin
You will be joining the world’s leading data and insights provider for the alternative assets market. We empower the global financial community with critical information and leading analytics solutions to help them make faster and smarter investment decisions, and to make them with confidence. A forward-thinking company, we lead our industry through innovation. We trust in the power of data, and we use it to increase transparency in alternatives. We believe that access to information leads to more investment in the ideas and infrastructure that build strong communities.

Role Overview:
The successful candidate will fit within Preqin’s research team and take on a role primarily focused on building relationships with, researching and updating information on APAC (excluding Greater China and Japan)-based fund managers with the goal of obtaining data that cannot be obtained from any third-party source. This data includes fund-level performance, fund terms and a variety of other data points useful to investors, service providers or other fund managers in the alternatives space.

Daily duties involve communicating and maintaining relationships with data sources both new and within Preqin’s network to obtain the latest information, as well as understanding and incorporating such data into our online database in an accurate and concise manner for our end users to access on the Preqin Platform.

The successful candidate is responsible for the maintenance and growth of Preqin’s fund manager databases and products and will have the opportunity to contribute towards the production of Preqin’s leading financial publications when required. Additionally, the researcher has opportunities to conduct in depth analyses of the data set to infer trends and partner with Research Insights to contribute to blogs and other forms of content accessible to customers of Preqin.

Full training relevant to the role will be provided, including but not limited to:
Structured training on finance and alternatives industry
Guidance and Mentorship on relationship building with data sources

In this role you will be:
Updating online databases with key financial information, statistics and analysis on which our clients depend on by maintaining relationships with fund managers via telephone, email communication or in person and conducting web-based research for further information fund managers.
Communicating and coordinating with the wider team to ensure profiles are updated accurately and in a timely manner, and to convey issues and solutions.
Using computer-based business applications, including Microsoft Excel, to analyse large data sets and to control for quality and accuracy.
Required to write blogs and research reports occasionally, perform analysis and generate reports for clients on an ad-hoc basis.
Completing other tasks as/when required.

You are a good fit if:
You are enthusiastic and confident individuals with an eye for detail
Have strong communications skills necessary to build relationships with high-level executives
Willing to take initiatives with analytical skills
Have a Bachelor’s Degree - Finance, Economics, Business preferred but all backgrounds welcome
Fresh graduates welcome!

Company Benefits:
Medical and dental benefits
21 days holiday
Flexi Benefits – Health and Wellness incentives
Structured Career Progression and Professional Development
We also sponsor employees to undertake professional training or to gain qualifications relevant to their career

Our Culture and Values:
At Preqin, we’re aligned around common values – our shared beliefs that shape Preqin’s corporate culture:

Be customer-obsessed
We exist for our customers. We listen to them and understand their challenges. We design best-in-class data solutions for their success.

Act with integrity
We build trust through honesty and transparency. We’re committed to doing the right thing for our customers, our company, and each other.

Own your success
We’re a high-performance team. We challenge and champion each other in our pursuit of excellence. We never stop learning and strive to become experts in our fields.

Think forward
We lead the industry through innovation. We foster collaboration and creativity to solve our clients’ next challenge and give them a competitive advantage.

Make an impact
We drive positive change as individuals, and as a company. We’re passionate about creating a better tomorrow for our industry and our communities.

Equal Opportunities:
Preqin is an equal opportunity employer, with diversity at the heart of our business. It is the policy of Preqin to ensure equal employment and consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, colour, religion, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, pregnancy, veteran status, genetic information, socioeconomic status, political affiliation, or any other basis prohibited by applicable law. Preqin is committed to offering an inclusive and accessible experience for all job seekers, so everyone has the opportunity to be successful. If you need a reasonable accommodation during the application process due to a disability, please let the Preqin recruiter know at the start of the application process. Reasonable accommodations are modifications or adjustments to the application or hiring process that would enable you to fully participate in that process."
"Product Sustainability Expert (LCA, Circular Economy Solutions)","You shall report functionally to the Global Head of Sustainability Services and regionally to Division Head for Product Services. You will help with the execution of these services by focusing on building an industry standard and professional services on LCA and Circular Economy Solutions.
Key Responsibilities:
Execute various sustainability solutions and innovation projects in products sustainability from development to ramp-up in the following areas:
o Product Life Cycle Assessment (LCA), Product Carbon Footprint (PCF)
o Advisory Services related to circular economy, manufacturing processes and materials use efficiency, product “cradle to grave” solutions

Utilise and improve relevant tools to evaluate client’s sustainability efforts and assess the viability of sustainable goals and practices.
Utilise and support the improvement and upkeep of reports according to the relevant reporting standards to ascertain the integrity of traceability and emissions calculation of sustainability projects

Coordinate with the different internal technical and operational departments to go through the project execution process
Ensure timely delivery of sustainability projects and solutions for clients.
Key Requirements:
A Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Environmental Science or Materials Science.
Experience in professional consulting services and project management in sustainability will be an advantage.
Fundamental understanding and passion on these key topics: sustainable materials, circular economy of supply chains, sustainability of consumer products manufacturing processes and materials use efficiency, product “cradle to grave” solutions.
Hands on experience on products Life Cycle Assessment (LCA), Product Carbon Footprint (PCF) and related standards such as ISO 14044, ISO 14064, GHG Protocol in a manufacturing environment would be an advantage.
Technical knowledge on materials particularly polymers and bio-based materials is ideal.
Ability to communicate technical testing information, deviations and troubleshoot remotely if necessary
Open-minded, flexible, self-starter with a positive outlook"
"Business Analyst, APAC & MEA","Be part of something bigger. Decode the future.

At Electrolux, as a leading global appliance company, we strive every day to shape living for the better for our consumers, our people and our planet. We share ideas and collaborate so that together, we can develop solutions that deliver enjoyable and sustainable living.

Come join us as you are. We believe diverse perspectives make us stronger and more innovative. In our global community of people from 100+ countries, we listen to each other, actively contribute and grow together.

Join us in our exciting quest to build the future home.

All about the role:

This is a Business Analyst, APAC & MEA role.

What you’ll do:

Use multiple data sources to analyze, track, interpret and make clear and concise recommendations on action plans for the Sales and Retail teams to drive sellouts across all product categories
Apply expertise in quantitative and qualitative analysis to synthesize trends and be able to tell the story behind the numbers
Download and maintain data from various internal systems and update worksheet databases
Design, normalize and maintain data dictionary, data model, and data integrity for retail
Create dashboards utilizing multiple sources of data for high-level reporting
Support operation team to prepare reports for KPI evaluation, sales, and marketing
Proactively participate in ad-hoc projects

Who You Are

For you to succeed in this role, you should be:
Data-Driven – With an eye for detail and the ability to interpret complex data, you can also translate this into meaningful, useful information that informs decision-making and continuous improvement;
Inquisitive - Analysis – the ability to ask the right questions to get to the root causes of issues while keeping a strategic mindset. Ability to research, analyze, and form recommendations that can be communicated to different audiences effectively.
Solution Oriented - Ability drive to solutions, actively think about next steps
Multi-tasker – Attention to detail with excellent planning and organization skills and can adjust to changing demands to prioritize multiple deliverables and tasks in a fast-paced environment.
Communication - Concisely build recommendations and speak to them (with confidence and the ability to answer tough questions).
Team player - Strong team player with the ability to build relationships and experience collaborating with and supporting geographically dispersed users.

EDUCATION

You should have a bachelor’s degree or higher in business analysis, business administration, finance, or a related field
Fluent in English (oral and written)
Other APAC Language knowledge would be a valuable addion

Experience

At least 3-5 years of Data & Analytics experience (e.g. in a consultancy, agency, or on the customer side) - ideally with a marketing/ e-commerce industry background
Experience in data analysis and visualization tools such as Tableau, MS Power BI, QLIK, etc.
Advanced MS Office skills, with distinct Excel. SQL expertise
Business reporting system knowledge (i.e. SAP, Qlikview)
Optional skills are a plus: Digital analytics tools (Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics), Coding: Python/R/JavaScript, Experience with data science projects

Where you’ll be:

You will be based in our Regional Singapore office.

Benefit highlights:

Flexibility of work hours.
Discounts on Electrolux products and services.
Medical & Hospitalization coverage for both employees and dependents.
Dental & Optical.

As part of Electrolux, we will continuously invest in you and your development. There are no barriers to where your career could take you.

Find more on:

Electrolux APAC & MEA: https://www.linkedin.com/company/electrolux/life/apacmea/

req41868"
"MSIM Marketing IT Application Developer, Associate","Company Profile

Morgan Stanley is a leading global financial services firm providing a wide range of investment banking, securities, investment management and wealth management services. The Firm's employees serve clients worldwide including corporations, governments, and individuals from more than 1,200 offices in 43 countries. As a market leader, the talent and passion of our people is critical to our success. Together, we share a common set of values rooted in integrity, excellence, and strong team ethic. Morgan Stanley can provide a superior foundation for building a professional career - a place for people to learn, to achieve and grow. A philosophy that balances personal lifestyles, perspectives and needs is an important part of our culture.

Technology/Role/department in Morgan Stanley

Technology works as a strategic partner with Morgan Stanley business units and the world's leading technology companies to redefine how we do business in ever more global, complex, and dynamic financial markets. Morgan Stanley's sizeable investment in technology results in quantitative trading systems, cutting-edge modeling and simulation software, comprehensive risk and security systems, and robust client-relationship capabilities, plus the worldwide infrastructure that forms the backbone of these systems and tools. Our insights, our applications and infrastructure give a competitive edge to clients' businesses - and to our own.

Investment Management IT

IMIT provides industry-leading strategies and solutions to enable business growth and deliver best in class functions to Morgan Stanley Investment Management business.

MSIM Marketing Technology partners with MSIM Sales & Marketing teams and is responsible for strategic development and operational management of Digital and Content Marketing technology platforms. MSIM Marketing Technology team is responsible for the design, development, delivery, and support of the technical platforms built to optimize client engagement via digital channels such as Public/Secure Web, Email, Social, Mobile, drive sales/client retention via segmentation, targeting, and cross-selling models, and enable Sales & Marketing teams to increase efficiency and effectiveness.

Roles & Responsibilities

MSIM Marketing IT Application Developer will be responsible for working in suite of applications with hands-on BU interface, application design, development and production support for Java based application platforms in the field of Digital Marketing and Content Management. The position will report into a Delivery Lead within Marketing IT team.

Skills Required

Java (8 or above) and Spring-boot REST services
Database
AEM (6.x or above)
Web Technologies (HTML5, CSS, JavaScript, Bootstrap)
Hand-on experience with React
4+ years of Experience in fast-paced demanding environment
Full-stack development and design of software components
Understand the architecture and functional sub-components within overall application platform
Excellent problem-solving skills, goal-oriented, self-motivated and adapts to changing situations and requirements
Collaborating with IT team members as well business stakeholders to understand requirements, application solution, development, testing and rollout
Enhance the process standards and best practices and support L3 issues for currently live systems.
Hands on experience with strong interest and aptitude for computer application design, development and maintenance
Expert-level experience in Java (8 or above) and object-oriented design and development
Proficient in web technologies across client/server-side (JavaScript, CSS, HTML5), web infrastructure including web/app server/load balancing etc., caching/compression/security over web, content distribution network, web usage analytics.
Working knowledge of relational database design and development (SQL, Sybase)
Ability to utilize technology to provide business solutions, adapting new technologies based on the project requirement
Must have knowledge of Agile methodology (Scrum)
Financial Services industry experience will consider an advantage but not a necessity
Should be willing to try hands-on with newly evolving technologies
Good to have skills
Scripting (Unix/Python)
Agile methodology Preferable Scrum
DevOps and CI/CD pipeline
Experience in AEM (Adobe Experience Manager) design and development would be an add advantage

Qualifications/Criterion

Bachelor's Degree

4 + years in Java AEM development, experience in BFSI preferred.

Morgan Stanley is an equal opportunities employer. We work to provide a supportive and inclusive environment where all individuals can maximize their full potential. Our skilled and creative workforce is comprised of individuals drawn from a broad cross section of the global communities in which we operate and who reflect a variety of backgrounds, talents, perspectives, and experiences. Our strong commitment to a culture of inclusion is evident through our constant focus on recruiting, developing, and advancing individuals based on their skills and talents.

Posting Date

Oct 31, 2022

Primary Location

Non-Japan Asia-Singapore-Singapore-Singapore

Education Level

Bachelor's Degree

Job

Development

Employment Type

Full Time

Job Level

Associate"
Automation Engineer,"Job Description

365 days a year, our global manufacturing and supply network works to ensure our patients have the treatments they need to live longer, healthier lives.

Key Responsibilities
Develop & implement Coding / Recipes (DCS / Scada / PLC's / Control Networks)
Implement Software Change Controls associated with automation / system changes
Own and develop automation solutions that are consistent with specific needs of the manufacturing environment.
Drive the Automation roll-out process at the Site level ensuring cost, schedule and technical solution are achieved.
Manage operations for (OT) systems, tools and applications, ensuring their stability and integrity, while meeting customer service levels.
Support OT systems business owner in all occurring technical topics and operate all IT/OT services, systems and applications, to monitor events that occur in the enterprise environment.
Implement / execute the end-to-end processes required for OT systems and Cyber security requirements.
Take accountability to ensure adherence to security and compliance policies and procedures.


Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion:

Novartis is committed to building an outstanding, inclusive work environment and diverse teams representative of the patients and communities we serve.

Minimum Requirements
Degree in engineering or equivalent
More than 4 years of engineering experience in Automation in Chemical or Pharmaceutical industry
Strong knowledge of DeltaV DCS System, Siemens PLC, BMS and PI
Proven in resolving software /automation problems & maintain reliable operation of all building control / automation and related systems while complying and supporting the global standards.
Maintain reliable operation of building automation and related systems, ensuring maximum system availability and acceptable performance.
Adhere to global & local procedures concerning the operation, maintenance and development of the building automation and related systems
Good Communications skills essential


Why consider Novartis?

766 million lives were touched by Novartis medicines in 2021, and while we’re proud of this, we know there is so much more we could do to help improve and extend people’s lives.

We believe new insights, perspectives and ground-breaking solutions can be found at the intersection of medical science and digital innovation. That a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment inspires new ways of working.

We believe our potential can thrive and grow in an unbossed culture underpinned by integrity, curiosity and flexibility. And we can reinvent what's possible, when we collaborate with courage to aggressively and ambitiously tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges. Because the greatest risk in life, is the risk of never trying!

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

Join our Novartis Network: If this role is not suitable to your experience or career goals but you wish to stay connected to learn more about Novartis and our career opportunities, join the Novartis Network here: https://talentnetwork.novartis.com/network

Division

Novartis Technical Operations

Business Unit

LARGE MOLECULES

Country

Singapore

Work Location

Singapore

Company/Legal Entity

NOV SINGAPORE PHARMA MANUFG

Functional Area

Technical Operations

Job Type

Full Time

Employment Type

Regular

Shift Work

No

Early Talent

No"
Software Developer (Full Stack),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Help and contribute to the design of overall architecture of the web application.
Maintain quality and ensure responsiveness of applications.
Collaborate with the rest of the engineering team to design and launch new features.
Maintain code integrity and organization.
Experience working with graphic designers and converting designs to visual elements.
Understanding and implementation of security and data protection.
Design and build scalable REST APIs for micro services.
Proficient experience using front-end frameworks.
Highly experienced in building responsive websites.
Experience with cloud APIs (AWS).
Knowledge of code versioning tools (GIT).
Must be able to write unit test for both front-end and backend code.
Must be able to code using good patterns and practices.
Must be able to document code and provide API documentation i.e. swagger.
EDUCATION / TRAINING
Degree holder in Computer Engineering / Science, Information Technology or equivalent.
Experience
At least 3 years of application development and Strong knowledge of API Development.
At least 3 years of experience with a backend framework such as Java (Spring Boot), NodeJs or other similar stacks e.g. dotnet core, Ruby on Rails.
At least 3 years of experience front end work using Javascript Frameworks; ReactJs is a must have.
Strong knowledge of web services (WSDL Soap, Restful).
Team lead experience is a plus.
At least 3 years of experience being a full stack engineer.
Commanding grasp of HTML, CSS and JavaScript.
At least 3 years of experience with using a RDBMS like of MySQL, and object caches like Memcached and/or Redis.
At least 3 years of experience with Docker.
Experience with AWS products such as S3, ECS, ELB, API Gateway.
Experience with NoSQL databases.
Experience with TDD/BDD and agile methodologies.

Desired Skills and Experience
API Development, Web Services, CSS, HTML, SOAP, REST, MySQL, Application Development, JavaScript, Information Technology, Ruby, Docker, Ruby on Rails, Java, API, Databases"
Account Documentation Executive,"Job Description

The incumbent will be responsible for the review of account documentation and will be part of the General Services - Client Onboarding team. S/he will report to the Team Lead of Client Onboarding.

Key Responsibilities
Process and review account documentation for SG-booked, CH-booked and HK-booked accounts
Full review of account opening documentation for SG-booked accounts
Review of account opening documentation for CH and HK-booked accounts based on SG requirements
Review of account documentation for periodic review of SG, CH and HK-booked accounts
Input / validate client static data in systems
Handle client documentation and system maintenance for structure changes and updates
Onboarding, updates and periodic review of Business Introducers and Independent Asset Managers
Assist in preparation of periodic reports and statistics
Attend to queries from Front Office on client account documentation issues
Process CRS & FATCA forms
Other adhoc tasks and projects
Role Requirement
Have at least 5 - 8 years of account documentation review experience in Private Banking
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Team player and able to work independently under tight deadline pressure
About Us

EFG Bank is the Swiss private banking subsidiary of EFG International. Headquartered in Zurich, it has an international network spanning Europe, Asia Pacific, Middle East and Latin America, and manages assets for private clients all over the world. The bank’s services comprise asset management and investment counselling, investment funds, securities brokerage, estate planning and a full array of banking services. EFG Bank offers a stimulating and dynamic work environment."
Business Analysis Advisor,"Who are we?

Equinix is the world’s digital infrastructure company, operating 200+ data centers across the globe and providing interconnections to all the key clouds and networks. Businesses need one place to simplify and bring together fragmented, complex infrastructure that spans private and public cloud environments. Our global platform allows customers to place infrastructure wherever they need it and connect it to everything they need to succeed.

We are a fast-growing global company with 70+ consecutive quarters of growth. Through our innovative portfolio of high-performance products and services, we have created the largest, most active global ecosystem of nearly 10,000 companies, including 1,800+ networks and 2,900+ cloud and IT service providers in over 26 countries spanning five continents.

Joining our operations team means that you will be at the forefront of all we do, maintaining critical facilities infrastructure as part of a close-knit team delivering best in class service to our data center customers. We embrace diversity in thought and contribution and are committed to providing an equitable work environment. that is foundational to our core values as a company and is vital to our success.

Equinix is the world’s digital infrastructure company, operating 210 global data centers providing interconnections to all the key clouds and networks. We’re helping digital leaders around the world deliver infrastructure for today’s hybrid multicloud architecture.

Job Summary: Assists with basic analysis and reports and supports various projects

Responsibilities

Problem Solving/Assessment

Applies appropriate methodologies and tools for analyzing a range of standard, functional and/or cross-functional issues
Assists in identifying process gaps and issues
Utilizes appropriate methodology including Lean Six Sigma where appropriate

Project Management

Supports project plans and resources, tracking timelines and ensuring status updates are periodically communicated
Coordinates with stakeholders to facilitate alignment through implementation and post-implementation stages
May help identify risks and issues

Cost/Benefit Analysis and Monitoring

Assists with pre and post implementation analysis
Expected benefits and actual results

Implementation and Change Management

Aids in updating process and procedural documentation
Assists with post deployment analysis

Reporting and Metrics

Supports status reporting providing periodic project updates, communicating identified risks, issues and concerns
Performs ad-hoc reporting

Alignment, Consistency & Prioritization

Coordinates cross functional discussions to drive issues, challenges and prioritization efforts

Business Requirements, Functional Design and Process Design

Documents business requirements
Supports in developing cross-functional BRDs
Assists the BSA's and Dev. team on solution design and development
Coordinates with stakeholders to analyze, define and document business processes within and across functional areas
May utilize Lean Six Sigma methodology, supporting the design or improvement of business processes

Stakeholder Management

Assists with mapping out stakeholder lists and establishing stakeholders' needs
Escalates to resolve basic stakeholder issues

Testing

May perform and/or coordinate user acceptance testing
Reports on testing progress

Qualifications

Degree with any relevant field
At least 2 years of relevant experience

Equinix is an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability.

Visit our Career page here to understand about Equinix COVID-19 Vaccine Policy."
Timepieces & Fine Jewellery Specialist,"You get to work alongside a Fashion team to accessorize the client’s look, promoting CHANEL’s watch & fine jewelry creations and workmanship and helping clients discover another side of the House of CHANEL. You also help to upskill the Fashion boutique team by running workshops to share our watch & fine jewelry collection stories, specialist knowledge and storytelling methods.

If you are a watch & jewelry enthusiast and this resonates with you, come join our team of Timepieces & Fine Jewelry Specialist! As the Front Face of CHANEL, you will play a critical role in delivering a unique luxurious and inspirational experience for all our clients – selling a style and a dream, not merely a product.

As our Timepieces & Fine Jewelry Specialist, you can look forward to excellent career growth and advancement opportunities within the boutique team across the House.

Leveraging Your Unique Experiences, CHANEL Will Enable You To…


Be our brand ambassador and transmit our brand values and culture to clients
Contribute to the brand image of CHANEL as the ultimate House of Luxury
Coach, share & demonstrate your knowledge in fashion, watches & fine jewelry
Develop visibility & awareness within clients via participating to high jewelry events
Develop strong, lasting relationships with clients and build emotional connections with them

You are energized by…


Demonstrating high professional standards, personal commitment and passion for the brand
Working in a highly collaborative environment
Keeping yourself updated on latest styling trends and recreating them with CHANEL pieces, particularly with an eye on watch & fine jewelry
Creating synergy effects between teams and elevating and aligning experiences level for fashion & watch & fine jewelry clients

What You Can Bring To The Team…


Excellent communication and relationship building skills
Passion for luxury watches & fine jewelry, and fashion
Exceptional client service with good service attitude
Open & positive mindset
Willingness to learn and being resilient

At CHANEL, we believe the uniqueness of each individual increases the diversity and vibrancy of our teams, and we foster an inclusive culture so that everyone can perform at their best. We strongly encourage your application, and value the perspective and experience you can bring to CHANEL."
Digital Campaign Specialist,"Getting onboard Razer will place you on a global mission to revolutionize the way the world games. Razer is a place to do great work, offering you the opportunity to make an impact globally while working across a global team located across 5 continents. Razer is also a great place to work, providing you the unique, gamer-centric #LifeAtRazer experience that will put you in an accelerated growth, both personally and professionally.

Job Responsibilities

The Digital Campaign Specialist is responsible for driving Razer’s brand awareness and product sales across AP etail platforms and marketplaces, with special emphasis on online including social, digital and ecommerce campaign management. In this role, you’ll drive our revenue hyper-growth targets and channel expansion strategy on digital platforms to increase Razer’s brand presence and revenue share coming from online sales. Effective social and digital ad campaign planning, management, execution and tracking is your key focus in this role.

Plan, set targets for, execute, and track campaigns on social media and digital platforms (Google, YouTube, Facebook, Instagram, Twitter, Twitch, TikTok, etc.) to enhance reach and conversion of online campaigns
Engage and manage social media and digital marketing agencies including budget/KPI setting/ target measurement/contracting/planning/execution and reporting
Manage localization process for social media and digital campaigns contents with relevant stakeholders
Maintain and expand relationships with regional etail marketplaces (e.g. Amazon, eBay, Lazada, Shopee, Coupang, PChome, 11Street, Blibli, Rakuten, etc) and Online Partners assisting with daily operations of marketplace management and campaign execution
Directly communicate with country distributors and Online Partners on campaign planning, product selection, and digital co-marketing activities including coordinating with external agencies and partners
Oversee and manage major mega sales day campaigns (618, 9.9, 11.11, BFCM, 12.12, etc)
Plan, manage, and track quarterly regional campaign marketing budget, identification of ROI and execution within budget
Monitor competitor market share trends to develop counter strategies to gain share
Maintain, expand, and/or set up Razer Flagship Stores in etail marketplaces

Pre-Requisites

At least 2-3 years of proven working experience in social/digital marketing including content marketing, social and digital campaigns to drive traffic, engagement and conversion
Proficient in digital ad campaigns execution and optimization – Online advertising on Google Search, Google Display, YouTube, Facebook, Instagram Twitter, Twitch, TikTok
Strong knowledge of website analytics tools is required and is up to date with the latest trends and best practices in social media marketing
Experienced in tracking and analyzing campaign outcomes including product revenue, traffic metrics, and other factors
Excellent communication, presentation, stakeholder management and project management skills
Able to work in complex and fast-moving environments and continue to drive effective results
Able to deliver under pressure and tight deadlines
Upbeat, positive, and self-motivated

Good-to-have(s)

Social marketing experience will be favorable
Experience working with digital marketing agencies will be favorable
Experience with ecommerce platforms such as Amazon, eBay, Shopee, Lazada, Rakuten, or others will be favorable
Passionate about gaming and understanding the gamer mindset

Are you game?"
Senior System Engineer,"Location: Singapore, Singapore

Thales people architect solutions that support 85 million mainline and suburban passenger journeys, worldwide, every day. Our Rail Signalling and Communication systems are used on metro lines across major cities, and 72,000 kms of route, 52,000 trains per day in 16 countries are controlled by our Traffic Management Systems. Together We deployed the first-ever nationwide ticketing system which processes over 50 million ticketing transactions in 100 cities daily.

Thales established its presence in Singapore in 1973 to support the expansion of aerospace-related activities in the Asia-Pacific region. Throughout the last four decades, the company grew from strength to strength and is today involved in the primary businesses of Aerospace (including Air Traffic Management), Defence & Security, Ground Transportation and Digital Identity & Security. Thales today employs over 2,100 people in Singapore across all its business areas.

Position Summary

Performs the system engineering activities required to SCADA system design, deployment and validation.

Analyses the customer’s and other stakeholders’ needs whatever the used means (e.g. advanced studies, simulations, mock-ups, models, prototypes, …)
Describes the missions, functions and requirements on the SCADA system
Formalises the specification and the architectural design to develop the SCADA system
Prepares and performs the SCADA system integration, verification and validation tests.
Main Tasks & Responsibilities

The System Engineer is responsible for a SCADA system along its lifecycle:
Involvement from early stage of the Bid:
Assess best solution
Write Technical Proposal
Prepare Bill of Quantities
Perform the engineering requirements analysis
Provides required technical documentation:
Design Documents (Preliminary, Final)
Statement of Works for suppliers and external contractors
Input/output requirement for Interfaces Management
Input for specialty engineering: HUMS, RAMS, EMC/EMI, Cyber-Security.
Input for Installation Management
Operation and Maintenance documentation
Training material
Reports and follow-up the KPIs for the sub-system
Participate to progress meetings
Analyses and Correct the Problem Changes Requests
Qualifications

Pre-requisite :
Tertiary qualification in Computer Science, Information Technology, Electronics Engineering or related discipline (essential)
Higher degree qualifications are desirable.
Essential Experience
Experience working on SCADA projects
Experience working within a Systems Engineering lifecycle
Strong oral and written communications skills.
Desirable Experience
Knowledge of Thales Products and Processes
Membership of relevant professional organisation, e.g. INCOSE, Institution of Engineers Singapore, etc.
At Thales we provide CAREERS and not only jobs. With Thales employing 80,000 employees in 68 countries our mobility policy enables thousands of employees each year to develop their careers at home and abroad, in their existing areas of expertise or by branching out into new fields. Together we believe that embracing flexibility is a smarter way of working. Great journeys start here, apply now!"
Senior Engineer / Engineer (Software Design),"Description

Position at PSB Technologies Singapore

SOFTWARE ENGINEER / SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER

Job Requirements
Involve in design and development of machine control software for full line automation systems from concept to on-site installation.
Assist in circuit design on machine control for full line automation systems.
Handle machine setups and troubleshooting.
Provide field support of automation machines.
Must be willing to travel overseas when required.
Qualifications
Diploma, Advanced Diploma or Degree in Electrical/Electronics/Mechatronics Engineering.
Relevant experience in machine control software design and development.
Proficient in PLC programming for various PLC types like AB, Omron and Beckhoff.
Good knowledge and relevant experience in design and troubleshooting of servo and motion control systems is essential."
Software Engineer (Mobile Application Developer),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
We are looking for a motivated and talented mobile developer who is proficient in developing native Android Application and/or React Native application.

Job Description
Design, build and maintain both Enterprise & B2C mobile applications with current best practices
Collaborating with various stakeholders on new requirements, solutions and deliverables.
Delivering projects on schedule and to specification
Developing test plans and maintaining system documentation
Requirements
Degree in Information Technology/ Computer Science or relevant discipline
Minimum 3 years as android developer, with relevant support experience.
Experience with Android Development with Java/Kotlin and/or React Native Application.
Build REST based API to support mobile functionality
Experience with software testing
Familiarity with version control (Git/SVN) and continuous integration
Experience in Retail, E-commerce will be advantageous
Self-motivated individuals with the ability to learn and develop independently in a fast-paced environment
A team player who possesses good interpersonal communication skills and ability to work independently an in a team

Desired Skills and Experience
Android Development, Ability To Work Independently, Good Interpersonal Communication Skills, Critical Thinking, Information Technology, Communication Skills, Web Applications, Team Player, Ability To Learn, Software Development"
Application Developer -Java,"Possess minimum 2 to 7 years of experience writing code using languages such as (but not limited to) J2EE, Java, PL/SQL.
Possess hands-on experience with Java Struts, Spring Boot, and Hibernate Enterprise framework.
Experience in one or more full SDLC for enterprise projects.
Experience in Agile Development environments.
Experience in Application Servers like WebSphere will be an advantage.
Good understanding of modern software development methodologies (Object).
Good understanding of Software Testing methodologies, scripting, and tools.
Good understanding of RDBMS databases such as Oracle."
Backend Software Engineer - Trust and Safety Engineering,"Responsibilities

[About Tiktok]
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

[About the Team]
Our Trust and Safety Engineering team is responsible for building a highly scalable, complex and intelligent platform that is able to manage high traffic loads. You would also be building the tools to help protect our users from harmful content and abusive behaviors. With the continuous efforts of our trust and safety team, we can provide the best user experience and bring joy to everyone in the world.

[Responsibilities]
- Build a highly-scalable, efficient and robust trust and safety platform and tools;
- Understand product objectives to develop an easy-to-use platform that aligns with customers needs;
- Collaborate with trust and safety specialists, experts and machine learning engineers;
- Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability and performance of the services;
- Work with Trust and Safety teams to protect TikTok globally.

Qualifications

[Minimum Qualifications]
- Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent with 3+ years of relevant experience.
- Proficiency in designing data structures, building algorithms, and at least one programming languages: Java, Python, C++ Go, PHP.
- Passion about techniques and solving challenging problems.
- Experience in problem solving with related internet products.
- Prior experience working on Internet Products or large scale platforms.

[Preferred Qualifications]
- Great communication and teamwork skills"
Data Scientist - Computer Vision (Risk Management),"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Data driven based business is the core in helping to use cloud native platform to serve tens of millions of crypto-currency users. Engineers and Data Scientists across the company use the data platform to do interesting and impactful analysis for continuous innovations.

As a data scientist, you will have the opportunity to leverage rich data (PB-level scalability) and state-of-art machine learning infrastructure to develop data products which are used by our tens of millions of crypto-currency users.

You will collaborate with a strong team of engineers, data analysts, business operation and product/marketing managers to define and build solutions, features, algorithms and products based off our rich data and cutting-edge machine learning technology.

Responsibilities

Develop CV/ML models and algorithms for solving KYC and other general image tasks
Conduct cutting-edge research for improving performance and efficiency of current solutions
Collaborate with backend engineer, strategist, and reviewer to build up the whole service pipeline

Requirements

B.E/M.E in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or a related areas
Experience and exposure on Advanced Computer Vision, Image recognition, retrieval, detection, synthesis, OCR and etc.
Solid experiences in Python and SQL
Self-driven, innovative, collaborative, with good communication and presentation skills
Knowledge of KYC process is a plus

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Recruitment Sales Specialist | Executive Search | Banking & Finance | Manufacturing | Oil & Gas,"With over 30 years of experience in the industry, Achieve Group is a home-grown multi-award-winning organization, and we are currently expanding! We are looking for people with positive mindset and the determination to succeed to join us as Recruitment Sales Consultant.

Award Winning Agency
Salary: $3,000 - $4,000 & above + Uncapped Commission + Incentives
5 days Work Week / Paya Lebar (SingPost Centre)
Experience in Recruitment Agency an added advantage

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Manage 360 end-to-end recruitment process
Identify new business opportunities and establish relationships with potential clients
Liaise with clients to understand their hiring needs and expectations
Manage the full recruitment process, from sourcing, screening, interviewing and selecting the right candidates according to clients’ requirement
Provide good customer service to clients and candidates

REQUIREMENTS:
Diploma or Degree in any discipline
Proven track record in sales and account management in any field
Experience in Recruitment Sales / Business Development / Manufacturing / Banking & Finance / Oil & Gas
Passion to meet sales targets
Self-driven and enthusiastic individual with good interpersonal and communication skills
Highly initiative and motivated individual
Good interpersonal and communication skills

Kindly submit your application with your updated Resume in MS Word to irene.lim@achievegroup.asia / DID: 6590 9948 / WhatsApp: 8832 5996

Notice:
We regret that only short-listed candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.
By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read & agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration, and for our marketing EDMs which you may opt out by unsubscribing in the mailer. You may refer and access our website at www.achievegroup.asia/privacy-policy/ for more information.

Cessation of Collection of full NRIC Numbers:
In compliance with the Personal Data Protection Act and commitment to protect candidates’ personal data, Achieve Group will cease to collect, process or use full NRIC numbers during our screening and job application process.
Kindly ensure your resumes provided to us does not contain your full NRIC number and full home address during your job application."
SAP Intern - Global Industry & Value Advisory,"We help the world run better

Our company culture is focused on helping our employees enable innovation by building breakthroughs together. How? We focus every day on building the foundation for tomorrow and creating a workplace that embraces differences, values flexibility, and is aligned to our purpose-driven and future-focused work. We offer a highly collaborative, caring team environment with a strong focus on learning and development, recognition for your individual contributions, and a variety of benefit options for you to choose from.Apply now!

About The Team

The Industry and Value Advisory (IVA) organization is chartered with articulating the value of adopting SAP technology solutions and differentiating SAP as the innovation partner of choice.

We are a global team of 50 people. We work on really exciting projects that impact our team of 700+ worldwide. Our projects are strategic and give a good insight into how a large technology organization is driven from a global point of view. A key focus area for the Global IVA team in 2023 is to execute the extend our Value Strategy, which focuses on revitalizing and re-injecting, the Value DNA across regions and LoBs based on the evolving industry realities and SAPs new corporate strategy. A key pillar in this transformation is to support our teams in strategic customer engagements in the world with state-of-the-art innovations and strategic guidance on the deal and developing new ways of delivering Value across the ecosystem. Hence, we aim at delivering the IVA transformation and support the build of a unified IVA community and brand globally.

What You’ll Do

Position title: SAP Intern - Global Industry & Value Advisory
Location: Singapore
Expected start date and duration: ASAP or no later than March 2023 for minimum 6 months or longer
Working Hours: minimum 3 days/week

In this role, you will work closely with the Global Industry and Value Advisory leadership team which includes:

Tasks include among others: Supporting the Regional Partners in programs to elevate scale of value thinking and value creation in the regions, deal engagements under supervision, executing and tracking initiatives, building tools to enable teams, track our business or review performance.
The candidate will work in an environment with experienced, former Top Management Consultants (McKinsey, BCG, Booz, Bain, etc.) and can expect tremendous professional coaching and growth

Who You Are

We’re looking for someone who takes initiative, perseveres, and stay curious. You like to work on meaningful innovative projects and are energized by lifelong learning.

The ideal candidate should be one year ahead of her/his graduation (graduate studies preferred), specific academic field of study is secondary (i.e., Computer Science, Engineering, Business Administration, etc.)
Analytical thinking, a passion for problem solving and ability to manage tasks/projects independently are at the essence
Experience in program or large-scale project management involving several stakeholder groups a plus
Previous work experience in (strategy) consulting experience a plus
A self-starter and independent thinker with high motivation, positive can-do attitude and drive, who can run with various tasks
You are a strong collaborator, who is not scared of working with a global team virtually
Proficient in Microsoft Office (Teams, Excel, Word and PowerPoint) is key
Proficiency in English is a must, Mandarin or other Asian language a plus

We build breakthroughs together

SAP innovations help more than 400,000 customers worldwide work together more efficiently and use business insight more effectively. Originally known for leadership in enterprise resource planning (ERP) software, SAP has evolved to become a market leader in end-to-end business application software and related services for database, analytics, intelligent technologies, and experience management. As a cloud company with 200 million users and more than 100,000 employees worldwide, we are purpose-driven and future-focused, with a highly collaborative team ethic and commitment to personal development. Whether connecting global industries, people, or platforms, we help ensure every challenge gets the solution it deserves. At SAP, we build breakthroughs, together.

We win with inclusion

SAP’s culture of inclusion, focus on health and well-being, and flexible working models help ensure that everyone – regardless of background – feels included and can run at their best. At SAP, we believe we are made stronger by the unique capabilities and qualities that each person brings to our company, and we invest in our employees to inspire confidence and help everyone realize their full potential. We ultimately believe in unleashing all talent and creating a better and more equitable world.

SAP is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to the values of Equal Employment Opportunity and provide accessibility accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with SAP and are in need of accommodation or special assistance to navigate our website or to complete your application, please send an e-mail with your request to Recruiting Operations Team: Careers@sap.com

For SAP employees: Only permanent roles are eligible for the SAP Employee Referral Program, according to the eligibility rules set in the SAP Referral Policy. Specific conditions may apply for roles in Vocational Training.

EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their age, race, religion, national origin, ethnicity, age, gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, et al), sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, protected veteran status, or disability.

Successful candidates might be required to undergo a background verification with an external vendor.

Requisition ID: 363228 | Work Area: Consulting and Professional Services | Expected Travel: 0 - 10% | Career Status: Student | Employment Type: Intern | Additional Locations: ."
Devops Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
The Job Description Is As Below

Responsibilities

As a DevOps Engineer, you are to assist application team running Treasury & Market Trading System to achieve the team’s goals and objectives. In the course of this engagement, deep immersion into the daily support/development work culture will be required to allow the engineer to fully understand the daily grind which the application team experiences and with that to come out with better improvement in operation.

Requirements
Experience in one or more of the following: Python/Java.
Very good analytical and problem-solving skills with good understanding of technical risks emerging out of architecture decisions.
Experience with developing applications and setting up automations in a Linux environment, with sound knowledge of algorithms, data structures, complexity analysis and software design.
Development skills with experience in real time, distributed and highly secured environments.
Experience with developing test cases and ensuring appropriate test coverage through unit and automated testing.
Experience with CI/CD pipelines and release strategies
Systematic problem-solving approach coupled with effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive.
Ability to debug and optimize code and to automate routine tasks.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, a related technical field that involves programming, or equivalent practical experience.
Highly motivated, pro-active and capable of working under pressure without compromising development processes and productivity.
Strong, committed and reliable team player, able to take direction but also willing to contribute to discussions on design and strategy.
Possess strong interpersonal and communication skills to be able to deal with and form good relationships with the business and other technology groups through day to day support and project work
Interest in financial technologies, new technology tools and the ability to learn.

Desired Skills and Experience
Treasury, Kubernetes, Azure, Pipelines, Data Structures, Scripting, Test Cases, Trading System, Continuous Integration, Software Design, Docker, Working Under Pressure, Team Player, Ansible, Linux, Ability To Learn"
Business Development Specialist – Client Events,"Job Description

Latham & Watkins, a global law firm consistently ranked among the top firms in the world, is seeking a Business Development Client Events Specialist to join our dynamic team in Hong Kong or Singapore. Please note that this role may be eligible for a flexible working schedule that allows for a hybrid and in-office presence.

About Latham & Watkins

Latham & Watkins is dedicated to hiring and developing the best and brightest. A key to Latham’s success and our continued ability to deliver the highest quality service to our clients is our “one-firm” culture – a spirit of teamwork and shared commitment to quality across our offices worldwide that has long distinguished Latham from other law firms.

About The Role

As a Business Development Client Events Specialist, you will be responsible for executing a high volume of client dinners and various hospitality events, as well as, supporting team members on larger event initiatives across Asia. Other key responsibilities include:

Working with key stakeholders to define event objectives and thoughtfully design event accordingly; post-event, you will be measuring success against outlined objectives and providing recommendations to extend the life-cycle of the event and capturing additional return on investment
Pro-actively coordinating various aspects of the event lifecycle, including planning meetings, checklists, budgets, expense processing, vendor management, onsite and virtual platform management, data management, post-event analysis
Curating targeted invitations lists for each event, working closely with stakeholders and e-marketing team
Drafting event communications and collateral that align with Latham branding
Developing and controlling budgets for each event; identifying, negotiating and achieving cost savings with venues and vendors
Continuously staying abreast of event best practices as well as market and industry trends
About You

Join our team if you:

Possess strong interpersonal and client service skills
Communicate well at all levels of the organization
Consistently display a positive, high-energy attitudes
And have:

A Bachelor’s degree
A minimum of four (3) years of experience in event management
Experience using event management and CRM systems
Superior organizational skills to manage multiple events at one time
Proficiency in Chinese
We encourage you to apply!

Successful candidates will not only be provided with an outstanding opportunity, but will also be provided with a generous total compensation package with bonuses awarded in recognition of both individual and firm performance. Eligible employees can participate in Latham’s comprehensive benefit program which includes:

Health insurance as well as group income protection and life assurance
A pension plan
Wellness programs
Employee discounts
And more!
Latham & Watkins is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Our commitment to diversity, equal opportunity and sustainability enables Latham & Watkins to draw from a remarkable wealth of talent to create one of the world's leading law firms.

Latham & Watkins' lawyers, paralegals, and professional staff worldwide comprise a rich mixture of different races, ethnic backgrounds, religions, sexual orientations, cultures, and primary languages. Our diversity makes us who we are.

What sets Latham & Watkins apart is our commitment to our pro bono work and sustainability initiatives. Latham's dedication to pro bono work is a source of pride and reflects a fundamental part of the firm’s culture. For more information about our pro bono work, please click here.

Latham & Watkins is committed to supporting the long-term sustainability of the environment, you can find more information on our sustainability programs by visiting our Latham Sustainability webpage."
Information Technology - SAP Techno Functional Consultant,"Job Description

The successful candidate will join the Singapore Airlines’ Information Technology Division and be a part of a dynamic and fast paced team. This team will be instrumental in transforming via technology, our operations in Finance, Procurement and/or Supply Chain to achieve the company’s strategic vision while optimizing the results across the business processes.

Key Responsibilities Include
Play an integral role in our SAP S/4 HANA implementation project and working in areas of Finance, Procurement and/or Supply Chain
Using Agile methodologies, work closely with business stakeholders, IT team and implementation partners to ensure that the S/4HANA solution, including relevant add-ons that will be implemented is able to deliver the business vision and projected outcomes and is aligned to our Digital Enterprise Architecture and Application Roadmap
Support any ongoing BAU work where needed
This is an individual contributor role
Note: Successful candidate will start with a 2 to 3 years contract with potential for renewal or conversion to permanent engagement based on performance
Requirements
Possess a degree in Information Technology or related fields
At least 5 years of functional and technical experience in SAP FICO, MM and/or PM modules and experience in integrating SAP ERP modules with non-SAP systems
Knowledge and experience in S/4HANA is preferred and other SAP add-on solutions such as Ariba, TripRecord, IBP and iMRO would be added advantage
Have knowledge / experience in delivering projects under the Agile framework
Have a curious mind, is logical and possess good problem-solving and communication skills
Able to work independently as well as collaboratively as part of a highly skilled team"
Database Administrator | DBA - MSBU,"Monday to Friday office hours
2-year contract position, renewable, convertible

The Database Administrator (DBA) must be a Certified Oracle Database Administrator and/or Microsoft SQL Administrator in administration and troubleshooting (inclusive of manual discovery or post actions from automatic alerts).
Incumbent is expected to perform Level 1 and Level 2 database related issues and be experienced in the following areas, but not limited to the following competencies:
Database Analysis
Database Performance analysis, tuning and optimization
SQL Coding
Database Migration
Database security features implementation
Database backup and recovery
Technical database documentation
Daily health checks on the database
Verification of database status and integrity during application upgrade or maintenance
Database housekeeping/optimization activities including but not limited to:
Highlight and ensure sufficient data growth
Create/reallocate DB files, tables, indexes, rollback segments, (auto)extent management and other database objects
Providing advice to Operations Manager and Customers on database related issues as well as new technology and innovations

Job Responsibilities
Document daily checks and status update
Develop and update all necessary DB documentation (including checklist, operations manual and relevant changes to configuration settings) and DR setup
Report monthly on database size and DB Uptime and Performance
Generate ad-hoc non-standard reports for incident/problem investigations, DB capacity planning or audit purposes

Database Management
Create new DB creations, database network configuration, determine/adhere to guidelines for database structures and file layout, review and enhance scripts and procedures, proper management of transaction and redo/archive logs
Assist in database purging and collaborate with Solutions Team to define the purging policy for each individual system, database re-indexing and database tuning, if required
Review daily on log irregularities and follow-up actions
Maintain regular database maintenance schedules
Monitor the performance to discover and detect from on-start, the possible system anomalies which may impact business operations. This shall include system resource usage, Basic CPU utilization, Disk I/O, Basic network I/O, memory utilization of database buffers, shared pool, memory cache, inefficient SQL, long running queries, in-doubt transactions, temporary table space usage, job query analysis, lock and latch analysis, alert log errors, availability of required start-up services/components for low disk space/archive logs, blocking locks, core dump, interfaces and batch-jobs
Monitor backups, recovery and replication for successful completion
Data Management
Monitor object fragmentation, invalid objects and extent of failure detection
Perform Disaster Recovery (DR) for all the critical systems and ensure successful rebuilt of Production or DR servers, if necessary

Incident/Problem Management
Incident detection and confirmation of production database systems shall include timely escalation to the Managed Helpdesk, and performing the DBA onsite services on physical database facilities, to rectify the incidents with root cause analysis in order to ensure permanent resolution
Verify and validate databases backup, recovery and replication status
Review, improve and document the database administration and operational guide on new or revised processes and procedures regularly
Work with customers/clients, service desk and third-party solutions vendor to resolve on the disrupted service and rectify the database integrity for the users promptly, to minimize business impact. This shall include applications that are undergoing upgrades.
Assist the Operations and Project Lead on the issues related to database in daily operations or new projects implementation
Any other ad-hoc duties as required or assigned
Job Requirements
Diploma or Degree in IT or equivalent
At least 3 years of Oracle or SQL Database support administration
Singaporeans only

Note: Employment by Third Party Contractor and Contract Employment"
Product Manager (Transportation),"We are seeking for a Product Manager to deliver superior experience for our mobile apps’ development. You should be familiar with the global digital app industry market trends and able to perform the following tasks.

Develop a thorough understanding of app markets, competitors, consumer and partner demands and emerging industry trends
Formulate new strategies via data analysis to ensure product competitiveness
Capture requirements and concepts into documentation for ease of communication with Business, Product and Tech stakeholders
Prioritize, multi-task and see through the product development process from end to end by taking ownership on the product feature timeline
Liaise with cross-functional teams to achieve deliverables and ensuring constant product improvement

What we look for in an individual
A practical person adopting a hands-on approach on product execution who is able to prioritize and multi-task
An independent and inquisitive person who is able to adapt with minimum guidance
A meticulous and determined person who is undeterred by roadblocks and see through the product development from end to end
A natural born leader who is able to liaise with cross-functional teams to achieve deliverables and ensuring constant product improvement
Has a good understanding on A/B Testing and mobile specific roll-out plans.
Has a good understanding on REST-driven architecture

Job Requirements:
Degree holder in Computer Science/Engineering or related fields of study
Minimum 4 years of work experience in digital product management
User-centred product design, knowledge of practices and disciplines
Strong solution orientation and problem-solving skills
Strong analytical and communication skills
Excellent presentation skills and able to communicate technical information (both written and verbal)
Proficient in project management tools, e.g. Jira and Confluence
Proven work experience on a collaborative team and working directly with developers for implementation of products"
Specialist Mining Engineer (SME),"You can expect a lot from a career at Worley

Together, our nearly 60,000 people across 60 countries have already achieved many industry firsts. And we’ve broken several records along the way.

We’re excited about the challenges ahead as the energy transition gathers pace. If you ask us, there’s never been a more rewarding time to work in the energy, chemical and resources sectors.

Whatever your ambition, there’s a path for you here. And there’s no barrier to your potential career success.

About The Role

To review (with calculations) the Contractor’s design, supervise and co-ordinate all aspects of temporary and permanent works for the mining works including trenchless construction methods.
He / she will be required to carry out the supervision work in accordance with the Building Control Act and the Authority's requirements. He / she has to ensure that the construction is carried out in accordance with the design, all relevant standards, contract specifications, approved method statements, safety requirements and to the agreed programme.
The SME is required to exercise his / her professional experience and judgement to ensure that the safe and proper construction methods are being adopted to carry out the mining construction.
To prepare and develop detailed supervision schedule and comprehensive checklist for the conduct of the inspection and supervision by himself / herself, and the Specialist Mining Inspector (SMI).
To prepare and develop detailed Safety Inspection schedule and checklist for the excavation and construction activities for the mining construction.
To review and check the construction drawings, method statements and construction sequence for all aspects of the temporary and permanent works of the mining construction, modification proposals to the design and construction methods and to advise on necessary amendments.
To review and check all contingency measures and their application and decision structure, including all rectification proposals.
. To supervise every stage of the mining construction, including all excavation, shotcreting, installation of support / stabilising elements, casting of concrete and all other works to achieve the full completion of the tunnel, in a safe manner.
. To monitor and interpret the visual / physical conditions of the mining work and assess the potential risks and deviations from the design intent and method statements. To immediately alert the Engineer on the potential risks and all deviations with clear assessment of the courses of actions and implementation of the contingency measures.
To monitor and assess the instrumentation results, and implement/instruct the execution of the various courses of action when the control levels are exceeded.
. To report to the Engineer on the daily progress of excavation and the instrumentation monitoring records, deviation of the ground encountered from expected profile, and to alert Engineer on change in physical / visual condition of tunnel.
. To report to the Engineer on the daily assessment of the conditions of the mining construction works, assessment of the potential risks and remedial measures/contingencies implemented.
. To give presentations to all staff (Client) at regular time periods on the various construction activities, and to assist in the presentations to Client’s Management on mining construction works.
To create a process to provide training, guidance and mentoring of the Client’ engineers and site supervisors attached to the mining construction works.
To prepare a report to preserve the knowledge and experience gained from the project, addressing all aspects of the mining construction and making recommendations for future improvements

About You

The Specialist Mining Engineer (SME) shall have minimum fifteen (15) years of relevant experience in supervising box tunnels that are in close proximity to existing bored tunnels and MRT station, trenchless construction methods such as micro-tunnelling, front jacking, simple faceless tunnelling, mining methods or box jacking methods, etc and/or of similar level of complexity in the Civil Contract
Ability to meet agreed deadlines
Possess excellent interpersonal skills and ability to work as part of team.
Familiarity of Singapore local codes & standards

Benefits To You

Join a fun and inclusive, global team of professionals
Opportunities to progress beyond this role

What We Offer You

Providing an agile culture and challenging work opportunities results in a positive work environment. Our people enjoy competitive compensation packages and a fun, personal, collaborative and safe working environment. We value equal employment opportunity and are committed to promoting fairness, equality and diversity.

Our policy is to conduct background checks for all candidates who accept an offer of employment with us.

If you have the passion and talent to keep up, it's time to test the limits of what you can become. Find your future with Worley.

Worley takes your personal data protection seriously and respects EU and local data protection laws. You can read our full Recruitment Privacy Notice on this link.

Company

Worley

Primary Location

Singapore

Job

Structural

Schedule

Full-time

Employment Type

Direct Contractor

Job Level

Experienced

Job Posting

Jan 3, 2023

Unposting Date

Feb 2, 2023

Reporting Manager Title

Project Manager"
Project Engineer (EMC & RF Test Systems),"Your tasks

Design and implement complex and customized EMC/RF Test Systems
Verify and approve system configuration and design
Install and commission test systems on site in customer's laboratories
Provide operational and maintenance training to customers
Develop and maintain training materials and system documentation
Drive trial measurements and proof-of-concept studies and testing on new test solutions
Provide technical support to customers

Your Qualifications

Holds a diploma or degree in Electronics Engineering (RF / Wireless / Microwave)
Possess knowledge and prior work experience in EMC Test System, EMC standards, and RF test and measurements
Results orientated approach to work
Good communication and presentation skills
Able to travel independently and on demand (mainly to Asia Pacific region)

Interested?
We are looking forward to receiving your application! Ideally, you should apply online with the reference number. If you have any questions, please feel free to contact your recruiting contact via LinkedIn or XING.

Equal opportunities are important to us. We are looking forward to receiving your application regardless of gender, nationality, ethnic and social origin, religion, ideology, disability, age as well as sexual orientation and identity.

reference number

Recruiting Contact

The Rohde & Schwarz technology group is among the trailblazers when it comes to paving the way for a safer and connected world with its leading solutions in test & measurement, technology systems, and networks & cybersecurity. Founded more than 85 years ago, the group is a reliable partner for industry and government customers around the world. Rohde & Schwarz Singapore is the competence centre in the heart of Asia for sales, systems & projects, service & repair, calibration, R&D and customer support. We aim to bring Rohde & Schwarz's technical competence one step closer to our customers in the region. Together with the Asian subsidiaries and agents we form the integral part of the company's multi-cultural sales and distribution network to service our customers."
Automotive Network Technology Engineer,"DESAY SV is a leading high technology company focusing on providing smart mobility solutions. In 2021, DESAY SV logged about 50% growth in revenue, 60% growth in net profit, maintained super rapid expanding since 2018. DESAY SV also successfully reached No.1 place of market share for both infotainment system and advanced driving assistant system in China.
During pandemic period, DESAY SV proudly demonstrated outstanding capability in developing cutting-edge in-vehicle computing units as well as robust supply chain management and intelligent manufacture. It furthers strengthened our leading position in the market, and we have been nominated to chair most of the automotive technology revolution strategies at National level.

Job Responsibilities:
Design and develop protocol stacks for Vehicle Network/Communication functions or systems (including but not limited to Ethernet, CAN, LIN, FlexRay, Optical related.)
Develop subsystem prototyping such as DoIP and SOME/IP stack based ecosystem.
Lead or participate in product software architecture definition and design which meet automotive OEM requirement.
Ensure and carry out forward design process and document quality according to V model to fulfil stringent automotive industrial ISO standard.
Implement software programming to realize defined architecture & design.
Behave independently as technology domain representative for internal and external customers.

For this role, we are looking at below requirements:
Strong capability in independent thinking, self-motivation and innovative thinking.
Deep understanding of network layer components such as IPv4, IPv6, routing, forwarding, TCP/IP.
Deep knowledge in applying C, C++, JAVA or other scripting for different embedded system development.
5 years experience in the embedded system development, ARM processor, preferably in automotive industry.
Knowledge of software development using embedded C, C++, C#.
Knowledge of OS, data structures and algorithms.
Knowledge of streaming media protocol and AVB.
Knowledge of Real-time operating systems (RTOS), Linux, Android Auto or QNX will be added advantage.
Experience in developing time-critical functions in embedded systems.
Proficiency with network monitoring protocols and tools.
Knowledge of security engineering (building secure systems), Operating Systems and network security, common attack patterns and exploitation techniques.
Knowledge of system security analysis techniques such as threat modelling, attack trees etc.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Experience with Automotive industrial protocols will be added advantage.

Qualification:
Bachelor's degree or above in Information Security, Electronic, Computer Engineering, Computer Science or related field.

Benefits:
While we want our employees to work hard, we also make sure they are happy and be rewarded for their hard work. We offer:
Annual Wage Supplement (AWS)
Variable Bonus16 days Annual Leave or more
Birthday Leave and Gift
Medical and Dental Coverage
Group Insurance Coverage
Corporate Health Screening
and more

*Thank you for your interest and application to this role. We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Technical Project Manager,"Key Responsibilities

Helps to prepare project plan and coordinates project activities from planning to implementation. Maintain matrix for process improvements.

Coordinates project schedule and task details and helps to prepare reports, tracking charts, checklist and project scheduling.

Helps to align the progress of resources internal to the business unit to meet project on-time and budget performance objectives.

Tracks projects cost schedule for internal and external customers.

On occasion will interface with external suppliers and monitor and report on the projects progress against quality and cost metrics.

Interfaces with internal customers and reports on progress against project objectives.

Functional Knowledge

Demonstrates expanded conceptual knowledge in own discipline and broadens capabilities

Business Expertise

Understands key business drivers; uses this understanding to accomplish own work

Leadership

No supervisory responsibilities but provides informal guidance to new team members

Problem Solving

Solves problems in straightforward situations; analyzes possible solutions using technical experience and judgment and precedents

Impact

Impacts quality of own work and the work of others on the team; works within guidelines and policies

Interpersonal Skills

Explains complex information to others in straightforward situations

Qualifications

Education:

Bachelor's Degree

Skills

Certifications:

Languages:

Years of Experience:

4 - 7 Years

Work Experience:

Additional Information

Travel:

No

Relocation Eligible:

No

Applied Materials is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law."
Executive Assistant,"HOW MIGHT YOU DEFY IMAGINATION?

Amgen is one of the world’s leading independent biotechnology companies. For over 4 decades, Amgen has pioneered biotechnology breakthroughs, to bring state-of-the-art medicines from laboratory to the patient. Amgen has not only discovered and developed innovative human therapeutics, but has invested in cutting edge manufacturing capability and support services to deliver these exciting therapies to medical teams around the world. Japan and Asia Pacific (JAPAC) is the fastest growing region in Amgen. Now we are hiring an Executive Assistant in Singapore.

Executive Assistant

Live

What You Will Do

The Executive Assistant (EA) will be responsible for providing administrative support for senior leaders. The EA’s administrative and project work assignments will be complex in nature requiring discretion, as well as considerable tact, judgment, creativity and initiative in resolving issues. The EA may also be asked to demonstrate project management skills to run projects.

Main Responsibilities:

Manage multiple priorities in a continually changing environment
Maintaining calendars, scheduling appointments, and coordinating arrangements for meetings across multiple geographic locations and time zones
Coordinating domestic and international travel and completing expense reports.
Organize workflow by reviewing and managing correspondence sent to the executive
Screening and directing correspondence/visitors
Answering questions and providing information when appropriate.
Assist on any additional tasks and responsibilities based on the business needs

Win

Qualifications

What we expect of you

Bachelor’s Degree and 5 years of directly related experience as an Executive Assistant in an international company OR
Associate degree and 8 years of directly related experience as an Executive Assistant in an international company
Excellent English communication skills in oral and written
Excellent computer skills in Microsoft Office, all remote working tools
Excellent time management and prioritization skills
Strong Interpersonal skills and a team player
Self-starter who can function autonomously
Focus on deliverables within agreed upon deadlines
Ability to pay close attention to detail and manage multiple tasks simultaneously
Innovative, creative, flexible

Thrive

What You Can Expect Of Us

As we work to develop treatments that take care of others, so we work to care for our teammates’ professional and personal growth and well-being.

Vast opportunities to learn and move up and across our global organization
Diverse and inclusive community of belonging, where teammates are empowered to bring ideas to the table and act
Generous Total Rewards Plan comprising health, finance and wealth, work/life balance, and career benefits

Apply now

for a career that defies imagination

In our quest to serve patients above all else, Amgen is the first to imagine, and the last to doubt. Join us.

careers.amgen.com

Equal Opportunity Statement

Amgen is an Equal Opportunity employer and will consider you without regard to your race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.

We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided a reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request an accommodation.

Join Us

If you're seeking a career where you can truly make a difference in the lives of others, a career where you can work at the absolute forefront of biotechnology with the top minds in the field, you'll find it at Amgen.

Amgen, a biotechnology pioneer, discovers, develops and delivers innovative human therapeutics. Our medicines have helped millions of patients in the fight against cancer, kidney disease, rheumatoid arthritis and other serious illnesses.

As an organization dedicated to improving the quality of life for people around the world, Amgen fosters an inclusive environment of diverse, ethical, committed and highly accomplished people who respect each other but compete intensely to win. Together, we live the Amgen values as we continue advancing science to serve patients."
Microsoft Account Executive - Singapore,"Inviso Microsoft Account Executive SMC-C – Singapore

The Team
Inviso’s Microsoft Account Executive (AE) for SMC-Corporate (SMC-C) provides role excellence through an impactful customer centricity, managing Microsoft’s managed customers. Key success is in its ability to drive customer partner experience leveraging Microsoft Programs resulting in satisfied customers. SMC-C team in Microsoft is at the forefront to better help customers be successful on their digital transformation journey through prioritized sales plays, programs while scaling through partners.

The Role
Successful candidate is to manage and engage customers through account planning, drive customer engagements through data driven and trusting approach. The successful candidate will also be with strong capabilities to establish internal collaboration, ensure customer engagements through various solution areas, close engagement with stakeholders and Partners for best customer engagement experience.
Embracing a challenger mindset, the successful AE for SMC-C manages customers with impact through their ability to close opportunities with customers that produce transformative business outcomes.

Roles and Responsibility:
Business Relationship Owner: Build coalition of support with various level of customer stakeholders.
Engage customers through inspiring and empowering them to develop pipeline on Microsoft solution utilizing Microsoft Programs best for customer.
Develop and manage all phases of the sales cycle including prospecting, qualifying, consultative selling and closing new business.
Work proactively and independently in developing relationships, driving value conversations through knowledge of Microsoft solutions.
Develop strategic accounts and execute sales strategies with defined sales plays.
Collaborate with Partners to ensure a good engagement experience with customers.

The Opportunity
Candidates in will sharpen critical career skills from the experience working within the team and in collaboration with the broader Microsoft SMC-C team. Candidates will also benefit from the broad network of Microsoft’s lines of business and client relationships across the various business groups and team.

Experience Required
Degree in Business, Computer Science or a related discipline or equivalent education
3+ years of experience in consultative selling Microsoft Cloud or related services
Prior consulting, account management, or sales experience specifically relating to Microsoft Business Solutions
Strong and established market knowledge within the local country
Able to work effectively with minimal supervision
Proven ability to navigate difficult conversations and drive effective solutions to business problems with knowledge of pricing tactics and strategies
Proven experience in closing business for business applications/technology sales as an Account Executive or Sales Representative
Ability to thrive in a dynamic and entrepreneurial environment and to work with a team
Ability to travel 30% or more
Exceptional communication skills, both written and verbal in English and local language requirements
Ability to work with management at every level
Problem solving abilities that adapt to variety of situations
Microsoft Office Proficiency: PowerPoint, Excel, Word, Outlook, Visio. Strong Excel capabilities is essential.

Additional Qualities That Would Be Helpful:
Managed large quota and has experience in managing cross industry accounts
Solid knowledge of one industry required (i.e. Government, Education, Healthcare, Financial Services, Retail, Manufacturing, Automotive, Telco, Media, Oil/Gas/Energy, etc.)
2+ years experience in supporting customer in driving Digital Transformation
Self-direction and a focus on quality, with the ability to apply independent judgment to accomplish objectives

About Inviso: Inviso is a growing mid-size technology consulting firm that offers a wide range of business services for small to enterprise organizations across a wide range of industries. Our solution offerings include Azure, Business Intelligence, Advertising & Marketing, Solution Assessments, and Staffing. We support customers around the world, with offices in the USA, Canada, Mexico, New Zealand, Singapore, Malaysia, India, and Australia. Our mission is to help clients achieve more by delivering innovative solutions that bring together the right mix of technology and creativity.

Inviso’s Microsoft Solutions Group (MSG) team is widely recognized as a global leader in the Microsoft Partner ecosystem for our strength in many critical areas of our service delivery: depth of subject matter expertise across Licensing, Microsoft 365, and Azure; customer satisfaction; project management; operational excellence; and technical expertise across major SAM and Cloud Assessment platforms, including Inviso’s own r-DIA. Cross-team collaboration, training, knowledge transfer, and career opportunities are a core priority!

Inviso Fast Facts:
15+ years of Microsoft consulting experience
High employee retention, average employee tenure of 5 years
4.8 (out of 5) star rating as a Microsoft Vendor
Microsoft Gold Partner – Cloud Platform, Data Platform and Data Analytics
WW SAM&C Partner Advisory Council Member
WW SAM&C Contributor of the Year Award 2017
Gartnerrecommended SAM Managed Service Provider
BI@Microsoft Preferred Supplier, Showcase Member of the Power BI Red Carpet Partner Program"
Regional Sea Freight Procurement Head cum Product Manager-Asia Pacific,"Requirements:

Procurement
Both FCL and LCL in close cooperation with global and other regions´ product management
Rate negotiation and procurement with Ocean Carriers, Capacity Management and Product Development on key trade lanes
Focus Intra- Asia product development and procurement

Carrier Relationship
Visiting core carriers but also new contact establishment
Manage relationship with Carriers to support local, regional and global strategy
Coordination with local sea freight teams on carrier contacts

Product Activities
Product design, promotion, training, in cooperation with global and local management
FAK agreements on new routes
Margin monitoring
Ad hoc Co leader agreements

Sales Support & Communication
Visiting clients on demand together with sales
RFQ support
Market information service
Joining regional and global meetings

Qualifications:
Min. 5 years of experience in Asian Sea Freight Procurement and Product Management
Having global exposure is an advantage
Good network and rapport with carrier contacts
Exceptional verbal and written communication and people skills
Proficient in English, Bilingual in English and Chinese is an advantage
Ability and willingness to travel for meetings with prospective and existing clients

*Based in Singapore
*Reports to Regional Directors of East Asia/Oceania and China

* We live diversity and encourage collaboration between different genders, both young and old, different ethnic/religious groups and people with special needs.

With a history of over 550 years, Gebrüder Weiss is the oldest logistics company in the world - and one of the most successful. The foundation of this success? Our employees. Because we give them the freedom to find new approaches and play an active part in shaping the future - at more than 180 locations worldwide. Excellent career prospects for all people who love mobility.

WE LOOK FORWARD TO RECEIVING YOUR APPLICATION!"
.NET Developer (Global Lead),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
The .NET Developer Global Lead will be part of our regional development team that has strong experience in agile development and in-depth knowledge of digital solutions. You will work in a highly productive and collaborative team where your ideas will be listened to and put into action. This exciting opportunity would suit a .NET Developer Global Lead who is looking to move upwards and onwards and is eager to work closely with senior management on interesting and super cool ideas. You will be collaborating with the Product, Design and Business teams to develop and maintain digital solutions for our prestigious clients in public sector and large commercial enterprises.

Responsibilities
Lead a team of developers including coaching and sharing of technical knowledge
Lead the .Net specific projects and manage stakeholders
Join project teams to work on full life-cycle web/mobile application projects from requirement gathering to solutioning, development, releasing and post-launch maintenance
Work with agile cross functional, cross countries teams to design, develop, maintain web/app application base on specifications and ensure successful releases
Support Project Manager/Scrum Master to provide consultation and direction to stakeholders for managing and delivering their expectations
Be a self-starter, proactively recognise and solve issues as they arise
Be motivated in continuous learning and improvement to enhance your skills in an ever changing environment
Qualifications And Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or other relevant qualifications
We are hiring all levels of experiences of .NET-based web/app development with full-stack exposure
Minimum 10 years of programming experience
Proficient in .NET development with excellent knowledge of .NET Core 3.1 and .NET 5
Solid understanding of object-oriented programming and fundamental design principles behind a scalable application on the cloud (AWS/Azure)
Comprehensive experience and knowledge of modern development tools and technologies: Redis, Docker, Kubernetes, Infrastructure-as-code
Extensive experience and knowledge of Relational Database, SQL-query programming, microservice, ORM (Entity framework) and various architectural and design patterns (MVC, concurrency pattern, singleton pattern, etc.)
Hands-on experience on server setup and maintenance, DevOps, and experience working with Cloud Infrastructure (AWS/Azure) will be an advantage
Hands-on experience with .NET CMS platforms (Sitecore, Sitefinity, SharePoint, etc.) will be an advantage.
Following certifications will be highly considered: Azure Developer (Associate), Azure Solutions Architect (Expert), Azure DevOps Engineer (Expert), AWS Developer (Associate), AWS Solutions Architect (Professional), AWS DevOps Engineer (Professional)
English-speaking with good communication and teamwork skills
Ability to work within a fast-paced agile development environment
Candidates with extensive experience, excellent communications skills and good certifications will be considered for Team Lead/Technical Architect role
Required Technology Stack
Front-end: React JS, Angular, HTML/CSS
Middleware: IIS, Nginx, .NET Core 3.1, .NET 5
Database: MS SQL Server, PostgreSQL, MySQL, Azure SQL Database, Azure Database for PostgreSQL, Azure Database for MySQL, Amazon RDS (MS SQL/PostgreSQL/MySQL), Amazon Aurora (PostgreSQL/MySQL)
OS: Windows Server
IDE/CLI: Visual Studio 2019, Nuget, Gradle, Npm
CI/CD: Bitbucket/Gitlab, Bamboo/Jenkins, SonarQube (code quality inspection), Robot Framework (test automation)
Cloud Infrastructure: AWS, Azure
Infrastructure-as-Code: Terraform
Platform: Sitecore, Sitefinity SharePoint
NOTICE

We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. All applications will be treated with the strictest confidence.

By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have read and agreed to the terms of our Privacy Policy, and consented to us collecting, using, retaining, and disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration.

Consequences of Not Providing Personal Data for Transaction/Service/Application

Please be noted that should you not consent and provide us with the relevant personal data to fulfil the “Purposes” of collection, use and disclosure of your personal data by Decision Science Agency Pte Ltd, it may hinder our ability to continue to interact with you. We may not be able to make a decision on your recruitment and employment or comply with the law and therefore, we may not be able to make an offer of employment.

You may refer to and access our website https://www.decision-science.com/ for more information.
Desired Skills and Experience
Kubernetes, .NET, Azure, Design Patterns, Public Sector, IIS, MySQL, Agile, SQL, SharePoint, SQL Server, Angular, Docker, Entity Framework, Visual Studio, Agile Development"
Senior Project Manager,"Recruitment Agencies - thanks for your interest, but we are not interested in reviewing applicants from agencies at this time.
At IR, our vision is to make the world a smarter and easier place to live and work. We provide visibility over systems that people can’t live without – systems that allow them to conduct millions of financial transactions every day and collaborate using unified communications ecosystems and contact centres. We create software that enables organisations to use data to optimise their systems.

We are an ASX listed organisation with nearly 200 staff and servicing over 600 organisations globally including over 25% of the Global Fortune 500 companies. We live off an ethos of being solution focused, collaborative and innovative, and as we continue to grow we encourage others who are similar to join us on the journey.
About the role
We are looking for a tenacious and highly organised Senior Project Manager to join us in our Uxbridge office. Responsible for the full project life cycle of multiple projects across our product lines, you will ensure that your projects are managed to scope and budget whilst ensuring a high degree of customer satisfaction. This role will utilise your extensive negotiation and communication skills whilst also giving you the opportunity to interface with our Partners and Resellers.

Your day to day responsibilities include (but aren’t limited to):
Understand customer drivers for the project and ensure outcomes support the achievement of customer objectives;
Ensure appropriate governance is in place for the project to oversee progress and apply corrective actions;
Create and obtain sign off for the plan including objectives, scope, timeline, resources (internal and external);
Establish and update project management documents including project schedules, detailed project plans and scope statements among others;
Make recommendations for resources required to achieve project objectives in planned timeframes, and alternative approaches if internal resources not available;
Gain stakeholder buy-in and use influence to achieve project outcomes;
Provide regular communication to stakeholders (internal/external) to the project;
Manage and track day-to-day project activities and resources;
Manage project scope and obtain approval for required changes; and
Provide status reporting regarding project milestones, deliverables, dependencies, risks and issues and outcome achievement.

About you
An experienced Project Manager, you are someone who takes ownership of their role and can think outside the box if things go wrong. Holding experience in high volume software deployment projects, you will have either PMP or Prince2 certification. You are extremely customer focused and have strong interpersonal skills, as well as can identify the potential for scope creep early. Although not essential, Project Management experience in either Financial Services or Unified Communications in a vendor environment would be advantageous.

Why work for IR?
There are numerous reasons why a career with IR is the one for you. Our success at acquiring new clients means we are constantly growing and in turn providing great career opportunities for our staff. We are able to provide flexible working conditions as well as other market leading benefits. And if working in a great culture is important to you, we have a great work-life balance as well as a family oriented culture where we celebrate our successes together.

IR is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and encourages applications from eligible and qualified persons."
Network Engineer- Level -1,"Want to be a part of our team?

Performs IT functions such as design, analysis, evaluation, testing, debugging, and implementation of applications programs supporting the company infrastructure business processes and operations and/or network-based (cloud) product systems.

Analyzes, installs, acquires, modifies, and supports operating systems, databases, or utilities software. Plans, conducts, and directs the analysis of business problems with automated systems solutions. Analyzes, designs, acquires, and implements projects for LAN and/or WAN systems. Plans, designs, acquires, and implements telecommunications voice/wire systems.

At higher job levels, may contribute to the development, testing, evaluation, or design of system or infrastructure architecture used throughout the IT solution set.

Working at NTT

The MS Engineer (L1) is responsible for providing a managed service to clients to ensure that their IT infrastructure and systems remain operational through proactively identifying, investigating, and resolving technical incidents and problems and restoring service to clients by managing incidents to resolution. Their primary objective is to ensure zero missed service level agreement conditions. The MS Engineer (L1) focuses on first-line support for standard and low complexity incidents and service requests.

Key Roles and Responsibilities:
Monitors client infrastructure and solutions
Identify problems and errors prior to or when they occur
Routinely identify common incidents and opportunities for avoidance as well as general opportunities for incident reduction
Investigate first line incidents assigned and identify the root cause of incidents and problems
Fulfill approved requests following agreed procedures
Provide telephonic or chat support to clients when required
Execute approved maintenance activities including patching and configuration changes
Follow the required handover procedures for shift changes to ensure service continuity
Report and escalate incidents where necessary
Ensure the efficient and comprehensive resolutions of incidents and requests
Proactively identify opportunities for work optimization
Update existing knowledge articles or create new ones
Identify opportunities for work optimization including opportunities for automation of work, request fulfillment, incident resolution, and other general process improvement opportunities.

Knowledge, Skills, and Attributes:
Ability to communicate and work across different cultures and social groups
Ability to plan activities and projects well in advance, and takes into account possible changing circumstances
Ability to maintain a positive outlook at work
Ability to work well in a pressurized environment
Ability to work hard and put in longer hours when it is necessary
Ability to apply active listening techniques such as paraphrasing the message to confirm understanding, probing for further relevant information, and refraining from interrupting
Ability to adapt to changing circumstances
Ability to place clients at the forefront of all interactions, understanding their requirements, and creating a positive client experience throughout the total client journey

Academic Qualifications
Diploma, degree, or relevant qualification in IT/Computing (or demonstrated equivalent work experience)

Advantageous certifications:
Up to date and relevant ITIL certification (Foundation Level)
Cisco Certified Network Associate - Routing and Switching (CCNA-R/S)
Cisco Certified Network Associate - Wireless (CCNA-WL)
Riverbed Certified Solutions Associate - WAN Optimization (RCSA-W)
Cisco Certified Network Associate - Security (CCNA-SEC)
Check Point Certified Security Administrator (CCSA)
Check Point Certified Security Administrator NG with Application Intelligence (CCSA-NG AI)
VMware Certified Professional vSphere
IP, WINS, DHCP, DNC, etc
MS-Office, MS-Outlook, Symantec Backup Exec, Symantec EndPoint Protection, Symantec System Recovery, Citrix Go-To-Assist
MS-Active Directory
MS-Windows Server
MS-Windows XP Professional
MS-Windows Terminal Server
MS-Exchange Server
MS-SQL Server
MS-IIS Server
Citrix Metaframe
Switches and Routers
SonicWall Firewalls and SSL VPN Security Appliances
Cisco Firewalls and Routers
Cisco Certified Network Associate - Data Center (CCNA-DC)
MCSA+VCP, RHCE, or equivalent
Cisco Certified Network Associate - Video (CCNA-VID)
Cisco Certified Network Associate - Voice (CCNA-V)

Additional Certifications
Cisco Certified Network Professional - Routing and Switching (CCNP-R/S)
Cisco Certified Network Professional - Wireless (CCNP-W)
Cisco Certified Network Professional - Security
Check Point Certified Security Expert (CCSE)
Certified Partner SE - Security
Cisco Certified Network Professional - Data Center (CCNP-DC)
Blue Coat Certified Proxy SG Professional
Cisco Certified Network Professional - Voice (CCNP-V)

Any of the above certifications is a plus. The MS – Services Engineer (L1) is expected to gain certifications relevant to services supported. Certifications carry additional weight on a candidate’s qualification for the role.

Required Experience:
Entry-level experience or completion of the relevant intern program
Entry-level experience with troubleshooting and providing the support required in network/ data center/ systems/ storage administration and monitoring Services within a medium to large ICT organization.
Working knowledge of management agents, redundancy concepts, and products within the supported technical domain (i.e. Network, Data Center, Telephony, Exchange, Storage, Cloud, Backup, etc)

What will make you a good fit for the role?

Standard career level descriptor for job level:
Develops professional experience
Applies policy and procedures to solve variety of issues
Problems are moderate in nature
Build productive internal and external working relationships
Receives general instructions on routine work
Receives detailed instructions on new work
Typically needs a Bachelor’s or equivalent and entry or basic level experience; or an advanced or equivalent degree without experience; or equivalent work experience"
"Engr II, Manufacturing","Applies knowledge of technical principles and Edwards systems/procedures to optimize manufacturing processes.

Key Responsibilities:
Optimize manufacturing processes, including using engineering methods (e.g., SIX Sigma and LEAN methods) for continuous process improvement and/or re-design/design of equipment, tools, fixtures, etc. to improve manufacturing processes, employing technical design skills
Develop moderately complex experiments and tests (including writing and executing protocols) to qualify and validate manufacturing processes; analyze results, make recommendations, and develop reports
Analyze and resolve moderately complex Manufacturing and Compliance issues (e.g., CAPA, non-conformances, audit observations)
Develop training and documentation materials (e.g., work instructions) for production to enable the seamless knowledge transfer of project and manufacturing processes
Establish project plans to ensure deliverables are completed to customer’s expectations, using project management tools (e.g., Project Plan, Risk Analysis, etc.)
Oversee manufacturing support tasks; give instruction to technicians on conducting tests; train technicians and provide feedback; and coordinate technician work
Other incidental duties assigned by Leadership

Education and Experience:

Bachelor's Degree in Engineering or Scientific field, 2 years years experience Required or

Master's Degree or equivalent with internship, senior projects, or thesis in Engineering or Scientific field including either industry or industry/education Required

Additional Skills:
Good computer skills in usage of MS Office Suite including MS Project; CAD experience preferred (if applicable)
Good documentation, communication (e.g., written and verbal) and interpersonal relationship skills including consultative and relationship management skills
Basic understanding of statistical techniques
Previous experience working with lab/industrial equipment required (if applicable)
Solid understanding and knowledge of principles, theories, and concepts relevant to Engineering
Solid problem-solving, organizational, analytical and critical thinking skills
Solid understanding of processes and equipment used in assigned work
Knowledge of applicable FDA regulations for medical device industry
Strict attention to detail
Ability to interact professionally with all organizational levels
Ability to manage competing priorities in a fast paced environment
Must be able to work in a team environment, including the ability to manage vendors and project stakeholders
Adhere to all company rules and requirements (e.g., pandemic protocols, Environmental Health & Safety rules) and take adequate control measures in preventing injuries to themselves and others as well as to the protection of environment and prevention of pollution under their span of influence/control"
Digital Forensics and Incident Response (DFIR) Lead,"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

You will play a key role in the Government Cyber Defence (GCD) of Cyber Security Group (CSG) as Digital Forensic and Incident Response (DFIR) Analyst to manage and investigate cybersecurity incidents.

Successful candidate will be responsible for delivering three core domains, incident response, digital forensics and malware analysis, specialising in either one of the domains. Passionate about DFIR, have desire to learn and improve. Critical thinking and great communication skills are necessary for this role to convey technical concepts and advise decision makers on the best course of action. This is a key position in the Cyber Incident Response Team (CIRT) and is leading the functional team in one of the DFIR domains.

What you will be working on:

Manage the team and ensure smooth operations of daily operations
Lead a team of DFIR analysts to ensure timely response to security incidents, root cause analysis and closure of incident
Investigate cybersecurity incidents that may involve digital forensic analysis, malware analysis and log analysis
Able to provide strong technical guidance on investigation and threat assessments
Assist the team in tasks prioritisation
Assess cybersecurity threats and vulnerabilities
Ensure the test incident response playbooks and processes are maintained and updated
Maintain situational awareness and keep current with cyber security news and threat actor Tactics, Techniques and Procedures (TTPs)
Prepare and review incident reports to update stakeholders

What we are looking for:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science/Information Security or equivalent
Professional certifications, including EnCE, GCFA, GREM, GNFA, GCTI, CISSP or other relevant certifications
Preferably 4 years or more of experience as a full time incident responder/digital forensic/malware analysis or related discipline

Technical Expertise:

Understanding of operating systems and platform (e.g. Windows, Linux)
Knowledge of computer networking, LAN, and server
Ability to show proficiency in Forensic Toolkits such as Encase, FTK or Autopsy
Ability to perform basic static and dynamic malware analysis
Ability to analyse network and application logs
Good working knowledge of Cloud and Container technologies are a plus
Familiarity with good security practices

Other Requirements:

Ability to multitask, prioritise and solid attention to details
Demonstrate a high degree of integrity, initiative, energy and endurance
Willingness to learn
Experience in leading a team for at least 1 year
Possess good communication and interpersonal skills
Singapore Citizen only

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
"Reporter, Oil Products (Base Oil) – Asia Market","Description
Market Analyst/Reporter, Oil Products (Base Oil) – Asia Market

About Argus
Argus is an independent organisation with almost 1,200 staff globally. We are headquartered in London and have 28 offices in the world’s principal commodity trading and production centres. Argus produces price assessments and analysis of international energy and other commodity markets and offers bespoke consulting services and industry-leading conferences. We specialise in agriculture, crude oil, fertilisers, generation fuels, LPG, metals, oil products, petrochemicals, and vehicle emissions.
What will you be doing?
Did you know that Argus was the first Price Reporting Agency to launch domestic Group III price assessments for Base Oil?

We are looking for a driven, passionate, and resourceful market reporter/analyst to join our editorial team to cover Base Oils, these little-known yet high-value areas of the economy. Base oils are used to manufacture finished lubricants such as automotive engine oils, metal-working fluids, and greases.

This is an excellent opportunity to forge your career covering global commodities and energy. You will learn to make daily chemicals price assessments in a sector of the international market and write daily market commentaries and news. Being part of a small team also means there will be cross-training and plenty of opportunity to gain experience in other commodities markets and learn from our experienced Senior Reporters/Editors. There are opportunities to travel and present papers at industry conferences, and lead webinar sessions.

You do not need prior commodities or energy industry experience. Intelligence, curiosity, writing ability and a genuine desire to produce quality journalism are the primary qualities we look for in a diverse pool of candidates.

Monitor and assess fast-moving markets to produce daily price assessments and intelligence, market commentaries, news, analysis, and reports
Establish strong relationships with key members of the industry and business leaders through meetings and daily communications to gain an in-depth understanding of your market
Proactively generate news leads and pitch stories, contribute copy to the relevant publication and the online news service, and offer contributions to special content (blog posts, white papers, webinars, podcasts, etc.)
Collaborate with colleagues on the desk and in other teams to enhance and drive coverage
Attend meetings, conferences, and industry events to build contacts, report on news and represent Argus in the industry
Build up your industry expertise and writing skills to provide readers with first-class market insights and analysis

To learn more about the report this role covers, please click on the below link:
https://www.argusmedia.com/en/oil-products/base-oils
What we’re looking for in you
An articulate graduate with a strong degree
The ability to develop, verify and write industry-relevant news/content to deadline is preferred
Prior experience working in financial, or commodities journalism is beneficial but not essential
Excellent writing, grammar, and numeracy skills
Proficiency working with Excel and interest in further developing data skills.
Strong coordination and time management skills with the ability to work well within a team, and a keen eye for detail
Excellent communication skills with the ability to network and build contacts with industry executives
Able to work independently whilst also engaging and collaborating in line with the Argus values: Excellence, Integrity, Partnership, and Inclusivity

What’s in it for you:
Work within a highly motivated team with an industry leader and rapidly growing global company
Competitive salary and bonus in line with education, experience, and skills
Hybrid working model - Work from Home options available
Excellent location at Raffles Place – close to public transport and amenities
Group Healthcare Scheme (Comprehensive outpatient - GP and specialist, dental and hospitalisation)
20 days of annual leave
Career development and promotion from within culture
Ongoing training, mentoring and development opportunities
Employee Welfare & Employee Assistance Programme
Travel
· Cover conferences and events (5-10% of overseas travel is expected).
Hours
Monday through Friday, 10.00 a.m. to 7.00 p.m.
Earlier or later hours, or weekend hours, may be expected on occasion.
We're not engaging any recruitment agencies for this role, so if you're interested. Please apply directly.
We will conduct interviews continuously and reserve the right to take down the advertisement when we find the right candidate.

Please send in your application via our official careers website at https://www.argusmedia.com/en/careers/open-positions.
Jobs posted on other websites and that do not link to our careers website may not be legitimate and may be fraudulent. If you are contacted by someone whom you suspect may not be appropriately representing Argus, please send the details to us via an email with “Recruitment Fraud” in the subject title."
"Senior Engineer, Functional Test (West)","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Scope

Responsible for test development and support for new product introductions (NPI), legacy test equipment, continuation engineering product changes, and equipment replacement.

Essential Functions
Participate in the new product design evaluation process. Provide design for test feedback and or requirements to the product team during the design phase to assure testability and test coverage as part of the validation plan. Based on the design requirements, develop a test plan and test specification. Manage and communicate project timelines and action plans effectively to deliver cost-effective test solutions on schedule and within budget.
Mental and visual ability to independently design, develop and implement software using multiple programming languages (including C++, C#, NI TestStand or PLC, etc.) for production test equipment.
Assist in development and implementation of departmental objectives. Help implement production and test strategies to meet financial objectives. Maintain and track project financials and timelines to meet the assigned project deliverables.
Responsible for design of electrical circuitry, properly sizing components and working with vendors to develop test fixtures. Selects proper test strategies based on test coverage requirements to ensure a safe, reliable, manufacturing test solution
Create and release documentation on all aspects of the test solution:

▪ Manufacturing Test Plan

▪ Test specification

▪ Test coverage

▪ Test Procedures
Demonstrate use of appropriate Lean Six Sigma tools for test equipment qualification, test system problem solving, and identification and implementation of continuous improvement opportunities.
Experience And Education
Bachelor's degree Electrical Engineering (EE), Electrical Engineering Technology (EET), Electrical Engineering/Computer Science (EE/CS), equivalent education, or experience.
5+ years’ experience as a test engineer contributor in a team oriented project environment, including design and development of test equipment for production.
Experience developing and implementing software using languages or platforms such as C, C++, C#, NI Test Stand, etc. a plus
Candidate must have the ability to read and interpret new product designs consisting of electronic circuit schematics and bills of materials (BOM).
Knowledge of electronic hardware.
Excellent troubleshooting, analysis, and problem solving skills.
Good written and verbal communications in English.
Proficient using Microsoft Office programs.
Some travel is required, typically up to 10%.
Only shortlisted candidates will be notified. Thank you for applying.

EnviroDynamics Solutions Pte Ltd

Lim Pei Ying, April

Reg. No: R22110702

EA License No.: 12C6285
Desired Skills and Experience
Test Equipment, Product Design, Financials, Capital Equipment, Test Cases, PLC, Procurement, JIRA, Equipment Qualification, C#, Test Development, Electrical Engineering, C++, Lean Six Sigma"
Project Manager,"Scope

Ensure successful delivery of project scope and targets while managing project risk, quality, delivery, scope, schedule, and budget
Plan, lead and implementation of Dyson Estate core projects
Engage internal stakeholders in understanding and defining the project requirements and timeline.
Develop full scale project schedule and in engaging third party contractors for RFP
Engage internal stakeholders in project design, implementation and testing& commissioning phases
Manage and coordinate internal stakeholders, project staff and third-party contractors
Manage project budget and resource allocation
Track and report project progress to relevant stakeholders
Manage and ensuring project change request are evaluated, documented, and agreed by all relevant stakeholders
Ensure due diligence in follow-up with internal and external dependencies in ensuring relevant documentation, consultation (regulatory and non-regulatory) has been obtained prior to the start of the project phase
Review, validate and consolidation of documentation (RFP, equipment manual, material spec sheets, PID, regulatory submission etc) throughout the entire project phase.
Assist with the technical evaluation of relevant vendors/contractors in supporting the project
Monitor and maintain housekeeping standards and compliance to any PPE requirements
Perform any other requirements as assigned by supervisor
Requirements

Relevant working experience in manufacturing sectors in Semiconductor/Electronic, Petrochemical or Pharmaceutical industry preferred
Minimum 10 years of experience as project manager
Degree/Diploma in Mechanical Engineering
Willing to work cross sites within Singapore
Able to execute and manage several projects in parallel
Good understanding on Mechanical System such as Chiller Plant, ACMV, Process Vacuum, Compressed Dry Air and Boiler will be good advantage
Good knowledge in basic electrical knowledge and reading of single line diagram
Good knowledge in basic local regulatory requirement
Experience in equipment hook up and move-in
Great understanding of all disciplines of project management
Experience in stakeholder management
Experience with vendor/contractor management and budget control
Excellent track record of project delivery (delivered on-time, met project requirements and cost efficiency)
Detail oriented, able to provide solutions to complex problems
Good interpersonal and communication skills
Proficient in MS package (Microsoft Word, Excel, and PowerPoint)

Dyson is an equal opportunity employer. We know that great minds don’t think alike, and it takes all kinds of minds to make our technology so unique. We welcome applications from all backgrounds and employment decisions are made without regard to race, colour, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other any other dimension of diversity."
Outsource Project Manager,"Job description:

Key Responsibilities:

Supports the customer in the delivery, management and control of all systems integration related activities with the OEMs
Supports the program in the management, control of requirements
Supports the program in the testing and acceptance activities.


Key Requirements:

Minimum Degree in relevant IT or Engineering studies.
A minimum of 3 years’ work experience with outsourced projects, budgeting, and collaboration with external partners
Strong knowledge of project management tools and methodologies, including PMP, Scrum and Agile
In-depth understanding of project life cycle"
"iOS Engineer (Real Time Communication), TikTok","Responsibilities

TikTok RTC is the world's leading real-time communications service, providing instant and high-quality multimedia interactions to customers around the world. We are building next-generation audio/video processing and interaction platforms to deliver high-volume, low-latency and rich Cloud as a Service technology.

Our popular products are empowered by our cutting-edge RTC technology. Working in this team, you will have the opportunity to meet the challenges of advanced audio/video algorithm design and global large-scale real-time communications interaction, while improving your skills in encoding, algorithms, data by working with many outstanding real-time communications professionals. Expertise in analytics and large-scale system design.

Responsibilities
1. Responsible for researching and developing real-time communication SDK on iOS with high-quality code.
2. Responsible for the design and development of RTC solutions for TikTok.
3. Responsible for optimising connectivity index, performance, stability, and audio & video quality to improve user experiences.
4. Continuously tracking and learning new technologies and new architectures.
5. Willing to challenge and resolve difficult technical problems.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor's degree or above with experience in iOS development.
2. Proficient in Objective-C, familiar with C/C++, solid knowledge of multi-threading, data structure, operating system and network.
3. Familiar with iOS system architecture and audio & video multimedia client development.
4. Good learning ability, communication ability, logical thinking ability, and innovation ability.
5. Experience in live streaming, co-host, player SDK, and video conference is preferred.
6. Experience in ffmpeg, x264, WebRTC, etc. is preferred."
IT Support Engineer,"What We Do
Time Research is a quantitative trading firm that utilizes a diversified portfolio of systematic and quantitative strategies across financial markets to achieve high quality, uncorrelated returns. We were founded by a team of traditional and crypto trading veterans with an average daily trading volume of over $1B USD, and pride ourselves in maintaining a low profile to focus on what we do best.

We have deep expertise in trading, technology and operations, and attribute our success to rigorous scientific research. As a technology and research-driven firm, we design and build our own cutting-edge systems: from high performance trading, large scale data analysis to compute farms.

With increasing business demand, we strive for ways to do things better and faster. We are looking for strong talent with a can-do attitude, who are passionate in using technology to solve complex problems in a fast growing and dynamic digital asset space.

What You Will Do
Provide technical support for user desktops and laptop setup for onsite and remote users (Windows, IOS)
Design and implement in-house system improvements, endpoint management and security, SaaS administration, and access management etc.
Basic troubleshooting of network issues in Windows domain environment (TCP/IP, Active Directory, Wireless AP, Firewall, Router, Switch)
Conduct new hire orientation and provide training to users
Corporate email setup and administration (Exchange server, Outlook, Mobile ActiveSync)
Responsible for work device purchases, maintain inventory and liaise with vendors
Support the setup of network infrastructure
Other ad hoc duties as required

Who You Are
Minimum 5 years of experience in an IT Support or Systems Engineering role
University degree required; degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or a related discipline is preferred
Candidate must be based in Singapore and does not require visa sponsorship
In-depth knowledge of computer hardware, software, and both Windows and Mac operating systems
Understanding of TCP/IP, IP address and LAN technology including switching and routing fundamentals
Hands-on experience in managing Google Workspace, Atlassian and Slack
Good knowledge of MDM and IAM tools
Proactive, enthusiastic and willingness to learn in a fluid and fast-paced environment
Good interpersonal and communication skills to interact effectively at all levels
Written and spoken language proficiency in English and Mandarin to handle queries from counterparts across different regions

Why Join Us
Competitive remuneration package and benefits
Fast paced and result-oriented environment with a flat hierarchy
Excellent exposure to the crypto ecosystem and the latest market insight
Collaborative teams in an energetic and casual working environment
Flexible but hard working and meritocratic culture where accomplishments are rewarded
Great career development opportunities and international mobility"
Business Analyst,"Works collaboratively with clients and stakeholders - both external and internal to the company - to research and elicit, analyze, validate and document business requirements, and to ensure that those requirements clearly reflect true business needs, correctly representing all stakeholders. Translates business needs into system/ application requirements and project components to help determine solutions to business problems. Assists team members in producing functional requirements for tool development. Proactively identifies and manages changes to requirements and identify risks for the company’s clients. Effectively manages client’s expectations. Applies industry and information technology expertise to support proposals, feasibility studies, implementations and new business development.

Formulate and define system scope and objectives using knowledge of information technology and industry knowledge/ requirements
Act as a liaison between client and technical solutions/ support groups, using strong communication skills to elicit, document, analyze and validate business processes, systems, and solution requirements
Research, identify, and specify solutions to problems
Support and conduct visualization, user experience and configuration elements of solution design
Document requirements specifications using high-maturity methods, processes and tools
Support requirements management and change management processes
Support aspects of the business cycle, including proposals, feasibility studies, and implementations
Consider the business implications of the application of technology to the current business environment
Typically a Bachelor's degree in a technical or business discipline or equivalent experience
Minimum of 2 years of related experience or a Master's degree and up to two years of experience
2 or more years experience
Essential: requirements determination using structured techniques for documentation, analysis, evaluation/ validation; decomposition of high- level information into details; abstracting low- level information; distinguishing requests vs needs; distinguishing requirements vs. solutions; classifying/ prioritizing requirements; requirements change management and traceability; identifying risks; applying creativity to solving complex problems; building relationships and working collaboratively; effective verbal/ written communication; experience in an industry domain
Specialized: developing structured user manuals and training; business rules modeling; develop and executing acceptance test plans"
Data Scientist - Computer Vision (Risk Management),"Binance is the global blockchain company behind the world’s largest digital asset exchange by trading volume and users, serving a greater mission to accelerate cryptocurrency adoption and increase the freedom of money.

Are you looking to be a part of the most influential company in the blockchain industry and contribute to the crypto-currency revolution that is changing the world?

Data driven based business is the core in helping to use cloud native platform to serve tens of millions of crypto-currency users. Engineers and Data Scientists across the company use the data platform to do interesting and impactful analysis for continuous innovations.

As a data scientist, you will have the opportunity to leverage rich data (PB-level scalability) and state-of-art machine learning infrastructure to develop data products which are used by our tens of millions of crypto-currency users.

You will collaborate with a strong team of engineers, data analysts, business operation and product/marketing managers to define and build solutions, features, algorithms and products based off our rich data and cutting-edge machine learning technology.

Responsibilities

Develop CV/ML models and algorithms for solving KYC and other general image tasks
Conduct cutting-edge research for improving performance and efficiency of current solutions
Collaborate with backend engineer, strategist, and reviewer to build up the whole service pipeline

Requirements

B.E/M.E in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or a related areas
Experience and exposure on Advanced Computer Vision, Image recognition, retrieval, detection, synthesis, OCR and etc.
Solid experiences in Python and SQL
Self-driven, innovative, collaborative, with good communication and presentation skills
Knowledge of KYC process is a plus

Working at Binance

Do something meaningful; Be a part of the future of finance technology and the no.1 company in the industry
Fast moving, challenging and unique business problems
International work environment and flat organisation
Great career development opportunities in a growing company
Possibility for relocation and international transfers mid-career
Competitive salary
Flexible working hours, Casual work attire

By submitting a job application, you confirm that you have read and agree to our Candidate Privacy Notice ."
Full-Stack Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Our client is a Venture Capital backed, well-funded SaaS startup in Singapore. They are looking for a Software Engineer who wants to be deeply involved in the end-to-end delivery of a new software product.

Responsibilities
Develop and deploy software systems that iteratively deliver business value across both back-end and front-end
Derive and implement non-functional requirements based on interactions with the product and business elements
Establish best practices for developing processes, technologies, coding practices and architectures
Maintain a DevOps culture and an Agile product development mindset in the technical team
Write and maintain unit tests to ensure robustness of the product
Debug and fix code based on customer incident reports and on errors found through internal testing
Assist in maintaining software infrastructure and ensure optimal availability of products / services
Assist in maintaining and upgrading the software architecture as new services are added to ensure ease of long-term development
Qualifications
2-6 years of experience in frontend and backend programming development
Experienced in using an Agile methodology / operating with a DevOps culture
Strong analytical mindset, attention to details, and critical thinking; entrepreneurial and solution-oriented
Strong team player with good communication and leadership skills
Experience in software architecture design and software infrastructure is a plus
Experience with high scalability SaaS systems built with microservices is a plus
What's next?

If you're interested in this role, click Apply or drop an email to don@adstifysearch.com

Don Chan

Senior Consultant

EA Personnel Number: R1763146

EA License Number: 20C0292
Desired Skills and Experience
CSS, Scalability, Critical Thinking, Venture Capital, Agile, JavaScript, Agile Methodology, Attention to Details, Architecture Design, SaaS, Team Player, Product Development, Java, API"
Developer/Consultant - Axiom,"Responsibilities

Handle requirements gathering and writing requirement documents, design and development using Axiom Controller View.
Handle Application analysis, design, development, integration, enhancement, as well as complex support issues.
Handle Production support of AXIOM applications.
Create and execute workflows and calling Axiom workflows from Schedulers

Skills Requirement

5 to 8 years of development experience in Axiom
Expertise in debugging and development of various objects in Controller view
Familiarity in Modify Model.
Familiarity in Database connectivity from Axiom
Excellent Data Analysis skills
Experience in Registry reporting is an addon
Knowledge on REVELEUS application (OFSAA)
Exposure in Risk Analytics area and BASEL is good to have.
A self-starter, comfortable dealing with clients with very strong communication skills."
Operations Engineer (Jurong Island),"Air Liquide Singapore

Headquartered in Paris, France, Air Liquide Singapore Private Limited (ALSg) is the largest and leading industrial gas company in South-east Asia. ALSg employs 800 people recognized for their high level of expertise to provide gases, equipment, services and packaged solutions to support the requirements of the Singapore manufacturing industry. With assets of more than S$1 billion, ALSg operates the largest network of air separation plants and gas production facilities dedicated to serving the different industries in Singapore. Strategically located on more than 20 sites in Singapore, our complete range of gases, which are produced under stringent quality control, are used in a wide variety of applications.

About Business Line
https://sg.airliquide.com/

Job Highlights
Career Development Opportunities
Attractive Remuneration & Benefits
Positive and Harmony Working Culture

Work Location
Jurong Island (Company transport is provided at Jurong East MRT.)


How Will You Be Contributing to Our Success?

Achieve process optimization and ensure smooth operations of gas plant/supply systems to meet customers’ requirements.
Collaborate closely with our regional technical teams to identify and implement efficiency and smart operation projects to achieve Company Climate Change ambitions.
Manage day to day operations, HSE , Quality, Process Safety and team performance in accordance with plant procedures and standards.
Review, update documents and implement changes required by the Company, local regulatory, corporate safety and industrial standards.
Train and qualify operational staff in accordance with plant procedures and standards.
Participate / lead in tool-box / safety meetings, audits and prepare monthly reports.
Participate as a company emergency response team member.


Who Are We Looking For?

Degree in Chemical Engineering or equivalent.
Minimum five years’ relevant experience in petrochemical/gas or related industry with chemical process related operations/process and DCS panel operation experience.
Strong leadership, analytical, troubleshooting and problem solving skills.
Able to commit to irregular working hours.
Good Communication and Presentation skills.
Experience in DCS Programming and Data analysis Skill will be advantageous.
**We thank you for your interest in Air Liquide. Interested applicants are encouraged to send in a detailed resume, including reasons for leaving for past employment. Please be informed that only shortlisted candidates would be notified.**"
Institution Business Analyst (IBA),"Position Overview

Institution Business Analyst’s key role is to serve as a catalyst to transform business needs into actionable plans to improve the process or operations. This includes defining and developing business technology strategy with IT and business divisions, requirements management, solution discovery, service management, risk management and relationship management.

He/She will,

serve as the link between business units and IT at the Chiefs and working levels during the full Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
co-develop business requirements specifications with the business users and provide guidance and recommendation in “ IT solution for new system implementation and system enhancements.
provide guidance to the business users in translating use cases, business process, scenario and rules, information flow, User Interface mockups into specifications.
communicate with system owners, business users and stakeholders on priorities and rationalise their requests, projects, budgets and IT initiatives.
provide support in delivering technology product that meet the needs of the business.
facilitate the investment and high level planning process and execution of IT initiatives through the use of technology.

He/She will need to

strive to understand business processes, challenges, including user’s priorities, issues and the technical challenges to reach a consensus.
be proactive and anticipatory in their thinking.
be driven and provide significant value to business units.

Role & Responsibilities

Act as key liaison across all functional areas, including business units, the information technology division, and outside vendor.
Process a broad knowledge of most technical and business resources and use them to effectively coordinate team members and external resources.
Participate in field research in pursuit of new solutions; including off-the-shelf products and to evaluate the applicability and usefulness of current solutions.
Collaborate with architecture and operations team to ensure solution compatibility with company standards.
Collaborate with management and technical delivery team to develop annual budgets for respective business areas.
Collaborate with business users and technical delivery team to secure funding for IT solution implementation.
Participate in strategic and budgetary planning processes, prepare and administer work unit operating budget; provide recommendations on desired goals and implement new/revised programs according to established guidelines.
Identify, screen and evaluate new solution opportunities to address unmet (internal and external) user needs.
Responsible for the development and implementation of solution and to ensure successful introduction of IT solution across the organization and with business units.
Develop solution concept, business case and preparation of proposals for IT investments on new system, system enhancements and/or operational changes.
Perform business analysis and prepare recommendations and business plan as needed.
Create and analyze relevant information and develop recommendations to senior management.
Create consensus with other functions as to the timing of solution introductions and withdrawals.
Collaborate with Project Management Office on the project initiation and prioritization of projects across the organization.
Oversee the launch of solution and help to maximize the positive impact on the organization.
Provide secretariat support for management meeting, e.g. monthly Pillar meeting.

Requirements

Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science/Engineering
3 to 8 years of IT and business or healthcare (added advantage) work experience; with 3-5 years in project management and implementations.
Experience in engaging, facilitating and managing workgroup sessions.
Ability to understand business operation, including their drivers for success, process and approaches and propose creative and practical solutions to address their business challenges.
Excellent communication skills – both written and verbal
Excellent active listening skills
Able to communicate and articulate business objective and deliverables in a clear and concise manner to different target audience
Able to effectively present the proposed solution to the stakeholders and business units
Able to rationalize processes and suggest improvements or workarounds
Able to influence others and move toward a common vision or goal
Establish and maintain strong relationships with stakeholders
Flair in problem solving and root cause identification skills
Possess strong analytical skills, including an understanding of business domain and financial resources
Able to engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously
Good interpersonal skills with the ability to work well with groups from diverse disciplines

Apply Now

NOTE: It only takes a few minutes to apply for a meaningful career in HealthTech - GO FOR IT!!"
Technical Project Manager,"Key Responsibilities

Helps to prepare project plan and coordinates project activities from planning to implementation. Maintain matrix for process improvements.

Coordinates project schedule and task details and helps to prepare reports, tracking charts, checklist and project scheduling.

Helps to align the progress of resources internal to the business unit to meet project on-time and budget performance objectives.

Tracks projects cost schedule for internal and external customers.

On occasion will interface with external suppliers and monitor and report on the projects progress against quality and cost metrics.

Interfaces with internal customers and reports on progress against project objectives.

Functional Knowledge

Demonstrates expanded conceptual knowledge in own discipline and broadens capabilities

Business Expertise

Understands key business drivers; uses this understanding to accomplish own work

Leadership

No supervisory responsibilities but provides informal guidance to new team members

Problem Solving

Solves problems in straightforward situations; analyzes possible solutions using technical experience and judgment and precedents

Impact

Impacts quality of own work and the work of others on the team; works within guidelines and policies

Interpersonal Skills

Explains complex information to others in straightforward situations

Qualifications

Education:

Bachelor's Degree

Skills

Certifications:

Languages:

Years of Experience:

4 - 7 Years

Work Experience:

Additional Information

Travel:

No

Relocation Eligible:

No

Applied Materials is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law."
Product Manager,"【About Ruijie Network】
Ruijie Networks(stock code:002396) is one of the world leading network solution suppliers. Ruijie Networks has 50+ branches with sales and service covering Asia, Europe, North America, and South America. Currently, we have more than 6,000 employees, including 3,000 R&D engineers in 7 R&D centers around the world. Ruijie Networks is the only company of data communication to be certified as an innovative enterprise in China. Each year, over 15% of sales income is invested in R&D, and over 30% of R&D funds in high-tech pre-research. In the network economy era, we believe that each progress in network technology changes our life, career, and education.

【What You'll Be Doing】
l You will become a recognized authority on strategy and planning of enterprise WLAN networking solutions based on region and industry.
l You will help develop and drive strategy and direction, including creating high-level and detailed presentations.
l You will collaborate with engineering, sales, marketing and fellow product managers to define next-generation product capabilities and strategies by domain and industry.
l You will focus on:
Orchestrate solutions and products that deliver customer value and differentiated capabilities in different fields
A solution-first mentality that tightly integrates hardware, software, and other building blocks inside and outside Ruijie to drive “better collaboration” outcomes
Grow our orchestration portfolio to become the foundation of our next-generation WLAN campuses and architectures.
l You will engage with and drive direct engagement with clients.
l You'll leverage industry insight and product knowledge to drive third-party integrations.
l You will network and build relationships with Ruijie's senior management and internal stakeholders as well as strategic partners.

【What We're Looking For】
Skillsets Required
In-depth research on enterprise wireless LAN market space.
In-depth understanding of enterprise wireless LAN software and system architecture.
Understand enterprise wireless LAN and campus workflows.
Good business instincts can thrive in a fast-paced environment where there are opportunities for disruption and growth.
Deal with the uncertainty and flexibility of change to drive the right decisions about your products and the broader enterprise WLAN portfolio.
Education And Experience Required
You are a proactive product management professional with 5+ years of enterprise WLAN/product management experience.
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or equivalent.
Your broad team skills and ability to drive/influence the work of others cross-functionally can guide teams to achieve results on complex, ambiguous projects.
Preferably have more than 5 years of industry experience.

【What We're Offering】
If this sounds like an interesting opportunity, hit apply!
Ruijie Network is an equal opportunity employer and we value diversity in all forms. We are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees and believe such an environment is critical for success. Employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need."
.NET Developer - Hire & Train Program,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Are you looking to start your career as a .NET Developer?

A growing number of companies are hiring Developers, and other technology workers who use technical skills to leverage the power of technology within their organizations.

This hire and train program will expose you in working with industry experts across top MNC Companies. It will cover every concept through hands on training, live projects, practical approaches and many more. Some of the .NET Developer skills that you can expect to learn are C#, ASP or VB.net.

What is Hire and Train Program?

Shortlisted candidates have to go for 6 to 8 weeks virtual classroom training. (You will receive a stipend during training period)

After completion of training, you will be assigned to a Project in which you will have to use the technology stack you have learned during your training period.

Evaluation will be done by presenting the assigned Project, and you should be able to showcase all skills you have acquired.

If you are successful, you will be deployed to work with our MNC client.

What is the minimum requirement to join this Program?
Educational Background in Information Technology/Infocomm/Software/Computer Science or any related field
Good communication skills
Basic programming skills is a plus
Willingness to be trained, and commitment to learn .NET
Interested Candidates may send their resume and cover letter directly to Hibah.bakhtavar@manpower.com.sg ,stating the position as the subject title in the email.

Hibah Bakhtavar | EA License No. 02C3423 | Personnel Registration No. R21103109
Desired Skills and Experience
ASPNet, CSS, Classroom, .NET, HTML, MySQL, HTML5, Information Technology, Good Communication Skills, ASP, SQL Server, Python, Vbnet, Angular, C#, API, Databases, Linux, C++"
Regional Sea Freight Procurement Head cum Product Manager-Asia Pacific,"Requirements:

Procurement
Both FCL and LCL in close cooperation with global and other regions´ product management
Rate negotiation and procurement with Ocean Carriers, Capacity Management and Product Development on key trade lanes
Focus Intra- Asia product development and procurement

Carrier Relationship
Visiting core carriers but also new contact establishment
Manage relationship with Carriers to support local, regional and global strategy
Coordination with local sea freight teams on carrier contacts

Product Activities
Product design, promotion, training, in cooperation with global and local management
FAK agreements on new routes
Margin monitoring
Ad hoc Co leader agreements

Sales Support & Communication
Visiting clients on demand together with sales
RFQ support
Market information service
Joining regional and global meetings

Qualifications:
Min. 5 years of experience in Asian Sea Freight Procurement and Product Management
Having global exposure is an advantage
Good network and rapport with carrier contacts
Exceptional verbal and written communication and people skills
Proficient in English, Bilingual in English and Chinese is an advantage
Ability and willingness to travel for meetings with prospective and existing clients

*Based in Singapore
*Reports to Regional Directors of East Asia/Oceania and China

* We live diversity and encourage collaboration between different genders, both young and old, different ethnic/religious groups and people with special needs.

With a history of over 550 years, Gebrüder Weiss is the oldest logistics company in the world - and one of the most successful. The foundation of this success? Our employees. Because we give them the freedom to find new approaches and play an active part in shaping the future - at more than 180 locations worldwide. Excellent career prospects for all people who love mobility.

WE LOOK FORWARD TO RECEIVING YOUR APPLICATION!"
Graduate-EN,"As Graduate, Engineer Field Ops , you will assure SITA's competitive strength and business growth through the provision of the highest quality technical field services to SITA customers in airports and at their premises and by actively seeking new field service revenue opportunities locally.

Perform all field services activities according to SITA standards and procedures, maximizing customer satisfaction by the delivery of first class on-site field maintenance and support activities. To manage and assist the field services team to ensure service delivery quality is maintained through direct assistance in implementing and improving working processes and procedures.

Roles performed in the context of Internal Desktop vary slightly in the sense that the main customers are Internal at SITA, specific Airline/Airport experience is not necessary, and that there are no specific billing responsibilities. For the technical competencies, only a high level knowledge of LAN Protocol Troubleshooting, WAN Troubleshooting, and LAN Equipment Configuration is necessary and knowledge/experience on specific tools is not required.

The roles are subject to following policy and procedure and will be responsible at country level only.

The world is changing. Are you ready to define with future of travel with us?

What You Will Do

Provide field operations support to internal and external customers in accordance with the terms of the customer contract and Service Level Agreements (SLAs).
To ensure the correct functioning and maintenance of all internal and external customer IT equipment and services.
When required, perform onsite interventions as a result of a Service Desk request as soon as possible, and within the terms of the customer contract and SLAs.
When required, act as the customer SPOC and co-ordinate the scheduling of the onsite intervention with Customer's, internal resolver groups, and the Service Desk ensuring the highest level of customer services and communications are maintained to resolve the fault and incident within the prescribed SLA.
Carry out site surveys for new customer premises for preparation for new product and services installation under the guidance of senior team members.
Ensure that all staff adheres to installation guidelines and industry best practices in order to deliver quality Field Operations.
Ensure that all staff use the appropriate tools and equipment to perform the installation, intervention, and repairs in accordance with the Field Operations guidelines and instructions where provided.
Reporting and escalating all observed problems to proper SITA operational escalation points.
Carry out preventive maintenance of equipment in accordance with agreed schedules and to manufacturer specifications.
Report on the monthly performance of the workshop and provide feedback to the Global Operations regional management teams.
To ensure the field services team adheres to the highest working standards for all interventions and repair targets by providing guidance, support and direct management.
Perform tests on hardware and software components and be responsible for the co-ordination of local acceptance testing with Customers and 3rd parties.
Ensure that all the required Field Service data is provided and recorded in the correct fields in the SITA Service Hub record for all assigned Incidents & Change Orders.
Support Management on escalated issues, as and when required.
In the support of the performance management process, provide personal feedback on performance of co-workers to the Lead Engineer.

Who You Are

A passion for the aviation industry, and a curiosity to understand how IT solutions deployed at airports make life for travellers more convenient
Keen to pursue Field Operation as a career
Enthusiasm and a willingness to learn
Positive, hardworking, resourceful, critical thinking and problem-solving worker with good communication skills.
Possess relevant degree qualifications in ICT, Computer Science, Information Systems (IS), IS Security or related disciplines

What You Can Expect

Get assigned to a Buddy and a Mentor that will guide you throughout your Graduate experience.
Be a part of a Graduate community – both local and global.
Have access to both Technical and soft skills development training.

What We Offer

SITA’s workplace is all about diversity many different countries and cultures are represented in our workforce, and colleagues who’ve been working here for decades collaborate with those just out of college and early in their careers. SITA is a place of change and constant improvement, where we're always pushing ourselves to find better ways of doing things smarter, quicker, easier, for us and our customers and for their customers too.

And we offer all the good stuff you’d expect like holidays, bonus, flexible benefits, medical policy, pension plan and access to world class learning.

Welcome to SITA

SITA is the world’s leading specialist in air transport communications and information technology. We don’t just connect the global aviation industry. We apply decades of experience and expertise to address almost every core business, operational, baggage, and passenger process in air transport.

We design, build, and support technology solutions all with one vision to create easy air travel every step of the way. As an organization, we cover 95% of all international air travel destinations and work with over 2,800 air transport and government customers in every corner of the globe. Are you ready to explore the opportunities?

In case of issues with uploading your CV or accessing the application system, please contact us @ careers@sita.aero

Profession

Graduates

Work Location

Asia Pacific-Singapore-Singapore

Schedule

Full-time

Job Posting

Oct 13, 2022, 53935 AM"
Principal Analyst Developer,"Who We're Looking For

We are looking for an experience analyst developer with strong knowledge on design patterns such as microservices and Python development in designing and delivering technology solutions across Data & Regulations and Low Code platforms technology stack. You will lead and contribute to all aspects of solution design, technical development, testing and implementation of high quality and performance platforms that are easy to maintain and extend. You are passionate about technology and building dynamic solutions that enable agility and create value to our business stakeholders in Operations that allows them to have that competitive advantage in this evolving landscape.

You will need to be technically competent and analytical with the ability to understand business challenges to deliver the right solution to them. You are a team player and will work closely with the different agile teams under APAC Technology, Global Operations Innovation and Global Technology across London on development/solution engagement.

About Schroders

We’re a global investment manager managing over £700 billion of clients’ assets. We help institutions, intermediaries and individuals around the world invest money to meet their goals, fulfil their ambitions, and prepare for the future.

We have around 5500 people on six continents. And we’ve been around for over 200 years but keep adapting as society and technology changes. What doesn’t change is our commitment to helping our clients, and society, prosper. We take immense pride in our culture and our reputation of being an employer of choice. It’s important to us that our people feel valued, included, and supported in their professional and personal growth.

By promoting flexible working, championing inclusion, and making health and wellbeing a priority, we have created the conditions for our people to thrive.

The base

The role will be based in our APAC Regional hub in Singapore and will be part of the APAC Operations Technology Delivery team.

The team

APAC Operations Technology team supports the Operations Regional hubs operating out of Singapore, which has a footprint coverage of 7 countries – Singapore, Hong Kong, Japan, Korea, China, Taiwan, Indonesia, and Australia) and covers Fund Operations operating out of Hong Kong. The team works closely with the regional business to deliver solutions to service their local demands whilst supporting and collaborating with the global business and technology teams on delivering strategic programmes where required.

Operations Technology team is at the cusp of exciting technology changes within Schroders. We are pivoting our applications to cloud, re-modernizing the Technology Stack and building up our low-code capability to further drive operational efficiency. The technology stack includes in-house solutions to Saas and Vendor-based platforms such as Aladdin, Outsystem, Xceptor, Symphony etc. We want talented people that can be part of this journey as we expand our capabilities and to deliver innovative solutions through continuous improvements. You will work in a vibrant environment, with ample opportunities to collaborate/partner with global technology teams to work on global programmes and initiatives.

What You'll Do
Work on day-to-day software development
Develop solutions with a cloud first approach
Demonstrate an interest in expanding both financial and technical knowledge proactively.
Work closely with Engineering lead to implement the Operations Technology roadmap.
Work closely with Delivery lead to prioritize backlog and ensure technical debts are being tracked, logged, and mitigated in a timely manner.
Lead in all aspects of software delivery in terms of design, development, testing and implementation.
Responsible for ensuring agile team work to continuously improve on how they develop applications to be easy on maintenance and extendable
Responsible in supporting the agile teams in terms of providing technical guidance, conducting code reviewing, ensuring adherence to software standards and policies, and mentoring the junior developers where required
Contribute to agile planning and ceremonies including story refinement, system demos, and retrospectives
Contribute to Enterprise Engineering community through discussion on technology trends, innovative ideas and sharing of solutions to common issues
Perform the role of Scrum Master for the agile team if required to do so.
Provide 3rd line production support and where required across London time zone for global applications
The Knowledge, Experience, And Qualifications You Need
Minimum 5 years of software development experience working on either React & Node JS for front-end UI or .Net for backend programming languages
Minimum 2 years of experience on python programing
Experience working on SQL or NoSQL database technologies
Proven knowledge in implementing design patterns using microservices or others
What Will Be Good To Have
Experience working in a financial services industry
Knowledge on working market data and platforms such as Bloomberg, Refinitiv, MEDM, Factset, etc
Knowledge on low code platform such as Xceptor, Outsystem or similar platforms
Knowledge on Denodo, Snowflake and other data cloud technologies
Knowledge on shift-left testing and usage of test automation tool
Exposure on cloud applications and platform e.g Azure or AWS is a plus
Knowledge of Dev Ops and methodologies and tools using GIT, CI/CD
What You'll Be Like
Organized, self-motivated with a good level of energy
Team oriented and enjoys collaborating with others
Strong problem solver and willing to challenge status quo
Excellent communicator in both verbal and written form
Able to articulate and present technical solutions in clear, concise way to stakeholders
Flexible and willing to learn
Friendly, approachable and able to work in global settings
Able to work under pressure, on several priorities at once, and with tight deadlines
We're Looking For The Best, Whoever They Are

Schroders is an equal opportunities employer. You're welcome here whatever your socio-economic background, race, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, religious belief, age or disability.

SIN01800"
"Engr II, Manufacturing","Applies knowledge of technical principles and Edwards systems/procedures to optimize manufacturing processes.

Key Responsibilities:
Optimize manufacturing processes, including using engineering methods (e.g., SIX Sigma and LEAN methods) for continuous process improvement and/or re-design/design of equipment, tools, fixtures, etc. to improve manufacturing processes, employing technical design skills
Develop moderately complex experiments and tests (including writing and executing protocols) to qualify and validate manufacturing processes; analyze results, make recommendations, and develop reports
Analyze and resolve moderately complex Manufacturing and Compliance issues (e.g., CAPA, non-conformances, audit observations)
Develop training and documentation materials (e.g., work instructions) for production to enable the seamless knowledge transfer of project and manufacturing processes
Establish project plans to ensure deliverables are completed to customer’s expectations, using project management tools (e.g., Project Plan, Risk Analysis, etc.)
Oversee manufacturing support tasks; give instruction to technicians on conducting tests; train technicians and provide feedback; and coordinate technician work
Other incidental duties assigned by Leadership

Education and Experience:

Bachelor's Degree in Engineering or Scientific field, 2 years years experience Required or

Master's Degree or equivalent with internship, senior projects, or thesis in Engineering or Scientific field including either industry or industry/education Required

Additional Skills:
Good computer skills in usage of MS Office Suite including MS Project; CAD experience preferred (if applicable)
Good documentation, communication (e.g., written and verbal) and interpersonal relationship skills including consultative and relationship management skills
Basic understanding of statistical techniques
Previous experience working with lab/industrial equipment required (if applicable)
Solid understanding and knowledge of principles, theories, and concepts relevant to Engineering
Solid problem-solving, organizational, analytical and critical thinking skills
Solid understanding of processes and equipment used in assigned work
Knowledge of applicable FDA regulations for medical device industry
Strict attention to detail
Ability to interact professionally with all organizational levels
Ability to manage competing priorities in a fast paced environment
Must be able to work in a team environment, including the ability to manage vendors and project stakeholders
Adhere to all company rules and requirements (e.g., pandemic protocols, Environmental Health & Safety rules) and take adequate control measures in preventing injuries to themselves and others as well as to the protection of environment and prevention of pollution under their span of influence/control"
Intern - PIE,"Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.

Join an inclusive team passionate about one thing: using their expertise in the relentless pursuit of innovation for customers and partners. The solutions we build help make everything from virtual reality experiences to breakthroughs in neural networks possible. We do it all while committing to integrity, sustainability, and giving back to our communities. Because doing so can fuel the very innovation we are pursuing.

JR33546 Intern - PIE

Description: Real-Time Defect Analysis department plays a critical role in Yield Improvement Program by driving baseline defect reduction program and ensuring robust defect excursion control through sampling methodology. In the leading tech node in Fab10, there are hundreds of critical defects across many inspection steps (using various tools that have different cost and effectiveness) being sampled at low level to maintain low cost and fast cycle time. The sampled data will then be utilized to conduct in-depth defect data analytic, which includes estimation of defect reduction significance from defect improvement projects and excursion significance from deviation processes.
Scope: In this project, students will gain 1st hand experience to understand semiconductor processes and how defects improvements are been carried out, the various inline data collection methodologies and different electrical probe testing for defects. Students will then combine all these information to develop a Best Sampling Model that will accurately predict the defect reduction/excursion significance and the relevant optimum sampling level. Students are expected to understand the pros and cons of the various methods we have, explore statistical, deploy different Big Data Analytics techniques and conduct actual simulation to build the model. Some additional considerations will be the cost of the data collection.
Deliverable: To develop Best Sampling Model that will maximize the return of investment and to accurate analyze the different types of RDA critical metrics (different cost of data collection, varying effectiveness, wide range of mean/range/standard deviation) to output: 1) defect reduction/excursion effectiveness and confidence level; 2) Optimum sampling level required.

About Micron Technology, Inc.

We are an industry leader in innovative memory and storage solutions transforming how the world uses information to enrich life for all. With a relentless focus on our customers, technology leadership, and manufacturing and operational excellence, Micron delivers a rich portfolio of high-performance DRAM, NAND, and NOR memory and storage products through our Micron® and Crucial® brands. Every day, the innovations that our people create fuel the data economy, enabling advances in artificial intelligence and 5G applications that unleash opportunities — from the data center to the intelligent edge and across the client and mobile user experience.

To learn more, please visit micron.com/careers

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status.

To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact hrsupport_sg@micron.com

Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.

Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron."
Site Reliability Engineer,"BitMEX is the world’s leading cryptocurrency derivatives trading platform, which has pioneered cryptocurrency trading through relentless commitment to change, and continues to set benchmarks for innovation, liquidity, and security today.

As the world's most advanced peer-to-peer crypto-products trading platform and API, BitMEX gives knowledge, confidence, and precision to hundreds of thousands of traders, transacting billions of USD a day.

Overview

As a member of the Platform Engineering team, you will be responsible for managing and supporting the infrastructure which drives our platform. The reliability and scalability of our technology is key to our success and this position will work with our development and security teams to help design highly available and fault tolerant systems.

Responsibilities

Manage and support our AWS cloud infrastructure, EC2 instances and physical servers
Development and management of IaC to ensure consistency of our infrastructure
Ensuring security hardening of our OS builds and configurations
Manage and maintain config management tooling to ensure consistency
Manage Key Management infrastructure
Integration of our stack with Kubernetes
Ensure SRE best practices for design and operation of the stack
Design, implement and test disaster recovery capabilities to ensure our business can continue to operate in the event of a technology failure
Participate in an on-call rota for escalations

Qualifications

Strong practical AWS knowledge
Minimum 6 years SRE / DevOps experience supporting and managing Linux based infrastructure
Working knowledge of key management systems
Computer science or engineering degree preferred - strong understanding of fundamental Computer Science principles is required
Comfortable with at least one scripting language such as Python, Ruby or Bash
Able to work under minimal supervision to identify problem areas requiring improvement and seeing a plan through to implementation
Production experience of running Config Management systems (Chef, Ansible, Puppet etc)
Experience working in Investment banking / finance related field (e.g. Equities, FX, Electronic Trading
Experience with networking devices

Join us, as we build a thriving cryptocurrency ecosystem through strategic investments in emerging cryptocurrency technology, and create the future of digital financial services."
Digital Forensics and Incident Response (DFIR) Lead,"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

You will play a key role in the Government Cyber Defence (GCD) of Cyber Security Group (CSG) as Digital Forensic and Incident Response (DFIR) Analyst to manage and investigate cybersecurity incidents.

Successful candidate will be responsible for delivering three core domains, incident response, digital forensics and malware analysis, specialising in either one of the domains. Passionate about DFIR, have desire to learn and improve. Critical thinking and great communication skills are necessary for this role to convey technical concepts and advise decision makers on the best course of action. This is a key position in the Cyber Incident Response Team (CIRT) and is leading the functional team in one of the DFIR domains.

What you will be working on:

Manage the team and ensure smooth operations of daily operations
Lead a team of DFIR analysts to ensure timely response to security incidents, root cause analysis and closure of incident
Investigate cybersecurity incidents that may involve digital forensic analysis, malware analysis and log analysis
Able to provide strong technical guidance on investigation and threat assessments
Assist the team in tasks prioritisation
Assess cybersecurity threats and vulnerabilities
Ensure the test incident response playbooks and processes are maintained and updated
Maintain situational awareness and keep current with cyber security news and threat actor Tactics, Techniques and Procedures (TTPs)
Prepare and review incident reports to update stakeholders

What we are looking for:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science/Information Security or equivalent
Professional certifications, including EnCE, GCFA, GREM, GNFA, GCTI, CISSP or other relevant certifications
Preferably 4 years or more of experience as a full time incident responder/digital forensic/malware analysis or related discipline

Technical Expertise:

Understanding of operating systems and platform (e.g. Windows, Linux)
Knowledge of computer networking, LAN, and server
Ability to show proficiency in Forensic Toolkits such as Encase, FTK or Autopsy
Ability to perform basic static and dynamic malware analysis
Ability to analyse network and application logs
Good working knowledge of Cloud and Container technologies are a plus
Familiarity with good security practices

Other Requirements:

Ability to multitask, prioritise and solid attention to details
Demonstrate a high degree of integrity, initiative, energy and endurance
Willingness to learn
Experience in leading a team for at least 1 year
Possess good communication and interpersonal skills
Singapore Citizen only

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
Développeur JavaScript,"TEHORA est présentement à la recherche d'un Développeur OU analyste programmeur JAVA ayant d’excellentes aptitudes techniques, d’excellentes connaissances et qui souhaite mettre à profit ses compétences au sein d’une équipe polyvalente.

Sans être exhaustifs, voici les services et livrables que devront fournir l'analyste programmeur retenu:


TÂCHES PRINCIPALES À EFFECTUER

Agir comme conseiller lors de la réalisation de solutions logicielles utilisant principalement la technologie JAVA;
Effectuer la programmation requise selon les spécifications de l’analyste responsable;
Rédiger et/ou modifier des analyses fonctionnelles et d’essais;
Participer à l’analyse des problèmes de production et en trouver la solution;
Réaliser toute documentation pertinente aux projets (ex. : analyse d’impacts, coûts/bénéfices ...);
Soutenir le responsable interne des interventions et/ou les analystes dans le cadre de la préparation et coordination des plans de travail requis pour l'exécution des travaux;
Participer à la validation de certains livrables d'architecture détaillée et d’analyse;
Diriger et harmoniser les activités des utilisateurs avec celles de son mandat;
Mettre à profit son expertise afin de soutenir les intervenants des différents secteurs impliqués ainsi que les ressources (internes et externes) lui étant assignées;
Conseiller le responsable interne des interventions et/ou les analystes dans les différentes phases d'analyse des systèmes et compléter les solutions apportées;
Participer à l’élaboration des solutions (conception d’approches répondant aux contraintes techniques);
Effectuer les essais unitaires;
S’assurer du respect des échéanciers des mandats à sa charge;
Participer aux rencontres de suivi de projet de l’équipe de réalisation et faire part de son niveau d’avancement, d’avenues de solution et/ou de problèmes pouvant compromettre les échéanciers ou la réalisation du projet ;
Supporter le pilotage lors d’essais utilisateurs;
Effectuer le développement nécessaire pour l'adaptation des modules identifiés par les architectes et/ou analystes.

Si le développement JAVA vous passionne, voici votre opportunité pour vous joindre à l’équipe en tant qu'analyste programmeur JAVA.
Vous travaillerez en collaboration avec l’équipe de projet, différents fournisseurs, et différents clients issus du secteur gouvernemental.

Profil


Posséder quatre (4) années d’expérience en développement;
Posséder trois (3) années d’expérience en développement Java / JEE d’application Web
Posséder trois (3) années d’expérience en développement avec PL/SQL
Posséder trois (3) années d’expérience en développement avec Oracle 10g ou une version ultérieure
Posséder deux (2) années d’expérience en développement avec les langages HTML, CSS et JavaScript

LIEU DE TRAVAIL

Le lieu de travail sera déterminé selon le mandat, il peut être en télé travail ou chez le client.

POURQUOI SE JOINDRE À TEHORA?

TEHORA est une firme québécoise multidisciplinaire reconnue pour l'excellence de ses services professionnels, de nature technique et de gestion de projets à l'échelle nationale et internationale. Notre mission est d'accompagner nos clients dans la concrétisation de leurs projets par l'excellence de notre savoir-faire et de notre créativité.

Depuis sa création en 2017, notre équipe de professionnels connait une croissance exponentielle en répondant aux besoins importants en gestion de projets multidisciplinaires, dans le domaine des transports, du génie civil, du TI et plus.

Nos collaborateurs travaillent sur des mandats aussi bien à l’interne que chez des clients d’envergures.

TEHORA se distingue par sa culture d’entreprise, axée sur le bonheur de ses employés et la diversité.

Chez TEHORA, chaque collaborateur est un membre important de l'équipe qui contribue à notre succès collectif. Nos membres ont la flexibilité requise pour avoir un équilibre entre le travail et leur vie privée, tout en menant une carrière enrichissante.

Nous offrons un environnement de travail motivant. La diversité des projets, la grande autonomie et l’interaction directe avec les clients sont appréciées. Une telle proximité est possible en raison de notre structure organisationnelle horizontale, qui se traduit par des relations de confiance et une communication efficace entre notre équipe et les clients.


AVANTAGES

Du télétravail et de la flexibilité pour s’adapter à vos obligations familiales
Une culture entrepreneuriale favorisant la créativité et l'innovation
Horaires flexibles (selon le type de contrat de travail)
Congés en cas de maladie et à l'occasion d'événements familiaux
Outils informatiques adaptés
Espace de travail épanouissant et motivant
Initiatives sociales et environnementales
Programme d’apprentissage en milieu de travail
Cheminement de carrière

SALAIRE

Le salaire sera calculé sur la base du taux horaire moyen correspondant à votre profil."
Software Engineer (Big Data Analysis Applications),"The Defence Science and Technology Agency (DSTA) brings you to the forefront of cybersecurity, digital transformation and engineering. From working on software development and systems integration to unmanned technologies and artificial intelligence, you can have an impact on Singapore’s defence.

Achieve your fullest potential with opportunities to build your technical expertise and hone your competencies in diverse domains. You can also expect an immersive learning experience, where you will work with bright minds and collaborate with global industry experts.

DSTA is recognised as one of the top 10 employers in the Engineering & IT sector, where our engineers and IT professionals work alongside procurement specialists to deliver state-of-the-art capabilities for Singapore’s peace and security.

Learn more about DSTA at https://www.dsta.gov.sg .

Opportunity
DSTA’s Information Programme Centre (Info PC) develops software solutions to enhance Intelligence capabilities for counter terrorism and national security issues. We are looking for motivated individuals to join us to develop scalable software solutions to support intelligence analysis.

The successful applicant will work directly with Intelligence Agencies to build analytics applications that operate on large data sets from various sources for real-time threat detection.

The role will require you to:

Translate business requirements into solution designs or technical specifications
Design, develop and test applications which process and analyse big data
Deploy, maintain and continuously improve software applications, including application roll-out, user trainings, and system monitoring.
Work closely with other supporting teams (e.g. infrastructure team) in the course of project delivery.

Minimum
Degree in Computer Science or related field, or relevant technical experience
Software engineering experience in web technologies and languages such as React, Javascript, Typescript, Node, Redux
Team player with good communication and interpersonal skill

Preferred
Fluent in GIT source code control.
Fluent in software design, code modularity and maintainability.
Experience in one of more of the following:
PowerShell or other scripting languages
Containerisation technologies e.g. Docker
Microservices architecture
Stream processing technologies e.g. Kafka
Geospatial technologies from Luciad and ESRI or other open source geospatial tools
Graph databases e.g. Neo4j

Why join us
As a software engineer for big data Intelligence applications, you have the freedom and technical autonomy to build the technologies required to solve real world problems. You will build software that operates on unique data sets that will have a lasting impact on our nation’s long-term defence and security. Here in DSTA, you will work with modern tech stacks and grow in your technical abilities as you learn from experienced mentors in the Information Programme Centre community."
Machine Learning Engineer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Responsibilities

Razer's analytics & insights team is growing and we are looking for a machine learning engineer with 1 to 3 years of experience in designing and developing machine learning systems to join us.
Build, test data and model pipelines for machine learning applications and analytics purpose.
Perform extract, transform, load operations from multiple data sources.
Design, build, test, validate, and deploy machine learning systems based on requirements to productionize models for product development, marketing campaigns and business strategies.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze data quality and model performance.
Build data platform tools for stakeholders and team members for data visualization, catalog, and observability
Pre-Requisites
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams.
Experience in programming languages such as Python, SQL.
Knowledge of machine learning data structures and modeling, software architecture, libraries and frameworks to create data science products that accomplishes outlined goals.
Experience using orchestration tools like Airflow or Prefect, distributed computing framework like Spark or Dask.
Demonstrated experience in applying DevSecOps, DataOps and MLOps.
Developed and deployed applications running on cloud systems such as AWS, Azure or Google Cloud Platform using Infrastructure as code tools such as Terraform, containerization tools like Dockers.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: PowerBI, Tableau.
Experience on working with Enterprise level data platform and product would be a plus
Has a Bachelor or Masters degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics or another quantitative field.

Desired Skills and Experience
Machine Learning, Modeling, Azure, Pipelines, Data Structures, Mathematics, Google Cloud Platform, PowerBI, Python, Statistics, Data Science, Orchestration"
Lead Application Engineer - Agri-Technology,"Job Description

In Danfoss we recognise that new agriculture technologies used in vertical farming, land-based fish farming, and alternative protein production are going to be needed to support the transformation to a sustainable food supply chain.

We are looking for a Lead application engineer who will be responsible for developing system applications on heating and cooling, such as HVAC, heat pump systems, and water system management for these Agri-Tech Environments. This person will be a member of the Global Applications Innovation team within Danfoss Climate Solutions (DCS) Sales and will report directly to the Global Director of Alternative Food Production.

If you want to be part of solving tomorrow’s challenges, then read on.

Job Responsibilities

Responsibilities for this position include, but are not limited to, the following.

Leads in the design of applications for vertical farming and recirculated aquaculture systems
Calculates HVAC system loads, psychrometric analysis, energy modelling, irrigation flow of the proposed systems for the vertical farming market
Calculates HVAC, heat pump life cycle cost analysis and benchmarks to next best alternative
Leads in the preparation of sketches, layouts, and preliminary costing of different system designs
Manages system tests, in house or at the customers facility in line with the application project requirements to a successful outcome
Delivers a detailed understanding of the sustainable energy targets across the alternative food production space and applies this within the system designs.
Manages the coordination with sales, business development functions and customers for specifications, lead-times, and costs for the completion of application projects
Builds credibility by evaluating up-to-date thinking and applying this to customers problems
Connects with a broad set of stakeholders both internally and externally to understand key market and application shifts, as well as opportunities
Creates conceptual presentations to deliver internal and external trainings

Background & Skills

The ideal candidate possesses these skills.

Mechanical Engineering Degree, Technical Degree in an HVAC, related field, or equivalent HVAC Industry
Minimum 5 years HVAC Mechanical application and refrigeration systems experience within the Building Climate Control is required. Experience within the vertical farming or aquaculture market is preferred.
Demonstrable background working within the HVAC Plant industry, with the ability to interpret P&ID drawings
Apply critical thinking to trouble shoot, multitask, prioritize activities, and effectively manage these tasks across a matrix organisation
High level influence- and consensus-building skills, with strong oral and written communication, presentation skills and very good listening competencies.
Able to work within stakeholders to develop and prepare specific project strategies and co deliver compelling business cases to decision-makers and internal management to achieve value-added results – profitable growth
Travel to support customer meetings is required across ASIA. International travel maybe required periodically

Danfoss – Engineering Tomorrow

At Danfoss, we are engineering solutions that allow the world to use resources in smarter ways – driving the sustainable transformation of tomorrow. No transformation has ever been started without a group of passionate, dedicated and empowered people. We believe that innovation and great results are driven by the right mix of people with diverse backgrounds, personalities, skills, and perspectives, reflecting the world in which we do business. To make sure the mix of people works, we strive to create an inclusive work environment where people of all backgrounds are treated equally, respected, and valued for who they are. It is a strong priority within Danfoss to improve the health, working environment and safety of our employees.

Following our founder’s mindset ‘action speaks louder than words’, we set ourselves ambitious targets to protect the environment by embarking on a plan to become CO2 neutral latest by 2030.

Danfoss is an EO employer and VEVRAA Federal Contractor. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or other protected category."
Full Stack (MERN) Engineer,"Responsibilities:
Work cross-functionally across product, design and engineering to develop internal product
Contribute quality code across the full-stack in developing and rolling out new features
Authoring functional and integration tests to ensure features meet product requirements
Tackle bugs and troubleshoot production issues for different platforms in tandem with operations

What We’d Like You To Have:
At least 2 to 4 years of experience in full-stack MERN development
Proficient in Javascript / Typescript
Experience building responsive single-page application
Extensive knowledge of a backend Stack like Javascript, Nodejs, Typescript, Mongoose, MongoDB, PostgreSQL and Redis
Experience working with Frontend tools and technologies like React, Redux, JavaScript, HTML and CSS and/or SCSS, JSON and JWT
Experience consuming and/or designing RESTful APIs
Experience with large-scale application development (e.g. microservice architectures)
Experience using AWS, Azure or GCP (AWS preferred)"
Developer,"What will you be doing as a Developer?
As a Developer at delaware, you play a crucial role in our projects. You will deliver development as per requirements coming from our customers and consultants and provide support for our ongoing engagements.

Do you have what it takes to become an Developer?
Must have development experience in any of the software.
Have some experience in Java, Python or C#.
Have an understanding of Data Structures and Algorithms.
Most importantly, you are open to learn and excited to enrich your knowledge.
Have experience and deep understanding in troubleshooting and debugging.
It’s in our (and your!) best interest if you recognize yourself in Our Values: respect, care, commitment, team spirit and entrepreneurship.

At delaware, we...
Are a dynamic, stimulating team of highly-motivated professionals with attention for personal development in your expertise.
Offer a continuous process for learning, development and growth.
Are involved in unique projects in Singapore (and the region) for prominent customers.
Offer a challenging and dynamic job in a successful organization.
Know there’s more to life than work. We organize team events, impromptu drinks or the occasional sports day: Nothing better for team spirit than getting sweaty together, right?
Are a flat organization with short lines of communication;
Offer a competitive benefits package that grows with you!

If this interests you, we would love to meet you! Send in your CV and we’ll invite you over for coffee and a chat."
Machine Learning Engineer,"Title: Machine Learning Engineer (ML Ops Engineer)

Location: Singapore

About the Role
Climate-Tech corporate venture
Established leadership team
Diverse and tech-driven teams

Responsibilities
Design the entire workflow for machine learning – from ETL to data storage, modeling, experimentation, algorithm development, and deployment
Design and develop highly scalable machine learning models and algorithms
Optimize existing machine learning libraries
Take POC projects into scalable solutions for the business by selecting and incorporating the right tools
Take models to deployment on Cloud – Build integration, testing, and scalable deployment pipelines
Provide recommendations for machine learning architecture and frameworks
Solve complex problems with multi-layered data sets
Work cross-functionally with the Data Science and Platform teams, ensuring accurate documentation of processes

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum 5 years of professional working experience with Machine Learning algorithm development
Professional working experience with ML libraries, packages, frameworks
Ability to design and implement cloud solutions and ability to build MLOps pipelines on cloud solutions (AWS, Azure, or GCP)
Experience with MLOps Frameworks like Kubeflow, MLFlow, DataRobot, Airflow, etc., experience with Docker and Kubernetes, OpenShift
Experience with programming languages Python, R, C++, C, etc.

Application
If you are interested in this position, please apply directly on the platform with your latest CV. We will review your application and revert back promptly.

About NextWave
NextWave Partners is the Recruitment Partner of choice within the Clean Energy, Sustainable Infrastructure, ESG, Impact Investment, Climate-Tech & Technology sectors. We are committed to supporting industries battling climate change towards a net-zero future and a sustainable economy.

Keep in touch
If you would wish to keep up to date with the latest NextWave opportunities and industry updates, please follow us on LinkedIn and create your profile on our website to receive a weekly newsletter in your inbox!

Our commitment
Diversity is a core value at NextWave Partners, and we are proud to be partnering with equal opportunities employers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, colour, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual
orientation, national origin, disability, or age.


EA Registration No: R1877984
NextWave Partners Ltd. (EA License No:16S8303 - UEN: 201602833E)
Web: www.next-wavepartners.com"
"Software Engineer (Graph Neural Network System), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.

The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.

Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!


Responsibilities
- Participate in the design and development of our self-developed distributed Graph Neural Network (GNN) training/inference systems over a large-scale graph dataset;
- Serving and applying Graph Embedding/GNN into real-world application scenarios, including but not limited to risk control, etc.

Qualifications

- Familiar with C++, Python development in Linux environment, familiar with multi-threading, network programming, cloud native K8S and other technologies;
- Familiar with Tensorflow, Pytorch, Ray framework;
- Possess good communication skills and ability to work well in a team.

Preferred Qualifications
- Familiar with existing industry open source GE/GNN systems (e.g., DGL, PYG, Euler, GraphLearn, BigGraph, etc)."
QA Engineer,"Location: Remote

Type: Full-time

Role Description

You’re a QA Engineer who is passionate about building quality products that deliver value to the lives of customers. You’re keen to work in an agile, fast-moving environment employing modern tools and techniques to deliver new features and applications.You thrive in a fast-paced, iterative environment and are able to work both independently and with cross-functional teams. If you desire, there is opportunity to grow into an Automation Engineer, or a team lead managing a small team of QA Engineer.

Responsibilities

Liaise with our PMs and engineering team to identify product requirements and drive QA efforts across our products.
Design and implement comprehensive and well-structured test plans and test cases. Debug and define corrective actions.
Estimate, prioritize, plan and coordinate testing activities
Document and evaluate test results to detect, log, and report program bugs and glitches
Perform thorough regression testing when bugs are resolved
Communicate with our internal operations team to help replicate, resolve, and report issues.
Regularly run performance tests and report to the team
Ensure the quality of the product end-to-end.

Skills & Experience
Prior experience in QA or any related role is a plus, fresh grads with a keen interest in working in a fast-paced, high growth environment are welcome to apply.
High attention to detail. Meticulous.
Strong written communication skills
Bonus:
Basic knowledge of software QA methodologies, tools and processes is beneficial but not mandatory
Hands-on experience with black box testing
Any exposure to automated testing tools is desirable
Exposed to Jira
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum development process


About Homage

Homage is a leading platform redefining long term wellness and care for our parents, grandparents, friends and loved ones. At the heart of Homage are the families and caregivers we work with and the technology we build transforms their lives and care delivery experience. Here, everyone works on exciting, meaningful projects. We move fast, have fun and help each other out.

We’re looking for people who are talented, thoughtful, responsible and passionate individuals who share our values and passion for what we do. Your work will directly impact the lives of people receiving care, people delivering care, and the families that are normally left in the dark about the entire caring process. We're looking for strong team players, people who can work with a very diverse team (engineers, care operations, sales folks.) We’re proudly backed by a group of top local investors, including East Ventures Growth, Golden Gate Ventures, HealthXCapital, 500 Startups and SeedPlus."
Cloud/Infra Architect | Singapore,"If we inspire you to do the work you love, will you still call it work?


What's in it for you?

EY DnA is the data and advanced analytics capability within EY Asia-Pacific, with over 500 specialist employees working across multiple industry sectors.


We’re looking for people with strong Data related Solutioning and Consulting experience. You will need passion for a career in data analytics, where you will provide a consultative service on a variety of data driven decision making projects within a fast-paced consulting environment.


What We're Looking For

We’re looking for a driven, dynamic, experienced, Cloud Architect to join our growing Data & Analytics team.

We’re looking for people with strong Consulting experience; who is a technical thought leader, responsible for cloud computing initiatives within an organization, and for directing the architectural aspects of a cloud team. Some of your responsibilities will include:

Partnering with key roles (e.g., project managers, business analysts, etc.) to create solutions that are aligned to Cloud architecture, standards and principles, leverage common solutions and services, and meet the financial targets (cost and benefits).
Work with motivated and professional people who are passionate about solving complex problems.
Help our clients to understand and work through ways to resolve current public and organisational issues.
Gain opportunities to support large-scale change and transformation.
Build your skills in technology management consulting.
Shape your career with EY’s global methodologies and networks.


To qualify for the role you must have

Experience designing and developing cloud solutions in a variety of client environments with industry standard frameworks and techniques including containers, serverless, PaaS and SaaS
Experience designing and developing solutions based on industry standard patterns and approaches including modern micro service integration and API platforms
Experience and or certifications developing solutions with cloud industry platforms (e.g. Azure, SAP, IBM, AWS, Google Cloud)
An ability to distil complex information into a clear and concise understanding.
Excellent analytical skills in both a business and technology solutions context.
Experience in requirements gathering and documentation, business process modelling, user story creation, functional/non-functional analysis, and/or business case development.
An ability to produce quality project management and/or technical documentation.


Ideally, you’ll also have

Good working knowledge and/or certification in industry standard architecture frameworks (e.g. TOGAF)
Accreditation in Prince2, Agile,.
Knowledge of Pega frameworks, strategic applications and cloud deployments.
Client facing management consulting experience.

About EY

As a global leader in assurance, tax, transaction and advisory services, we hire and develop the most passionate people in their field to help build a better working world. This starts with a culture that believes in giving you the training, opportunities and creative freedom to make things better. So that whenever you join, however long you stay, the exceptional EY experience lasts a lifetime.

If you can confidently demonstrate that you meet the criteria above, please contact us as soon as possible.

Join us in building a better working world. Apply now.

Want to get to know us better?

Visit ey.com/sg/careers

Become a fan on Facebook: facebook.com/EYCareersSingapore

Follow us on Instagram: instagram.com/EYSGCareers

Connect with us on LinkedIn: bit.ly/EYLinked_Careers

Watch us on YouTube: youtube.com/ernstandyoungglobal

EY | Building a better working world

Our preferred applicant will be required to undertake employment screening by EY or our external third-party provider."
Application Support Engineer,"A rapidly expanding and well-respected technology provider to the financial markets has currently opened up an opportunity!

This firm boasts a great team culture and it really values each individual and what they bring to the table.

You will support customer-facing operations by responding to operational and business issues. This position is also responsible for planning, deploying, and supporting client implementations of the firm’s product offerings.

Responsibilities:
· Confidently provide customer support in line with the firms’ SLAs. This can be done via email, phone, or live chat.
· Act as a technical first responder. Triage technical issues to different departments. Prioritize and escalate issues according to the severity and details of each case.
· Analyze logs, FIX messages, and other primary sources to determine the root cause of issues.
· Support new client needs from project planning to hands-on implementation.
· Work with clients to appropriately configure each aspect of their prescribed technology, including liquidity provider details, order routing configuration, trading platform connectivity, etc.
· Manage application upgrades and migrations.
Perform system check-out after the process is completed.

Required Skills:
Prior application support experience supporting clients in the financial services industry.
High proficiency level (power user) with Microsoft Windows OS.
Understanding of FIX protocol.
Basic knowledge of TCP/IP and Networking.
Basic knowledge of SQL (PGSQL, MYSQL).
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and high attention to detail.
Ability to process multiple client communication streams and make high-quality decisions under pressure.

Salary for this position lies within the range of $100,000 - $130,000!

If you are interested in finding out more about this opportunity, apply now and iopa Solutions will connect with you to have a more detailed discussion!"
Back End Developer,"Experienced and passionate backend developer to join an exciting FinTech offering a pioneering L2 technological solution!

About the role
The successful candidate will be responsible for designing and developing a Rust microservices in a reliable and scalable architecture. You would be self-assigned issues to work on and review PRs on Github from fellow coworkers. Further you would collaborate with other development teams inside the company and you would gather information in order to come up with solutions to their problems.

Requirements:
3+ years of relevant experience with software development.
Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
Solid understanding of microservices architecture.
Be familiar with deployment using Docker.
Experience with statically-typed languages.
Experience with Event Streaming.
Experience with REST and GraphQL APIs.
Experience with Git (e.g. we do rebase and use commit —fix-up to keep the history clean and concise).
Good English communication skills (written and spoken).
Self-motivated to work in a 100% remote office environment.

Plus points if you have the following:
Experience with Rust.
Experience with Redis Streams or Kafka.
Experience with PostgreSQL.
Experience with AWS.
Knowledge of blockchain and Solidity technology.

The Benefits:
Great salary & token packages for the full-contractors
Great culture within a start-up environment and being part of a pioneering vision
Flexible work hours and fully remote location
Flexible Paid Time-Off
Hardware, home office, learning and certification, health insurance, physical and mental wellness subsidies.

Mana Search is FinTech’s all-in-one search firm. We partner with the most exciting VC & growth equity backed FinTechs. Strategic search into the CxO suite, venture building through delivering teams in Engineering, Data Analytics, Product and Commercial. If you are interested in hearing more about this role or other do get in touch via stella@manasearch.co.uk - thanks!"
Operational Control - Executive On-Time Performance,"Job Description

The successful candidate will be responsible for delivering the best operational and financial performance for SIA with focus on the customer and safety, which is achieved by taking ownership of flight efficiency related projects and initiative under On-Time Performance, resulting in seamless and effective operations.

Key Responsibilities Include
Coordination of TMM initiatives with all stakeholders/Divisions, CAAS and CAG
Tactical and Dynamic Cost Index
Arrival Sequencing into Singapore (ASIST): Continuous developments and enhancements with CAAS
Decision making tool in OCC
Responsible for the on-time development and delivery of Mission Management Tool
Project management in defining the roadmap
Future developments
Communicate with various ops stakeholders to gather their requirements to be integrated with the project timeline
Ensure that the project is on schedule and the proper dissemination of requirements and enhancements to all stakeholders/users
Develop trends, data insights and analysis of the flight related operations in OCC
Perform any other duties as required
Requirements
A good degree in any discipline
Preferably with background in aviation related experience
Good project management skills
Quick thinking in searching for solutions and excellent analytical skills
Result oriented
An excellent team player
A strong appetite for operational excellence
Excellent in excel skills
Visualisation skills such as applications like Tableau will be an advantage
Excellent interpersonal skills
Degree"
Project Manager,"Responsibilities:

1. Efficiently manage full-lifecycle of projects including business requirements, project planning, implementation, monitor and control, risk handling, project roll-out and customer validation to ensure a streamlined process
2. Forecast and utilize project resources in an efficient manner to ensure project is delivered on time, within scope and budget
3. Create/edit specific customer documents with high standardization including functional specifications for customers, high level technical specifications for developers, UAT testing plan, etc.
4. Find efficient and practical solutions to given requirements which closely adhere to programming and testing standards, accuracy and creativity
5. Give professional guidance and appropriate support to project teams during development of projects and the final validation
6. Manage and monitor project team to ensure enhanced work efficiency, high motivation and good team spirit
7. Collaborate with quality control team, project team to manage and optimize UAT phase ensuring project issues or bugs are sorted, and satisfactory client’s feedback as well
8. Take responsibility of quality of the project by guaranteeing all project functions are flawless and validating delivery of the project meticulously, ensuring smooth project go-live
9. Communicate with customer effectively and promptly in kick-off meeting, specifications validation, follow-up meetings, UAT validation to meet customers’ needs
10. Give sufficient support to customers to meet customer’s satisfaction by answering customers inquires, resolving matters and complaints


Requirements:

· Bachelor degree or equivalent qualification
· PMP Certificate (Desirable)
· Strong experience in web project management process
· Experience with e-commerce solutions (especially Magento, Salesforce) (Desirable)
· Programming Skills of Object Oriented PHP, JavaScript, HTML/CSS, Ajax and optimizing MySQL
· Good managerial skills to work with other team members
· Good command of English and Mandarin
· A good team player with excellent communication and interpersonal skills
· Analytical skills and organizational skills"
Electrical Engineer,"Sensia is the unification of sensing, intelligence and action. Sensia brings together the best of the best: the pioneering process automation, real-time control and IoT technologies of Rockwell Automation, combined with the unmatched measurement and instrumentation, software and analytics capabilities of Schlumberger. Sensia is further strengthened by the oil and gas domain expertise and artificial lift experience shared by Rockwell Automation and Schlumberger. The result is Sensia—the leading automation specialist in oil & gas production, transportation and processing with a team of 1,000+ experts serving customers globally. Rockwell Automation is a global technology leader focused on helping the world’s manufacturers be more productive, sustainable, and agile. With more than 25,000 employees who make the world better every day, we know we have something special. Behind our customers - amazing companies that help feed the world, provide life-saving medicine on a global scale, and focus on clean water and green mobility - our people are energized problem solvers that take pride in how the work we do changes the world for the better. We welcome all makers, forward thinkers, and problem solvers who are looking for a place to do their best work. And if that’s you we would love to have you join us! Job Description Essential Responsibilities And Duties Maintain and improve electronic designs (wide range of electronics, digital, power electronics, analog front, communication) and products (technical files, components, schematics, assembly procedures, tool manuals, etc.) Understand electrical schematics, select components, build prototypes, products, and systems suitable for testing. Set up and run lab simulations. Design and implement tests, document results and develop customer presentations. Provide timely corrective actions on defects. Conduct or participate in technical reviews of requirements, specifications, designs, code, and other artifacts. Contribute to design standards and support design re-use. Create and maintain product documentation. Provide support to operations and customers. Continually evaluate engineering approaches and risk. Author technical reports, papers, articles, patents and presentations. Share expertise via special interest groups. Expand informal network throughout the organization. Conduct Failure Analysis at board and/or tool level Required Skills BAS / MS / PhD in Electrical Engineering and 5 years or more of work experience Strong communication skills, written and verbal English language proficiency Direct hands-on experience with common electronic test equipment such as oscilloscopes, function generators, multimeters, spectrum analyzers, power analyzers, etc. Must have some skills below. A candidate does not need all skills, but willing to learn step by step: Digital (MCU, linux mcu, FPGA, etc) Analog electronics Power electronics Communication interface Modulations Layout Cadence, LTSpice, TINA LabView and test stand basic knowledge and software Familiar with CE/UL, EMC, IEC 61010 standards Experience in certification and V&V testing"
Business Analyst,"What The Role Is

As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.

What You Will Be Working On
Work closely with business users to gather data science requirements, identify data gaps and conduct impact and feasibility assessments.
Apply the appropriate analytics methodologies and data warehousing concepts to design and develop the end to end analytics solution, governance process and ingestion pipelines.
Collaborate with the business and technical teams to ensure proper translation of requirements into specifications and to conduct subsequent user acceptance tests.
Maintain the data warehouse and data marts to ensure continued relevance to business needs.
Advocate the meaningful use of data and data analytics and guide business users in the relevant concepts and skillsets.

What We Are Looking For
Preferably 2 years of experience in working with business users in requirements gathering, impact analysis, system functional testing and documentation.
Ability to influence stakeholders and communicate complex data and analytics concepts in simple terms.
Strong skills in quantitative analysis of data, data structure concepts, data preparation and SQL queries.
Proficient in analytical and data visualisation tools such as SAS, Tableau, Power BI, Python and Spark.
Passion in learning new techniques and technologies."
"Project Manager (Cloud, Protection, & Licensing)","Location: Singapore, Singapore

Thales people architect identity management and data protection solutions at the heart of digital security. Business and governments rely on us to bring trust to the billons of digital interactions they have with people. Our technologies and services help banks exchange funds, people cross borders, energy become smarter and much more. More than 30,000 organizations already rely on us to verify the identities of people and things, grant access to digital services, analyze vast quantities of information and encrypt data to make the connected world more secure.

Thales established its presence in Singapore in 1973 to support the expansion of aerospace-related activities in the Asia-Pacific region. Throughout the last four decades, the company grew from strength to strength and is today involved in the primary businesses of Aerospace (including Air Traffic Management), Defence & Security, Ground Transportation and Digital Identity & Security. Thales today employs over 2,100 people in Singapore across all its business areas.

Responsibilities

We are looking for someone enthusiastic and ambitious to join our talented Professional Services team. As a key member of the team, you would be working with our team of Professional Services Consultants to deliver the projects for the customers.

You will work closely with customers and internal team to deliver the projects in a timely manner in order to optimize our revenue.

Duties will cover all aspects Project Management, as well as support to the Professional Services team, including:
Managing assembled project teams, coordinating staff and internal resources.
Ensuring the project objectives in relation to cost, time and quality are achieved
Setting and managing customer’s expectations, develop detail project plan, defining the scope of the project and managing the assignment of tasks to project team members.
Managing relationships with customers and stakeholders. Maintaining lines of communication for updates and feedback with stakeholders and customers; provide timely update on project status to stakeholders and customers.
As Project Manager, You Are Accountable For
Managing Projects in accordance with Thales internal guidelines ensuring it addresses the objectives of the business.
Liaise closely and collaboratively with functional teams to ensure efficient delivery of projects. Particularly, coordinating with internal cross functional teams in order to maximize efficiency and ensure Projects outcomes meets the objectives.
Acquiring and implementing knowledge about the business policies &practices, business intelligence tools, interact with contracts, finance, booking and other lines of business.
Generate dashboard and scorecards for the team for review.
Stakeholder management with the leadership support and help business track KPI’s/Focus areas for the year.
Develop KPI’s and conduct analysis to provide early alert to the business of all significant emerging variances and risks. Develop and execute mitigation plans to counter variances and risks.
Coordinating and negotiating input from partners and oversees subcontractors.
Developing customer relationships by ensuring products and services delivered exceed where possible, customer expectations.
Work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment demonstrating teamwork, innovation, and excellence.
Implement governance standards, including tracking, monitoring and track status of project team and program deliverables.
Assess and understand end-to-end process for better efficiencies and effectiveness and establish best practices.
Reporting and tracking of projects, staffing, financials, SLAs, forecasting and other key business metrics in business plan versus actual
Manage risks, changes and impact analysis and identify key areas of improvement.
End to end project deliverables & documentation, project control & success and handover to Operations.
Requirement
Degree qualified in computer science, information technology, engineering, project management or other suitable discipline.
Experience in Cyber Security or related field
ITIL/PMP Certification or ability to secure certification.
Proven and effective leadership skills with a high level of interpersonal and verbal communication skills as well as the ability to manage multi-disciplinary teams.
At least five years Project Management experience.
The confidence and maturity of judgement to represent the company at senior levels with customer organizations both nationally and internationally.
Exceptional written communication skills including authoring content and editing.
Strong internal stakeholder management in a matrix organization.
Strong customer focus and external relationship management.
Ability to navigate complexity and ambiguity to make effective commercial and financial decisions
At Thales we provide CAREERS and not only jobs. With Thales employing 80,000 employees in 68 countries our mobility policy enables thousands of employees each year to develop their careers at home and abroad, in their existing areas of expertise or by branching out into new fields. Together we believe that embracing flexibility is a smarter way of working. Great journeys start here, apply now!"
Software Engineer - HC005,"Activate Interactive Pte Ltd (“Activate”) is a leading IT solution and service provider headquartered in Singapore with a presence in Malaysia and Indonesia. Our clients are empowered with quality, cost-effective, and impactful end-to-end application development, like mobile and web applications, and cloud technology that remove technology roadblocks and increase their business efficiency.

We believe in positively impacting the lives of people around us and the environment we live in through the use of technology. Hence, we are committed to providing a conducive environment for all employees to realise their full potential, who in turn have the opportunity to continuously drive innovation.

We are searching for our next team members to join our growing team.

If you love the idea of being part of a growing company with exciting prospects in mobile and web technologies that create positive impact on people’s lives, then we would love to hear from you.

We are looking for Software Engineer

Internal Code: HC005
We adopt agile software practices as our core operating principle, and we work with the latest software technologies and best practices.
We are also very proud of our flat team structure, and collaborative and fun culture.
We are seeking a highly motivated software engineer who will write beautiful code, and contribute in delivering the next generation national health claims processing platform.
If you are looking to collaborate with highly motivated peers, and immerse in best industrial practices, or if you have a deep passion for contributing to the public good, this is the right opportunity for you.

What will you do?
Design, develop, document, test, deploy, and maintain software applications.
Improve software quality using Scrum practices such as code review and unit testing.
Be well-rounded and collaborate with QE, DevOps, or Product Owners and Business
Analysts to contribute to the success of the project.

Requirements

What are we looking for?
Degree in Computer Science, Computer or Electronics Engineering, Information Technology or related disciplines.
At least three years of professional experience in a software engineer or equivalent position.
Familiar with cloud-native technology and architecture.
Familiar with Clean Code, Design Patterns and Unit Testing.
Knowledge and experience in Kotlin, Spring Boot Framework and Spring Cloud will be advantageous.
Working experience in Agile and UX development environments will be an added advantage.
Good presentation and listening skills.
Self-driven, motivated, and strong desire to learn.

Benefits

What do we offer in return?
Fun working environment
Employee Wellness Program

Does it sound like something you are interested in exploring further? Please be in touch with our team for an initial chat at chi@activate.sg

Activate Interactive Singapore is an equal opportunity employer. Employment decisions will be based on merit, qualifications and abilities. Activate Interactive Pte Ltd does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, colour, religion, sex, sexuality, national origin, age, disability, marital status or any other characteristics protected by law.

Protecting your privacy and the security of your data are longstanding top priorities for Activate Interactive Pte Ltd.

Your personal data will be processed for the purposes of managing Activate Interactive Pte Ltd’s recruitment related activities, which include setting up and conducting interviews and tests for applicants, evaluating and assessing the results, and as is otherwise needed in the recruitment and hiring processes.

Please consult our Privacy Notice (https://www.activate.sg/privacy-policy) to know more about how we collect, use, and transfer the personal data of our candidates. Here you can find how you can request for access, correction and/or withdrawal of your Personal Data."
Digital Experience (DX) Specialist,"Lendlease Singapore is currently searching for a Digital Experience Specialist.

Delivering iconic and award-winning projects, we are setting standards in innovative and industry-leading project management, construction and design services locally and globally.

Your responsibilities will include, but are not limited to;

Advanced stakeholder management, customer satisfaction, governance, service review meetings, performance reporting, (may include budget and P&L management) etc.
Provide and/or lead group or individual training sessions, inductions and presentations to ensure education, awareness and satisfaction (to customers, service & technology teams, key stakeholders etc).
Establish and/or utilise performance metrics, monitoring, analysing and tracking service performance to ensure targets are met or exceeded, and identifying continuous improvement opportunities and insights.
Provide leadership, governance and collaboration to ensure commercial and operational relationships with vendors and trusted partners are financially viable and deliver quality service to customers.
Ensure all services provided comply with industry standards, best practice and regulatory requirements.
Ensure effective risk and issue management, leading the escalation and resolution of issues where required.
Manage development, maintenance and publishing of documentation and knowledge base articles. Service Delivery:
Own delivery of a globally aligned service that underpins and facilitates business objectives, ensuring local needs and future pipeline & changes are met.
Draw upon advanced knowledge and experience of the Lendlease business, be the customer’s trusted advisor and advocate, actively working to improve the speed, reliability, quality and cost benefit of service delivered. Customer Success:
Product and service roll-out, adoption, awareness and support.
Drive retention and growth among customers, evaluate and understand adoption trends and business needs. Customer Support:
Provide senior L2+ remote and face to face support (including troubleshooting, issue resolution, project site work etc).
Manage, plan and action each ticket through to resolution. Service Management:
Deliver best practice process definition, design, re-engineering, implementation, management and improvement of current/to-be processes.
Advanced level Service Management tool SME input into Tool functional capabilities and roadmap enhancements.

Lendlease is a globally integrated real estate group with core expertise in shaping cities and creating strong and connected communities.

We create award-winning urban precincts, new communities for older people and young families just starting out, retail precincts, and workplaces to the highest sustainability standards. We are also privileged to create essential civic and social infrastructure including state-of-the-art hospitals, universities and stadiums around the world.

If you feel this position is suited to your skills, experience and career aspirations, please apply on the link.

To find out more about us and to explore all other opportunities visit www.lendlease.com/careers"
"Data Analytics Sales Specialist, Google Cloud","Minimum qualifications:

7 years of experience promoting analytics, data warehousing, or data management software
Experience planning, pitching, and executing a territory sales strategy
Experience executing commercial and legal agreements with procurement, legal, and business teams
Experience working with sales engineers and customer technical leads to build business cases for transformation and accompanying plans for implementation

Preferred qualifications:

Experience with market leading Business Intelligence (BI) front-end, data analytics middleware, or back-end data warehouse technologies
Understanding of data analytics technology stack (e.g., Hadoop/Spark, Columnar data warehouses, data streaming, ETL and data governance, predictive analytics, data science framework, etc.)
Familiarity with Google Cloud Data and Analytics offerings (e.g., BigQuery, Looker, Dataproc, Pub/Sub, etc.)
Effective at engaging and influencing executive stakeholders as a business advisor and thought leader in data and analytics
Excellent business judgment and people management skills, using data to inform decisions and influence stakeholders

About The Job

The Google Cloud Platform team helps customers transform and build what's next for their business — all with technology built in the cloud. Our products are engineered for security, reliability and scalability, running the full stack from infrastructure to applications to devices and hardware. Our teams are dedicated to helping our customers — developers, small and large businesses, educational institutions and government agencies — see the benefits of our technology come to life. As part of an entrepreneurial team in this rapidly growing business, you will play a key role in understanding the needs of our customers and help shape the future of businesses of all sizes use technology to connect with customers, employees and partners.

In this role, you will build an understanding of our customers' businesses and bring expertise to executive-level relationships to help them deliver their strategies. You will leverage expertise promoting data analytics and work with account teams, customer engineering, and partners to ensure customer outcomes

Google Cloud accelerates organizations’ ability to digitally transform their business with the best infrastructure, platform, industry solutions and expertise. We deliver enterprise-grade solutions that leverage Google’s cutting-edge technology – all on the cleanest cloud in the industry. Customers in more than 200 countries and territories turn to Google Cloud as their trusted partner to enable growth and solve their most critical business problems.

Responsibilities

Own numbers and calibrate the business against the objectives and key results, accurately forecasting and reporting the state of the business for the assigned territory
Build and maintain executive relationships with customers as the data analytics subject matter expert, influencing long-term strategic direction
Develop and execute strategic account plans, including a broader enterprise plan across key industries; focus on building accounts
Assist customers in identifying use cases suitable for Google Cloud Data and Analytics solutions, articulating key solution differentiation and measurable business impacts
Work with Google account and technical teams to develop and drive pipeline, and provide expertise. Develop go-to-market (GTM) efforts with Google Cloud Platform partners

Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. See also Google's EEO Policy and EEO is the Law. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing our Accommodations for Applicants form ."
Business Analyst - Wealth Management IT - AVP,"In Asia Pacific, BNP Paribas is one of the best-positioned international financial institutions with an uninterrupted presence since 1860. Currently with over 18,000 employees* and a presence in 13 markets, BNP Paribas provides corporates, institutional and private investors with product and service solutions tailored to their specific needs. It offers a wide range of financial services covering corporate & institutional banking, wealth management, asset management, insurance, as well as retail banking and consumer financing through strategic partnerships.

Worldwide, BNP Paribas has a presence in 68 markets with more than 193,000 employees. It has key positions in its three main activities: Domestic Markets and International Financial Services (whose retail-banking networks and financial services are covered by Retail Banking & Services) and Corporate & Institutional Banking, which serves two client franchises: corporate clients and institutional investors. Asia Pacific is a key strategic region for BNP Paribas and it continues to develop its franchise in the region.
excluding partnerships

At BNP Paribas, we passionately embrace diversity and are committed to fostering an inclusive workplace where all employees are valued, respected and can bring their authentic selves to work. We prohibit Discrimination and Harassment of any kind and our policies promote equal employment opportunity for all employees and applicants, irrespective of, but not limited to their gender, gender identity, sex, sexual orientation, ethnicity, race, colour, national origin, age, religion, social status, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status etc. As a global Bank, we truly believe that inclusion and diversity of our teams is key to our success in serving our clients and the communities we operate in.

https://careers.apac.bnpparibas/

Position Purpose

WMIS Products division is responsible for project delivery and application support for Structured Products, FX and Regulatory Reporting (EMIR, MIFIR, HKMA, MAS).

Products division is looking for a Business Analyst to join the team to work in the LCM squad. He/ she will be reporting to the LCM squad team lead.

Project delivery includes a major transformation project to migrate the Structured Products from existing Booking Chain from Calypso to Contineo and then build and execute a roadmap to decommission Calypso and all the shadow IT Tools and its associated processes in Asia (Singapore, Hong-Kong and Taiwan)and European sites (Switzerland, Monaco, Spain, Luxembourg, Germany). In terms of systems, both in-house development and vendor applications are involved (Contineo, Connexio, BVE, Olympic).

Direct Responsibilities

Responsibilities

The candidate will work within our Reporting Squad and will be involved in Business Analysis on execution, referential and back-office applications. He/She will:
Gather the requirements from the Product Owner and end users
Write user stories and confirm the understanding with the developers.
Write function specifications and ensure proper documentation of requirements, process mapping and workflow diagramming.
Document business rules, feasibility studies, and impact analysis
Perform system analysis with the BA of other applications squads when involved in multi-systems features and interfaces.
Coordinate with multiple Technical teams, Infrastructure and testing teams to deliver the projects
Assist to prepare technical deliveries and support implementation by integration teams.
Work with developers on system development and unit testing.
Work with the testing team to conduct system integration testing to ensure quality of delivery.
Support UAT (reproduce issues, monitoring, fixing with the team)

Technical & Behavioral Competencies

Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience required
4+ years of overall experience as Business Analyst
7+ years in banking industry

Mandatory Skills
4 years of Business Analysis in the field of Structured Products and Derivatives
Knowledge and work experience in banking industry, preferably Wealth Management
Deep understanding of Structured Products operations
Good understanding of Ledger currency positions
Good understanding of Interest Rate, Linked Notes, Accumulators/Decumulators products
Good understanding of IT architecture
Experience with one position keeping tool
Good understanding of the bank’s processes, especially Structured Products Workflows from Front to Back.
Highly analytical mindset, capable of modeling complex systems
Excellent communication skills, able to engage with end users and stakeholders at various levels
Experience in implementing software packages
Minimum 7 years of related working experience in banking and finance IT.

Optional Skills
Client risk management tool (preferably Contineo)
Understanding of structured products
Understanding of technical aspects like Java development, Cloud, API.

Specific Qualifications (if Required)
Office suite
DB queries is a plus

Primary Location

SG-06-Singapore

Job Type

Standard / Permanent

Job

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY

Education Level

Bachelor Degree or equivalent (>= 3 years)

Experience Level

At least 7 years"
Senior Malware Reverse Engineer (Unit 42) - Remote,"Company Description

Our Mission

At Palo Alto Networks® everything starts and ends with our mission:

Being the cybersecurity partner of choice, protecting our digital way of life.

We have the vision of a world where each day is safer and more secure than the one before. These aren’t easy goals to accomplish – but we’re not here for easy. We’re here for better. We are a company built on the foundation of challenging and disrupting the way things are done, and we’re looking for innovators who are as committed to shaping the future of cybersecurity as we are.

We’re changing the nature of work. Palo Alto Networks is evolving to meet the needs of our employees now and in the future through FLEXWORK, our approach to how we work. From benefits to learning, location to leadership, we’ve rethought and recreated every aspect of the employee experience at Palo Alto Networks. And because it FLEXes around each individual employee based on their individual choices, employees are empowered to push boundaries and help us all evolve, together.

Job Description

Your Career

As a member of Unit 42's Threat Intelligence team, you will work closely with a globally distributed team of Vulnerability Researchers, Reverse Engineers, and Threat Intelligence Analysts. Your time will be divided between picking apart various classes of malware and side projects to improve our team workflows and company products.

Your Impact

Reverse engineer malware via static, dynamic methods as well as interpretation of assembly through utilization of a disassembling or debugging tool
Collaborate with our Threat Intelligence team to analyze and develop detection coverage for the latest threats
Implement automated malware analysis tools and work with Unit 42 engineers to import into analysis workflows
Research and prototype novel automated malware detection techniques
Communicate with product engineering teams to improve detection efficacy in our ecosystem of products

Qualifications

Your Experience

Proficiency in Python, C, and/or C++
Experience in malware analysis and reverse engineering in x86/x64
Familiarity with Golang malware and Reversing GO binaries
Experience with debuggers such as WinDBG, GDB, and X64DBG
Familiar with disassemblers such as IDA Pro, Binary Ninja, or Ghidra
Development experience with malware analysis automation, such as IDA plugins, sandboxing, triage tools, etc.
Experience with mobile malware a plus
BS/MS in Computer Science or Computer Engineering or equivalent military experience required

Additional Information

The Team

We are the Global Threat Intelligence team at Palo Alto Networks. We believe threat intelligence should be shared and available to all within the industry. We deliver high-quality, in-depth research on adversaries, malware families, and attack campaigns. Our analysts uncover and document adversary behaviors and then share playbooks that give insight into the various tools, techniques, and procedures threat actors execute to compromise organizations.

Our Commitment

We’re trailblazers that dream big, take risks, and challenge cybersecurity’s status quo. It’s simple: we can’t accomplish our mission without diverse teams innovating, together.

We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations for all qualified individuals with a disability. If you require assistance or accommodation due to a disability or special need, please contact us at accommodations@paloaltonetworks.com.

Palo Alto Networks is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity in our workplace, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or other legally protected characteristics.

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Covid-19 Vaccination Information for Palo Alto Networks Jobs
Vaccine requirements and disclosure obligations vary by country.
Unless applicable law requires otherwise, you must be vaccinated for COVID or qualify for a reasonable accommodation if:
The job requires accessing a company worksite
The job requires in-person customer contact and the customer has implemented such requirements
You choose to access a Palo Alto Networks worksite
If you have questions about the vaccine requirements of this particular position based on your location or job requirements, please inquire with the recruiter."
Project Manager Undergrad Intern,"Client Peripherals PMO is responsible for end to end program management of Dell Peripherals from concept incubation, product development, sustaining and product end of life. Dell peripherals products include keyboards, mice, active stylus, headsets, speakers, docking station, video adapters, power companions, displays arms & stands and gaming keyboards, mice and headsets.

Project Manager is responsible for Ecosystem interlock with Client’s program team. Co-work with marketing to define Peripheral Offer. Lead development schedule discussion with ODM vendors. Device sample allocation plan for market seedings, engineering compatibility testing. Lead cross core team initiatives. Publish monthly RUM report for sustaining programs to facilitate recovery actions for low attainment.

Join us as a Project Manager Intern on our Field Marketing team in Singapore to do the best work of your career and make a profound social impact.

What You’ll Achieve

As an Intern Undergraduate, you will responsible for end to end program management of Dell Peripherals from concept incubation, product development, sustaining and product end of life. Dell peripherals products include keyboards, mice, active stylus, headsets, speakers, docking station, video adapters, power companions, displays arms & stands and gaming keyboards, mice and headsets.

You will:
Facilitate and/or participate in program/project extended and core team meetings.
Publish monthly RUM report for sustaining programs to facilitate recovery actions for low attainment and positive influence on product planning.
Data analysis on RUM reporting – co-work with MKT to provide positive influence on product planning.
Data analysis on Program development Zipcode – co-work with Program Manager on lesson learnt and opportunities for improvement.

Take the first step towards your dream career

Every Dell Technologies team member brings something unique to the table. Here’s what we are looking for with this role:

Essential Requirements
Degree in supply chain and operations management, engineering, business.
Ability to work with cross-functional teams and Collaboration and communication skills.
Problem solving and quantitative analytical skills.
Flexibility to quickly adapt to new challenges and operate in periods of ambiguity.
Demonstrate attentiveness to quality and productivity and MS Project, Power BI experience, proficient in Excel.

Desirable Requirements
Ability to communicate well with senior level team members
Collaboration skills

Here’s our story; now tell us yours

Dell Technologies helps organizations and individuals build a brighter digital tomorrow. Our company is made up of more than 150,000 people, located in over 180 locations around the world. We’re proud to be a diverse and inclusive team and have an endless passion for our mission to drive human progress.

What’s most important to us is that you are respected, feel like you can be yourself and have the opportunity to do the best work of your life -- while still having a life. We offer excellent benefits, bonus programs, flexible work arrangements, a variety of career development opportunities, employee resource groups, and much more.

We started with computers, but we didn’t stop there. We are helping customers move into the future with multi-cloud, AI and machine learning through the most innovative technology and services portfolio for the data era. Join us and become a part of what’s next in technology, starting today.

You can also learn more about us by reading our latest Diversity and Inclusion Report and our plan to make the world a better place by 2030 here.

Dell is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Dell are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV Status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Dell will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Dell encourages applicants of all ages. Read the full Equal Employment Opportunity Policy here.

""SGUR""

Job Id: R199677

Job Function: Interns"
Full Stack Developer,"What do we do?
At Infosys Compaz(iCompaz), we focus on Digital Transformation for enterprises across industry vertical segments and services. We take clients on a rewarding journey of Digital Transformation, with strengths in AI, Data, User Experience, Cloud, Cybersecurity and Analytics, while also serving clients in their IT management in technology operations, infrastructure and applications. We serve a comprehensive client network spanning multiple industries and are helping clients meet the challenges of the digital economy in financial services, retail, transportation and logistics, telecom, services, and resource sectors, among others.

Key Responsibilities :
Design and build web and mobile friendly applications with modern JavaScript and state management frameworks.
Knowledge in DevOps setup and building pipeline, Spring boot, Microservices, React, TOSCA Testing tool knowledge.
Strong JavaScript, HTML5, CSS skills, and having the knowledge in CSS in JS and Web Component
Research and select toolsets to enhance user experience with dynamic content.
Interact with backend APIs and optimize responsiveness.
Work closely with UX designers to collect requirements and verify design feasibility.
Research UI design and development techniques to find innovative and elegant solutions to complex UI problems.
Knowledge of related trends such as DevOps, Performance Engineering, AB Testing etc.
Experience with the Atlassian Toolchain (Bitbucket, JIRA, Bamboo, Amazon Device Farm, Confluence).
Automotive, Finance or Banking Industry experience a definite plus.
Strong solution orientation and problem-solving skills.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills in an Asian multicultural project environment.
Ability to present concepts clearly to management.
Self-starter and active driver of change especially in terms of digital mind-set & tools.
Willingness to collaborate re. knowledge sharing.
Requirements:
Degree holder in Computer Engineering / Science, Information Technology or equivalent.
Passionate coder with 5-10 years of Application Development experience.
Experience in DevOps , Spring boot, Microservices, React, TOSCA Testing tool knowledge.
Experience in JavaScript, HTML5, CSS skills, and good knowledge in CSS in JS and Web Component
Good knowledge of DevOps
Excellent analytical skills
Excellent oral and written communication

Why iCompaz?
iCompaz is a Joint Venture between Infosys Limited and Temasek Holdings, both global leaders in their respective industries, and the JV was created exclusively to bring Digital Transformation capabilities and global skills to the ASEAN market. Temasek Holdings is a global investment company headquartered in Singapore. Infosys is a global leader in next-generation digital services and consulting, headquartered in Bangalore, India.
We take pride in our fair employment opportunity. You are welcome at iCompaz regardless of age, race, gender, religion, marital status and family responsibilities, or disability.
We offer an inclusive and diverse workplace environment to support your career aspirations. We have a strong emphasis on continuous learning to your professional and personal growth. If you are looking for an opportunity where you would be able to make an impact with what you are good at, and at the same time being able to explore any other area that interests or motivates you, WE’VE GOT YOU COVERED!"
"Assistant Vice President, IT Project Manager cum Business Analyst - Technology Service Delivery Grou","Job description:

You will be responsible for managing end-to-end delivery of projects and system enhancements for MIS reporting services across the APAC and East Asia region. You will work with stakeholders across various functions to deliver technology solutions to address their business needs.

Job Responsibilities


Project Management / Business Analysis
Manage the end-to-end delivery of project and system change requests in accordance to Software Development Lifecycle, as an application SME for DAT systems;

a) Business requirement and solution analysis, planning and budgetary management:

Define project scope & plan and seek stakeholder’s sign-off.
Prepare administrative documents, where relevant, during project initiation (Internal Memo, Budget applications etc)
b) Project lifecycle management:

Coordinate solution development and change requests with project vendors
Vendor and contract management
Prepare artefacts in accordance to SMBC’s project lifecycle framework
Track project status, especially tasks to ensure delivery is on track. Provide regular project updates to both management and stakeholders.
Facilitate business requirement, data sourcing and solution analysis discussions with users, vendors and upstream data source teams, document user requirements.
Manage users’ expectation and project scope creep.
Review documentation such as functional and technical specifications prepared by vendors to ensure quality
Lead technical discussions with other technical teams, including vendor during the architecture design definition.
Prepare test plan, test cases and coordinate testing with users and vendor
Coordinate with the various teams for the system environment setup.
Coordinate production release and provide post implementation support
Manage production incidents and work with vendor to deliver fixes
Coordinate with users and various IT teams on the yearly DR drill exercise.
Responsible for coordinating with the various IT teams for the regular applications maintenance activities i.e., server patching, audits etc.
APAC or Asia Regional Support

Provide support for APAC or Asia Branches / Subsidiaries as a regional HO:
Support Business reporting, Data Analysis or Business Analysis requirement.
Conduct feasibility study for new system requirement.
Conduct functional review of projects in each branch/subsidiary.
Monitor project status and system change request and completion of projects/requests.
User Engagement and Stakeholder Management.
Support production issues resolution for local system.
System Production Management / Business Support (BAU)

Provide on-going maintenance support for existing MIS & Data reporting systems and provide L3 system and functional consultancy:
Production issues resolution and answer users’ queries
DR site maintenance and DR drill preparation and participation
Ad-hoc impact analysis and regression testing for application
Yearly System Risk Assessment, audits
Contract / Service Agreement Renewal for System maintenance.
Job Requirements

Master’s or bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Manage Information Science, Banking and Finance or equivalent
Min. 5 years of working experience in MIS, regulatory reporting, data management or data analytics role within Banks/Financial Institutions.
Experience in project implementation or business analysis.
Proficient in System Development Life Cycle (SDLC)/Agile project delivery framework
Competent in business requirement gathering, functional review, feasibility studies and stake holder management
Skilled in technical solutioning, technology infrastructure and system implementation
Proven problem-solving ability and work well in a challenging technical environment, with capability to multi-task whilst delivering high quality solutions
Excellent communication, interpersonal and presentation skills
Demonstrate sound judgment in reviewing problems and making recommendations / decisions
Ability to highlight or escalate risk issues to relevant parties in a timely manager
Ability to identify customers’ needs and providing value-added solutions to them
A team player who can work independently
Is organized, systematic and logical in approach
Knowledge in Financial Accounting, Management Accounting & Regulatory Reporting, Risk Management, Capital / Profitability Management would be a plus.
Experience in data management, data warehousing, data mart, data visualization, design and implementation is an added advantage.
Certifications such as PMP, PRINCE2, SCRUM, ITIL is a plus."
Senior Java Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
About The Position

As a member of the project’s development team, you will develop robust processes to ingest huge amounts of data from disparate systems, and build processes that transform and use that data. The core technology used is Apache Spark on top of HDFS, and development is primarily in Java. The position is ideal for someone with a strong interest in data processing and data science: either a confirmed expert in Big Data technologies or a strong developer keen on gaining expertise in that domain.

Qualifications And Profile

The successful candidate will definitely have:
At least 8 years of software development experience
At least 5 years experience working with Java
A strong understanding of recent Java language features, such as lambdas, streams, and futures
Good knowledge of algorithms and data structures, with strong fundamentals in complexity analysis
Strong ability to analyze code – understand execution flow & debug even without access to a debugger
Experience with Maven, Git, writing and maintaining integration tests
Strong familiarity with Linux and bash
Good knowledge of SQL or an SQL-inspired dialect such as HQL
An ideal candidate will also have expertise in some of the following:
Hadoop Big data clusters and tech: Spark, Kafka, HDFS, ORC, Hive, HBase, YARN, Parquet, Zookeeper
Jenkins and Ansible
Jira or a similar issue-tracking system
The Spring framework and IoC, and particularly Sping Boot and Swagger for restful web services

Desired Skills and Experience
Git, Apache Spark, Web Services, Big Data, Data Structures, Hadoop, Maven, SQL, JIRA, Writing, Data Science, Ansible, Java, Linux, Software Development"
Senior Software Engineer /MNC s ( Junior / Entry level / Senior ) X3 Opening,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description

Responsibilities:

Diploma/ Degree in Electrical / IT Entry level / Junior Welcome apply

Experience candidates welcome apply

1 month AWS , Variable Bonus up to 3 months / 5 days work week

System Administration and Installation of UNIX/LINUX/WINDOWS Servers & Workstations

Software Configuration Management using Rational Clear Case and RCS

Basic Network Setup (routers, switchers, IP addresses)

Database Modeling and Parameterization (Oracle)

Scripting using Java Scripts, Perl, ksh, csh, bsh, bash

Software Development using C, C++, Pascal, SQL, Java, HTML, XML, etc

Functional and Integration Testing

Site Commissioning of delivered SCADA/'DMS/EMS systems

Warranty support and maintenance for delivered projects

Requirements

Degree in Computer Science/Computer Engineering

5 to 10 years’ experience in SCADA/EMS/DMS systems or Real Time software development in a UNIX/LINUX environment.

Good Pay + Good allowance + Good Bonus

Interested candidates please send an updated Resume / CV in Ms Word format to lilian@recruitflash.com or WhatsApp’s your resume to 98332779 ( no Calls)

Consultant in-charge : Quah Li Lian (Lilian) ( Registration No: R1983286 )
Desired Skills and Experience
Perl, Oracle, XML, Modeling, HTML, Scripting, Electrical, IP, System Administration, Warranty, Routers, Software Configuration Management, Pascal, Integration Testing, Commissioning, C++"
"Agile Developer (Java, up to $7,000)","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Maintain a large-scale enterprise web application systems
Work with customers in user story elaboration and effort estimation.
Implement microservices with container related technologies (Docker, Kubernetes)
Set-up continuous integration and continuous delivery (CI/CD) automation.
Requirements
Degree and above
At least 2 years of experience in agile projects
Proficient in Java programming language
Experience in frontend framework (HTML5/Angular/React)
If you are keen to apply for the position, kindly email your detailed resume in MS Word to hr@recruit-expert.com

Please note that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

For more job opportunities, please visit our website at www.recruit-expert.com

EA Licence: 19C9701

Registration: R1326740
Desired Skills and Experience
Microsoft Technologies, Agile Methodolgy, Java Application Development, Agile Project Management, Development, AngularJS, system, Agile Methodologies, web application, Agile, HTML5, HTML 5, Java, Angular JS, Agile Development"
C# .NET Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Responsibilities
Develop, maintain and support custom-built software application
Develop software solutions for interfacing with customised hardware
Preparation of technical documentation on Jira and Confluence
Provide post-implementation support and carry out investigation and troubleshooting when necessary
Requirements
At least 2 years of development experience in C# .NET
Experience using React or any other javascript framework
Experience in relational databases such as MySQL and MSSQL
Experience working with artificial intelligence and recognition is a plus
Experience dealing with inputs due to hardware interface changes is a plus

Desired Skills and Experience
Git, Confluence, ReactJS, Troubleshooting, .NET, C#.NET, JavaScript, Enterprise Software, SQL, JIRA, Agile Scrum, REST APIs, Software Development, Hibernate"
Full-Stack System Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Our company is an innovative and forward-looking payments fintech that provides value-added card services with the most advanced technology to our customers and partners.

We offer attractive remuneration packages and reward schemes, and invite the talents to join our big family.

We believe in empowering our people with opportunities to grow and take charge of their career paths.

Responsibilities
Design, develop and deploy services capable of meeting the anticipated load, performance, availability, security, and resilience requirements
Provide insights on new technology trends in financial and internet industries and carry out implementation in the organization
Perform software development and testing, system design, system analysis and problem solving
Implement new technologies and develop technical products in some major projects
Define and enforce best practices, develop and maintain framework/standards to improve the quality of the deliverables
Train and provide guidance to junior staff
Requirements
University graduate in computer science or related discipline
5-7 years of hands-on system design and development experience in banking or related industries with implementation experience in at least 3 medium and large scale core projects as System Architect / System Analyst
Experience in banking industry will be an advantage
Experience in JAVA and knowledge in framework (e.g. Java, EE,Spring,Spring boot)
Solid hands-on experience in web-based / API-based / development with web (Restful API, XML, JSON, HTML5, CSS, JavaScript, VUE,Bootstrap, Angularjs)
Proficient in Oracle / MySQL database, Windows or Unix / Linux servers, PL/SQL, stored procedure
In-depth understanding of architecture design theory and system operation mechanism with practical experience
With IT or Internet architecture experience is preferred
Familiar with the cutting-edge FinTech will be an advantage
Good communication Skill is an advantage as the successful candidates needs to liaise with internal and external stakeholders.

Desired Skills and Experience
JSON, CSS, Oracle, XML, Architect, AngularJS, MySQL, JavaScript, HTML5, Unix, Windows, Java, API, Linux, Software Development"
Banking Site Reliability Engineer - Changi Business Park*,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
We are a top 8 global IT services company with operations in 50+ countries. We offer an advanced portfolio of application, business process, cloud, and infrastructure services to businesses and governments worldwide.

NTT DATA Singapore PTE Ltd is a wholly-owned subsidiary of NTT DATA Corp, a part of NTT Group, the world’s 65th Largest Company according to Fortune Magazine. The Singapore entity of NTT DATA is an S10 government-registered supplier and forms the core of NTT DATA’s APAC operations and is positioned as a gateway of our global capabilities in Singapore and the APAC region.

At NTT DATA SINGAPORE, we pride ourselves on being an inclusive and equal opportunity employer that puts our people and clients first. We welcome different ideas, backgrounds and passionate individuals to join us in our inclusive environment to achieve stronger and better results through teamwork, foresight, and innovation. We pledge to create a harmonious and nurturing culture, where all individuals feel a sense of pride and belonging, regardless of age, gender identity, race, sexual orientation, physical or mental ability, ethnicity.

What do we offer?

Direct Contract for 12 MONTHS, Renewable subjected to Performance

Work Location: Changi Business Park

Salary: Up to 8k as per experience

Our Client is the largest local bank in Singapore, operating across 18 markets.

Interested Candidatess please send your resume to huiting.khoo at apac.nttdata.com

Requirements
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field with good experience working with contemporary technologies and scripting languages.
Strong communication skills and ability to explain protocol and processes with team and management
A passion for learning and using new technologies in the open source communities.
A passion for coding.
4 or more years of IT work experience.
Working knowledge of Grafana, Prometheus, Elastic stack (Elasticsearch / Logstash / Kibana / Beats) including data ingestion, management, monitoring & analytics. Able to perform L1/2 ELK related tasks.
In-depth experience in Unix/Linux/Shell/Python scripting.
Knowledgeable and experienced in SRE (Site Reliability Engineering) practices covering monitoring, observability, performance management, automation, and resiliency.
Good understanding of Network routing, Load balancing and Networking protocols; a base knowledge of TCP/IP, with an understanding of HTTP and DNS
Ability to contribute to discussions on design and strategy.
Adequate knowledge of database systems (RDBMS, MariaDB, SQL, NOSQL), Object Oriented Programming and web application development.
Good problem diagnosis and creative problem-solving skills
Experience in NodeJS, Spring boot and Kafka and would be a plus.
Experience in automation tools (e.g. Ansible) & DevOps pipelines would be a plus.
Self-driven, committed, and reliable team player.
Responsbilities
Implement and maintain highly resilient, highly available data engineering, monitoring and analytics application clusters. Perform production support for the platform.
Setup the server infrastructure as per design. Ensure implementation meets bank’s security standards and industry’s security standards.
Perform continuous improvement for the platform covering areas such as: capacity planning, observability, monitoring, reliability, and resiliency.
Design and develop data engineering pipelines.
Automate repetitive tasks, optimize processes and perform thorough testing to ensure quality.
Create and maintain software documentation for the platform.
Perform application maintenance, patching and upgrades.
Ensure on-time delivery of tasks and projects.
Ensure continuous uptime of applications and services.
Ensure no security or audit issues.
Comply to bank standards to track and follow up on the assigned projects.
Cover all areas in application and infrastructure operations of the platform.
Benefits
14 Days Annual Leave
14 Days Medical Leave
Medical Insurance Coverage
Interested Candidatess please send your resume to huiting.khoo at apac.nttdata.com
Desired Skills and Experience
HTTP, DevOps, Pipelines, Software Documentation, Automation Tools, Scripting, Routing, Reliability, Data Engineering, SQL, Reliability Engineering, Networking, Technical Consultation, Banking, Web Application Development, Ansible, DNS"
"Software Programmer (Java/J2EE, Linux/Unix)","This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Job Description

Develop and maintain applications using Java to integrate SECS/GEM equipment with MES system.

Requirements
At least 3 years’ experience in Java application development and familiar with OO concept (must have).
Experience with SECS/GEM protocol used for equipment integration is a plus
Experience in working with Oracle PL/SQL
Experience working in Linux OS environment.
Experience in working with MES and shop floor automation.
Familiar with the concept of messaging bus (eg: Tibco R/V)
Experience in semiconductor industry and understand the concept of SPC.

Desired Skills and Experience
MES, Machine Learning, Semiconductor Industry, JavaSE, Java code, Application Development, JavaScript, Protocol, Core Java, Semiconductors, Java, Semiconductor Process, Manufacturing Execution Systems, Linux, J2EE, SECS/GEM, Semiconductor technology"
MSSQL Database Administrator-Singapore,"ABOUT US

Amaris Consulting is an independent technology consulting firm providing guidance and solutions to businesses.
With more than 1000 clients across the globe, we have been rolling out solutions in major projects for over a decade – this is made possible by an international team of 6000 people spread across 5 continents and more than 60 countries.
Our solutions focus on four different Business Lines: Information System & Digital, Telecom, Life Sciences and Engineering.
We’re focused on building and nurturing a top talent community where all our team members can achieve their full potential.
Amaris is your steppingstone to cross rivers of change, meet challenges and achieve all your projects with success.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Services & system deployment:
Set up Databases infrastructure architecture in APAC ( SG, HK, JP, IN) :
Capacity planning, optimization & upgrade
Configuration & customisation
DR/Off country DR strategy planning
Maintenance & Support:
Provide Incident troubleshooting and support for the Databases infrastructure, assist providing 1st to 3rd level support during night support. Working hours 9:00-6:00 calls; WE support
DB’s performance monitoring and fine-tuning
DB’s problem management and recovery
DB’s provisioning and usage control
Maintain and participate regional DR drills
dashboard and charge-out report

REQUIREMENTS
5-8 years working experience.

Equal opportunity
Amaris Consulting is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to promoting diversity within the workforce and creating an inclusive working environment. For this purpose, we welcome applications from all qualified candidates regardless of gender, sexual orientation, race, ethnicity, beliefs, age, marital status, disability or other characteristics."
Category Project Manager (e-commerce) - Singapore,"Responsibilities

TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated.

With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users.

We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In this role, you will be responsible for developing categories and the corresponding sub-categories conducting prioritization of subcategories, leads identification, leads generation, acquisition, incubation, and performance improvement & management.

Join us as we drive the future of e-commerce here at TikTok.

Responsibilities:
- Organize and coordinate cross-departmental resources to define and support business growth activities
- Support strategic projects to drive platform growth, including GMV, buyer CRM, seller program adoption rate, and other key metrics with cross-functional partners such as seller management, marketing, and operations
- Collaborate with other functional teams to promote the optimization of governance, strategy, data, and product teams
- Collaborate with our team to analyze different categories to gain insights into their strengths, challenges, and areas for improvement

Qualifications

- Minimum Bachelor's degree or above
- 2-4 years of experience in e-commerce platform, consulting firm or internet strategy, industry or market research, and business analytics with eCommerce relevant experience
- Highly analytical, logical, and problem-solving skills with good attention to detail
- Big picture thinking, structured, organized, and experienced in managing projects on different scales (planning, root cause identification, risk mitigation, and process optimization)
- Adaptable, fast learner, highly motivated, and versatile player with some exposure in operation and commercial
- Proficiency in English

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Finance Technology - Regulatory Reporting Software Engineer, Associate","The Finance Risk Data and Controls (FRDC) Technology organization is seeking strong engineer who wants to join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products in Regulatory Reporting Technology function.

In This Role, a Successful Candidate Will

The ideal candidate enjoys building, supporting, and the evolution of software applications, and has a strong understanding of designing and building applications in a variety of technologies as well as manage communication with stakeholders.

Manage and support a portfolio of production applications which includes in-house, on premise, and vendor products like Oracle OFSAA, WKFS, etc.
Make sound architectural decisions around Regulatory Reporting application components
Identify gaps and weaknesses in existing applications and design and implement remediation of these gaps
Engage with development team throughout the life cycle to help develop solutions for reliability and scale, ensuring minimal refactoring or changes
Design automated software, testing, and product upgrades, change management, release management solutions
Work to improve the stability of applications in the production environment
Ensure changes to the applications follow a disciplined change management processes including all documentation, reviews, and approval steps
Ensure adherence to design and coding standards
Define and execute test cases for quality of deliverables
Liaise with stakeholders from various teams which includes Finance, Corporate Controllers, Product Controllers within the region as well as global for all cycles (development, testing, implementation, post release)

Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree in computer science/Finance or equivalent.
Minimum 3 years of experience in Oracle PL/SQL.
Hands on experience in writing complex SQL queries and defining DB objects.
Good Knowledge on Stored Procedures/Packages, Functions and Triggers.
Strong Unix and Shell scripting knowledge.
Good knowledge of Regulatory Reporting applications/tools
Three years or more in Python or Java or equivalent development experience.
Understanding of Agile methodology and leveraging SDLC tools to improve development and testing efficiency (JIRA, Jenkins, GIT etc.).
Self-motivated team player.
Must possess the ability to research and resolve issues independently while working across teams to acquire needed information.
Strong analytical & problem-solving skills.
Ability to work under pressure within agreed timelines and support multiple tasks in parallel.
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Exposure to Cloud based application development platform such as AWS/Azure/GCP is a plus

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.

We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Solution Architect - Singapore,"At EY, you’ll have the chance to build a career as unique as you are, with the global scale, support, inclusive culture and technology to become the best version of you. And we’re counting on your unique voice and perspective to help EY become even better, too. Join us and build an exceptional experience for yourself, and a better working world for all.

If we inspire you to do the work you love, will you still call it work?

What's in it for you?

EY DnA is the data and advanced analytics capability within EY Asia-Pacific, with over 500 specialist employees working across multiple industry sectors. You will shape, change, and deliver a data management roadmap to improve and enhance the value and re-usability of data, through modern and evolving data management practices and frameworks.

As our Solutions Architect you'll play a key role in driving solution architecture design, evaluation and selection, buy vs. build decisions, and early-phase project estimates which contribute to the business case. You will partner with key roles (eg. project managers, business analysts, etc) to create solutions that are aligned to architecture standards and principles, leverage common solutions and services, and meet the financial targets (costs and benefits).

What We're Looking For

Here's our wish list but don't worry if you don't tick all the boxes. We're interested in your strengths, what you want to learn, and how far you want to go.

Strong cloud architecture expertise (Azure, AWS) across large projects Strong solution implementation experience (platform engineering, developer experience)
Experience with DevOps and agile delivery (code management, CI/CD, modular design)
Experience in requirements gathering and documentation
Strong ability to effectively engage and collaborate with a range of stakeholders
Demonstrated experience leading teams

To qualify for the role you must have

Demonstrated experience in Big Data, data warehouse, data analytics projects, and/or any Information Management related projects
Prior experience building large scale enterprise data architectures using commercial and/or open source Data Analytics technologies
Strong knowledge of data engineering discipline including ability to design efficient ETL/ELT architectures to build and maintain complex queries, streaming and real-time data pipelines
Data modelling and architecting skills including strong foundation in data warehousing concepts, data normalisation, dimensional data modelling and a variety of data models including data vault

Ideally, you’ll also have

Experience in engaging with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Strong consulting experience and background, including engaging directly with clients

What We Look For

Highly motivated individuals with excellent problem-solving skills and the ability to prioritize shifting workloads in a rapidly changing industry. An effective communicator, you’ll be a confident leader equipped with strong people management skills and a genuine passion to make things happen in a dynamic organization.

What Working At EY Offers

EY offers a competitive remuneration package where you’ll be rewarded for your individual and team performance. We are committed to being an inclusive employer and are happy to consider flexible working arrangements. Plus, we offer:

Support, coaching and feedback from some of the most engaging colleagues around
Opportunities to develop new skills and progress your career
The freedom and flexibility to handle your role in a way that’s right for you

About EY

As a global leader in assurance, tax, transaction and advisory services, we hire and develop the most passionate people in their field to help build a better working world. This starts with a culture that believes in giving you the training, opportunities and creative freedom to make things better. So that whenever you join, however long you stay, the exceptional EY experience lasts a lifetime.

If you can confidently demonstrate that you meet the criteria above, please contact us as soon as possible.

Join us in building a better working world. Apply now.

Want to get to know us better?

Visit ey.com/sg/careers

Become a fan on Facebook: facebook.com/EYCareersSingapore

Follow us on Instagram: instagram.com/EYSGCareers

Connect with us on LinkedIn: bit.ly/EYLinked_Careers

Watch us on YouTube: youtube.com/ernstandyoungglobal

EY | Building a better working world

Our preferred applicant will be required to undertake employment screening by EY or our external third-party provider."
OutSystems Software Developer (1 year contract),"The KPMG Digital Transformation team assists organisations in the development of digital products, solutions and services, including digital strategy and enterprise architecture, digital target operating model, digital labour, digital technologies and solution. Our goal is assist clients to understand technology trends and changes, and make the right technology choices to develop a business advantage.

The role includes:
Developing software using Agile methodology
Collaborating closely with Business Analysts and Quality Control Engineers for user stories elaboration, testing activities and bug fixing
Responsible for providing estimates for user stories during sprint planning
Responsible for converting acceptance criteria into automated unit tests
Championing Agile technical practices such as test-driven development, pair programming, and refactoring
Involving in application deployment

The ideal candidate should possess:
Degree or Diploma in Computer Science, Business or related IT discipline
At least 3 years of hands-on Full Stack experience of developing cloud-native applications using .NET Framework and interested in Outsystems
Working experiment on OutSystems projects will be an added advantage
Working experience in Agile software development and technical practices
Familiar with OOP programing and Design pattern
Familiar with HTML5, CSS and JavaScript frameworks
Working experience with interfacing using SOAP/REST API technologies
Working experience in full-stack development will be an added advantage
Working experience in Oracle database, SQL and PLSQL scripting will be an added advantage
Working experience in setting up, configuring and administrating Microsoft IIS will be an added advantage
Experience in workflow products
Positive and willing to learn new technologies
Ability to understand complex systems and think strategically about business, products and technical challenges
Team player and passionate in championing the team to continuously refactor and improve to deliver the quality software product

Only shortlisted candidates will be contacted by KPMG Talent Acquisition team, personal data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only.

At KPMG in Singapore we are committed to creating a diverse and inclusive workplace. We believe that diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. As an equal opportunity employer, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of age, race, gender identity or expression, colour, marital status, religion, sexual orientation, disability, or other non-merit factors. We celebrate the different talents that our people bring and support every staff member in their journey to achieve personal and professional growth. One of the ways we do this is through Take Charge: Flexi-work, our flexible working framework which enables agile and innovative teams to help deliver our business goals."
"Associate, Data Solutions & Analytics, Private Markets (2 year contract) 14890","The Investment Services Private Market and Finance Department is responsible for investment services for the private market and financial management across the GIC group. It is responsible for providing operations and reporting support to the private market business of GIC as well as budgeting, accounting, payment processing, cash management, tax and financial & management reporting services to all departments, corporate management companies and the global offices of the GIC group. It is involved in deal structuring and closing, transaction processing, administration and accounting of investment holding companies, review of financial controls for asset operations, cash & securities reconciliation, valuation, and financial reporting for assets under management, and external debt financing.


Data Solutions & Analytics’ (DSA) vision is to unlock the value of Private Market’s information assets and make it readily available to support decision-making and informed action. We provide best-in-class data stewardship, sourcing, ingestion, analytics, and governance across the private market asset classes in GIC. Partnering with investment, technology, and investment services groups, it leads the transformational sourcing, designing, build and use of the next generation of data management capabilities and infrastructure for GIC’s Private Market business.

We are hiring an Associate (2-year contract) for DSA, to push business agenda and implement transformational projects in data solutions and management.

Key responsibilities:

Manage data operations processes to bring in asset-level data on GIC’s private markets investments into the GIC environment, including handling of operational and non-routine queries/requests from business users and external information providers
Design, develop and implement sustainable processes and controls to ensure consistent high standards of data quality and governance
Review existing processes and implement improvements to achieve robust ways of processing data and advancement in productivity
Investigate and resolve data exceptions and data quality issues. Identify roadblocks in achieving high standards of data quality and design solutions to enable better outcomes
Implement data projects that improve the efficiency of data operations, including but not limited to data collection outsourcing and working with business to optimize data collection processes

Requirements:

At least 3 years of relevant experience in data solutioning and management, project management and process re-engineering
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science & Engineering, Finance or equivalent
Exposure to financial services industries and or data outsourcing projects, specifically private markets is a huge bonus
Possess knowledge and strong passion in data governance and management
Ability to engage with business to understand business needs and translating them into data solutions
Strong communication and people engagement skills to be able to interact internally within team and externally across functions
Possess strong learning agility, self-driven, pro-active, and great sense of purpose to relook on existing data usage
Proficiency in MS Office applications, VBA, SQL and Python
Comfortable in attaining new skills through use of new technology tools and systems
Strong analytical skills and ability to work with large volume of data

Language:

As the incumbent will work closely with counterparties in the non-English market, business level fluency in non-English languages (including, but not limited to Mandarin, Japanese and Korean) would be an added advantage for this role.
GIC is a values driven organization. GIC’s PRIME Values act as our compass, enabling us to fulfil our fundamental purpose and objectives. It is the foundational bedrock which governs our behaviors, our decision making, and our focus. It informs both our long-term strategy as a firm, and the way we relate to our Client, business partners and employees. PRIME stands for Prudence, Respect, Integrity, Merit and Excellence."
Sales Operations Associate,"Secretlab is an international gaming chair brand seating over a million users worldwide, with our key markets in the United States, Europe and Singapore, where we are headquartered.

You will be a valued member of our Corporate Sales team, being a crucial point-of-contact for the team with our corporate customers in the Global market. This role requires strong interpersonal, strategic, and analysis skills, allowing our brand to develop strong and lasting relationships with clients while delivering world-class service to match the product.

Our Corporate Sales team represents our brand to all corporate clients as Secretlab continues to grow its reach through internal and collaborative efforts with world-renowned brands such as Game of Thrones, Batman, Cloud9, Team Secret, as well as international esports organisers such as Riot Games for their League of Legends global tournaments.

Responsibilities
Act as a key point of contact for Corporate Sales related activities and analyses.
Help to support business needs e.g. issuing quotation, invoicing, reporting, contracting, analysis, working with sales team, finance, logistics team and other stakeholders.
Assist in the maintenance of customer/partner master data, including account attributes, legal agreements and CRM account.
Participate in corporate sales and marketing discussions to contribute insights on new process & tool implementations.
Prepare periodic reports and analyses on sales operations performance.
Any other ad hoc activities to support the Corporate Sales team.

Requirements
Min Diploma in Business or a relevant field.
Minimum of 2 years’ relevant experience in sales support, business development, or account management.
Experience handling corporate customers, ideally with experience in the furniture industry preferable.
Ability to build and maintain business relations
Organized and analytical work approach, while maintaining adaptability to rapidly evolving business landscapes
Hardworking and reliable

Bonuses
Passion for the gaming industry
Experienced in CRM tools"
"Supply Chain Digital and Data Lead, MedTech Asia Pacific","Job Description

Johnson & Johnson has immense focus on Digital and Data globally. Business enabled through Digital, and Data has been in the business strategic priorities for 2022 and beyond.
Johnson & Johnson supply chain is amongst the top three in the world as per Gartner. It is fast transforming further by adopting digital ways of doing business
MedTech focuses on Medical Devices Business at Johnson & Johnson. It is a fast-growing sector.
Asia Pacific region (comprising of 14 countries) is the fastest growing region in Johnson and Johnson globally. The technology and supply chain need to keep pace with the growth in business in this region. The growth in the region has opened many exciting opportunities for adoption of Digital and Data in Supply Chain
The role supports approx. $6 Bn USD Business in Asia Pacific under the Digital Supply Chain Transformation for MedTech Sector

Position Summary

The role entails idea generation, understand requirements, and translate into functional and technical specifications and solutions.
Collaborate with regional, cluster and global business partners/ product owners to shape and execute initiatives that will help the Asia Pacific MedTech achieve its Supply Chain Digital ambition.
The role expects to fully leverage new and existing technology platforms with a focus on meeting internal customers and external customers’ business objectives
Based on a deep understanding of the SC capabilities and customer needs, this role brings strong technology knowledge to the table to shape and unlock relevant use cases.
In this role, you will be part of the APAC regional Supply Chain Digital chapter and global Supply Chain digital council representing the regional MedTech team to shape the strategy, execution and to deliver best in class digital and data capabilities in the end-to-end digital MedTech supply chain

Responsibilities / Key Jobs To Be Done
Understand the market and franchise challenges to identify region level business opportunities
Shape and lead regional Digital and Data E2E solutions in APAC Region
E2E supply chain visibility, Control Tower, Data Strategy, Digital capability enhancement initiatives like collaborative demand portal, Intelligent Automation, Demand sensing, China Digital Strategy
Understand Global initiatives and their applicability in the regional clusters
Collaborate with global Digital and Data teams to help shape global initiatives based on APAC needs and improve the capabilities in APAC
Acts as a proactive technology partner, develops business relationships acting as the SPOC (Single Point Of Contact)
Translate advanced business analytics problems into technical approaches
Drive the selection of product/platform solution options to assess technical elements of the solution, drive build versus buy decisions understanding the detailed architecture
Partner with Data Science team to drive digital through the development and implementation of digital models across digital channels
Develop digital analytics service strategy and roadmap, collaborate with business and global DS and Digital teams to meet annual digital service target
Project manage complex work streams and initiatives across digital business objectives in supply chain
Oversee the design and delivery of reports and insights that analyze business functions and key operations and performance metrics
Partner with business teams to accelerate digital acumen in the region
Enable self-service and automation capabilities in the region
Enable communication and change management for adoption of Digital ways of working
Recruit, train, develop and supervise analyst-level employees.
Anticipate future demands of initiatives related to people, technology, budget and business within supply chain and design/project monitor implementation of solutions to meet these needs.
Organize and drive successful completion of data insight initiatives through effective management of analyst and data employees and effective collaboration with stakeholders.
Working with business leadership on the creation of new digital and data capabilities for the business by envisioning products and services that will create measurable improvement in our supply chain performance.
Design effective data architecture and technology infrastructure to support analytics activities
Strategy to prioritize investments in digital and data.

Key Skills

Strong technical understanding of the digital, data and BI technologies products
Experience on at least one data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau, QlikView)
Advanced knowledge of SQL, shell scripting, Python/R, and MS excel.
Experience in developing systems and tools to enable end to end supply chain digital and data capabilities to serve the customer (example - IoT, RPA, Intelligent Automation, Data science, AI, Machine learning, understanding of data platforms like Microsoft Azure, AWS, Cloudera, Tableau)
Thought leader, focusing on agility, agile delivery with a fail-fast mindset, and measurable outcomes
Proven ability to work cross-functionally and delivering automated solutions for customer-facing data science problems.
Skilled in creating and delivering presentations to all audiences, including executives.
Fosters a culture of empowerment and accountability brings clarity around purpose and vision, eliminate barriers, and pushes decision making to the lowest appropriated level
Anticipates and communicates the need for change and innovation in an empathetic & influential manner to ensure that the business responds to demands in an agile, positive, proactive way
Deep understanding of the customer needs, ability to create a value proposition for the customer and a vision for the Product Group that best support business goals
Technical aptitude and familiarity with the design and use of complex supply chain software systems - ERP, Plan, Make, Customer Service and logistics
Strong individual contributor who can work with minimal direction and oversight
Experience working effectively with software engineering teams, Enterprise architects, Data Science teams

Major Duties & Responsibilities

Accountable for for Supply Chain MedTech Digital and Data strategy and execution for the region. Shape and lead regional Digital and Data initiatives in APAC Region
E2E supply chain visibility, Data Strategy, Digital capability enhancement initiatives like collaborative demand portal, Intelligent Automation, Demand sensing, China Digital Strategy
Build strong partnerships and connections with technology providers, internal & external partners, partner with business teams to accelerate the digital & data roadmap and the overall digital acumen in the region
Recruit, train, develop and supervise analyst-level employees

Required Minimum Education: Bachelor’s degree in the field of engineering, technology, or Business administration

Required Years of Related Experience: 10-15 years of overall experience in technology in supply chain functions/related and in Data & Analytics field

Required Knowledge, Skills And Abilities

Knowledgeable on the technical concepts, prominent and emerging industry solutions and business process understanding in one or more of the following:
Supply chain business processes and systems – ERP, Plan, Make, Customer Service and Logistics
Thought leader in defining and developing technology digital and data landscape that supports end to end Supply Chain digital transformation
Data and Analytics- tools and strategy like Cloudera, Azure, Tableau, Qlik, Alteryx
Experienced in Data Engineering & Analytics, Cybersecurity, Emerging Technologies, Decision Science & Intelligent Automation, Cloud DevOps & Security, Device / Software / Platform Engineering
MedTech business knowledge is an added advantage
Strong Business Acumen & Communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to work with business partners to understand business requirements and define the priorities and roadmaps with the associated capabilities.
Experience in effectively collaborating and managing stakeholders
Project Management experience in deployment of major IT capabilities
Experience working in a Shared Services IT Operating model where development and support services are provided by shared services organizations that support multiple functional and organizational units
Leadership experience in building teams with the above capabilities

Travel on the Job: Occasional travel in APAC with a few inter regional trip in a year

Required Years of People Management Experience: 5 years (SA management experience counted)

Preferred Minimum Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in computer science, Data Science or business administration and/or Master of Business administration with technology as a core component preferred

Preferred Area of Study: Computer Science, Supply Chain management, Data & Analytics

Preferred Related Industry Experience: Health Care

Preferred Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Implementing advanced technology or innovative solutions across multiple sites and locations; Supply Chain, ERP-SAP, advanced planning, customer service capabilities and logistics

At Johnson & Johnson, we’re on a mission to change the trajectory of health for humanity. That starts by creating the world’s healthiest workforce. Through cutting-edge programs and policies, we empower the physical, mental, emotional and financial health of our employees and the ones they love. As such, depending on location and subject to local legislation, candidates offered employment may be required to show proof of COVID-19 vaccination or, in certain countries, secure an approved accommodation prior to the commencement of employment to support the well-being of our employees, their families and the communities in which we live and work. If you are invited to interview for the position, your recruiter will advise on the vaccine requirement status in your geographic location.

Primary Location

Asia Pacific-Singapore-Singapore-Singapore

Other Locations

Asia Pacific-China-Shanghai-Shanghai

Organization

Johnson & Johnson Pte. Ltd. (8435)

Job Function

Business Relationship Management

Job Qualifications

Required Qualifications"
Senior Associate Engineer (Business Continuity Management),"Job description
Maintain proper documentation of Networks Group Business Continuity Management (BCM) Policy & Guidelines, Risk Assessment, Business Impact Analysis and Business Continuity Plan
Review and assess risk/threats arising from changes in the regulatory, organization structure, people, process and environment
Recommend risk treatment for identified risks to BCMS Steering Committee
Conduct Annual Network Call Tree Exercise
Work actively with team members to drive Annual Network Exercise
Implement programs such as BCM-related training modules or workshops to improve BCM Awareness
Collaborate closely with Network stakeholders to ensure successful BCM ISO 22301 certification audits, conducted annually
Support BCM Lead to work with Division BCM representative for all BCM related activities including Covid-19 activities, to ensure all timeline are met
We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated.
The Ideal candidate should possess:
Minimum Diploma in any discipline
At least 2 years’ experience working in a similar role doing Business Continuity Management Programme. Prior working experience in Telecommunications or Information Technology Company would be advantageous
Good report writing skills
Conversant in the use of Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint
Ability to work independently and able to adapt to a dynamic environment
Team player with strong interpersonal skills
Strong planning and project management skills"
Data Strategist (CDO Office),"The Government Technology Agency (GovTech) aims to transform the delivery of Government digital services by taking an ""outside-in"" view, putting citizens and businesses at the heart of everything we do. We also develop the Smart Nation infrastructure and applications, and facilitate collaboration with citizens and businesses to co-develop technologies.

Join us as we support Singapore’s vision of building a Smart Nation - a nation of possibilities empowered through info-communications technology and related engineering.

The Data strategist will manage the whole process of identifying the data needed for business success, working in partnership with business colleagues, analysts, data management and data governance, data scientists and business portfolio managers. You will help to identify datasets that are likely to show promise and fit the requirements of the business. You will also assist in moving the business strategy forward by understanding the data required.

What you will be working on:

Design innovative enterprise data strategies that will enable a consistent, trusted, and available data across the company supporting growth and productivity for the enterprise
Work with business and product teams to understand opportunities to collect, source, use data to further enable new products, features, and solutions to meet business goals
Identify and drive enterprise data programs across the organization that develops our muscle in Data Governance, Data Quality, and Master Data Management
Design enterprise, business and product frameworks and target operating models to be adopted across the company in support of new data capabilities as appropriate
Design and implement strategies that will achieve growth and productivity through process automation
Enable effective, efficient working relationship with business and technology partners
Responsible for strategy programs scope, change, issue and risk management within the CDO office;
Ensure data governance and management processes are followed and adhered to
Enable greater data usage and understand data rights to further enable data innovation

What we are looking for:

Passion and love for data is paramount.
Strong understanding of the different elements of Data Science & AI, and the general sense of the common tools and products associated with it.
Possess strategic and critical thinking mindset, with strong ability to articulate concepts, strategies, issues and challenges with clear framing.
Excellent written and presentation skills required.
Strong leadership and management skills with proven stakeholder management experience.
Project management experience will come in handy when charting out strategic plans that are well grounded.
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or equivalent.
Minimum 8 years of relevant experience in strategic planning, data analytics and related domains.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company as we believe that diversity is meaningful to innovation. Our employee benefits are based on a total rewards approach, offering a holistic and market-competitive suite of perks. This includes generous leave benefits to meet your work-life needs. We trust that you will get the job done wherever you are, and whatever works best for you – so work from home or take a break to exercise if you need to*. We also believe it’s important for you to keep honing your craft in the constantly-evolving tech landscape, so we provide and support a plethora of in-house and external learning and development opportunities all year round.

Subject to the nature of your job role that might require you to be onsite during fixed hours"
Senior Fullstack Lead Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Minimum of 8+ years development experience, preferably with a Java/.Net background
Min 5 years of as Technical Lead, managing & monitoring developers.
Experience in frontend technologies (HTML, CSS and JS/TS) as well as any web framework (React, Angular, Vue etc)
Experience in backend JavaScript (Node.js)/TypeScript or other backend frameworks
Experience in Ralational Database Management System (Postgres, MySQL, MS SQL, etc) and NoSQL (MongoDB, etc).
Experience with automated testing
Experience in using CI/CD pipelines for deployment automation.
Experience with deployments on cloud infrastructure (AWS preferred, Azure, GCP)
Experience in building and deploying applications to containerised environment (Docker, Kubernetes, etc)
Takes ownership of work, delivering solutions end-to-end with minimal support

Desired Skills and Experience
MongoDB, Troubleshooting, CSS, Kubernetes, Azure, Pipelines, HTML, MySQL, JavaScript, Enterprise Software, SQL, Angular, Docker, Web API, C#, Github"
Engineering Manager II,"About Us

Circles.Life revolutionizes the digital services industry by giving power back to our customers. Born in Singapore as Asia’s first and most successful digital mobile services, our services have been rapidly gaining market share since our 2016 launch, while delivering best-in-class customer experience. We are owning the market in innovation, customer happiness and growth.

Looking ahead, Circles.Life plans to further leverage its telco technology, including a new digital data platform to create more lifestyle products. Discover, an AI-driven events feature, is the first of many more.

We are committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment.

Do you want to get firsthand insights on how a hyper-growth company operates and be part of building disruptive technology? Are you passionate about being part of a fun, ambitious team that thrives in an entrepreneurial tech environment?

If the answer is YES, read on to find out more!

About This Role

We are looking for an Engineering Manager II who will be responsible for leading a team of high performing engineers and delivery teams.

As a key member of our team, your responsibilities include:
Leading and working closely with engineering teams to develop the best technical design,strategy and execution of capabilities
Owning the delivery of various timelines, ensuring that key milestones are met and deliveries are of the highest quality.
Taking end to end ownership of the assigned domain within the platform driving the engineering excellence of services from a quality, security, availability, scalability and other “ilities” perspective
Work closely with the Architects and principal engineers from the architecture team to ensure the domains under your purview are compliant to the agreed upon architectural guardrails
Proactively monitor and manage the progress of the deliverables, identify risks and eliminate the roadblocks
Establishing various best practices for software development (eg. documentation, testing), and encouraging their adoption with the team and organization.
Ability to be hands on and get into the weeds is crucial.
Collaborating with other non-technical stakeholders of the business which includes Product Managers, Designers etc.
Mentoring an excellent team of talented engineers and working with Engineering leadership to coach and upskill junior developers.
Enable and unblock the teams by proactively removing any roadblocks
Conducting performance reviews and defining each individual’s career paths to help developers grow within the organization
Proactive resource planning to achieve a smooth delivery and proactively drive hiring on time with the help of TA teams - Take ownership of hiring for your team.
Work closely with the engineering partners to align and onboard the contractors on time to manage and achieve delivery targets
Required Qualifications
Degree / Masters in Computer Science, Software Engineering or equivalent
At least 10+ years’ of hands-on engineering experience and passion with a track record of handling various deliveries, of which 2+ years are relevant Engineering Management/ Leadership experience
Strong design and architectural experience in building various highly-scalable and highly-available cloud-based web apps (millions of consumers)
Strong understanding of Agile and the SDLC Activities which include Analysis, Design, Development, Testing, Deployment and Post-Production Support.
Strong people management skills to lead and build a high-performing team
Experience in Product Management or collaborating with Product teams and Managers
Excellent analytic, problem-solving, oral and written communication skills with the ability to thrive in a high performance team
Preferred Qualifications
Comfortable in a startup environment – we’re fast-paced, self-motivated, and determined to change the industry
Experience in product-based / hyper-growth environment highly advantageous
Experience in MicroServices based development
Experience working in an Agile environment, including practices like Continuous Integration and Delivery (CI/CD) and Test-Driven Development.
Experience working as part of and directing geographically dispersed, diverse, and virtual teams
Strong preference for people with significant hands-on expertise in one or more of these software stack
Backend: Java-Spring Boot, GoLang, Node.JS or similar stacks
Frontend: Modern Javascript, React, Redux, HTML and CSS or similar stacks
Mobile: Swift/Objective-C, Java/Kotlin or cross platform development such as Flutter, React Native, Ionic
Telco Business Support Systems: Oracle stack (BRM version 7.5 onwards/ECE/PCRF/OCOMC), and experience solutioning through major industry standard (eg. eTOM, SID, TAM, ITIL, OSS/j,TM Forum)
Familiarity with UX principles for creating delightful Customer Experiences
What’s On Offer

We provide a great environment and platform for employees to build their career. In this role, you can expect:
Unique opportunity to be a part of innovating the telecommunications industry
Once in a lifetime chance to help shape a brand from the ground up
Autonomy in the role and in managing your own portfolio
Exposure to the fast-paced world of high-tech start-ups
Attractive experience and compensation
Working with passionate, smart and driven colleagues in a vibrant environment"
Business Advisory Analyst,"Job ID:[[id]]

Location: Singapore. Local Contract will be offered. Fresh Graduates are welcome to apply!

Role Overview:

Business Advisory combines deep domain expertise with an understanding of the industry and its stakeholders to assist customers in addressing key industry transformations and ensure that safe and sustainable solutions are leveraged.

As a Business Advisory Analyst, you will provide support to clients from across the maritime value chain in their efforts to tackle business and commercial challenges. You will focus on supporting the development of management consulting solutions for clients. You will work collaboratively with a range of technical and commercial specialists on a broad range of projects to assist and coordinate services to produce deliverables for clients.

What You will Do:
To contribute to business advisory engagements by undertaking research and analysis activities.
To develop clear insights and recommendations to clients using qualitative and quantitative methods.
To work with both internal and external stakeholders to identify potential routes to arriving at answers to specific research and analysis challenges, and to suggest alternative solutions where appropriate.
To produce the required inputs within the agreed parameters in a defined format including contract terms and conditions.
To properly document research activities such that they can be referenced as part of consulting outcomes
To undertake structured analysis that can be interrogated and verified by both internal and external parties as required
Conduct activities in line with internal procedures, accreditation schemes, legislation, and industry standards.
To make suggestions to improve service delivery effectiveness through changes to processes or work scope such that it leads to a reduction in appraisal effort (where applicable).
What You will Have:
Minimum bachelor’s degree from a recognised university in maritime business, economics, engineering or equivalent course
Proficiency in the English language with excellent writing skills
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel
Able to prioritise and work effectively under pressure
Good verbal and presentation skills across all levels of internal and external stakeholders
Good interpersonal skills and an ability to communicate issues and ideas effectively
Be flexible, adaptable, and prepared to take on new challenges and work from other LR or client office locations
Be highly self-motivated, possessing strong enthusiasm and commitment to delivering sustainable outcomes
Diversity and Inclusion at Lloyd's Register:

Together we are one Lloyd’s Register, committed to developing an inclusive and safe workplace that embraces and celebrates diversity. We strive to ensure that all applicants to LR experience equality of opportunity and fair treatment, because we believe it is the right thing to do. We hope you do too.

Copyright © Lloyd's Register 2022. All rights reserved. Terms of use. Privacy policy.

The Lloyd's Register Group comprises charities and non-charitable companies, with the latter supporting the charities in their main goal of enhancing the safety of life and property, at sea, on land and in the air - for the benefit of the public and the environment. (Group entities)."
Project Engineer,"Sensia is the unification of sensing, intelligence and action. Sensia brings together the best of the best: the pioneering process automation, real-time control and IoT technologies of Rockwell Automation, combined with the unmatched measurement and instrumentation, software and analytics capabilities of Schlumberger. Sensia is further strengthened by the oil and gas domain expertise and artificial lift experience shared by Rockwell Automation and Schlumberger. The result is Sensia—the leading automation specialist in oil & gas production, transportation and processing with a team of 1,000+ experts serving customers globally. Rockwell Automation is a global technology leader focused on helping the world’s manufacturers be more productive, sustainable, and agile. With more than 25,000 employees who make the world better every day, we know we have something special. Behind our customers - amazing companies that help feed the world, provide life-saving medicine on a global scale, and focus on clean water and green mobility - our people are energized problem solvers that take pride in how the work we do changes the world for the better. We welcome all makers, forward thinkers, and problem solvers who are looking for a place to do their best work. And if that’s you we would love to have you join us! Job Description About Us Sensia is the unification of sensing, intelligence and action. Sensia brings together the best of the best: pioneering process automation, real-time control and IoT technologies of Rockwell Automation, combined with the unmatched measurement and instrumentation, software and analytics capabilities of Schlumberger. It is further strengthened by the oil and gas domain expertise and artificial lift experience shared by Rockwell Automation and Schlumberger. Job Purpose Take lead to deliver & execute the assigned O&G automation & process safety projects on time with good quality / cost effectiveness and customer satisfaction Key Responsibilities Functional: Analyzes customer's requirements to determine the optimal process control system solution and determines applicable control configuration/architecture Performs conceptual process control systems design, determination of process control system strategy, design of assembled programming May provides on-site process control system start-up as required. Need project experience in EPC (Include Marine Business) and Process safety Leadership: Plan, schedule, coordinate and monitor resources for projects including setting and managing time-scales and budgets. Provide verbal and written reports to communicate project status as required and contribute to project review meetings. Visit internal/external panel manufacturing facilities to assess progress, provide technical assistance and for final inspection and sign off. Interpersonal: Client liaison and interface with management Development and maintenance of customer relationship Team player with the ability to integrate with other team project members Business: Review project hardware/software for compliance with applicable codes/standards and assure personnel/machinery safety practices are fully implemented Attends, participates in the preparation and presentation of technical papers in industry symposiums and trade shows, as applicable Coordinate customer requirements with engineering and other appropriate departments to ensure the highest level of customer satisfaction is achieved Key Competencies Required Organizational Competencies: Contributes Professional & Technical Collaborates & Teams Effectively Communicates Effectively Adds Value for Customers & Partners Attains Results Job related competencies Upper intermediate level of expertise in the O&G industry, Integrated Architecture, Safety system & IAS / Component Industry Control, Networks, Cybersecurity Upper intermediate level of expertise in Industry Knowledge, Application Knowledge, Training Skills, and basic understanding of Project Engineering, EHS (Environment, Health & Safety). Educational Qualifications/Work Experience Minimum: Bachelor’s degree in engineering discipline or similar Related control systems application experience as follows: 5 years of experience Desired: Experience of control system applications throughout the project lifecycle from initial design concepts through to installation and subsequent client support FPSO Related Experience preferred Key Internal Stakeholders: Project Manager, Engineer, COE, Business Operations Manager, Account Manager"
DigitalBCG | DAS Consultants,"Who We Are

Boston Consulting Group partners with leaders in business and society to tackle their most important challenges and capture their greatest opportunities. BCG was the pioneer in business strategy when it was founded in 1963. Today, we work closely with clients to embrace a transformational approach aimed at benefiting all stakeholders—empowering organizations to grow, build sustainable competitive advantage, and drive positive societal impact.

Our diverse, global teams bring deep industry and functional expertise and a range of perspectives that question the status quo and spark change. BCG delivers solutions through leading-edge management consulting, technology and design, and corporate and digital ventures. We work in a uniquely collaborative model across the firm and throughout all levels of the client organization, fueled by the goal of helping our clients thrive and enabling them to make the world a better place.

Digital BCG

BCG has a long history of driving growth by embracing innovation and new ways of thinking. Through DigitalBCG, we bring together a diverse mix of consultants and digital specialists to ensure that we are supporting our clients throughout their digital transformation journeys. We work with our clients to fully understand the impact of digital on their business and set priorities that will transform their vision into value. Whether it be developing new technologies to support their core business, making better use of their data, or pursuing entirely new sources of revenue, our aim is to achieve radical improvements in productivity, flexibility, and speed. We are innovating how our clients are using artificial intelligence, robotic process automation, internet of things, personalization, blockchain technologies, and more to gain competitive advantage.

DigitalBCG encompasses a broad set of data, digital, and technology capabilities from BCG consulting teams and practices, along with our business units such as BCG Digital Ventures, BCG Platinion, and BCG GAMMA.

Practice Area Profile

BCG's Technology Advantage (TA) practice focuses on helping clients deliver competitive advantage and business superior performance through the use of data, technology and digital. TA is the fastest growing practice at BCG and at the heart of the strategic impact we have with our clients. Our consultants and experts globally work across all industries and provide deep experience and expertise across a number of topics including: * Digital Transformation * Data & Digital Platforms * Software & Agile * Digitizing the Tech Function

What You'll Do

As a DigitalBCG Consultant, you will be part of BCG teams that partner with leading companies to shift mindsets, shape agendas, and create value through digital transformation programs. The work you do every day—going deep to uncover key insights and reimagine business models—will enable our clients to compete in today’s fast-paced environment and accelerate into the digital future. You’ll build both a comprehensive consulting skillset and digital expertise by working on a mix of digital and traditional BCG client cases.

Digital Transformation & Strategy: Helping clients rethink the impact of digital on their business and accelerate their transformation efforts.
Customer Centricity: Reinventing the customer experience, leveraging journey maps, deep customer empathy, and data to create transformative digital interfaces, marketing strategies, and process innovations.
Digital Marketing & Personalization: Optimising digital marketing programs across all digital channels and levers, including precision marketing, and analytics-enabled, one-to- one personalization.
Big Data & Analytics: Driving transformational value through cutting-edge applications of AI and Machine Learning tools that are fully scaled into the business.
New Ways of Working: Building ongoing organisational change capabilities, and helping clients transform into digital enterprises that continue to develop and innovate with speed, at scale.
Transformation of the Technology Function and Technology Build: Redesigning technology functions to improve flexibility, efficiency, and Business-IT alignment.

What You'll Bring (Experience & Qualifications)

5-10 years’ experience in a strategy, management or technology consultancy; digital/tech start-up and/or industry experience
Breadth and depth across IT/digital strategy and transformation, CTO/CIO advisory, operating models, data & analytics, technology architecture, IoT etc
Thrive in a hypothesis-based environment and ability to frame strategic challenges from a digital/tech perspective
Strong analytical skills, problem solving ability and conceptual thinking
Excellent communication, story-lining, client facing and consulting skills
Strategic mindset, presence and gravitas
Bachelor's degree preferably in an IT/Computer Science, Engineering or related discipline
MBA, Masters or PHD will be highly regarded
Flexibility to travel within SEA/Asia Pacific region (once restrictions allow)."
Digital and Data Analyst,"Where you fit in

You will be partnering with business stakeholders to build truly integrated, collaborative, and competitive supply chains for Lubricants.

What’s the role?

As Digital and Data Analyst, your key accountabilities include the following:

Perform review of on digitalization project initiatives to ensure timely completion and value delivery.
Liaise with government agencies to understand their steer in Industry 4.0 and highlight fit for purpose suggestions to activities.
Extract data from data platforms, track and report Key Performance index (KPIs). KPI may include but not limited to: Overall Equipment Efficiency (OEE), Energy Performance index and CO2 footprint, Blend Right First Time (RFT), Sample Track and Trace (STT), Days in Inventory (DIO) etc.
Perform detailed data analysis on the KPIs and set target on those KPIs.
Perform data - based evaluation to identify work processes that is less than efficient and suggest area of improvements.
Perform weekly discussions and cadence with production, planning, logistic and quality team to plan and execute improvements item.
Work with internal and external stakeholders to design, execute and implement new digital tools.

What We Need From You

To succeed in this role, you will have:

Bachelor’s degree in Engineering discipline or equivalent.
Minimum 3-5 years of relevant work experience.
Awareness in Industry 4.0 and Skilled in Data analytical/ visualisation tools (Spotfire/ Phyton/ Power Bi etc).
Experience in LEAN and/or Continuous Improvement (CI) methodologies is a plus.
Demonstrated interest and outward focus on new technologies, sustainability, industry trends.
Experience with manufacturing and production operations.
Excellent communication skills across organization levels.
Strong teamwork & collaboration skills.
Basic proficiency in MS Office.

Company Description

Shell is one the largest foreign investors in Singapore and began operations in 1891. Today, we have more than 3,200 employees in Singapore alone. The Pulau Bukom Manufacturing Site today is the largest Shell refinery in the world in terms of crude distillation capacity, which makes Singapore a key regional supply and trading centre for Shell in the East. Singapore is the largest petrochemical production and export centre in the Asia Pacific region. Shell Jurong Island (SJI) manufactures petrochemicals to meet the fast-growing demand for these products in the region. We also have one of the largest single-branded retail networks in Singapore, providing customers with a wide range of quality products and services. When you join Shell in Singapore, you can count on our commitment to help you thrive and propel your career by means of our industry-leading development programme and our available and unrivalled pool of local and global experts. Our numerous global and local skill pools as well as our diversity are key to our success and continuing innovation.

An innovative place to work

There’s never been a more exciting time to work at Shell.

Join us and you’ll be adding your talent and imagination to a business with the ambition to shape the future – whether by investing in oil, gas, and renewable energy to meet demand, exploring new ways to store energy, or developing technology that helps the world to use energy more efficiently, everyone at Shell does their part.

An inclusive place to work

To power progress, we need to attract and develop the brightest minds and make sure every voice is heard. Here are just some of the ways we are nurturing an inclusive environment – one where you can express your ideas, extend your skills, and reach your potential.

We’re creating a space where people with disabilities can excel through transparent recruitment process, workplace adjustments and ongoing support in their roles. Feel free to let us know about your circumstances when you apply, and we’ll take it from there.
We’re closing the gender gap – whether that’s through action on equal pay or by enabling more women to reach senior roles in engineering and technology.
We’re striving to be a pioneer of an inclusive and diverse workplace, promoting equality for employees regardless of sexual orientation or gender identity.
We consider ourselves a flexible employer and want to support you finding the right balance. We encourage you to discuss this with us in your application.

A rewarding place to work

Combine our creative, collaborative environment and global operations with an impressive range of benefits and joining Shell becomes an inspired career choice.

We’re huge advocates for career development. We’ll encourage you to try new roles and experience new settings. By pushing people to reach their potential, we frequently help them find skills they never knew they had, or make career moves they never thought possible."
DevOps Engineer,"DevOps Engineer, Education Institute



We are partnering an established Education Technology company to identify a DevOps Engineer passionate in automating processes to support infrastructure operations on AWS cloud.



Responsibilities

You automate core processes, maintain system observability and help increase scalability and provide technical feedback on improving deployment cycles to improve business agility. You will work closely with developers to curate products at a faster pace and ensure smooth implementations of CI/CD pipelines.



Requirements



You have 2+ years of IT work experience with DevOps technologies (Jenkins/ Ansible/ Terraform etc)
Demonstrated experience working with different applications and AWS Cloud services.
Good exposure to programming languages Python, Java, etc.
Good exposure to scripting languages such as Bash, Shell, Python, etc.
Have worked using monitoring tools such as ELK, Grafana, Prometheus, FluentD, etc.
You have excellent communication and presentation skills, a team player to collaborate with International partners.


To apply, please submit your resume to May Chua at mc@kerryconsulting.com, quoting the job title. We regret that only successful shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Licence Number: 16S8060 / R2090112"
Business Development Manager (Banking),"About The Company

The client that we are partnering with is a global leader within the banking scene. They are on a scout for customer focused individuals to join their expanding team of client acquisition managers.

About The Job
Be the first touch point for the bank’s new clients
Source and generate new leads through marketing calls, networking events and partnerships with external stakeholders
Provide good customer service to clients by understanding their needs and directing them to the respective relevant department
Engage in ongoing conversations with new clients to understand their needs and requirements to assess how the bank is able to help these clients to grow their wealth to achieve their financial goals
Share about the bank’s products and offerings and evoke their interest in the banking products
Provide accurate information regarding the benefits and privileges that the client will enjoy as a customer of the bank
Comply with all regulations and controls as set by the Bank and external regulatory authorities
About The Manager/team
Supportive managers who helps the team to strive for excellence by identifying the strengths and areas of improvement for each individual team member
Strong team culture and support
Self-motivated individuals who strive in a fast moving environment
Regular performance reviews and feedback
Skills And Experience Required
Minimum degree required
Minimum 3 years of business development/sales experience
Good effective communication skills
Analytical and logical thinking
Good problem solving skills
High level of resilience
A mind towards excellence
If you're interested in the above role, click on the 'apply' function now! Alternatively, you can contact Claudia at 65103640 for a confidential discussion.

(EA: 94C3609/ R2199597)

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM’s regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents.

#seeingthepossibleinyou"
"VP, System Analyst (Digital Banking - Corporate), Group Technology (INF1_D_PYM)","About UOB

United Overseas Bank Limited (UOB) is a leading bank in Asia with a global network of more than 500 branches and offices in 19 countries and territories in Asia Pacific, Europe and North America. In Asia, we operate through our head office in Singapore and banking subsidiaries in China, Indonesia, Malaysia and Thailand, as well as branches and offices. Our history spans more than 80 years. Over this time, we have been guided by our values – Honorable, Enterprising, United and Committed. This means we always strive to do what is right, build for the future, work as one team and pursue long-term success. It is how we work, consistently, be it towards the company, our colleagues or our customers.

About The Department

Group Technology and Operations (GTO) provides software and system development, information technology support services and banking operations.

We have centralized and standardized the technology components into Singapore, creating a global footprint which can be utilized for supporting our regional subsidiaries and the branches around the world. We operate and support 19 countries with this architecture to provide a secure and flexible banking infrastructure.

Our Operations divisions provide transactional customer services for our businesses while also focusing on cost efficiency through process improvements, automation and straight through processing.

Job Responsibilities
Translate high-level requirements into detailed documentation within the organisation’s context.
Envision and design end-to-end business processes while keeping an eye on the details.
Communicate and clarify requirements with developers.
Identify and clearly document dependencies.
Work with architect, development and vendor team on the smooth delivery of the solution.
Direct the offshore squad in making day-to-day decisions and conflict resolution.
Gather critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful documentation.
Evaluate and analyse existing business processes, and uncover areas for improvements.

Job Requirements
Bachelor Degree in related field or equivalent experience
Good understanding of digital banking products and processes, and corporate banking.
At least 10 years of experience as a System Analyst and have worked in Java, REST API, middleware tools.
Knowledge of Payment products supported in Asian countries
Must have technical knowledge of databases (good knowledge of SQL, SQL tuning)
Excellent functional / technical / documentation skills.
Extremely detail oriented

Be a part of UOB Family

UOB is an equal opportunity employer. UOB does not discriminate on the basis of a candidate's age, race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or other non-merit factors. All employment decisions at UOB are based on business needs, job requirements and qualifications. If you require any assistance or accommodations to be made for the recruitment process, please inform us when you submit your online application.

Apply now and make a difference."
Account Executive (Growth) - Singapore,"Want to join the #1 marketing data pipeline company and one of Europe’s fastest-growing tech companies?

We’re now looking for Growth Sales Executives to join the growing Supermetrics Sales team in Singapore! In this role, you’ll lead the charge in expanding our existing customers with cross-selling and upselling in the South East Asian region as one of our top markets globally.

🧩 Why are we looking for you to become a key part of our team?

Our explosive growth has been achieved through superior products, marketing magic, and of course — our sales team. We're determined to build a world-class sales team to work with thousands of clients and leads from all around the globe. 🤩

We already have a team of more than 75 amazing sales professionals with a goal of doubling the team size this year, across our four sales office hubs in the US, Finland HQ, Dublin Ireland, and now Singapore. Our next phase of sales growth involves investing further resources and focus into the South East Asian region and we need your help to be an instrumental part in scaling the yet-untapped potential.

We already have more than 10% of our sales assisted revenue, and 2000 paying customers in the South East Asian region making it one of our top markets. With the help of a local Singapore team, we're looking forward to boosting that even further.

📝 Your Day-to-day Work And Responsibilities Will Include

Up-selling and cross-selling to our existing customers
Executing sales calls & product demos
Sending proposals typically to at least 50% of conversations
Updating Salesforce with all activities - we love our data to be clean and accurate
Following up on your sent proposals
Negotiating and closing deals
Meeting with the team! We have two internal meetings a week, where we share tips, share our thoughts, track progress against team goals and keep the team spirit up

Sometimes you need to prioritise some things over others depending on your own and your team's situation. So despite having some set activities, no two days will look the same.

💪 This Role Is For You If You Have

For you to be successful in this role and to be able to achieve your goals, you need to have at least 1-5 years of sales experience from B2B, SaaS or Software. Excellent written and verbal communication skills in English are a must. We highly value any experience from selling internationally that you might've gathered so far.

These Skills Are Also Highly Appreciated At Supermetrics

High commitment and strong track record of attaining goals
Positivity and desire to uplift and share knowledge with those around you. We're not competing against our colleagues, but sharing knowledge within the team and taking pleasure in seeing each other succeed
Experience within digital marketing, business intelligence or data warehousing is a definite plus ➡️ you're selling to marketing & data professionals

What’s in it for you?

We’ve managed to achieve significant financial success with zero salespeople initially and then boost the company even further by building a high-achieving sales organization. You can help with getting our company to the next level and become part of our success story.

The reason people love to work at Supermetrics is that we all work towards the same goal using our own individual strengths. We’re determined to achieve our vision of being the best business data pipeline company in the world.

At Supermetrics, we have unrivaled team spirit and a shared thirst for continuous learning and sharing our knowledge. We take our work seriously - not so much ourselves. We recognize our team as our greatest asset and take good care of our people.

Here’s more info about our culture and benefits!

In case we haven’t met before, here’s Supermetrics in a nutshell:

We are a diverse community of curious minds and data geeks that are excited to build the best business data solutions out there. Kindness, humility, openness, and dedication to our respective crafts are some of our most prevalent traits.
We build products that are used by 500,000 people around the world in small and large companies alike (our more well-known customers include Nestlé, Dyson, Disney, and Warner Bros to name a few).
We currently have offices in the US, Ireland, Finland and Lithuania and have 200+ employees working in different functions.
If you want to see what we're all about, click here for more info."
Senior Data Engineer (142264),"Responsibilities:
Design, develop and automate large scale, high-performance distributed data processing systems (batch and/or real-time streaming) that meet both functional and non-functional requirements
Deliver high level & detailed design to ensure that the solution meet business requirements and align to the data architecture principles and technology stacks
Partner with business domain experts, data scientists, and solution designers to identify relevant data-assets, domain data model and data solutions. Collaborate with product data engineers to coordinate backlog feature development of data pipelines patterns and capabilities
Own and lead data engineering projects; data pipelines delivery with reliable, efficient, testable, & maintainable artifacts, involves ingest & process data from a large number and variety of data sources
Build, optimize and contribute to shared Data Engineering Frameworks and tooling, Data Products & standards to improve the productivity and quality of output for Data Engineers
Design and build scalable Data APIs to host Operational data and Data-Lake assert in Data[1]Mesh / Data Fabric Architecture
Drive Modern Data Platform operations using Data Ops, ensure data quality, monitoring the data system. Also support Data science MLOps platform 8. Drive and deliver industry standard Devops (CI/CD) best practices, automate development and release management
Understand data security standards, use data security guidelines & tools to apply and adhere to the required data controls across data platform, data pipelines, applications and access end points
Support and contribute to data engineering product and data pipeline documentations, development guidelines & standards for data-pipeline, data model and layer design

We are committed to a safe and healthy environment for our employees & customers and will require all prospective employees to be fully vaccinated

Requirements:
Minimum of 8 years of experience in Data Engineering, Data Lake Infrastructure, Data Warehousing, Data Analytics tools or related, in design and developing of end-to-end scalable data pipelines and data products
Experience in building and operating large and robust distributed data lakes (multiple PBs) and deploying high performance with reliable system with monitoring and logging practices
Experience in designing and building data products and pipelines using some of the most scalable and resilient open-source big data technologies; Spark, Delta-Lake, Kafka, Flink, Airflow, Presto and related distributed data processing
Build and deploy high performance modern data engineering & automation frameworks using programming languages such as Scala/Python and automate the big data workflows such as ingestion, aggregation, ETL processing etc
Good understanding of data modeling and high[1]end design, data engineering / software engineering best practices - include handling and logging errors, monitoring the system, fault-tolerant pipelines, data quality and ensuring a deterministic pipeline with DataOps
Excellent experience in using ANSI SQL for relational databases like – Postgres, MySql, Oracle and knowledge of Advanced SQL on distributed analytics
Experience working in Telco Data Warehouse and / or Data Lake engines – Databricks SQL, Snowflake , etc
Proficiency programming languageslike Scala , Python, Java, Go, Rust or scripting languages like Bash
Experience on cloud systems like AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud Platform o Cloud data engineering experience in at least one cloud (Azure, AWS, GCP) o Experience with Databrick (Cloud Data Lakehouse)
Experience on Hadoop stack: HDFS, Yarn, Hive, HBase, Cloudera, Hortonworks
Experience on NoSQL
Experience on Event Streaming Platform, Message Queues like Kafka, Pulsar , Rabbit -MQ, Redis -MQ o Event Processing systems – Kafka Streaming, KSQL, Spark Streaming, Apache Flink, Apache Beam etc.
Build and deploy using CI/CD toolkits Technical"
Systems Engineer (Operations & Maintenance),"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Candidate Profile
Degree in Engineering with knowledge of programming
3 years of relevant working experience in an Operations & Maintenance (O&M) industry
Experience in using Maintenance Management systems, Asset Information systems.
Hands-on experience in Data Analytics, Visualization, and creating dashboards.
Key Responsibilities
Support O&M Team to ensure equipment are available with high reliability.
Develop, maintain and keep up-to-date Asset Information Systems and Maintenance Management Systems.
Monitor and test application performance for potential issues and bottlenecks, identify possible solutions and work with relevant stakeholders.

Desired Skills and Experience
Maintenance Management, analysis of faults, fault diagnosis, Fault management, Maintenance & Repair, Operations Management, Asset Integrity, Asset Integrity Management, Corrective Maintenance Management, Reliability, Fault Reporting, Visualization, Data Analytics, Repair & maintenance"
.Net Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Will be involved in the full lifecycle of projects encompassing requirements gathering, planning, development, testing, release and support.

Key Roles and Responsibilities
We are looking for Developers with a strong technical background. you will be responsible for the design, implementation, testing and deploying end-to-end software solutions with the following key responsibilities:
Develop the selected User Stories that have been selected from the Sprint Backlog
Ensure developed features fulfilled all agreed acceptance criteria
Ensure Sprint items developed and completed within the agreed Sprint duration
Perform unit testing and resolve any buys reported by QA
Responsible for design, build and deployment of code to testing environment with best practices.
Work with API/Infrastructure lead on technical design for the C# and APIs
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree/Diploma in Computer Science, Computer Studies, Information Technology or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years or more of software development experience
Experience in C#, .Net core and SQL data schema development
Cloud native development experience, preferably with AWS - lambda and docker
Experience with Web Services, Microservices and API development
Knowledge of Message Queue, Events Kafka preferred
Experience with Angular, React JS – Optional (good to have)
Experience in Agile development experience
Ability to work in a team as well as independently
Effective at acquiring an understanding of a problem or situation, with good problem-solving skill.
Familiar with common programming design patterns and best practices

Desired Skills and Experience
API Development, ReactJS, .NET, .NET Core, SQL, Angular, Cloud, API, Software Development, Agile Development"
Senior Software Engineer - Java,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
As an API developer, you will work closely with multiple teams, including Digital Channels, Enterprise Architecture, Infrastructure and other business and technology teams to ensure solutions are aligned with overall strategy.

Project Details : Digital Banking Project
Bachelor’s Degree in computer science or computer engineering
At least 2+ years of hands-on experience on API deployment;
6+ years of experience as software engineer in the following domains:
Java EE including (Web Services, REST, JPA).
Spring, SOA, Design patterns.
Database (SQL & No SQL)
Knowledge and experience with CI/CD tools
API usage in Mobile technologies
Mandatory
Strong Java technical Expertise
Strong critical thinker with problem solving aptitude.
Good written and oral communication skills
Proven/previous experience with CI/CD, DevOps and Agile.
Hands-on experience on API related activities: requirement analysis, design, resource-based API modeling, micro-services architecture
Knowledge about API design standards, patterns and best-practices
Hands-on experience in API security standards and implementation
Plus
General banking knowledge or Banking knowledge related to Private banking
Speaking at conferences and/or user groups
Contributing to open source projects
Exposure to the following domains is a plus: Analytics, Mobile Technologies.

Desired Skills and Experience
Git, Oral Communication Skills, Web Services, Modeling, Design Patterns, REST, Agile, Problem Solving, Private Banking, Open Source, Enterprise Architecture, Continuous Integration, SOA, Banking, Java, API"
Software Developer,"This job is sourced from a job board. Learn more
Description
Develop and support clinic software and web services/API that exchanges data with government services.
Research for advanced software solutions to improve productivity and performance of both HQ and clinic staffs.
Develop solutions using C#/VB.NET with MSSQL database
Responsible for the 2nd level application support and able to analyse problems with users independently
To create dashboard to monitor production system status
Develop system that are secure and compliance with the IT security policy and development best practice.
Requirements
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent.
3+ years of programming experience in ASP.NET, Entity Framework, MVC, C#, VB.NET, AJAX
Experience in designing Web API/ SOAP web service with best practice
Experience in writing SQL script for data analysis
Experience with HTML and CSS with responsive design experience, including cross-browser/cross-device differences
Candidate with knowledge of Cloud computing like Amazon Web Services, Microsoft or Google Cloud
Experience in the healthcare industry is strongly preferred
Experience in App Script to design dashboard on google sheet
Able to write documentation such as flowcharts, layouts, diagrams, charts, code comments and clear code
Able to support system during clinic operational hours
Able to work independently with minimum supervision

Desired Skills and Experience
Web Service, MVC, ASPNet, CSS, Cloud Computing, HTML, Security Policy, SQL, AJAX, Writing, Vbnet, Web API, C#, Entity Framework, Able To Work Independently"
